And a very disturbing thing has been that sometimes, someone down the line leaks, maybe, some of these options that have simply been drafted to make sure that we get the whole picture. And suddenly we're reading in the press or hearing on television that this is what we're going to do.

And in a number of cases, it hasn't even come to me or to the Cabinet yet. It's still down there in that process of putting all the options together. And, again, sometimes it has made more difficult the solution to the problem that we're trying to solve.

And so, I really am pretty upset about the leakers, but with regard to national security, we're not doing anything that I think unfairly imposes a restriction on the right of the people to know or the freedom of information as far as you of the press are concerned. As a matter of fact, I have had now over 120 interviews since I've been in office and numerous press availabilities and so forth.

As you know, we've had a history of the quick fix -- artificial stimulant of the money supply generates some government spending -- and, yes, we would cure that immediate recession, except that we had laid the groundwork for an even worse recession about 2 to 3 years later. And this has been the whole pattern.

Well, we started with an idea of correcting what is basically wrong: that government is taking too big a share of the gross national product, too much in taxes from the people; that we've had punitive regulations toward business and industry that have prevented American industry from modernizing and being able to keep pace with our competitors worldwide. And so we set out to change this with that economic program we introduced in 1981.

Now, at no time have we been given all that we asked for in the reductions of spending. As a matter of fact, right now the '83 budget, the deficit would be $41 billion less if we had just been given the cuts that we asked for and which were brought to us by our agency heads and Cabinet members as the figure that they said they could do the job with and live with.

The basic thing is to get inflation down. Always before in the quick-fix thing, inflation has gone up. The problem we have now with the deficits is to get them on a declining pattern. And, again, the 1984 budget that we have offered is one that will. The immediate deficit and probably the 1984 budget deficit are going to be rather large. But in a 5-year projection out there, they're on a downward path to where you then can look and say, continuing on this course, here's where we balance the budget.

At the same time, one of the things that has hindered recovery or modernization of business in the past is government's excessive borrowing from the private sector, which has shut off the capital supply. But our own economic program has so stimulated private savings that there is a much larger capital pool out there for borrowing, and even with the deficits that we view the government is not going to be hogging all of the private capital that is available. So, I think we're on the right track.

Secretary Watt seems to create a lot of problems for himself and your administration on environmental issues as well as musical issues. [Laughter] How do you answer charges that the administration is not doing its job to protect our environment?

On the environmental side, I know an image has been created, and he's become quite a lightning rod, but I have to tell you that I don't know of anyone in that department who has done a better job than has been done so far with regard to environmental protection and to our refurbishing of our parks.

When we took office, we found that the National Park System was very dangerously down to a level of lack of health and safety provisions in the parks, that the funding, before our arrival -- now, here I am talking about spending money, not saving it -- that the funding for the maintenance and upkeep of our parks had been literally a starvation diet, about as bad as it had been for national defense. And we have spent, in just these couple of years, more than was spent in the entire previous 4 years on putting our national parks back in shape.

But let me just, if I can, give you one example of what I think is a distortion of the record. Now, maybe sometimes he asked for it by careless remarks or something, but there has been no reduction in our ability -- Good Lord, as Governor of California, we led the whole Nation in the things that we put into effect environmentally, while I was there. And this is the one thing that I'd like to mention: Before, several years ago, 174 million acres of land in the United States was classified as potential wilderness land to be added to the 80 million acres of wilderness land that we now have. But the law said that to be eligible to be added, it must be adjacent to the wilderness land. It must also meet the requirements of no roads or paths, no trails, be completely pristine and wilderness. It must not have any dual ownership, such as someone or some other government entity owning, let's say, mineral rights underneath the soil.

Now, during the previous administration, in the study of these 174 million acres, 150 million acres were ruled as not eligible under the law, and they were just taken out of the consideration. And not a word was said by anyone.

Now, this Department of Interior inherited 24 million acres left that was still supposed to be studied. And at a moment when some of them had been studied, 800,000 acres were ruled as ineligible under the law for wilderness consideration -- less than a million, compared to 150 million. And somehow the whole image throughout the country was created that he'd taken a million acres or so out of the wilderness land, the existing wilderness. And he hadn't. He was still going along with the law that says we -- now we've got about 23 million acres to continue studying as to whether we should add any of that to wilderness land.

The President. Well, I don't believe that there's danger of us being involved in that war. We did this at a request -- along with our allies in the multinational force, as it's called -- to help provide order while the Lebanese Government -- this was anticipating the removal from Lebanon's soil of Syrian troops, several thousand PLO that are still in there, and the Israeli troops -- until Lebanon, which for 8 years has been in, virtually, a state of war between various fighting factions and has not been in charge of its own destiny -- that Lebanon can assume the sovereignty over its own soil. And in order to permit them to do that and to bring these factions together, the multinational force was created as a kind of an, as I say, an order-keeping force. There's no intention of them engaging in combat, fighting on one side or the other with any faction.

We've made great progress with Israel in regard to the agreement of them withdrawing below their northern border. There are still a few sticking points, and that's why George Shultz has gone over there now to see if those can't be removed. The Syrians and the PLO have both announced several times that if Israel leaves, they will withdraw also. And at that point -- and we've sent training forces over also to help in the training of the Lebanese Army. And as soon as this is done and Lebanon has sovereignty again and responsibility for its own borders we'll bring our multinational forces home.

Mr. Marcil. Thank you very much, Mr. President. It's been an honor having you with us. We'd like to have you do just -- [applause]. Thank you very much. We'd like to ask you to do just one thing for us when you get back to the White House. Please give our best wishes to a man whose professionalism and courage we so much admire: Jim Brady.

John H. Rousselot, to be Special Assistant to the President for Public Liaison. He will also serve as Deputy Director of the Office of Public Liaison. He will oversee White House relationships with business and other constituencies concerned with issues of commerce, trade, and agriculture.

The President. I have just concluded a productive meeting and lunch with Prime Minister Trudeau and the other representatives of the Canadian Government. There's no country for whom the people of the United States feel a deeper affection than your own, Mr. Prime Minister, and I'm particularly pleased that you and your colleagues were able to come at this time.

We discussed our search for solutions to economic problems facing Canada and the United States as well as the less fortunate countries and our efforts to achieve peace and security throughout the world. We also examined several pressing bilateral issues.

I'm pleased that we continue to approach these areas of common concern in a cooperative spirit based on our shared democratic values and traditions. The Prime Minister and I agree that challenges also present opportunities and can be used as steppingstones toward a secure and prosperous world that we both seek.

Much of our discussion today focused on the upcoming Williamsburg Summit, and we agreed that this meeting comes at an opportune moment. The Western economies are pulling out of the serious recession, and we're seeking ways to ensure continued progress. The Prime Minister and I are confident of an open and free exchange at Williamsburg, that it will contribute to a better understanding and encourage the creative approaches for economic cooperation. We discussed the importance of resisting protectionist pressures and maintaining the open trade and investment policies that have served us so well.

The issue of security was also a part of our discussions. I outlined the need to maintain effective deterrent force and to achieve real movement toward the reduction of nuclear weapons. The Prime Minister was supportive and emphasized Canada's earnest hope that the talks in Geneva will lead to a safer world.

We also discussed the need for progress in strengthening measures to prevent nuclear proliferation, including the importance of having other supplier states adopt the comprehensive safeguards for export requirement.

I would perhaps, following another track, suggest that on the arrangements for Williamsburg, I was particularly happy that you confirmed to me that you would be determined, as you said you would be, to ensure that the talks at Williamsburg were unstructured and, hopefully, that we won't be meeting in order to justify an agenda and a communique that other people had written for us beforehand, but that we would be meeting there much in the spirit that you and I have been meeting these past hours, to really exchange ideas, to get to the bottom of our feelings, so that we can contribute -- and it would be the first time, I think, in a spontaneous way at these summits -- contribute to the building of a consensus, rather than, once again, trying to talk in a way that's said that our Sherpas had prepared a consensus before, and they wrote a communique, and we were trying to live up to it.

And that is what I find very exciting about this coming Williamsburg Summit, that the material arrangements that you are taking and your intentions, as you expressed them to me, do lead me to hope that on economic matters, first, that we will really be asking each other questions and looking together for creative answers on the various problems you've mentioned, including the most serious overriding problem of the world trade and payment system, including the effect of the huge Third World debt now on our own coming prosperity. We, too, believe that the economy has turned around, that this is our duty to make sure that at Williamsburg that that recovery is lasting and deep and not just another hope in people's minds.

NATO two-track policy, is being followed, I believe, by your government, sir, and, certainly, by the other NATO governments in that we are every bit as determined to make the effort to reduce the number and strength of the SS - 20's, which are aimed at Western Europe -- negotiations to get a reduction or, hopefully, even the disappearance of those, as are our efforts to ensure that the other track, the one of the deployment of the Pershing II's and of the land-based cruise missiles is followed.

In other words, I've been encouraged by the steps that you've taken, Mr. President, in the past months when you proposed an interim solution different from the zero-option, when you proposed a series of confidence-building measures. I think these are all initiatives which we need in NATO so that our people will understand that we want peace and that we're not determined to escalate any arms race. We're more determined to seek ways of reaching a lasting peace and that that is very much part of our politics. And, as I say, I've felt encouraged by the steps that your administration, sir, has taken in the last few weeks.

Q. Senator, there are a lot of people on the Hill who are saying that even the Republican Senators were not happy about your selection; that they don't think you have the diplomatic credentials, the stature, or -- nothing personal, of course. [Laughter] But how do you feel about that?

Senator Stone. I feel pretty good about it because I know those gentlemen and it's going to work out just fine. And I think that the vote, the confirming vote will be strong and supportive. I need a strong, supportive vote to do a job as difficult as this. It isn't going to be easy.

Senator Stone. I have many friends there, I speak Spanish, I've carried out at least one successful mission, and I think that I can advance the diplomatic principles clearly spelled out in the President's speech of last night.

Senator Stone. Using the four principles announced in the President's speech last night and the four assurances, diplomatic assurances in support of those four goals, the envoy will do his best to meet -- both within countries and as between countries in Central America -- to try to move our difficulties and their difficulties to the conference table, to invite opposition groups to participate in a peaceful political process, and to facilitate and support the efforts of the Latin nations themselves to set their own agendas and advance those agendas towards peace.

Q. Senator, one of the problems that some people who have been critical of this selection are saying is that you are so identified with the right-wing elements in Latin America that you would not be a credible representative to bring in the left-wing insurgents into these conferences and negotiations. Can you answer that criticism?

Senator Stone. I don't think that this is a matter of personality so much as it is principle. If the left, or all opposition groups -- because some are left and some are not left -- if all opposition groups consent to participate in a peaceful political process, not only will I not stand in the way, I'm going to do everything I can to advance that process.

Senator Stone. It's not a question of trusting me; it's a question of trusting the Latin nations themselves. They are going to set this agenda, and we will do our best to support that agenda. For example, there is a group known as the Contadora Four -- Mexico, Panama, Venezuela, and Colombia. They have been working diligently to try to set an agenda for peace conferences, peace talks. We will support that. Another more expanded group is called Five-Plus-Five. Another group participated in the San Jose meetings that resulted in the San Jose Principles. And within countries, for example, within Salvador, we have an appointed Peace Commission headed by a Roman Catholic bishop and made up of two independents -- I'll get to you in one second, Lou [Lou Cannon, Washington Post].

Secretary of State, really on behalf of all Americans who want peace. And I think that the trustworthiness of the American people and the American government is beyond reproach. I'll advance that trustworthiness as an asset.

Q. How optimistic are you, Senator, of a negotiated settlement to the conflict in El Salvador? And if you think that is possible, what kind of a time frame are we talking about in your mind, realizing that you can't be precise about it?

Senator Stone. The odds are long. It's a very difficult situation. Anyone who thinks that a mere invitation to peace will produce peace is just inaccurate and unrealistic. This will be just as hard a fight as military fighting is hard. But it is so worthwhile and it is in so much in everyone's interest, that I hope and trust we can advance towards it. As to how long it takes, obviously, the sooner the better. We'll do the best we can. I'll draw on every resource of the ARA Bureau [Bureau of Inter-American Affairs], of Assistant Secretary Enders and his very capable staff, as well as Members of Congress, leaders in this country, and men and women of good will everywhere.

Senator Stone. I think that when we get into the details of how this mission will be carried out or who will be talked to or the timetables, that is the kind of question that has to be reserved for the Senate Foreign Relations Committee. I'm going to answer all their questions, and I hope and trust that that one and others will be asked. And by that time, we'll have appropriate answers fully cleared by the State Department, as well as just one person standing up here.

Senator Stone. I really don't think so. My two assignments were to try to advance towards a peace with Belize and to try to get an improvement of human rights in Guatemala sufficient to entitle and warrant a restoration of U.S. relations and support. And I worked very diligently towards that with the ARA Bureau, with Secretary Enders, with the Director of Central American Affairs, Craig Johnstone, and others, in great detail as well as on general principle. And I think both of those goals were so worthwhile that it will not only not hurt me, I think it's going to help me.

And let me just say that that is one of the goals that we all should seek. We all think of the peace situation as involving only, for example, Nicaragua, Honduras, Costa Rica, and El Salvador. The fact is, that as between some of those countries bilaterally, peace could be attained, the kind of peace relationships that would last.

Senator Stone. Well, let me just step outside of the envoy situation for one minute and return to my capacity as Vice Chairman of the President's Commission on Radio Broadcasting to Cuba. I think the most effective and best thing we can do is to bring fair, full, and free information to the people of Cuba about the cost they are bearing in the adventurism of that government around the world, not just in Central America. I am in support of that. I sense and detect increasing congressional support of that, and I hope and trust that the Congress will act on that proposal as soon as possible.

Q. Senator, how do you propose to get the guerrillas in El Salvador into elections, particularly given the fact that you have represented a right-wing government in Guatemala? I'm talking now not in terms of negotiations between countries, but trying to get the rebels in one country to join the political process in that country?

Senator Stone. It's going to be very difficult, and as long as the guerrillas believe that they are going to win total victory militarily, it's going to be very difficult to get them to the table. But we must try. We must invite them to participate in the upcoming elections, which we have to support -- the government of El Salvador to make as accessible to all and as safe to all candidates as possible.

Senator Stone. Mr. President, I'm proud of the speech that you made last night. I think you really described the administration's program fully, fairly, and I think the response of it has been wonderful today. And I appreciate so much your coming in here now.

The President. Well, I just came in because I just wanted to say that I'm delighted that you're going to do this and that you've agreed to do it. And I know the good job that you'll do for us down there.

The President. No, I think that it just adds to the experience that he's had down there. And I know the job that he can do and, as I say, I'm delighted. And, as I said last night, we want bipartisanship in this, and so we come together as members of the two major parties.

Q. Mr. President, it's been said that your choice for this position, that this gentleman does not have the trust of the rebels in El Salvador. Will they, then, use that as a good reason to not come to an agreement?

Senator Stone. Mr. President, you didn't hear the word that she said. She said the trust and confidence of the rebels. And I think what you were talking about is the trust and the confidence of the Salvadorans.

The President. Yes, I was quite aware of that and not too surprised by it, either. But I guess that's what this business is all about, is having differences of opinion. And very frankly, I didn't find any substance in what he had to say.

But I have to tell you the truth. I didn't hear about the wonderful work that Cenikor is doing all on my own. The idea of my being here is from Nancy, and maybe you've seen her -- big hazel eyes, slender, pretty. Well, Nancy heard about you when she was in Texas, and she recommended that I stop by. And I'm certainly glad that I did.

We're different ages. As a matter of fact, I have lived about half again as long as my life expectancy when I was born. That's a source of annoyance to a number of people. [Laughter] But I think we'd be surprised to learn how much we do have in common. We believe in many of the same things, such as the opportunity, hard work, and self-confidence that work can bring. And it is beliefs that bind people together.

I also believe in the philosophy that Cenikor symbolizes. This center is self-sufficient, just like all of you will soon be. Cenikor receives no Federal money, and so no Federal strings come attached.

A plane was coming up the west coast of Florida over the Gulf, that we had reason to believe was suspicious. A government plane, plus an Army Blackhawk helicopter, piloted by Customs people, were on its tail when it landed on a grassy strip near La Belle, Florida. The Blackhawk then landed. The two drug smugglers jumped from the plane to run away. In fact, one of them swam across the canal and hid in the bushes. The alligators didn't get him, but the enforcement people did, and we seized 625 pounds of cocaine, which I'm told has a conservative value of $187\1/2\ million. And I don't know how you feel about it, but -- well, I think I do -- but when I just stop to think of the little handful of misbegotten people that would have been getting that $187\1/2\ million, I'm delighted that somebody headed them off and that money --  Somebody from Houston, the Vice President, George Bush, is in charge of the Florida Task Force. Since last Saturday, 1,015 pounds of cocaine have been thwarted from entering the United States market.

I was glancing through your Cenikor booklet, and I liked the very first sentence I read. ``In all the years that Cenikor has been in business rehabilitating lives, we have found that nothing works as well as work itself.'' Work is therapy. You feel better about yourself when you have something productive to do. And that's why I worry so much about today, so many Americans who don't have jobs. It's hard on them not only economically but psychologically. I also know the stresses that you here have been through and still are going through. I know what you're undertaking to put your lives in order, and it isn't easy. From what I've been told, you're learning again, or in some cases, for the first time, what self-confidence, pride, and respect mean to you personally.

And when you get along to where I am, you find out taking care of that machinery sure pays off when you get along to this stage, and you can still tie your own shoes and pull on your socks without sitting down -- [laughter] -- and do a lot of things that are much more enjoyable than that.

I believe, as it said in that booklet, that the only limits to your achievement are those that are self-imposed. I believe in you and what each one of you can accomplish. You're working your way back, and I can tell you that all the rest of us are eagerly awaiting your return.

Note: The President spoke at 3:18 p.m. in the cafeteria of the residential facility to the board of directors, residents, and staff of the foundation. Prior to his remarks, the President viewed a display of goods manufactured by the residents. He was accompanied on a tour of the center by Ken Barun, president of the Cenikor Foundation, a nonprofit drug and alcohol rehabilitation center.

Now, I know it's not easy to corral Texans into a political party. It's always an experience coming down here to be with you Texas Republicans. Everything is so big, and I hesitate, but I'm going to dare the fates. I know that there aren't very many stories about the size of Texas that aren't known to all Texans, but maybe there are some outlanders here who might not have heard it.

But seriously, though, as much as people joke about big Texas, your ``Lone Star State'' plays an increasingly important role in directing the future of this country. And there's one great service that Texas can render to the United States next year: Return to the United States Senate the man who's proven himself second-to-none in his determination to improve America's economic well-being and to improve her national security -- your Senator, John Tower.

I've known and admired John Tower for many years, but it wasn't until I got into my current job that I fully appreciated his many talents. In the '80 election, we pledged to make America strong again, militarily and economically. Well, I can tell you without any hesitation, Senator John Tower has been indispensable in putting us on the road toward success in both those fields.

Over the years, John has stood firm -- sometimes like a voice in the wilderness -- against the tax-tax, spend-spend philosophy that pushed America to the brink of disaster. And since the '80 election, when we finally managed to get some leverage, he has provided the expertise and the leadership that was needed to deal with the economic crisis that we inherited.

Every time I come to Texas I feel like a kid showing his report card to his family. I just want you to know that before I start, in all the areas in which we've scored A's, we couldn't have done it without John Tower.

I know it's getting difficult to remember -- we're told that political memories are very short -- but it wasn't that long ago when inflation was public enemy number one. We were told that it would be more than a decade before we could ever hope to conquer inflation. Well, it has come down from 12.4 percent to 3.6 percent last year, and for the first 6 months, or the last 6 months, I should say, it has been down to one-half of 1 percent, and it hasn't been there for 22 years.

I hear a lot about compassion in Washington from those who want us to return to the policies of the past, but it's about time we take a close look at what would have happened had we permitted the inflation, caused by their policies, to remain double digit. If inflation had continued as it was, not increased, just stayed where it was, before we all took office, a family of four on a fixed income of $20,000 would be more than $1,500 poorer in purchasing power today, but also they would have been further impoverished by much higher taxes.

And what was inflation doing to our economy? Savings and investment sank as the people, trying to protect what they could, put their money into nonproductive inflation hedges and those who could afford it, into tax shelters. With inflation running double digits for 2 years back-to-back, interest rates shot right through the roof, knocking the wind out of construction, automobile, and other major industries -- a blow from which they're just now beginning to recover. Consumer spending hit the skids when, again, because of inflation and over-taxation, the real income of our working people began to drop, a total reversal of anything we'd ever experienced in the American history.

By getting control of inflation, we've channeled savings back into stocks and other productive investments. The stock market, reflecting the new confidence that's spreading throughout the country, has shot up 400 points, reaching an alltime high, and it's still rising. The interest rates are down from the 21\1/2\ percent when we took off, to 10\1/2\ percent now. And I think we're going to knock them down even lower in the very near future.

But even now, homebuilding and auto sales are far above what they were only a year ago. Real wages are up, as is productivity and consumer spending. The leading economic indicators rose again in March for the seventh straight month. And, of course, as John told you already, I think the greatest and most positive indicator of all is they aren't calling it Reaganomics anymore.

The budget was growing at a rate of 17\1/2\ percent in 1980. We've cut it by 40 percent. Taxes and regulations were strangling incentive and tying the hands of our most productive citizens. As of July, we will have cut personal tax rates 25 percent. And I can assure you tonight, we're not going to retreat one iota on the tax rate reduction or indexing.

The quickest way to short circuit this recovery would be to increase the taxes on our people. We don't have a trillion-dollar debt because you weren't taxed enough. We have a debt of that size because government has been spending too much.

I think we can be rightfully proud that we've set in place a program that should deliver America a strong and sustained non-inflationary economic progress -- or program. And I realize that many problems remain. Areas long dependent on the old smokestack industries are still suffering from dislocation that comes with technological transition. We're trying to help with training programs for those without skills, or whose skills are no longer in demand.

In south Texas, the people are also suffering in this time from something which no American can control -- the peso devaluation and the economic crisis in Mexico. Senator Tower has a program to help the people in south Texas who are bearing the brunt of this problem. And I can assure you, we are now seriously examining his proposals at the White House at this time.

But getting our economy back on its feet is only half the job. It won't matter how prosperous we become unless we're at peace and secure from foreign aggression. And that's another reason I'm proud to be here tonight. I can think of no other United States Senator -- not one -- who has contributed more to the security needs of the United States than Senator John Tower.

I won't go into all the details. I think you know, though, that during most of the seventies, the security needs of America were neglected. During that time, the real national defense spending dropped 21.6 percent. Our Navy went from nearly 1,000 ships to under 500. Research and development was cut back. Weapons systems were cancelled. And by the end of the decade, our military personnel depended on weapons and equipment that had been designed by and for a previous generation.

By 1980 morale in the Armed Forces was at a low ebb, reflecting a serious erosion of military pay and, just as important, a seeming lack of appreciation for the job our soldiers, sailors, airmen, and marines were doing.

And at this same time when we voluntarily reduced our military commitment, the Soviets went into high gear, increasing their military capability -- conventionally and strategically -- beyond any legitimate defensive requirements.

This administration has received a good deal of criticism for our defense proposals. But, just like the domestic program, we're simply trying to make up for the irresponsibility of the past. Now, let me make one thing plain: We will not tolerate waste in the defense budget, but neither will we permit the Communist dictatorship to militarily dominate this planet.

We can't ask the brave young men and women in our Armed Forces to protect America with second-rate equipment and bargain-basement weapons. If they can put their lives on the line to protect our way of life, we can afford to give them the weapons and equipment they need to do the job right.

And now, to those who always are so in haste to say that's warlike and that we want a war, you can't look, as I do so often, at the faces of those young men and women in our uniform and ever think for 1 minute that you would want to send them into combat. They are there as peacemakers to deter any possible attack, to preserve the peace, simply because of their ability and their dedication to this country.

There come many thrilling moments in a job like mine, but none has exceeded the thrill that I feel at the dedication, the esprit de corps, the morale of our people in uniform today, in contrast to what it was no more than 2\1/2\ years ago.

But more recently, I received something else. With all of our talk about the budget and the sacrifice that we're asking people in government to make, and no pay increases and so forth, and no cost-of-living increases for a period while we attempt to get this budget under control, and that included the military -- and I opened a letter one day, and it was signed by over a hundred marines stationed in Italy. And they told me very briefly over their signatures, if this is what it takes to help the country, count them in. They will be happy to do without a pay raise.

Our national security rests as much on willpower as firepower. This generation of Americans faces tremendous responsibilities. There's nothing I want more than verifiable agreement with the Soviet Union to reduce the levels of strategic weapons. In the long run, that's the best way to lower the growth in defense spending. But the Soviets will only bargain in good faith if they understand we're determined to defend freedom. And I'm determined they will understand that.

America. The challenge we face there is not some threat in some distant land; it's a brush fire that's burning in our neighborhood. And you tonight know the truth of something I told the Congress: Texas is closer to El Salvador than it is to Massachusetts. And like it or not, the future freedom and peace of mankind rests on our shoulders.

If we try to take the easy way out, our children will suffer. In Central America, which is so close to home, we must be willing to counter aggression -- at the very least with financial and military aid -- or no one anywhere in the world will believe the word of the United States.

Today we have the opportunity to avert crisis by giving our friends support they need to defend themselves and to develop their economies and their democratic institutions. But we can't succeed if we're paralyzed by indecision. An old preacher once said to a young man asking advice, ``In life, you must believe your beliefs and have your doubts, but not the other way around.'' Today, while we recognize that honest people do have doubts, we, as a nation firmly grounded in individual freedom and representative government, must have the courage to believe our beliefs and act upon them.

Over the first 2\1/2\ years, it's never been clearer to me that the future of a free people doesn't depend so much on those who hold elected office. It depends on those outside the government -- on you at the grassroots. And while the history books may record events as they happened during this or that administration, the direction of a country is determined not so much by the leader as by the character of its people.

The President. I don't believe from -- looking from the outside, I don't believe there's ever been a better relationship or a working combination between the President and Vice President than we have had and that we have now.

The President. [Inaudible] For one thing, I've always believed, and did when I was Governor, that the Vice President is sort of like an executive vice president in a corporation. He's part of the team and makes a great contribution. And I must say, George is -- he's a part of everything we do in policymaking and carrying out the policy and he's -- believe me, he works hard. And his experience in the past in the CIA and in the field of diplomacy, as well as in Congress, have been invaluable.

The President. Yes. Usually, I'm a little ahead of them. I've asked for it before they tell me. He and I, we try -- in addition to everything else, we're in Cabinet meetings and everything there together -- but even so, then just the two of us try to have lunch at least once a week in the office.

Ms. Lewis. He, of course, will not tell me what those conversations are because that's a policy of his. He doesn't talk about what you talk about. Are there any examples you would feel free to tell me, of the kinds of conversations you have with him, the kinds of talk that goes on at those lunches?

The President. Let me just say that just in addition to the conversation that you have about the overall situation in the executive branch, whatever is the policy matter or the thing that -- there's always something hanging over you where a decision has to be made and, yes, we talk those things out.

The President. Yes, but I must say, he's -- and on that, he is most unselfish and generous in what he does both for the party, on party events, and out there in the hustings, selling the things that we're trying to do.

The President. I think there was -- not a misunderstanding between us, but there was a misunderstanding about where we were on this. But there was never any difference on our part but that we were pledged to the support of the Taiwan Initiative.

The President. Well, I could say that about all of them, because my way of doing business that I brought from California is not one in which a Cabinet member presents a case and everyone else remains silent rather than step on his turf. It's more like a board of directors. I want input from all sides, every shade of opinion. And then the only difference between that and a board of directors meeting is, I don't take a vote. I know that I have to make the decision. But everyone speaks up and presents views, and out of that is where I get what I need to know.

The President. Yes. And sometimes it's discussions of when there are visiting foreign ministers and so forth, that he will meet with them, perhaps, or entertain them while I'm doing something else, in addition to participating in the meetings together. And then, he'll bring me up to date on those things they've talked about. But also it is true that many times it's family and discussions and just general conversation.

Ms. Lewis. He'd be an asset to you, I would think, in some areas that perhaps you've had some problems with -- blacks, Hispanics, labor -- areas the administration would like to improve in. Is that an accurate assessment?

The President. It's so general, I don't think I could pin it down to one. That's like asking two fellows in a football game on the same team what part of the game did -- and under the best -- and it's just been a constant partnership.

Transportation, and Elizabeth Dole, the Secretary of Transportation, has not yet come to us with any recommendation. And we're certainly giving it full consideration, and I am waiting to hear what the recommendation will be.

The President. Well, everyone, I think, has to be treated individually. This one, of course, is unusual in the amount of local and private support for it, but it is a rather unusual situation, of course. It reflects something I believe in: the local autonomy and the private sector.

The President.  --  -- made him an active part of the administration and the Cabinet process and all. And it worked. And maybe there's been less that -- but it had never entered my mind that if I got this job, that I wouldn't do the same thing with the Vice President.

American heritage. The generosity and civic-mindedness of the American people has long been a noted aspect of our Nation. Since its inception, this has been a country in which neighbor has lent a hand to neighbor, and families have banded together to help one another in times of adversity.

Voluntary service remains as important today as it was in earlier decades. We cannot rely solely on institutions of government to provide remedies for our problems. Many of the solutions must be devised and supported by other individuals and private groups. Greater emphasis must be placed on developing increased community commitment to voluntary service and on developing more volunteer leaders.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 29th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

And we're awful proud for you to take this time to greet them, and I think this is a very special day to them. And the Phi Slama Jama has, I think, taken the Nation and the city of Houston -- the slam-dunking and the abilities of this team. And we'd like to make a special presentation to you.

Jama fraternity, it entitles him to all rights and privileges. And we would really like you to be a part of this Phi Slama Jama fraternity. And we have a T-shirt here that -- it will help you slam-dunk. [Laughter] It's what the guys wear, and it's to help you slam-dunk. And so we'd sure like to have you have that, also.

I'd like to talk with you today about a subject of paramount concern to every American family -- the education of our children. You may have heard the disturbing report this week by the National Commission on Excellence in Education that I created shortly after taking office. Their study reveals that our education system, once the finest in the world, is in a sorry state of disrepair.

We're a people who believe that each generation will stand upon the shoulders of the one before it, the accomplishments of each ever greater than the last. Our families immigrated here to make a better life not just for themselves, but for their children and their children's children. Education was not simply another part of American society; it was the key that opened the golden door.

Yet today, we're told in a tough report card on our commitment that the educational skills of today's students will not match those of their parents. About 13 percent of our 17-year-olds are functional illiterates and, among minority youth, the rate is closer to 40 percent. More than two-thirds of our high schoolers can't write a decent essay. Our grade is a stark and uncompromising ``U'' for unsatisfactory. We must act now and with energy if we're to avoid failing an entire generation.

Let me hasten to point out that America's children are just as smart today as they ever were. But most of them do less than an hour of homework a night. Many have abandoned vocational and college prep courses for general ones. When they graduate from high school, they're prepared for neither work nor higher education.

Those were years when the Federal presence in education grew and grew. Parental control over local schools shrank. Bureaucracy ballooned until accountability seemed lost. Parents were frustrated and didn't know where to turn.

Well, government seemed to forget that education begins in the home, where it's a parental right and responsibility. Both our private and our public schools exist to aid your families in the instruction of your children. For too many years, people here in Washington acted like your families' wishes were only getting in the way. We've seen what that ``Washington knows best'' attitude has wrought.

Our high standards of literacy and educational diversity have been slipping. Well-intentioned but misguided policymakers have stamped a uniform mediocrity on the rich variety and excellence that had been our heritage.

The National Commission for Excellence in Education recommends requiring 4 years of English in high school and 3 solid years, each, of math and science. It suggests more and longer school days, higher goals, and tougher standards for matriculation. Our teachers should be better trained and better paid. And, we must no longer make excuses for those who are not qualified to teach.

Parents, please demand these and other reforms in your local schools and hold your local officials accountable. Let our parents once again be the rudder that puts American education back on course towards success through excellence.

There are things the Federal Government can and must do to ensure educational excellence, but bigger budgets are not the answer. Federal spending increased seventeenfold during the same 20 years that marked such a dramatic decline in quality. We will continue our firm commitment to support the education efforts of State and local governments, but the focus of our agenda is, as it must be, to restore parental choice and influence and to increase competition between schools.

We've sent to the Congress a tuition tax credit plan and proposed a voucher system to help low- and middle-income families afford the schools of their choice. We've proposed education savings accounts to help families save for college education. We've sent legislation to the Congress that would create block grants for the training of math and science teachers, and another proposal would encourage those teachers to keep abreast of new developments in their fields. We've also begun an effort to honor some of our finest math and science teachers.

For the sake of all our children, our country, and our future, we must join together in a national campaign to restore excellence in American education. At home, in school, in State government, and at the Federal level, we must make sure we have put our children first and that their education is a top priority.

I would like to close with a special challenge to America's students who may think I just want to pile on more homework. Your generation is coming of age in one of the most challenging and exciting times in our history. High technology is revolutionizing our industries, renewing our economy, and promising new hope and opportunity in the years ahead. But you must earn the rewards of the future with plain hard work. The harder you work today, the greater your rewards will be tomorrow. Make sure you get the training and the skills you need to take advantage of the new opportunities ahead. Get a good education; that's the key to success. It will open your mind and give wings to your spirit. There's a dazzling new world waiting for you. My generation only discovered it. But you, by summoning all the faith, effort, and discipline you can muster can claim it for America.

You're a sure sign of spring; the arrival of the princesses here makes that positive. The festival symbolizes the spirit of friendship between the United States and Japan, as well as the beginning of spring.

The nations of the Western Hemisphere have been blessed with a common heritage that has bound them together in the pursuit of peace and harmony within the framework of democratic institutions. The annual proclamation of Pan American Day and Pan American Week has for 53 years stressed our unity of purpose and drawn the attention of the world to the significant achievements of the Inter-American system and the Organization of American States.

Through the OAS, the nations of the Americas have worked to fulfill their shared aspirations for peace, prosperity, and freedom. These goals form the cornerstone of the OAS and find eloquent expression in the OAS Charter. While other areas of the world have been fraught with strife, the OAS has been instrumental in maintaining the peace in this hemisphere. The peacekeeping mechanisms available to OAS member nations have proved responsive in a multitude of tests in the past, including those posed by the subversion and indirect aggression of Cuba and its partners.

The continued strength and resilience of these peacekeeping mechanisms should be of primary importance to all the nations of the Americas as we deal with the current challenges to peace, prosperity and freedom, especially in Central America.

Because in this century our hemisphere has been spared the violence other regions have had to endure, we have been fortunate to be able to dedicate our energies to the important tasks of economic, social, scientific, educational, and cultural development of our nations. In this effort to better the lives of our people, the OAS, through its technical councils and specialized Inter-American agencies, has served as a model for others.

Consistent with the spirit of the Inter-American system as expressed in the OAS Charter, the peoples of this hemisphere are turning more and more to democratic institutions as a means of solving the difficult problems we face. This is a vote of confidence in democracy as an effective means of governing -- a practical problem-solving mechanism -- not just an abstract political ideal.

During the bicentennial year of the birth of the great Liberator, Simon Bolivar, it is appropriate that we rededicate ourselves to the spirit of hemispheric solidarity that he symbolized. His example serves as an inspiration for all Americans to face the difficult challenges of our time.

Bolivar believed that diversity does not preclude unity. The kind of cooperation the Pan American nations enjoy today is based on mutual respect for the individual characteristics that distinguish us, as well as the long-standing ties that unite us. Pan American Day is a welcome opportunity to recognize this cooperation and the impressive progress we have made together.

On this Pan American Day of 1984, the people of the United States extend warm greetings to all of their neighbors in the Americas, and reaffirm their active support for the Organization of American States and the principles for which it stands.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 2nd day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

I am pleased that the judicial panel has acted promptly in responding to the Attorney General's request to name an independent counsel. The counsel's responsibilities are to assure the full and impartial investigation of the allegations concerning Ed Meese that have been raised in connection with his confirmation hearings. This will provide an opportunity to determine the facts in a fair and expeditious manner.

Abuse of children occurs in all segments of our society, in rural, suburban, and urban areas and among all racial, ethnic, and income groups. The time has come for Americans to unite in an all-out effort to eradicate child abuse, both physical and sexual, from the Nation.

Child abuse is a national concern, but it is a community and family problem first, and the answers must be found at the community level. Most physical and emotional violence takes place within the family. All Americans aware of the problem of child abuse must work for an end of this tragedy.

There is a place for everyone in this effort. By being a good neighbor to the family next door who may be under stress, Americans can be an enormous help. Our schools have an important role to play by educating children about parental roles and responsibilities, values, and appropriate behavior in the family setting. We must do what we can to reverse the trend of abused children becoming abusive parents. In addition, voluntary community self-help groups such as Parents Anonymous are taking positive steps to break this cycle.

In recognition of the need to find ways to prevent the agony of child abuse from continuing in future generations, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 161, has designated the month of April 1984 as ``National Child Abuse Prevention Month'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this period.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Almost every woman in our Nation looks forward to the rewards and joys of motherhood without overlooking the long-term effort that raising children demands. We are grateful to mothers for their willingness to give of themselves for their children's well-being, for their wholehearted belief in their offspring, for their love, for being wellsprings of hope, and for all the support they lend to us throughout life.

Motherhood is both a great responsibility and one of the most unique, rewarding, and pleasurable experiences life has to offer. Just as the family is the basis of a strong nation, so dedicated mothers are frequently the key to strong families. The quality and scope of their activities, as well as their overriding concern for the well-being of their families and the future of our country, inspire and strengthen us as individuals and as a Nation.

Committee of Principals shall consist of representatives from those Federal departments, agencies or entities, designated by the President, which lease or own telecommunications facilities or services of significance to national security or emergency preparedness, and, to the extent permitted by law, other Executive entities which bear policy, regulatory or enforcement responsibilities of importance to national security or emergency preparedness telecommunications capabilities.

Telecommunications Resources Board (JTRB) to assist him in the exercise of the functions specified in this subsection. The Director of the Office of Science and Technology Policy shall serve as chairman of the JTRB; select those Federal departments, agencies, or entities which shall be members of the JTRB; and specify the functions it shall perform.

Director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency with respect to the emergency management responsibilities assigned pursuant to Executive Order No. 12148, as amended; the Secretary of Commerce, with respect to responsibilities assigned pursuant to Executive Order No.

Administrator of General Services, consistent with policy guidance provided by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, shall ensure that Federally owned or managed domestic communications facilities and services meet the national security and emergency preparedness requirements of the Federal civilian departments, agencies and entities.

Principals, the Manager of the NCS, and other departments and agencies in the execution of the functions set forth in this Order, furnishing them such information, support and assistance as may be required.

Director of the Office of Management and Budget, or any office or official thereof; or reassign any function assigned any agency under the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended; or under any other law; or any function vested by law in the Federal Communications Commission.

President Bush to Geneva to present to the 40-nation Conference [Committee] on Disarmament a bold American initiative for a comprehensive, worldwide ban on chemical weapons. Our proposal would prohibit the production, possession, and use of chemical weapons.

The shortcomings of early chemical weapons treaties have been made tragically clear in recent years. Chemical weapons have been used against defenseless peoples in Afghanistan, in Southeast Asia, and in the conflict between Iran and Iraq. The use of these terrible weapons also has serious implications for our own security.

United States to maintain a limited retaliatory capability of its own until we achieve an effective ban. We must be able to deter a chemical attack against us or our allies. And without a modern and credible deterrent, the prospects for achieving a comprehensive ban would be nil.

Our comprehensive treaty proposal can bring the day closer when the world will prohibit all chemical weapons, but verification of a chemical weapons ban won't be easy. Only an effective monitoring and enforcement package can ensure international confidence in such an agreement.

This latest initiative reflects my continuing strong commitment to arms control. Our administration seeks to move forward in several areas. I'm pleased, for example, that the United States is also participating in a promising new multilateral negotiation dealing with confidence building measures in Europe, and in the recently resumed East-West talks on reducing conventional forces in Europe.

We're working closely with our NATO allies to try to make progress in all these areas. I can't report these promising developments, however, without expressing my deep, personal regret that the Soviet Union still has not returned to the two negotiations on nuclear arms reductions -- the START and the INF talks which it walked away from late last year.

The United States and many other countries have urged repeatedly that the Soviets return to these talks. So far, they've ignored the will of the world. I hope that the Soviet leadership will respond to our new initiatives, not only by negotiating seriously on chemical weapons but also by joining us in the urgent task of achieving real reductions in nuclear arms.

And this week you slammed the door on negotiations for killer satellites, which could lead to an arms race in space. My question is, how do these moves serve the cause of peace, and do you think that the country is really ready for wider involvement, military involvement around the world?

The President. I don't think that George meant to imply anything of that kind or that we're going to get more militant or anything. I think he was trying to express to those people that have been so concerned about arms and whether there's an arms race, and that is that your military strength is a definite part of diplomacy. And I think this is what he was trying to explain.

With regard to the space weapons, this is a situation in which the Soviet Union is ahead of us and already has -- and has in place -- such a weapon. We are still in the stage of studying such a thing.

The great problem that we have -- and we're very willing to enter into a treaty with regard to outlawing such weapons, except that it so far seems almost impossible to verify such a weapon, if not actually impossible. And if that's true, then we, again, must have a deterrent.

The President. Well, in both of them we're trying, but we, as we say, we have to face the reality that before you can place any confidence in such a treaty, you must be confident that you have the one thing that the Soviets have been the most reluctant to give in any treaties that we've ever had, or that we have with them, and that is verification procedures.

Q. Mr. President, more than a dozen members of your administration have left under some sort of a cloud, and this is what the Democrats are calling the sleaze factor. Are you concerned that voters might think there's a lack of integrity in the people that you've hired, and how are you going to deal with this as a campaign issue?

The President. Well, in the first place, I reject the use of the word ``sleaze,'' and I don't think that it fits any situation that we have here. I'll repeat what I have said many times before, and over a period of years. I believe the halls of government are as sacred as our temples of worship, and nothing but the highest integrity is required of those who serve in government. But at the same time, I also respect very much something that is very typically American, and that is you are innocent until proven guilty. And we're having an awful lot -- and have for the past several years -- of guilt by accusation. And I intend to protect that particular American tradition, and I would think that you would all feel a shared responsibility in doing the same thing -- that you're not guilty simply because you've been accused.

Now, I will be the first to remove anyone in the administration that does not have the highest integrity, and I adhere to that. At the same time, however, I'm not going to take any action that is based on accusation without proof, and I'm not going to take any action in any case for political expediency.

The President. Well, some of these people have simply -- they have left on their own, and they have left simply because they recognize that while they remain a part of the administration the accusations and the charges will continue. Now, others have not felt that way, and a great many have been cleared. But it's a strange thing that their names keep popping up again by the same ones who were the first to throw the accusations out.

Q. Mr. President, with regard to your proposal to ban chemical weapons, isn't this proposal another way to get Congress -- what they've failed to do for the last 3 years, which is appropriate money for chemical weapons? And what do we say if our adversaries accuse us of talking peace but preparing for war?

The President. Well, I don't think the accusation would stand up if they said that. The situation is that we haven't produced any such weapons for 15 years. The Soviet Union has a massive arsenal and is ahead of us in many areas having to do with chemical warfare.

Now, if there is ever one example -- or one place where there is an example -- of the power of a deterrent force, it is in the field of chemical weapons. And I hand you World War II, when all the nations had them and no one used them even in the most desperate moments when defeat was staring at them because they knew that the others had them and could use them in return.

The second thing is, if we're going to have a chemical warfare ban or a treaty banning them, you've got to have something to bargain with. And, therefore, it's just the same as it is with the other weapons. They must know that the alternative to banning them is to then face the fact that we are going to build a deterrent.

We have a tax program that was a 25-percent cut across the board. Now, that's 25-percent reduction in the tax burden of everyone. If you have someone whose tax burden is $20, that cut means that they saved $5, and they still owe $15. But someone who owes a hundred times as much, who pays a hundred times as much tax, $2,000, gets $500 but still owes $1,500. In other words, the progressivity of the tax program stays the same. So, there is no way that the tax program could have benefited someone at one end of the scale and not the other. It's based on proportions.

The other thing is -- that makes me doubtful of those figures -- is what we have done for everyone with regard to inflation. And here you do benefit the people at the lower end of the scale more than you do at the top. Now, the fact of that is someone that -- the beginning of 1979, with an $8,000 income, they were about $500 or so above the poverty-level income. By the end of 1980, 2 years later, with that same income they were some $500 below the poverty-level income in purchasing power.

Executive order; it was passed by Congress and signed by me -- with regard to some cuts, for example, in the aid for dependent children program -- now every protection was made for all of those totally dependent on welfare. There are some 3 million of them still there. There were 943,000 families that were removed, but they were families that had considerable outside earnings, plus their welfare grants.

Now, we were told when we did this that, oh, these people would quit their jobs just to take the security of being on welfare. Well, only a very few did. And two-thirds of the people that did not, then sizably increased their actual earnings and became independent of welfare.

Q. Mr. President, just to follow up, whatever the interpretation of this particular report, are you concerned that the perception that your administration has been a friend of the wealthy at the expense of the poor is going to be a political problem for you this year?

The President. Oh, I'm concerned about it. It's a political problem if people believe it, but there's absolutely no truth in it. It's probably the most glaring example of political demagoguery that our friends have been engaging in.

The President. We may have lost some with some people, but situations change, Sam. It was true when I said that, but I can, I think, explain, and I'll try to make it as brief as I can what the situation, or what the change was.

We and three of our allies -- our four governments -- decided that in an effort to straighten out the situation that was so out of control in Lebanon, that we would send in a combination force, a multiple force, not to participate in a war but to be on hand to help provide stability while the Lebanese were allowed, then, to create a government.

You will remember a civil war had been going on there for about 10 years. And at the time this was decided, the Israelis were at the border of Beirut; the PLO, 10 to 15 thousand of them, were fighting from within the heart of Beirut; the Syrians were also involved.

The idea was that if a government could be created in Lebanon, and then we could help them re-create their military, and the foreign forces withdraw, then, as their military moved out into the areas previously occupied by the foreign powers to hopefully pacify some of the internecine fighting groups -- the militias that were fighting each other as well as the official forces of Lebanon -- that the multinational force would be a kind of stable peacekeeping force behind keeping order while they went out to do that job, because they wouldn't have the manpower to do both.

PLO who, up until then were unwilling to surrender even though they faced defeat, because they feared a massacre at the hands of those that were fighting them. So, with the multinational force there to guarantee against that, they were ushered out.

Lebanese military and equipping them, and made a very capable military. What did happen, with the deterioration when Syria insisted on staying in and backing some of the rebel radical forces there, was that with religious and ethnic differences, some units of the army refused to take up arms against some of their same ethnic background, or religious background. Now, the Government of Lebanon went forward, then, in trying to bring together the kind of a consensus government -- of the radical elements and all -- and take them into a broadened based government.

In the meantime, because the multinational force had been successful, to that extent, it was determined by those who don't want that kind of a solution in Lebanon that they had to put the pressure on to get our forces and the others out. And with the terrorist attacks that brought such tragedy, our forces dug in. But once dug in, while this was offering security to them from the kind of attacks they'd been subjected to, they were no longer visible as the kind of force they were supposed to be.

We are still engaged diplomatically with anything that we can do to help. And there are those in the area who say that they doubt that there can be any solution or peace without our help. And so we'll do that.

The President. I have to say this, Sam, and then I'll move on to another subject. I have to say that this was one of the things -- and they must take a responsibility. When you're engaged in this kind of a diplomatic attempt, and you have forces there, and there is an effort made to oust them, a debate as public as was conducted here, raging, with the Congress demanding, ``Oh, take our, bring our men home, take them away'' -- all this can do is stimulate the terrorists and urge them on to further attacks, because they see a possibility of success in getting the force out which is keeping them from having their way. It should come to the -- it should be understood by everyone in government that once this is committed, you have rendered them ineffective when you conduct that kind of a debate in public.

Q. Mr. President, the Senate today unanimously adopted a proposal to withdraw U.S. military aid from El Salvador if the government there is overthrown by a military coup. Some people have suggested that that might happen if Mr. Duarte is elected. Do you support the proposal that passed the Senate today? And would you veto it if it came to your desk?

The President. Well, I'm not going to talk about whether to veto or not, but I think here, again, this is not helpful in what we're trying to accomplish. And I think it's something that -- I just don't think they should be doing it at this time.

Q. I'd like to follow up on Sam's question, if I could, Mr. President. Secretary of State Shultz says one of the problems in Lebanon is the War Powers Act and that Congress is always meddling in foreign policy; that neither our foes nor our friends know who's in charge. How much of a problem do you have with the War Powers Act, and would you like to see a Supreme Court test of whether or not it's constitutional?

The President. Well, there's been no talk of such a test or doing anything of that kind but, Chris, I do have to say this. In the last 10 years the Congress has imposed about 150 restrictions on the President's power in international diplomacy, and I think that the Constitution made it pretty plain way back in the beginning as to how diplomacy was to be conducted. And I just don't think that a committee of 535 individuals, no matter how well intentioned, can offer what is needed in actions of this kind or where there is a necessity.

The President. Well, I'll tell you, Chris, this is the time for me to say, ``I told you so.'' For a long time, and even before I became Governor [President], I was saying that the war in Vietnam had reached a position or a state in which we should have asked for a declaration of war and called it a war.

Q. Mr. President, while you were lobbying for the school prayer amendment recently, the gist of one of your arguments was that Congress should pass it because polls showed the American people were overwhelmingly in favor of it. Public opinion polls, sir, also show that Americans favor stricter control of handgun sales and an immediate, verifiable U.S.-Soviet nuclear freeze. In light of that and in light of your argument, do you see any change in your position on these two issues?

The President. No, I don't. And I think that calling attention to the fact that the overwhelming majority of the people favored prayer being permitted in schools was a logical thing to say to the Members of Congress when I was trying to get that amendment passed.

My only regret is that the debate was never on the real issue. I don't know how to explain it, but for them to sit there and debate hour after hour, as they did, that somehow we were asking for prayer to be mandated on schools -- we were asking nothing of the kind. Quite the contrary, we were asking that the Constitution be restored to neutrality with regard to religion.

Well, I was in -- I've told many of the Congressmen -- I was in more elementary schools than most people. My father moved around a great deal. I was in five of them before I got out of eighth grade. And I don't recall there ever being a mandatory -- or a prayer session in any of the schools. But we all knew that prayer was not denied in schools.

Q. Well, sir, if I could just follow up, I understand your disappointment in the Senate debate and the vote, but I guess what I'm trying to ask you is why are the public opinion polls a valid argument for the school prayer amendment, which you do favor, and not a valid argument for the handgun control and the nuclear freeze issues which you do not?

In California, knowing that the wrong people would probably never have any problem getting a gun and the law-abiding citizen would be denied the right to have one, we simply passed a law that said that anyone who commits a crime, is convicted of a crime and had in his or her possession a gun at the time of the commission of the crime, whether they used it or not, add 5 to 15 years to the sentence by virtue of their having carried -- or carried a gun in the commission of a crime. You'd be surprised how effective it became.

Q. Mr. President, recently the U.S.-backed opponents of the Sandinista regime have gone beyond their warfare on land to mining ports off the Nicaraguan coast. Are you concerned that these mines there, which neutral freighters or others could hit, run a risk of widening the war in Central America? And do you think that there's any point in which we ought to try to call a halt to the activities of the contras?

The President. No, our interest in Nicaragua -- I'm not going to comment on that one way or the other, or the tactics that are used in a war of that kind. Our interest in Nicaragua is one and one only. The present Government of Nicaragua is exporting revolution to El Salvador, its neighbor, and is helping, supporting, arming, and training the guerrillas that are trying to overthrow a duly elected government. And as long as they do that, we're going to try and inconvenience that government of Nicaragua until they quit that kind of action.

The President. No, I think these maneuvers are something we've done before. They're not something unusual or aimed at anyone down there. They are combined exercises that we hold with our own units and when we have -- one unit goes through some of these and gets the training, we send another one down to do the same thing. And that's all they are is war games.

Q. Mr. President, until recently your administration had handled trade disputes with Japan with relatively little public fanfare. But over the last few days, three of your Cabinet members and several other administration officials have spoken out publicly and firmly in criticizing Japan. Why the change in strategy?

The President. Well, maybe it's not a change in strategy, it's just talking frankly about what's going on. It's like any government with its various interests and its bureaucracies and so forth. We're not making as much progress as we would like to make with regard to the things that I had discussed in Japan with Prime Minister Nakasone and here at the Williamsburg summit. I know where he stands. And I know that he sincerely and honestly wants better trade relations and some of the obstacles removed that are impairing free and fair trade between us. But then there are other elements, and they're subject to political pressure and public opinion pressure the same as we are in our own country. And I think what you've been hearing are some complaints about those who are trying to negotiate these things.

Q. Mr. President, some people might say that you're a man who's approaching the Golden Years, and I'd like to know what your reaction is to Governor Lamm of Colorado who said that some elderly people have a duty to die and get out of the way and fall like leaves to provide humus for the younger generation. What is your reaction to that statement?

The President. Well, I think I was as shocked as anyone was to hear such a statement. I since, however, have seen reports that that was not exactly the way it was said, and that he was referring to outright terminal cases of the kind that have been under so much discussion over recent years, of someone who had a very limited time and was, for example, in a coma and simply being artificially kept alive, that this is what he was talking about. I don't know. All I know is the way the stories were carried. I have not had anyone fill me in on the actual case and how he said it.

Q. Mr. President, you've been saying recently that you're trying to encourage moderate Arab leaders to join the Middle East peace process. Yet, King Hussein, the key moderate Arab, seems to have shut the door rather firmly. In view of that, what is your future course for guiding your '82 peace plan, and how do you intend to try to remove the obstacles on that course?

The President. That continues to be our plan, and I believe that King Hussein still feels and believes that he would have to be an important part, being the next door neighbor to Israel, in bringing about such negotiations. And I continue to believe in this. This is the answer. It's what started us from the very beginning in the Middle East -- to continue the Camp David process, to persuade other nations to do what Egypt did in making that peace.

At the present moment you have a group of Arab nations who still are of that -- have never retreated from their position that Israel does not have a right to exist as a nation. And we're trying to persuade them that we can be evenhanded and that we're not trying to dictate any peace of any kind, that we simply want to be of help if we can, an intermediary in bringing about a negotiation that will erase the issues and the problems that have kept them apart, so that they can settle back and live in peace together. And we're going to continue to try to do that.

Q. Mr. President, the Soviet Union is currently engaged in perhaps its largest military exercise ever in the Atlantic Ocean -- an exercise that involves some 40 vessels, including submarines, destroyers, and a nuclear-powered battle cruiser. I wonder if you could tell us what you think the Soviet Union is up to in all of this?

The President. I think it's spring in Russia as well as in the United States, and that's when you have war games and maneuvers. We've been having some of our own. We always tell them when we're going to have them; we wish they'd tell us.

But I think this is nothing more than that. Your war games are actually -- whoever's conducting them -- based on your own thoughts as to what contingencies could arise that would find you in an emergency situation, and so you set out to train or practice for that.

Q. Mr. President, getting back to your earlier statement that you felt for sometime that we should have declared war during the Vietnam period, against whom would we have declared war? And if we had done so, wouldn't that have widened the war and gotten us stuck into an even greater quagmire?

The President. Well, I can only say, with regard to that, I said that at a time when it was going on because of what was going on here in our own country, in which none of the rules of warfare could apply with regard to lending comfort and aid to the enemy.

Who we would have declared war against would have been a country, North Vietnam. The settlement of French Indochina created two nations -- South Vietnam and North Vietnam. They were two separate nations. In fact, back through history they had pretty much been separate countries before. You say that because of the situation at the time; whether I would still feel the same way or not. I know that there was great concern about the possibility of a war widening, just as there was in Korea that prevented us from allowing General MacArthur to lead us to a victory in Korea. Everyone thought that you have to fight a war without winning it, or you might find yourself in a bigger war. Well, maybe General MacArthur was right. There is no substitute for victory.

Apple. And I've been eager to get to one of these conferences for women in business ever since the Small Business Administration's office of women's business ownership, under Carolyn Gray, started cosponsoring them.

New York. You and your firms make up a vibrant part of the New York economy, employing thousands of men and women, providing goods and services that range from bookbinding to financial consulting. Each of you knows from personal experience that American women have the vision, the talent, and the determination to make great contributions to our nation's economy. And you're serving as role models for a new generation of women -- women for whom participating in the economy will be much easier because of your efforts. On behalf of all Americans, I commend you.

In our lifetime, America has begun an historical social change that offers women exciting new opportunities. Just 35 years ago, only a third of adult women held jobs outside the home. Today more than two-thirds of the women between the ages of 25 and 44 are in paid positions. Growing numbers of women are doctors, military officers, police, and firefighters; more than a third of our law students are female; and women business owners represent the fastest growing segment of the small business community.

On a personal level, I've seen these changes clearly in the lives of the women closest to me. My mother, Nelle, never had the chance to go beyond elementary school. All her life she devoted herself to our family and held us together both emotionally and financially. For a while during the depression, she helped make ends meet by working in a dress shop for $14 a week.

My wife, Nancy, belongs to a later generation of women, in which many were raised with society expecting one thing of them, only to discover years afterward that society had come to expect something else. Like so many women, Nancy's had both the challenges and the rich rewards of adapting. She pursued a successful career as an actress, and today she gracefully combines her role as a loving wife and mother with her many duties as First Lady.

And, you know, the Government gets quite a bargain with First Ladies. They aren't on the payroll, but Nancy's office hours and duties run about even with mine. That's why she's not here at this moment. No words can express how proud I am to be the man in her life.

But in my mother's time and throughout our history, women were always hard at work, seeking self-fulfillment, giving of themselves to their families, and building a better nation. Today women in our country are just as hardworking and giving as ever. It's America that has changed and grown, giving women increased chances to reach for the stars and go as far as their God-given talents can take them.

Women in the eighties are a diverse majority with varied interests and futures. Some seek to pursue their own careers, some run for political office, some focus on the home and family, and some seek to do all these things. No role is superior to another. What's important is that each woman must have the freedom to choose her path for herself, and I'm committed to just that. The simple truth is I've been frustrated by the perception that's been created about my supposed lack of interest in the welfare of women, and I'm going to take advantage of this opportunity to reveal some things our administration has been doing and that seem to have been closely guarded secrets up till now.

Once, after making a speech, a minister, the late Bill Alexander of Oklahoma, took it upon himself to tell me the story of his first sermon. I've never forgotten it. I always suspected maybe it had something to do with the length of my speech. He said that he had worked for weeks after his ordination on this first sermon and had been asked to speak -- or to pray or preach at a small country church in Oklahoma, an evening service. And he arrived after working all these weeks on that first sermon that he was going to preach as a minister and looked out at a church that was empty except for one lone little fellow sitting out there amongst all the empty pews.

Now, I'm not going to miss an opportunity like this, and I'm going to take a certain advantage of the situation. [Laughter] I'm not going to talk an hour and a half, but you're going to get the whole load. [Laughter] Because during the past 3 years, I've appointed more than 1,400 women to top government positions, not because of their sex, but because they were the best people for the jobs.

Elizabeth Dole, who as Secretary of Transportation oversees matters ranging from expendable rocket launches to revisions of our maritime laws; and Jeane Kirkpatrick, who as Ambassador to the United Nations plays a crucial role -- she does play a crucial role in our country's foreign policy.

I had lunch with the Committee last week, and they told me about the hearings they're holding to learn about the problems that women business owners encounter. And if you have any suggestions for the Committee, please write to me at the White House, and I'll pass your letters on to them.

Women's Business Enterprise. This Committee is composed of high-level Federal officials representing the various departments and agencies of the Federal Government. I've charged that Committee with making certain that in dealing with women-owned businesses, the Federal Government sets an example for private enterprise.

A series of conferences like this one is the final part of initiative for women business owners. In addition to this New York conference, conferences for women in business have been held in places ranging from Somerset, New Jersey, to San Francisco, as you've been told -- and many more are planned. The conferences are designed to help women acquire management skills and compete more effectively, and they're all cosponsored by private sector groups to make sure that we get private enterprises in the act.

In Atlanta, for example, local private firms responded to the conference enthusiastically. A group of businesses agreed to publish a women business owners directory for the State of Georgia at their own expense, and a group of banks established a hotline -- one number for women to call to find out about everything from the availability of venture capital to where to get help in drawing up a contract.

Now, just as we're supporting you as you make gains in private enterprise, we're making certain that women receive fair treatment under the law. Our administration has moved to amend or eliminate statutes that discriminate on the basis of sex. At my direction, the Justice Department conducted a review of Federal statutes and found 140 that give different treatment to men and women. We have already proposed legislation to correct 122 of them. Of the remaining 18, 6 are still under study, the rest favor women and will remain unchanged. [Laughter] Like the law that -- well, it's like the law that establishes a Women's Bureau in the Department of Labor. And I want to mention the superb job that Dr. Lenora Cole-Alexander is doing in heading that Bureau.

At the same time, the Task Force on Legal Equity for Women has begun a thorough review of nonstatutory rules, practices, and procedures throughout the Federal Government. Whenever it finds women treated unfairly, the Task Force works with the agencies or departments to ensure changes will be made.

To reach laws and procedures beyond the Federal level, we've established the Fifty States Project, a program that's working with Governors to help them find the areas where their State codes, regulations, and administrative rules treat women unfairly. I'm delighted to say that 42 States have already begun reviews of their laws and procedures, and more than half our States are already amending their laws to ensure equal treatment for women.

At the same time, the Department of Justice has been hard at work to fight discrimination in individual cases. The Department has filed the first seven suits in its history to enforce the Pregnancy Discrimination Act of 1978, and one of those suits involve the rights of some 9,000 women. Just last year, the Justice Department won a record-breaking $2\3/4\ million discrimination case dealing with the rights of 685 women and blacks. Perhaps most important, the Department of Justice has so far filed more charges -- or cases charging sex discrimination in employment than did the last administration during a comparable time.

Let there be no doubt, this administration considers discrimination based on sex just as great an evil as discrimination based on religion or race, and we will prosecute cases of sex discrimination to the full extent of the law.

For those whose former spouses are delinquent in child support payments, we've moved to strengthen the Federal child support enforcement system. The year we took office, some $4 billion were owed to the children of America. Since then, our measures have raised child support collections by two-thirds. Improvements still need to be made in this area. So, we proposed new legislation that would further improve collection of child support for both welfare and nonwelfare families.

For those receiving Aid to Families with Dependent Children, the majority of whom are women, we've increased training opportunities that will help them secure permanent, productive employment, because no government handout can give a woman who's supporting her family the same sense of dignity as a job. Now, our Job Training Partnership Act specifically targets these women as a group that must be served.

This applies to both men and women, but it's of particular importance to women who are holding down a job while raising a family. Now they'll be better able to structure their working hours to do things like spend more time with their families and perhaps be at home when their children come home from school.

For all women, we're working with the Congress and women's groups to provide several forms of tax relief -- relief, by the way, which could and should have been passed long ago by those in Washington who had a monopoly on power and who still claim a monopoly on compassion.

Our administration has greatly reduced the income tax marriage penalty. We've eliminated estate tax that's levied on a surviving spouse, giving significant benefits to those with family farms and small businesses where women have long been hard-working partners. We've put social security back on a firm footing and made reforms that help many divorced spouses and disabled widows.

Nothing is more important to parents than knowing their children are being taken good care of while they're on the job. So, we've almost doubled the maximum child care tax credit. In other moves to make child care more available and affordable, we proposed tax relief for organizations that care for the dependents of working people, and we're pressing for a restructuring of the dependent care tax credit to make more benefits available for low- and middle-income taxpayers.

We're also working with the Congress to pass historic legislation that will reform inequities that women suffer in some private pension plans. This legislation has passed the Senate, and we're awaiting a vote on the floor of the House, in case you'd like to call or write someone. [Laughter] I have often said it is not only necessary to make the legislators see the light; it's better to make them feel the heat. [Laughter] The reforms will lower the age at which employees can participate in company pension plans; protect nonworking spouses from losing death benefits without their knowledge; coordinate State and Federal laws so divorced spouses can collect court-awarded pension benefits more easily; require pension plans to offer survivor's benefits protection to workers after they reach 45; and permit a break in service of up to 5 years without loss of pension credit, a change that would help women take time to start a family but still go back to their careers.

Despite the importance of all these reforms, I've always believed the most important step we can take for women is the most important step that we can take for all our people -- a dynamic, sustained economic expansion. Economic growth will provide more opportunities for women than if all the promises made in the history of Washington, DC, were enacted into law.

Think back just 3 years. Raging inflation, the highest prime interest rate in more than a century, an ever-growing tax burden, government regulations that were out of control -- all these had stifled investment, smothered productivity, and brought growth to a virtual standstill.

Homemakers found that 12\1/2\-percent inflation made it harder and harder to buy the groceries and pay the bills. And the thousands of women who wanted to start their own businesses saw 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rates slam the door in their faces.

When we took office, we made restoring economic vitality our top priority. We cut the growth of government spending. We pruned needless regulations. We chopped tax rates and enacted an historic reform called tax indexing. Indexing means that government will never again profit from inflation at your expense. And today, less than 3 years after we set our program in place, we're seeing a surging economic expansion.

The prime interest rate has fallen to about half what it was when we took office. Inflation has plummeted some two-thirds to about 4 or 4\1/2\ percent. Housing starts, factory orders, and retail sales are up. Compared to the last quarter of 1982, net private savings during the same period in 1983 shot up nearly 50 percent to over $230 billion, providing new funds to fuel innovation and spur growth.

In the 15 months since the recovery began, nearly 5 million Americans have found work, and the overall unemployment rate has fallen to 7.7 percent, marking the steepest drop in more than 30 years. And just last month it was announced that during the first quarter of 1984 our gross national product grew at the robust annual rate of more than 7 percent, proving that expansion is here to stay.

The unemployment rate among adult women has dropped from 9.1 percent to 6.9 percent. More women have jobs today than ever before in our nation's history. Just as important, the jobs women hold are getting better and better. In 1983 women filled almost three-quarters of all the new jobs in managerial, professional, and technical fields. And the number of women-owned businesses is growing four times faster than the number of those owned by men.

Entrepreneurs like you, who own their own, mostly small businesses, are playing a special part in this expansion. Last year alone, there were almost 600,000 new business incorporations. That's an all-time high in our history and half again the number of incorporations each year during the early seventies. At the same time, bankruptcies declined some 30 percent in the second half of 1983 compared with the same period in 1982. And small business income, as measured by proprietorships and partnerships, grew by a remarkable 18 percent. Perhaps most important, during this expansion small businesses, like the ones that many of you own, provided the most new jobs, gave the most employees the freedom to work part-time, and hired the most young people, senior citizens, and women. The American entrepreneur is building a dazzling new future, and she's just getting started.

We must and will go forward to keep opportunities expanding for you and all Americans. To prevent the nightmare of inflation from ever coming back, we must enact constitutional reforms like the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. Please, I'd like both of those. And to provide new incentives for growth, make taxes more simple and fair, I believe we must design and enact a program of tax simplification; not tinkering here and there, but a sweeping, comprehensive reform of the entire tax code. We must and will enact these measures. And I'm convinced that when we do, the American economy will reach new heights of prosperity.

When I look at America, I see our basic industry making striking gains, and new industries, like robotics and bioengineering, gathering strength. I see America leading the world in a technological revolution that's putting men and women into space and adding years to life here on Earth. I see a country of open, self-confident people, serving as a force for peace among nations.

And now, I know that many of your companies gross millions of dollars a year, but I'd like to share a letter I received that tells about a woman who started a business that's more modest. The letter comes from a person called Betty Lou, and I believe it shows the enterprising spirit of American women. She wrote, ``Mr. President, I'm a simple person in that I have simple needs . . .

Well, whether founding their own companies like Betty Lou and so many of you, or holding down any of the millions of jobs our economy provides; or devoting themselves to caring for their loved ones and raising happy, healthy children; or doing all these things, I know that women will play a vital part in leading our nation into the future -- and that there will always be American women who are American heroes.

Americans are always thrilled to come to this city, and believe me, for a midwesterner from a small town in Illinois, the sidewalks of New York still evoke that sense of romance and excitement that is unique to this city and this State.

Greek Orthodox bishop approaching the altar, St. Thomas Episcopal Church holding hundreds who watched the proceedings on a video screen, and that homily of welcome and humor and love from Archbishop O'Connor.

I've been accused of liking a good story, but I really did love the one the Archbishop told about the second-grader who wrote him and asked if he held down a job before this one. [Laughter] The same young man also wanted to know if the Archbishop had any children. [Laughter] Well, he's spoken to that tonight. I think we're aware that he does -- the thousands and thousands of children who are in the schools that bring us to this gathering here tonight.

But who can forget the substance of your new Archbishop's sermon? How many fewer accounts of violence, heartbreak, and tragedy would there be, especially in places like the Mideast, if all the people of the world could take his words to heart? How valid, how meaningful those words are for this season of Lent, this time of reflection and renewal.

But I want, honestly, all of you to know I really was a little nervous about speaking to you here tonight, especially on issues like education. When I look around this room and see the distinguished members of the hierarchy and many prominent educators, not to mention you parents who've given so much time and effort to improving Catholic schools, I have to think of a story that kind of fits the position that I'm in tonight, and particularly having to follow the Archbishop up here at this podium.

There was a fellow who, for very many years, had been quite a celebrity in his end of the country up in Pennsylvania, because he was in great demand as a speaker -- he was the last living survivor of the Johnstown flood. And so in telling and retelling his adventures, as I say, he was in great demand. Finally, however, the day came when he passed on to a better life and wasn't in heaven very long before St. Peter told him that newcomers there were expected to sort of bring the others there up-to-date on what was going on. And he said, ``Oh, that's great,'' and he told them about what he'd been doing on Earth.

But actually, the fact that so many of you are activists for education is not a reason for concern, but for pride. Not long ago, opinion polls showed the confidence of average Americans for our governmental institutions had declined to new lows. Many Americans simply believed that government belonged now to politicians and bureaucrats, not to the people. Well, there was a reason for this. After years of listening to the bromides and aphorisms of liberal government, the people felt they'd been had. Federal spending had skyrocketed -- it tripled in the seventies -- and taxation doubled between 1976 and 1981. Yet far from solving anything, all this government only made our problems worse. It fueled inflation, it drained energy and wealth from the private sector, it halted economic growth, and it eventually put millions out of work.

But at the root of this spend-and-spend, and tax-and-tax, and borrow-and-borrow philosophy was the belief that solving our social problems was simply a matter of allocating resources rather than exerting moral leadership. There were those who thought, and still do, that by changing man's material environment we could perfect human nature and usher in a brave new world. So they favored gigantic government programs and social engineering schemes run by a tiny elite of experts. And that's why they frequently saw traditional values like family, work, neighborhood, religion, as obstacles. In their view, the solutions to America's problems were no longer in her homes, her churches, her schools, or her work places, but in a bureaucrat's budget and a social worker's files.

But on the national level, the fight goes on. One example is the question of tuition tax credits. As you know, we've submitted a bill to the Congress that would make such credits available to parents like yourselves. And the bill that we proposed does not violate the separation of church and state. And it's certainly no threat to public education. What it would do is give hard-working Catholic and other private school parents a break, while increasing diversity and excellence in both public and private schools. And I want to compliment you on your efforts in the past for this bill and pledge again my strongest efforts on its behalf.

I quoted from a Scottish ballad when we were defeated on that. The ballad goes, ``I am wounded, but I am not slain. I will rest a bit and fight again.'' Together, we can uphold and reinforce the basic right of all parents to educate their children in the way that best meets their children's needs.

But opposition to tuition tax credits isn't the only roadblock those in Washington have put in our way. They also managed during the past generation to construct a tax system that excessively burdens the family and actually discriminates against those traditional family values. For example, the dependency exemption on your income tax -- the money you can deduct for raising a child or caring for an elderly relative -- was $600 in the late forties. That has been increased to $1,000 now. But if that deduction had been indexed to keep pace with inflation, today you would be deducting more than $3,000 for every one of your children. So, you can see that in the very time that the cost of raising a family has gone up, the tax treatment of families has actually worsened.

I want you to know I've told the Treasury Department to come up with recommendations to make your taxes more simple, fair for families and for all Americans, and to increase incentives for economic growth by broadening the base and bringing your income tax rates down, not up.

On this issue of tax fairness for families, or other issues like the prayer amendment, stricter laws against the criminals that prey on our young people, greater discipline in our schools, and our pro-life amendment, there is more at stake here than just one administration's political agenda.

When I visited His Holiness Pope John Paul II in Rome -- and I'm pleased to say I will have the privilege of visiting with him soon again when our paths cross in Alaska -- he spoke about the importance of these values. He said it was his profound hope ``that the entire structure of American life will rest ever more securely on the strong foundation of moral and spiritual values.

There are so many examples that come to mind. In my State of the Union Message I mentioned a man known to many of you, the guardian of homeless youth in Times Square, Father Bruce Ritter, who has saved so many young, formerly lost lives at Covenant House. I know that Father Ritter and all who want to see stronger efforts to combat child abduction and child exploitation will be pleased to learn some good news: Within a week, the Justice Department will sign a $3.3 million grant to create the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children. This Center will help educate parents to prevent abductions and runaways, assist parents whose children are missing, and give technical assistance to local law enforcement agencies in their efforts to find missing children. Let's win these children back.

Or, I wonder how many of you remember the daughter of one of America's most famous novelists, a young woman who came from New England to New York before the turn of the century? Her beauty, her own literary skill, and that of her husband's, made the young couple the toast of society here. But with the death of an infant son and the unavoidable breakup of her marriage, tragedy struck. The young woman, a convert to Catholicism, sought again the meaning and purpose of life, and somehow she found herself on Cherry Street in lower Manhattan. And from that little dilapidated house in New York's slums grew a nursing order of Dominican nuns with hospitals throughout the United States. For cancer patients, shunned in those days like the lepers of another age, the odyssey of Nathaniel Hawthorne's beautiful daughter, Rose Hawthorne Lathrop, would become a blessing beyond all description. Hundreds, then thousands, would find treatment and solace and hope, and they were welcome whether they could afford it or not.

The work of Mother Alphonsa of the Hawthorne Dominicans goes on today in two hospitals here in this State and five other hospitals in other States. It's a perfect example of how ``sorrow built a bridge into the infinite,'' of how generous and giving have been the hearts of New York Catholics.

It's been a tradition carried right up until our own time. Rarely has the world seen a more magnificent display of the cardinal virtues of faith, hope, and charity than in the manner in which your own beloved Terence Cardinal Cooke met death last year. It was a fitting and inspiring climax to a life of holiness and service to others.

And tonight, ladies and gentlemen, it is my privilege to present posthumously the Nation's highest civilian award, the Medal of Freedom, to Terence Cardinal Cooke. Accepting the medal for Cardinal Cooke will be Archbishop O'Connor.

A saintly man and a great spiritual leader, Terence Cardinal Cooke inspired his countrymen with his dedication to his Church, devotion to his flock, and service to his country. As the Military Vicar to our Nation's Armed Forces, Cardinal Cooke worked tirelessly on behalf of those who serve their country in uniform. As a patriot and national leader, he preached the love of country and championed the cause of human freedom. He will live in the memory of his countrymen as a man of compassion, courage, and personal holiness.

Thank you very much, Ann Armstrong. Thank you, Cochairman Sam Nunn. I am honored to have this opportunity to take part in your National Leadership Forum. The CSIS reputation for distinguished scholarly research is well deserved, and your organization rightly enjoys that great respect.

All Americans share two great goals for foreign policy: a safer world, and a world in which individual rights can be respected and precious values may flourish. These goals are at the heart of America's traditional idealism and our aspirations for world peace. Yet, while cherished by us, they do not belong exclusively to us. They're not made in America. They're shared by people everywhere.

Tragically, the world in which these fundamental goals are so widely shared is a very troubled world. While we and our allies may enjoy peace and prosperity, many citizens of the industrial world continue to live in fear of conflict and the threat of nuclear war. And all around the globe terrorists threaten innocent people and civilized values. And in developing countries, the dreams of human progress have too often been lost to violent revolution and dictatorship.

Quite obviously the widespread desire for a safer and more humane world is, by itself, not enough to create such a world. In pursuing our worthy goals, we must go beyond honorable intentions and good will to practical means.

Strength -- we know that strength alone is not enough, but without it there can be no effective diplomacy and negotiations, no secure democracy and peace. Conversely, weakness or hopeful passivity are only self-defeating. They invite the very aggression and instability that they would seek to avoid.

Now, economic growth -- this is the underlying base that ensures our strength and permits human potential to flourish. Neither strength nor creativity can be achieved or sustained without economic growth, both at home and abroad.

Shared responsibility with allies -- our friends and allies share the heavy responsibility for the protection of freedom. We seek and need their partnership, sharing burdens in pursuit of our common goals.

Bipartisanship at home -- in our two-party democracy, an effective foreign policy must begin with bipartisanship, and the sharing of responsibility for a safer and more humane world must begin at home.

During the past 3 years, we've been steadily rebuilding America's capacity to advance our foreign policy goals through renewed attention to these vital principles. Many threats remain, and peace may still seem precarious. But America is safer and more secure today because the people of this great nation have restored the foundation of its strength.

We began with renewed realism, a clear-eyed understanding of the world we live in and of our inescapable global responsibilities. Our industries depend on the importation of energy and minerals from distant lands. Our prosperity requires a sound international financial system and free and open trading markets. And our security is inseparable from the security of our friends and neighbors.

I believe Americans today see the world with realism and maturity. The great majority of our people do not believe the stark differences between democracy and totalitarianism can be wished away. They understand that keeping America secure begins with keeping America strong and free.

When we took office in 1981, the Soviet Union had been engaged for 20 years in the most massive military buildup in history. Clearly, their goal was not to catch us, but to surpass us. Yet the United States remained a virtual spectator in the 1970's, a decade of neglect that took a severe toll on our defense capabilities.

With bipartisan support, we embarked immediately on a major defense rebuilding program. We've made good progress in restoring the morale of our men and women in uniform, restocking spare parts and ammunition, replacing obsolescent equipment and facilities, improving basic training and readiness, and pushing forward with long overdue weapons programs.

The simple fact is that in the last half of the 1970's, we were not deterring, as events from Angola to Afghanistan made clear. Today we are. And that fact has fundamentally altered the future for millions of human beings. Gone are the days when the United States was perceived as a rudderless superpower, a helpless hostage to world events. American leadership is back. Peace through strength is not a slogan. It's a fact of life. And we will not return to the days of handwringing, defeatism, decline, and despair.

We have also upgraded significantly our intelligence capabilities, restoring morale in the intelligence agencies and increasing our capability to detect, analyze, and counter hostile intelligence threats.

Economic strength, the underlying base of support for our defense buildup, has received a dramatic new boost. We've transformed a no-growth economy, crippled by disincentives, double-digit inflation, 21\1/2\-percent interest rates, plunging productivity, and a weak dollar, into a dynamic growth economy bolstered by new incentives, stable prices, lower interest rates, a rebirth of productivity, and restored our confidence in our currency.

Renewed strength at home has been accompanied by closer partnerships with America's friends and allies. Far from buckling under Soviet intimidation, the unity of the NATO alliance has held firm, and we're moving forward to modernize our strategic deterrent. The leader of America's oldest ally, French President Francois Mitterrand, recently reminded us that peace, like liberty, is never given. The pursuit of both is a continual one. In the turbulent times we live in, solidarity among friends is essential.

Our principles don't involve just rebuilding our strength; they also tell us how to use it. We remain true to the principle of nonaggression. On an occasion when the United States, at the request of its neighbors, did use force in Grenada, we acted decisively, but only after it was clear a bloodthirsty regime had put American and Grenadian lives in danger, and the security of neighboring islands in danger. As soon as stability and freedom were restored in the island, we left. The Soviet Union had no such legitimate justification for its massive invasion of Afghanistan 4 years ago. And today, over a hundred thousand occupation troops remain there. The United States, by stark contrast, occupies no foreign nation, nor do we seek to.

Though we and the Soviet Union differ markedly, living in this nuclear age makes it imperative that we talk with each other. If the new Soviet leadership truly is devoted to building a safer and more humane world, rather than expanding armed conquests, it will find a sympathetic partner in the West.

In pursuing these practical principles, we have throughout sought to revive the spirit that was once the hallmark of our postwar foreign policy: bipartisan cooperation between the executive and legislative branches of our government.

Much has been accomplished, but much remains to be done. If Republicans and Democrats will join together to confront four great challenges to American foreign policy in the eighties, then we can and will make great strides toward a safer and more humane world.

Challenge number one is to reduce the risk of nuclear war and to reduce the levels of nuclear armaments in a way that also reduces the risk they will ever be used. We have no higher challenge, for a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. But merely to be against nuclear war is not enough to prevent it.

For 35 years the defense policy of the United States and her NATO allies has been based on one simple premise: We do not start wars; we maintain our conventional and strategic strength to deter aggression by convincing any potential aggressor that war could bring no benefit, only disaster. Deterrence has been and will remain the cornerstone of our national security policy to defend freedom and preserve peace.

But as I mentioned, the 1970's were marked by neglect of our defenses, and nuclear safety was no exception. Too many forgot John Kennedy's warning that only when our arms are certain beyond doubt can we be certain beyond doubt they will never be used. By the beginning of this decade, we face three growing problems: the Soviet SS - 20 monopoly in Europe and Asia; the vulnerability of our land-based ICBM, the entire force; and the failure of arms control agreements to slow the overall growth in strategic weapons. The Carter administration acknowledged these problems. In fact, almost everyone did.

The practical means for reducing the risks of nuclear war must, therefore, follow two parallel paths -- credible deterrence and real arms reductions with effective verification. It is on this basis that we've responded to the problems I just described. This is why we've moved forward to implement NATO's dual-track decision of 1979. While actually reducing the number of nuclear weapons in Europe, it is also why we have sought bipartisan support for the recommendations of the Scowcroft commission and the builddown concept and why we've proposed deep reductions in strategic forces at the strategic arms reduction talks.

Without exception, every arms control proposal that we have offered would reverse the arms buildup and help bring a more stable balance at lower force levels. At the START talks, we seek to reduce substantially the number of ballistic missile warheads, reduce the destructive capacity of nuclear missiles, and establish limits on bombers and cruise missiles, below the levels of SALT II.

At the talks on intermediate-range nuclear forces, our negotiators have tabled four initiatives to address Soviet concerns and improve prospects for a fair and equitable agreement that would reduce or eliminate an entire class of such nuclear weapons. Our flexibility in the START and INF negotiations has been demonstrated by numerous modifications to our positions. But they have been met only by the silence of Soviet walkouts.

At the mutual and balanced force reduction talks in Vienna, we and our NATO partners presented a treaty that would reduce conventional forces to parity at lower levels. To reduce the risks of war in time of crisis, we have proposed to the Soviet Union important measures to improve direct communications and increase mutual confidence. And just recently, I directed Vice President Bush to go to the Conference [Committee] on Disarmament in Geneva to present a new American initiative, a worldwide ban on the production, possession, and use of chemical weapons.

Our strategic policy represents a careful response to a nuclear agenda upon which even our critics agreed. Many who would break the bonds of partisanship, claiming they know how to bring greater security, seem to ignore the likely consequences of their own proposals.

Those who wanted a last-minute moratorium on INF deployment would have betrayed our allies and reduced the chances for a safer Europe. Those who would try to implement a unilateral freeze would find it unverifiable and destabilizing, because it would prevent restoration of a stable balance that keeps the peace. And those who would advocate unilateral cancellation of the Peacekeeper missile would ignore a central recommendation of the bipartisan Scowcroft report and leave the Soviets with little incentive to negotiate meaningful reductions. Indeed, the Soviets would be rewarded for leaving the bargaining table.

These simplistic solutions and others put forward by our critics would take meaningful agreements and increased security much further from our grasp. Our critics can best help us move closer to the goals that we share by accepting practical means to achieve them. Granted, it's easy to support a strong defense. It's much harder to support a strong defense budget. And granted, it's easy to call for arms agreements. It's more difficult to support patient, firm, fair negotiations with those who want to see how much we will compromise with ourselves first. Bipartisanship can only work if both forces, both sides, face up to real world problems and meet them with real world solutions.

Regional tensions often begin in longstanding social, political, and economic inequities and in ethnic and religious disputes. But throughout the 1970's, increased Soviet support for terrorism, insurgency, and aggression coupled with the perception of weakening U.S. power and resolve greatly exacerbated these tensions.

The results were not surprising: the massacres of Kampuchea followed by the Vietnamese invasion, the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, the rise of Iranian extremism and the holding of Americans hostage, Libyan coercion in Africa, Soviet and Cuban military involvement in Angola and Ethiopia, their subversion in Central America, and the rise of state-supported terrorism.

Taken together, these events defined a pattern of mounting instability and violence that the U.S. could not ignore. And we have not. As with defense, by the beginning of the eighties, there was an emerging consensus in this country that we had to go do better in dealing with problems that affect our vital interests.

Obviously, no single abstract policy could deal successfully with all problems or all regions. But as a general matter, effective, regional stabilization requires a balanced approach -- a mix of economic aid, security assistance, and diplomatic mediation -- tailored to the needs of each region.

It's also obvious that we alone cannot save embattled governments or control terrorism. But doing nothing only ensures far greater problems down the road. So, we strive to expand cooperation with states who support our common interests, to help friendly nations in danger, and to seize major opportunities for peacekeeping.

Perhaps the best example of this comprehensive approach is the report and recommendations of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America. It is from this report that we drew our proposals for bringing peaceful development to Central America. They are now before the Congress and will be debated at length.

I welcome a debate, but if it's to be productive, we must put aside mythology and uninformed rhetoric. Some, for example, insist that the root of regional violence is poverty, but not communism. Well, three-fourths of our requests and of our current program is economic and humanitarian assistance. America is a good and generous nation, but economic aid alone cannot stop Cuban- and Soviet-inspired guerrillas determined to terrorize, burn, bomb, and destroy everything from bridges and industries to electric power and transportation. And neither individual rights nor economic health can be advanced if stability is not secured.

Other critics say that we shouldn't see the problems of this or any other region as an East-West struggle. Our policies in Central America and elsewhere are in fact designed precisely to keep East-West tensions from spreading, from intruding into the lives of nations that are struggling with great problems of their own.

Events in southern Africa are showing what persistent mediation and ability to talk to all sides can accomplish. The states of this region have been poised for war for decades, but there is new hope for peace. South Africa, Angola, and Mozambique are implementing agreements to break the cycle of violence. Our administration has been active in this process, and we'll stay involved, trying to bring an independent Namibia into being, end foreign military interference, and keep the region free from East-West conflict. I have hope that peace and democratic reform can be enjoyed by all the peoples of southern Africa.

In Central America we've also seen progress. El Salvador's Presidential election expresses that nation's desire to govern itself in peace. Yet the future of the region remains open. We have a choice. Either we help America's friends defend themselves and give democracy a chance, or we abandon our responsibilities and let the Soviet Union and Cuba shape the destiny of our hemisphere. If this happens, the East-West conflict will only become broader and much more dangerous.

Now, no one says this approach is cheap, quick, or easy. But the cost of this commitment is bargain-basement compared to the tremendous sacrifices that we will have to make if we do nothing, or do too little. The Kissinger commission warned that an outbreak of Cuban-type regimes in Central America will bring subversion closer to our own borders, and the specter of millions of uprooted refugees fleeing in desperation to the north.

In the Middle East, which has so rarely known peace, we seek a similar mix of economic aid, diplomatic mediation, and military assistance and cooperation. These will, we believe, make the use of U.S. forces unnecessary and make the risk of East-West conflict less. But, given the importance of the region, we must also be ready to act when the presence of American power and that of our friends can help stop the spread of violence. I have said, for example, that we'll keep open the Straits of Hormuz, the vital lifeline through which so much oil flows to the United States and other industrial democracies. Making this clear beforehand and making it credible makes a crisis much less likely.

We must work with quiet persistence and without illusions. We may suffer setbacks, but we mustn't jump to the conclusion that we can defend our interests without ever committing ourselves. Nor should other nations believe that mere setbacks will turn America inward again.

Because effective regional problemsolving requires a balanced and sustained approach, it is essential that the Congress give full, not piecemeal, support. Indeed, where we have foundered in regional stabilization, it has been because the Congress has failed to provide such support.

Expanding opportunities for economic development and personal freedom is our third great challenge. The American concept of peace is more than absence of war. We favor the flowering of economic growth and individual liberty in a world of peace. And this, too, is a goal to which most Americans subscribe. Our political leaders must be judged by whether the means they offer will help us to reach it.

Our belief in individual freedom and opportunity is rooted in practical experience. Free people build free markets that ignite dynamic development for everyone. And in America, incentives, risktaking, and entrepreneurship are reawakening the spirit of capitalism and strengthening economic expansion and human progress throughout the world. Our goal has always been to restore and sustain noninflationary worldwide growth, thereby ending for good the stagflation of the 1970's, which saw a drastic weakening of the fabric of the world economy.

We take our leadership responsibilities seriously, but we alone cannot put the world's economic house in order. At Williamsburg, the industrial countries consolidated their views on economic policy. The proof is not in the communique; it's in the results. France is reducing inflation and seeking greater flexibility in its economy. Japan is slowly, to be sure, but steadily, we will insist, liberalizing its trade and capital markets. Germany and the United Kingdom are moving forward on a steady course of low inflation and moderate, sustained growth.

Just as we believe that incentives are key to greater growth in America and throughout the world, so, too, must we resist the sugar-coated poison of protectionism everywhere it exists. Here at home we're opposing inflationary, self-defeating bills like domestic content. At the London economic summit in June, I hope that we can lay the groundwork for a new round of negotiations that will open markets for our exports of goods and services and stimulate greater growth, efficiency, and jobs for all.

And we're advancing other key initiatives to promote more powerful worldwide growth by expanding trade and investment relationships. The dynamic growth of Pacific Basin nations has made them the fastest growing markets for our goods, services, and capital. Last year I visited Japan and Korea -- two of America's most important allies -- to forge closer partnerships. And this month I will visit the People's Republic of China, another of the increasingly significant relationships that we hold in the Pacific. I see America and our Pacific neighbors as nations of the future going forward together in a mighty enterprise to build dynamic growth economies and a safer world.

And practical proposals like the Caribbean Basin Initiative will strengthen the private sectors of some 20 sectors -- or I should say, 20 Caribbean neighbors, while guaranteeing fairer treatment for U.S. companies and nationals and increasing demand for American exports.

We've recently sent to the Congress a new economic policy initiative for Africa. And it, too, is designed to support the growth of private enterprise in African countries by encouraging structural economic change in international trade. We've also asked the Congress to increase humanitarian assistance to Africa to combat the devastating effects of extreme drought.

In building a strong global recovery, of course, nothing is more important than to keep the wheels of world commerce turning and create jobs without renewing the spiral of inflation. The International Monetary Fund is a linchpin in our efforts to restore a sound world economy, resolve the debt problems of many developing countries. With bipartisan support, we implemented a major increase in IMF resources. In cooperation with the IMF, we're working to prevent the problems of individual debtor nations from disrupting the stability and strength of the entire international financial system. It was this goal that brought nations of north and south together to help resolve the debt difficulties of the new democratic Government of Argentina.

Because we know that democratic governments are the best guarantors of human rights, and that economic growth will always flourish when men and women are free, we seek to promote not just material products but the values of faith and human dignity for which America and all democratic nations stand -- values which embody the culmination of 5,000 years of Western civilization.

When I addressed the British Parliament in June of 1982, I called for a bold and lasting effort to assist people struggling for human rights. We've established the National Endowment for Democracy, a partnership of people from all walks of life dedicated to spreading the positive message of democracy. To succeed we must oppose the double speak of totalitarian propaganda.

Americans have always wanted to see the spread of democratic institutions, and that goal is coming closer. In our own hemisphere, 26 countries of Latin America and the Caribbean are either democracies or formally embarked on a democratic transition. This represents 90 percent of the region's population, up from under 50 percent a decade ago.

Trust the people -- this is the crucial lesson of history and America's message to the world. We must be staunch in our conviction that freedom is not the sole possession of a chosen few, but the universal right of men and women everywhere.

President Truman said, ``If we should pay merely lip service to inspiring ideals, and later do violence to simple justice, we would draw down upon us the bitter wrath of generations yet unborn.'' Well, let us go forward together, faithful friends of democracy and democratic values, confident in our conviction that the tide of the future is a freedom tide. But let us go forward with practical means.

U.S. foreign policy. We must restore America's honorable tradition of partisan politics stopping at the water's edge, Republicans and Democrats standing united in patriotism and speaking with one voice as responsible trustees for peace, democracy, individual liberty, and the rule of law.

In the 1970's we saw a rash of congressional initiatives to limit the President's authority in the areas of trade, human rights, arms sales, foreign assistance, intelligence operations, and the dispatch of troops in time of crisis. Over a hundred separate prohibitions and restrictions on executive branch authority to formulate and implement foreign policy were enacted.

The most far-reaching consequence of the past decade's congressional activism is this: Bipartisan consensus-building has become a central responsibility of congressional leadership as well as of executive leadership. If we're to have a sustainable foreign policy, the Congress must support the practical details of policy, not just the general goals.

We have demonstrated the capacity for such jointly responsible leadership in certain areas, but we've seen setbacks for bipartisanship, too. I believe that once we established bipartisan agreement on our course in Lebanon, the subsequent second-guessing about whether we ought to keep our men there severely undermined our policy. It hindered the ability of our diplomats to negotiate, encouraged more intransigence from the Syrians, and prolonged the violence. Similarly, congressional wavering on support for the Jackson plan, which reflects the recommendations of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America, can only encourage the enemies of democracy who are determined to wear us down.

To understand and solve this problem -- this problem of joint responsibility -- we have to go beyond the familiar questions as to who should be stronger, the President or the Congress. The more basic problem is, in this post-Vietnam era, Congress has not yet developed capacities for coherent, responsible action needed to carry out the new foreign policy powers it has taken for itself. To meet the challenges of this decade, we need a strong President and a strong Congress.

Unfortunately, many in the Congress seem to believe they're still in the troubled Vietnam era, with their only task to be vocal critics and not responsible partners in developing positive, practical programs to solve real problems.

Much was learned from Vietnam -- lessons ranging from increased appreciation of the need for careful discrimination in the use of U.S. force or military assistance, to increased appreciation of the need for domestic support for any such military element or policy. Military force, either direct or indirect, must remain an available part of America's foreign policy. But clearly the Congress is less than wholly comfortable with both the need for a military element in foreign policy and its own responsibility to deal with that element.

Presidents must recognize Congress as a more significant partner in foreign policymaking and, as we've tried to do, seek new means to reach bipartisan executive-legislative consensus. But legislators must realize that they, too, are partners. They have a responsibility to go beyond mere criticism to consensus-building that will produce positive, practical, and effective action.

Bipartisan consensus is not an end in itself. Sound and experienced U.S. foreign policy leadership must always reflect a deep understanding of fundamental American interests, values, and principles. Consensus on the broad goals of a safer and more humane world is easy to achieve.

IMF funding, and the bipartisan work of the Kissinger commission. But it's time to lift our efforts to a higher level of cooperation, time to meet together with realism and idealism, America's great challenges for the eighties.

Distinguished ladies and gentlemen, we have the right to dream great dreams, the opportunity to strive for a world at peace enriched by human dignity, and the responsibility to work as partners so that we might leave these blessed gifts to our children and to our children's children.

Clay. Abraham Lincoln called him ``my beau ideal of a statesman.'' He knew Clay's loftiness of spirit and vision, never lost sight of his country's interest, and, election year or not, Clay would set love of country above all political considerations.

I can't leave without a little lighter note that maybe points to some of the intricacies of diplomacy and how seemingly small they can be. I just, in leaving, want to give you a little experience that occurred and could have been a diplomatic crisis at the recent state dinner for President Mitterrand.

The President. [Inaudible] -- before we're through here. But I just looked forward to this, to welcome you all to the White House. Now, you're across the street from it, but this is considered part of the White House, too. And I want to congratulate you on the magnificent season that you had and in winning the second consecutive -- for the second consecutive year, the NCAA's women's basketball national title.

I know that you came from behind last Sunday against Tennessee and won in the second half. And being a southern Californian, why, I can say that this is the kind of performance that made USC a giant in the sports world. And now you're part of that impressive sports tradition.

But then I can also add a congratulation to all of you as a team, because it was a great team effort. And I think that your coach, the university, and your friends and families all must be very proud of you, and they have every reason to be. And you have a reason to be proud of yourselves and what you've accomplished. I think you're an inspiration to athletes all over America.

Ms. Sharp. Mr. President, on behalf of the University of Southern California, the women's athletic program, and the women's basketball team, we would like to thank you for honoring us here today. We were very excited when we got the call, and we're going to have a wonderful time while we're here. And on behalf of you, we'd like to thank you very much.

All Americans long for a safer world in which individual rights are respected and precious values flourish. But we're also realistic. We know we live in a troubled world and that we have global responsibilities. Our industries depend on energy and minerals from distant lands. Our prosperity requires a sound financial system and markets open to our goods. And our security is linked with the security of our allies and trading partners.

When I took office, we faced the greatest foreign policy challenges since World War II. Challenge number one was reducing the risk of nuclear war. Second, we had to try to help bring greater stability to regions riddled by terrorism and revolutionary violence that threatened our interests and, ultimately, our security. Third, we had to deal with an international economy that was crippled by soaring inflation rates, low growth, and predictions of an imminent global depression.

Reducing the risk of nuclear war means maintaining a secure military balance and pursuing every opportunity to reduce weapons by agreement. Today America is safer because our defenses are stronger. We're offering the most sweeping arms control proposals in history, from reducing nuclear arms to banning chemical weapons.

Well, they'll never convince the world they're sincere with harsh rhetoric and walk-outs. We do know they respect strength. And in time, we should expect that they will return to the negotiating table where all of us hope and pray that a safer world can be secured.

Our second challenge, peacemaking in troubled regions, has demanded a new direction. We're trying to bring all our strengths to bear. Economic aid alone won't stop Soviet-sponsored guerrillas, and individual rights aren't secure without peace. We need all the tools we have -- diplomatic mediation, economic help, security assistance, and promotion of democratic reforms -- to address complex regional problems. The recent Presidential elections in El Salvador probably couldn't have been held if we'd followed any other approach. And for democracy to have a chance in the future, the Congress must pass the plan we've proposed, which follows the recommendations made by the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America.

Our third challenge, expanding opportunities for economic development and personal freedom, is also being met. America's powerful expansion is pulling the international economy forward. As we buy more from our friends, they buy more from us. Jobs, income, and opportunities increase for all. We've developed creative initiatives to spark private enterprise in the Caribbean. We're expanding our economic relationships with the growing nations of the Pacific Basin. And we're shoring up the international financial system.

You hear about the economic upturn. You don't hear enough about the democratic upturn. Ten years ago, fewer than half the people of Latin America and the Caribbean lived in democracies or countries embarked on a democratic transition. Today 90 percent of the people do. The tide of the future is a freedom tide.

Finally, our fourth challenge, restoring bipartisan consensus to our foreign policy, is urgently needed. The Congress has given itself many new powers in foreign policy. Over 100 separate restrictions on executive authority were enacted in the 1970's, but the Congress hasn't yet accepted an equal sense of responsibility. We've had some successes in bipartisanship. The Scowcroft commission helped create a consensus on arms control policy, and the bipartisan Kissinger commission gave us a comprehensive set of recommendations on Central America. But we must go beyond recommendations to action. I applaud the Senate's approval this week of emergency security assistance to El Salvador, and I hope the House will give its approval. When we develop a problem-solving plan to help build a safer world and a better world, there must be no Republicans or Democrats, just Americans pulling together.

I know your victory Monday night represents not just a single effort, but is the result of countless hours of conditioning, training, and practicing by each of you individually, all of which is part of making a truly great team.

You're the first team from the northeast to win the NCAA championship in 30 years, and you have every reason to be proud, as I know you must be. You came close 2 years ago. Now, you've made it. And we're all happy for you and, I think, understand a little of how you all must feel.

And, Coach, you not only put together and directed a fine team, but you've watched out in the long run for the interests, the true interests of these young men. I think they'll remember you for a long time, and they'll be most grateful as the years go by.

During your time at Georgetown in coaching, the overwhelming majority of your players have graduated, which is also something of a record in intercollegiate athletics in these days. But it also says something about the coach's priorities.

Now, I understand there's been some criticism, Coach Thompson, that maybe your coaching was a little too stringent or almost military. I wouldn't let that bother me at all. It's results that pay off and certainly this has been a result.

You've won the title. You've never let -- and this, I think, is vitally important, as much so as the title -- you have never let these young men forget that there is something more important for their being at Georgetown than basketball. And that isn't always true.

Coach Thompson. Mr. President, certainly we do appreciate you taking the time in your busy schedule to honor us. And I've got to say that that's got to be one of the highlights in these young men's lives, to have an opportunity to meet you.

And I do want to give you a little token so that you can remember our team, and I also have a shirt. It should have ``Hoya Paranoia'' on it, because that's what they called us all year. But I'd like to give you this shirt to make you our official member.

Senator Church served his nation with distinction and dedication. His abiding interest in foreign policy made an important intellectual contribution to our country. We send our sympathy to his family and friends.

The President. Nancy and I are honored to be here tonight. And I know I speak for everyone in the audience when I thank Bill Schustik, the playwright, for the play, and the entire cast of ``On Shiloh Hill'' for that magnificent performance.

Few burdens can compare with those that were borne by the men and women who lived in this city during those bitter years. And yet even then, Washingtonians could gather at Ford's Theatre as we've gathered tonight to see the latest play, to enjoy relief from the troubles of the day.

This theatre demonstrated during the years that whatever events demand the Nation's attention, the arts must always have their place. Today Ford's Theatre is still giving Americans uplift and inspiration. And in keeping Ford's an active, vibrant institution, all of you testify to the importance of remembering our own history and witness the central place of the arts in our lives and set a fine example of the kind of private support that we've given in this country to such rich -- given it such a rich cultural life.

Then there are the board of governors, the sponsors, the patrons, and the contributors. But tonight does belong to one woman who has given of herself to Ford's, to the city, and to everyone fortunate enough to know her -- Mildred O'Neill.

Now, Mildred, you may have suspected now and then that from time to time your husband and I find something about which we disagree. [Laughter] But there is one thing that we sure agree on -- he's lucky, mighty lucky, to be the man in your life. On behalf of everybody with whom you work, your work for this grand, old theatre has meant so much, Millie, that we all thank you from the bottom of our hearts.

It's always such a special pleasure to be in Ford's Theatre, and tonight I feel doubly honored to have the privilege of giving a unique award to a wonderful lady. Millie O'Neill, as most of us know, moved to Washington permanently when her husband was elected as Speaker of the House. Ford's Theatre was the first organization she became involved with in our Nation's Capital, and 7 years later she's been unanimously chosen to receive the Lincoln Medal for her generous support of the Theatre.

I'm delighted to receive this award and be included in the very prestigious group who have been honorees before me. I am just delighted. But I have said many times before that anything that I have done for Ford's Theatre has been a labor of love. I've enjoyed every minute of it.

There aren't enough medals around for everyone that should be awarded. I would like to share this and accept it in the name of all the very wonderful men and women who have performed here at the galas, and also to the wonderful friends of Ford's who have been so very generous and gracious when I came begging -- and I came begging very often.

Mental health counselors use special counseling skills and understanding of human development to help their fellow Americans cope with problems of adjustment, the pain of illness, and the stresses of life. They provide 50 percent of the mental health services delivered in this country, working with the chronically mentally ill, the depressed, the anxious, the abused, and others, who, through no fault of their own, cannot fully meet their daily obligations or experience life's pleasures.

Through a variety of techniques, mental health counselors assist people to attain self-understanding and skills needed to solve problems, make decisions, and successfully deal with others in an increasingly complex world. Mental health counselors work in hospitals, community agencies, clinics, and the private practice sector and with all types of health professionals, applying the expertise gained through their many years of education and training.

In recognition of the important services that these counselors perform for others to save lives and reduce suffering, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 203, has designated the week beginning April 8, 1984, as National Mental Health Counselors Week and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 8th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Today's ceremonies mark the 27th year that we've set aside May 1st as Law Day, a day to reflect on and give thanks for a constitutional system that has, just as its Framers dreamed, secured the blessings of liberty through the rule of law. And so, I'm delighted that we could be joined today by so many who represent that continuing tradition of law and liberty -- Chief Justice Burger, the Attorney General, Senator Thurmond, and Director Webster, distinguished members of the judiciary, the presidents of the American Bar Association, the National Bar Association, the Federal Bar Association, and the other distinguished representatives of our legal profession, present for these Law Day proclamation ceremonies.

The theme of this year's Law Day observance is a simple phrase, but one that goes to the heart of a philosophy that has kept us both strong and free: ``Law Makes Freedom Work.'' Our Founding Fathers knew that law and freedom must be linked if both were to survive, and they knew, as the proclamation I'm about to sign states, that without law there can be no freedom, only chaos and disorder. And without freedom, law is but a cynical veneer for injustice and oppression.

America on May 1st, free men and women will commemorate Law Day, celebrating a two-century-old partnership between law and liberty. But in those other lands men and women will be summoned to state-sponsored commemorations of May Day -- sad and artificial celebrations of a revolution that enslaved the very people it promised to liberate.

I, some time ago, was interested and took it upon myself to read some of those constitutions I've just referred to. And I saw phrases very similar to the same phrases in ours regarding the fundamental rights. But there was one subtle difference. It might seem small, but it told the whole story. All of those other constitutions said these were the rights that the government was granting to the people, and our Constitution says these are the things that the people will grant to the government.

We in the United States have been blessed to live in a land where law and freedom are found not simply in a Constitution and a Bill of Rights, but in our daily lives. This is cause not for complacency and self-congratulation, but for profound gratitude -- a gratitude that's best expressed in the lives of responsible citizenship.

In particular, those of us who are gathered here today in this historic place have a special responsibility as leaders of our government and our legal profession to be worthy of the citizens we serve. To the degree that we're faithful to this trust through lives marked by public virtue and personal honor, so, too, will we be worthy of the precious gifts of law and freedom that are the unique heritage we celebrate as Americans this Law Day.

This year's Law Day theme, ``Law Makes Freedom Work,'' captures the essence of our heritage as a Republic. Our unique experience demonstrates that law and freedom must be indivisible partners. For without law, there can be no freedom, only chaos and disorder; and without freedom, law is but a cynical veneer for injustice and oppression.

The guarantees of freedom embodied in our Constitution and the Bill of Rights are a continuing legacy, enhancing the lives of our citizens and serving as an inspiration to people around the world. One of our Nation's strongest principles is that voluntary adherence to the rule of law expands, rather than limits, the opportunities for freedom.

For twenty-seven years, we have set aside this day as a time for reflection upon and celebration of the vital bond between liberty and the rule of law that gives life to our national goals and ideals. It is also an opportunity for all Americans to improve their understanding and appreciation of the contribution law makes to the preservation of freedom.

We now know that the tremor and rigidity characteristic of Parkinson's disease are caused by a chemical deficiency in the part of the brain that controls movement. Through research, scientists have discovered that certain drugs can help overcome this deficiency. Many Americans with Parkinson's disease have found that with medication, physical therapy, and emotional support from families and friends, they can lead normal and productive lives.

Superbly trained scientists are hard at work trying to solve the problems caused by Parkinson's disease. Many of these scientists are supported by the Federal government's National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and by four national voluntary health organizations: the American Parkinson Disease Association, the National Parkinson Foundation, Inc., the Parkinson's Disease Foundation, and the United Parkinson Foundation.

While these medical advances are encouraging, it is important that there be greater public awareness of what it means to have Parkinson's disease. We must let people with Parkinson's disease know that we understand when they have trouble walking through a doorway or when the disorder causes their hands or their heads to shake uncontrollably. A smile may be all the encouragement they need to relax enough to resume normal movement. I commend the courage of Americans who refuse to be vanquished by Parkinson's disease. And I applaud the resourcefulness of the families and friends who provide them with sustained affection and encouragement.

Teachers of the Year. And always, in all those years since Harry Truman, the President himself or a member of his family has personally given the award. And I think it's a clear expression that -- the high regard in which you're all held.

You hold a critically important place in the life of our nation, not just because of the skills you impart, though that in itself would be enough, but because you shape the future by shaping the adults of the future. And you do this by being the kind of people that we would want our children to become. I'm not sure that yours is the most unsung profession, but you work with quiet confidence and little fanfare, and so many teachers do not receive the praise they deserve.

In an important way, teachers set the tone for society. I don't think there's one of us in the country who doesn't remember a teacher who made a difference in our life, one who steered us in the right direction or showed faith in us early on or encouraged us when things weren't going well. It was a teacher who steered me into acting, an English teacher named B.J. Fraser, back in Dixon, Illinois.

I noted, by the way, in her biographical sketch that Sherleen Sisney became a teacher partly because of the influence of one of her high school teachers, also an English teacher. And, now, Mrs. Sisney is America's Teacher of the Year.

There's another way you set the tone. When children are just starting grade school, teachers are the first representatives they meet of the world outside the family. And when these teachers are gifted, when they encourage and communicate the excitement of learning, then children learn to be eager about the world and optimistic toward it.

There's another thing that teachers do, a quiet thing that isn't usually noted. For lonely children, children from troubled families who don't get enough attention at home, for them the classroom becomes a kind of family and the teacher their parent -- sometimes, the only parent from whom they receive affection and understanding.

You know how it is with young children when they aren't loved. They think themselves unlovable, and that's the beginning of trouble. But when a teacher comes along and gives that child attention, shows him or her kindness and makes them feel special, then for the first time, the child feels self-esteem and self-worth. And they blossom in the warmth.

All of this puts great demands on you, and I just hope that you know how much this administration is on your side and eager to help. But right now, I want to stop for a moment because I want you to hear a few words from another president.

Ms. Wright. Thank you. Mrs. Sisney is most deserving of this award, not only because she's an outstanding teacher in the professional sense but also in the human sense. She's a caring teacher who wants only the best for her students. By using such techniques as ``learning by doing,'' Mrs.

Sisney causes students to think for themselves and to rationalize certain situations. Possessing strong leadership abilities and commitment in the school and also in the community, Mrs. Sisney is respected by both her colleagues and her students. On behalf of the Ballard student body, it is with much pride that I congratulate you, Mrs. Sisney, on this great accomplishment. We love you.

The President. When I first came into office, I was very disturbed by what teachers were being forced to contend with in America's schools. Somehow in the sixties and seventies, people decided that discipline was old fashioned and high standards unnecessary. It made teaching so difficult that I admire all of you who endured all of that and held on.

Secretary Bell and others have been working long and hard to turn it around. And we're still a long way from where we want to be, but already the indications are good, and working together with State and local governments, we are turning it around. Since 1980 more than half the school districts in the country have moved to tighten course requirements. Forty-six States are making graduation requirements tougher, and now all 50 States have special task forces in education.

We want most of all to restore all honor to this profession and to all who are among America's most overburdened and underpaid professionals. So, we're working on merit pay for teachers, because they deserve to have their excellence rewarded and because the decision to become a teacher shouldn't be a decision to endure financial sacrifice for the rest of your life.

And now as I end these remarks in this great, old garden, I realize I haven't even touched on the part that you play, the vital part in keeping democracy and the democratic spirit alive. Thomas Jefferson noted this when he said, ``If you expect the people to be ignorant and free, you expect what never was and never will be.'' The ongoing experiment called democracy, the longest continuing experiment in human history, cannot exist without an informed citizenry, and cannot exist, therefore, without you.

We owe all of the teachers of America a debt we can never pay, but I mean to honor all of them today by honoring you. And so, I may say to you, Mrs. Sherleen Sisney of Ballard High School in Kentucky, and to all the State Teachers of the Year, may I say what Presidents say when they give medals for courage and extraordinary contributions: I thank you on behalf of a grateful nation.

Congress concerning the strategic modernization program, especially the Peacekeeper (MX) missile. On April 19, 1983, I was very pleased to report to the Congress and the American people that the Commission unanimously agreed on strategic force modernization recommendations, which I strongly endorsed. Secretary Shultz, Secretary Weinberger, the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the Director of the Arms Control and Disarmament Agency, and the National Security Council also endorsed the recommendations of the Commission. At that time, I affirmed my commitment to pursue ambitious arms reduction negotiations as an integral part of the package.

Despite the range of views which existed in the past, the Congress joined us in supporting this bipartisan effort to modernize our strategic deterrent. This consensus was a major accomplishment in our common effort to enhance national security. The willingness of all parties to reexamine their previous positions allowed us to end a decade of political paralysis over arms control and modernization.

Last week the Commission issued its final report. The report focuses on the arms control portion of its earlier recommendations. Once again, the Commission members and their counselors have performed a tough job extraordinarily well. Again, we all owe this distinguished group of Americans special thanks.

This final report reiterates the original recommendations, that is, an integrated strategic program consisting of an arms control structure with incentives to enhance stability at reduced levels of strategic arsenals; deployment of 100 MX missiles; and development of a small, single warhead ICBM; as well as other elements. The Commission again emphasizes that each element is essential to the overall program it outlined.

After noting the disappointing history of U.S.-Soviet arms control negotiations, the Commission emphasizes the importance of keeping expectations within bounds. In particular, arms control can make a substantial contribution to U.S. security by increasing strategic stability, allowing some types of defense expenditures to be avoided, and offering a useful forum for dialog on strategic concepts and priorities. The Commission stresses, however, that arms control alone cannot end the threat of nuclear war, reduce the casualties and damage in the event of such a war, or automatically permit deep or early defense budget cuts.

On related issues, the Commission confirms the need for effective verification and satisfactory compliance to sustain the arms control process. The Commission recognizes the significance of the 1972 Anti-Ballistic Missile Treaty and notes that research permitted under the treaty is important to ascertain realistic, technological possibilities as well as to guard against Soviet ABM breakout. The Commission also recommends extreme caution in proceeding to engineering development of an active strategic defense system.

Our proposed strategic defense initiative is limited to technology research. The initiative also includes continued study of strategic policy and arms control implications of strategic defense concepts. The program is consistent with all treaty obligations and there is no conflict between our initiative and the recommendations made by the Commission.

I urge continuing support by the Congress and the American people for this bipartisan consensus which unites us in our common objective of strengthening our national security and moving toward significant reductions in nuclear arms.

The people of our countries are both friends and neighbors, and we're pleased to have this opportunity to express our good will to neighbors who reflect the same love of liberty in which we take such pride.

The Dominican Republic today shines as a beacon of freedom-loving people everywhere. Your people have shown the spirit, courage, and perseverance necessary to build, in your words, ``a true functional democracy in the Caribbean.'' Democracy, as all free people have found, is not the easiest path, but it is the best one. It is the way most consistent with the spirit of the New World, with the values of which all Americans from one end of the hemisphere to the other can claim as their birthright.

As such, it is fitting that the Dominican Republic, with its stability and political liberty, now shows others the way. Your nation, after all, was the beachhead of Western civilization in the New World. Christopher Columbus, the great discoverer, landed on your shores during his first voyage of exploration. In your country still stands the first cathedral of America, built in 1540. The hopes and dreams of all the Americans once focused on those hardy souls who left the Old World and entered the New through the doorway of Santo Domingo.

Today, as you strive to increase the opportunity of all your citizens, you follow in the spirit of those who came before you. You face many challenges in invigorating your economy and improving the standard of living of your people. Yet even in the days of Columbus, the magnificent beauty and vast potential of your land were evident. In early 1493 Columbus wrote, ``In that island . . . we named Espanola, there are mountains of very great size and beauty, vast plains, groves, and very fruitful fields . . . . The convenience and excellence of the harbors in this island and the abundance of the rivers . . . surpass anything that would be believed by one who had not seen it.'' Well, that beauty and that potential still remain. Coupled now with freedom, your people have every reason to expect that great things can be accomplished.

President Jorge Blanco, it is propitious that your visit coincides with Pan American Week, a time when we have for the last 53 years celebrated the ties between the peoples of the Western Hemisphere. The people of the United States place great value on the special ties that we have with friends close to home. And while the progress of any country depends most heavily on the freedom, the hard work, and ingenuity of its own people and government, the United States is committed to healthy cooperation with our Caribbean Basin neighbors for the betterment of all our peoples.

Combined with your own domestic reforms, which we heartily applaud, the trade and commerce unleashed by the Caribbean Basin Initiative should bring vast new opportunities to Dominicans and to other Caribbean people. Your country and some two dozen others will now have for most of your products virtually unrestricted duty-free entry until 1996 into the world's largest market.

Never before has the United States or any other nation offered one-way free trade to any regional group of countries. It's a revolutionary step based on the conviction that enterprise, investment, and job creation will elevate the quality of life while preserving the freedom and independence so cherished by both our peoples.

There is a Caribbean country on a much different path. Instead of economic freedom, it imposes heavy-handed controls, denying for people, for example, the right of private ownership and the right to organize independent unions. Instead of seeking mutual respect and friendly commerce with its neighbors, it exports violence and hatred. Instead of enjoying democratic liberties as are guaranteed in the Dominican Republic and most other Caribbean countries, its people are denied freedom of the press, speech, and religion. This tyranny has brought little hope for economic progress, providing its people only shortages and foodlines. Cuba is now dependent on a faraway totalitarian power without whose subsidy its dictatorial government could not export aggression or, indeed, survive.

Such serfdom and bowing to the interests of faraway masters is not consistent with the legacy of the people of this hemisphere. Our history is that of breaking away from such tutelage, and in this all Americans have a common vision. Your proud independence and the continuing strength of democracy in the Dominican Republic is a tremendous inspiration here and to other people in the hemisphere who are now battling to establish their own democracies.

President Jorge Blanco, we in the United States are fully aware that the success of democratic institutions in your country is due to the good will and strenuous efforts of individuals like yourself. You and your fellow countrymen have our respect. As we work to build a more prosperous and happy future, let us continue to open the doors of commerce and social interaction between our peoples.

President Jorge Blanco. President Reagan, Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen, my greetings to you, President Reagan, to your distinguished wife, and to the representatives of your government -- and greetings, also, to the generous people of the United States.

I am very pleased with this state visit, made at your invitation and which begins at the doorstep of the majestic White House, which represents and symbolizes the prestigious image of the United States all over the world.

Since the Pilgrims arrived on the shores of Massachusetts in search of a safe haven in order to freely exercise their religious and political ideas; through the heroic struggles which culminated in independence and the establishment of the first democracy in the Americas; and then on to the emancipation of the slaves proclaimed by the eminent Abraham Lincoln, your people have been and are a model for men who join together in support of the eternal ideals of human freedom and dignity. These common efforts have created the great melting pot of races and cultures which is the United States of America.

As President and as jurist, I must recall with admiration the important documents which sustain the institutional history of the great American people, and which have established landmarks in the upward climb of humanity -- the Mayflower Compact, the Declaration of Independence, the Bill of Rights, Lincoln's Gettysburg Address, the Proclamation of the Four Freedoms by Roosevelt, among many others, have been and shall always be the most outstanding example of this nation's contributions to equality, democracy, and social progress.

We represent a Dominican democracy which is nourished, among other sources, by the old teachings which came precisely from this great nation when it proclaimed its independence on the 4th of July of 1776. Since that time, freedom has had its most immediate origin on these American lands.

In the Dominican Republic, we have always fought for freedom, and our recent history increasingly has enhanced this struggle, which is the mainstay of our democracy, playing a vital role within the inter-American system, whose principles have been incorporated into the fundamental charter of our Organization of American States.

I am particularly grateful, Mr. President, for the reference you made to my political role of responsibility for the destinies of my country, and of the difficult task that I face in strengthening our democracy, while at the same time facing the dire effects of an international economic crisis which has dealt harsh blows to the weak economies and fragile political institutions of developing countries. And I want to express my appreciation for the Caribbean Basin Initiative, which has opened new possibilities for the development of our countries in the Caribbean.

We are pleased with the certainty that our efforts will always receive the encouragement and cooperation of friendly peoples, particularly the people of this great nation which never falters in its resolve to provide necessary and important solidarity.

I accept your words of praise towards me as a recognition of the values of the Dominican people, firmly resolved to enrich its political democracy with economic and social development and to strengthen peace throughout the hemisphere. I hope that our visit will serve to strengthen even more the firm bonds of friendship and of mutual cooperation between our governments and between our peoples.

And now I would hope that our visit will be able to provide us, a visit which we are making at your kind invitation, with a way to increase even more the very strong bonds of friendship that exist between your people and mine.

The President. Well, once again, I'm calling to congratulate you and the rest of the crew aboard the Challenger there on an historic mission. The retrieval of the Solar Max satellite this morning was just great. And you and the crew demonstrated once again just how versatile the space shuttle is and what we can accomplish by having a team in space and on the ground. I know you'll agree that those folks at the Goddard Space Flight Center did a fantastic job maneuvering the satellite for you.

And, Terry, I guess you made one long reach for man this morning when you snapped that satellite with the 50-foot robot arm. And George and Jim, you've done fine work as well. The pictures sent back of you working in space are spectacular. They're also a little scary for those of us that are sitting comfortably anchored to the Earth.

We certainly concur with all of your remarks. The Challenger and its sister ships are magnificent flying machines, and I think that they can make a significant road into space with regard to repair and servicing of satellites. And we believe this is the initial step.

I would also like to concur with your remarks regarding the people up at Goddard who managed to put this satellite back in a configuration that we could retrieve it after the little problem we ran into the other day. Those people and the people in Houston and everybody that worked on it truly made this recovery possible. It is a team effort all the way.

The President. Well, let me tell you, you're all a team that has made all Americans very proud of what you're doing up there and what the future bodes for all of us with regard to this opening up of that great frontier of space.

Secretary Pierce and ladies and gentlemen, I'm delighted to join you today as our nation observes the 16th anniversary of the law that guarantees one of the most basic American rights -- the right to fair housing.

Just a generation ago, nearly 1 in 10 Americans were forced to live lives that were separate and unequal. Most black Americans were taught in segregated schools. Many could find only poor jobs and toiling for low wages. They were refused entry into hotels and restaurants. And across the country, when they wanted to buy a house or rent an apartment, they were too often told they weren't welcome.

The struggle for equality of rights moved our nation to the very depths of its soul. Throughout the land, people began to treat each other not as blacks and whites, but as fellow Americans. In 1968 an historic civil rights bill was passed, and it is title VIII of that act that we honor here today.

The opening words of title VIII were simple, but profound. ``It is the policy of the United States to provide, within constitutional limitations, for fair housing throughout the United States.'' From Maine to Hawaii, title VIII made it unlawful to discriminate in housing on the basis of race, color, religion, or national origin. No American could ever again be denied housing because of the color of his skin. The law was soon amended to prohibit discrimination on the basis of sex as well. And it became crucial in protecting the rights not only of black Americans but of all minorities, including Hispanics, Native Americans, Asians, single mothers, and others.

And today our country is more committed to fair housing than ever. State and local fair housing laws that are substantially equivalent to the Federal law have increased from 23 in 1979 to 82 today. At the national level, the Department of Housing and Urban Development under Secretary Pierce is aggressively investigating complaints of housing discrimination.

Perhaps most important, our administration has proposed legislation to give the fair housing law tougher enforcement. Among other changes in the present law, our legislation would impose civil penalties of up to $50,000 for a first housing discrimination offense and of up to a hundred thousand dollars for a second offense; allow individual as well as pattern or group complaints to be referred to the Attorney General; allow complaints to be filed up to 2 years after the alleged offense; and would extend the protection of the Fair Housing Act to the handicapped and disabled.

Despite the importance of these government efforts, fair housing can never become a permanent way of life without the involvement of thousands of contractors, realtors, building managers, and others who make up the housing industry. And that's where HUD's Public-Private Partnerships for Fair Housing programs comes in.

In partnerships in housing, local realtors, chambers of commerce, and other committed groups and citizens are conducting fair housing campaigns at their own expense. On behalf of all Americans, I want to give my heartfelt thanks to those Secretary Pierce has presented with awards and to everyone who has participated in the Public-Private Partnerships for Fair Housing program.

Ever since the passage of the Fair Housing Act during this month in 1968, April has traditionally been Fair Housing Month. This April let us once again dedicate ourselves to the great work of assuring fair housing for all. And let us continue that work until fair housing becomes a permanent reality in our national life.

In my State of the Union Address this year, I called on the Congress to join me in cutting projected deficits significantly over the next 3 years. I said at the time that deficit reductions should be a bipartisan effort, bringing representatives of both parties in the Congress together with the top officials of the administration to develop specific proposals. I'm delighted to report that the first result of that effort has finally reached -- well, not my desk, but that table. H.R.

Seldom do I receive legislation that will reduce government spending and at the same time help improve conditions for farmers. This new law will help reduce excessive wheat supplies. At the same time, it'll keep the production of other major crops from growing too fast by establishing more reasonable target price levels -- price levels that discourage excessive production both here and abroad.

In addition, during negotiations on this legislation we were able to provide additional funding for farm exports and for farm disaster assistance programs, both high priorities for farmers. In recent years, farmers have gone through some hard times because of a weak demand in export markets and unusually large harvests of certain crops that resulted in weak prices. In addition, farmers went through a particularly wrenching transition from the very high inflation and interest rates of the late 1970's to today's more restrained inflation. Now that the cost of fuel, fertilizer, equipment, and the other items that farmers depend on has stopped rising at double-digit rates, I believe that we're poised for a more stable and secure recovery in the farm economy.

When the Congress passed the 1981 farm bill, few people thought that inflation would come down as fast as it did. That law, therefore, mandated large automatic increases in farm price supports, a desperate effort to keep farmers' heads above water in a rising tide of inflationary pressures. Well, with our success in controlling inflation, those mandated increases are no longer needed to offset costs; indeed, instead of improving conditions in the farm sector, the mandated target price increases threatened to further depress commodity prices by creating too great an incentive for increased production at the same time that they were adding to the deficits. H.R.

This bill was the product of some tough head-to-head negotiations. Like any compromise, it's far from perfect, but it demonstrates that a good-faith effort by all parties can produce results. As I sign this first installment of the deficit downpayment, I want to give a word of encouragement to those who are working on the remaining proposals still under consideration by the Congress. The skeptics who claimed that the Congress and the administration would be unwilling to take any tough steps to reduce the deficit were just plain wrong. And now that we've shown we can do it, we must go on to take the other tough steps that the good of the country demands.

In recent days a shrill and often confusing debate has developed over our goals, plans, and activities in Central America. Because this debate, much of it uninformed and unattributed, is obscuring the real situation, we believe it in the public interest to set the record straight on our objectives, our policy, and our actions -- on the record.

First, allegations have been made that we are planning for U.S. combat troops to conduct an invasion in Central America. We state emphatically that we have not considered nor have we developed plans to use U.S. military forces to invade Nicaragua or any other Central American country. Secretary Weinberger made this point in his television appearance on Sunday. Some have chosen to disbelieve him -- consciously or unconsciously confusing what they call ``invasion'' plans with our longstanding obligations under the 1947 Rio Treaty, our treaty obligations to defend the Panama Canal, or military contingency plans for disaster relief, humanitarian assistance, or emergency evacuations. For over a generation, as prudence would dictate, we have maintained and updated plans for these contingencies. We have not, however, planned to use our forces to invade any country in the region.

American region have not been adequately briefed to appropriate committees of the Congress. To the contrary, all U.S. activities in the Central America region have been fully briefed in detail to the committees of the Congress which exercise jurisdiction in full compliance with the law.

International Court of Justice. A government fanatically dedicated to intervention beyond its borders thus seeks to use an honorable international institution to protect it from its own citizens who are rising up against it. This administration will not be deceived nor will it play that game.

The courage and confidence in democracy that the Salvadoran people are demonstrating deserve our admiration and full support. Now more than ever, our backing for the democratic process must go beyond mere words. Recent uninformed comment on these matters has diverted attention from the central issue. The administration has proposed a long-term program based on the recommendations of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America. We have also presented our case for urgent military assistance to El Salvador. That case is sound, and the ongoing Salvadoran election process about to enter a runoff requires our support so that El Salvador can ensure its safe conduct.

Canal but sits astride some of the most important sealanes in the world. Most importantly, it contains millions of people who want to be free and who crave democracy. The recent elections in El Salvador prove that. The real issues are whether we in the United States want to stand by and let a Communist government in Nicaragua export violence and terrorism in this hemisphere and whether we will allow the power of the ballot box to be overcome by the power of the gun. There is no doubt that the Soviet Union and Cuba want to see communism spread further in Central America. The question is: Will the United States support those countries that want democracy and are willing to fight for their own freedom?

President Jorge Blanco and his lovely wife represent a country rich in history, blessed with natural beauty, and filled with creative and robust people. This morning at the welcoming ceremony, I mentioned the great accomplishments of your people. And, Mr. President, you can be rightfully proud of your country's freedom.

Eugenio Maria de Aostos, a writer from the last century, truly a man of the hemisphere, once wrote, ``No one knows better the meaning of justice and freedom than those who have lived under despotism.'' Well, such is the case of those who lead the Dominican Republic today. In our lifetime, through your efforts and those of good people like you, the Dominican Republic has been rescued from tyranny and brought safely into the family of free nations. Your personal commitment to the high ideals of liberty, Mr. President, is exemplary.

There can be no greater vocation for any statesman than to lead his people to a more free, just, and humane society. In pursuit of that vocation, you have set a standard of statesmanship and patriotism which is a model not only for the Caribbean but for the Western Hemisphere -- indeed, for the leader of any country seeking to create a climate of dignity and freedom in which the human spirit can flourish.

World events totally beyond our control can dramatically change the rules of the game. Such was the case with energy costs during the last decade. Maintaining healthy economic growth in the face of rising energy costs has been a major challenge to democratic governments throughout the world. Progress can no longer be taken for granted, but, instead, requires constant diligence and a commitment to the long-run well-being of a country.

President Blanco, your government is today ensuring a better tomorrow. You're meeting the challenge head on, working diligently to rebuild your economy through fiscal responsibility and courageous reform in public administration. You've improved your country's business and investment climate. And by stressing the importance of the private sector, and by providing practical incentives for investment, you've made certain the Dominican Republic will be part of the economic upsurge now taking place in the United States, as it spreads throughout the global economy.

Some of you may not be aware that President Blanco, in his country, has established enterprise zones to encourage investment and commerce. Mr. President, perhaps you've got some tips on how to get great ideas like that -- [laughter] -- through the legislative process here in Washington.

Seriously, though, Mr. President, the strength of Dominican democracy have not gone unnoticed by our Congress. Your support and the example of a strong Dominican democracy deserve credit for helping assure the passage of the Caribbean Basin Initiative. You proved that there is a better way, and it works.

This dinner will be permanently engraved in my memory, as it will be in that of my wife and of the members of our delegation. Henceforth, we can include it among the most stellar moments of our lives.

Over and above protocol, we feel the warmth and affection of President Reagan, his gracious wife, Nancy, and the high officials of this nation who receive us as emissaries of the democracy which we represent with genuine pride.

We are pleased to see once again that the Dominican democracy is respected and admired by the great democracy of the United States of America. We are both associated with and agree upon the defense of the human values which gave birth to our respective nations. We share a common past of ideals and principles, and a present full of responsibilities which must contribute to the building of a more promising future for our people.

I appreciate your recognition of the democratic vocation of our people and of the firm resolve of the government we are fortunate to head to fight tenaciously, with unswerving faith and will, for maintenance of a democratic system, in spite of the adversities of an unprecedented world economic crisis which affects all of the international community, but more so the developing countries.

From the very moment I took office I set a clear and precise target: to restore the economy and the finances of the Dominican nation to health. We are devoting major efforts and sacrifices to this unpostponable objective, conscious of the fact that a house in order and the adoption of policies that are conducive to sustained development and of reform measures that will ensure a true system of social justice, are indispensable prerequisites for the strengthening and full effectiveness of our democratic institutions.

The Presidency of a country, be it large or small, is a forge where leadership is hammered out, in the awareness of the resources and aspirations of their peoples. That is why we do not hesitate to support and defend the generous program of the Caribbean Basin Initiative, which has already become reality and serves as a means to expand our markets, at the same time that it constitutes a great stimulus for private enterprise, a constant and necessary engine for the development of our societies.

I sincerely hope that our talks will lead to appropriate and fair solutions to common problems and will guarantee positive achievements for the development of our economies and the prosperity of our nations.

Juan Pablo Duarte. Eugenio Maria de Aostos was the teacher par excellence of all successive generations of Dominicans as the years have gone by. Juan Pablo Duarte, together with other two great patriots, was the founder of our modern republic. But the mention of the name of Juan Pablo Duarte here in this room at the White House is an extraordinary recognition of the ideals that have shaped our nation throughout the years, and which led to the independence movement which led, in turn, to our independence declared on the 27th of February of 1844.

President Jorge Blanco spoke in Spanish, and a text of his remarks in English was provided to the dinner guests. As printed above, the remarks follow that text, except where the modification was made by President Jorge Blanco's interpreter.

I've heard enough since I've been here to know something that Mr. Caldwell was talking about, and that is the relationship -- the communication that takes place here. And you know, I've always believed that a lot of the troubles in the world would disappear if we were talking to each other instead of about each other. And communication really means people having something to say and then the manner in which it's done.

And a favorite story of mine about communication was told to me by Danny Villanueva. You younger ones won't remember, but he once was the placekicker for the Los Angeles Rams and then he became a sports announcer. And Danny told me that one night he was over having dinner at the home of one of the ballplayers with the Dodgers. The young wife was bustling about getting dinner ready. They were talking sports, and the baby started to cry. And over her shoulder, she said to her husband, ``Change the baby.'' And he was embarrassed, being a young fellow, in front of Danny. And he said, ``What do you mean, change the baby? I'm a ballplayer.

Well, you communicated since I've been here. You've shown me an exciting success story and given me a glimpse of America's future. And it looks mighty good. In this place, in one of our country's basic industries, we can see where America's headed and what lies in store for all our people. Each of you can rightly take pride in helping make us all that we are and all that we can be.

You've also made me remember how far we've come. And speaking for myself, that's a long way, because when I think back to my first car -- I bet it isn't the same as yours, a Model-T. Well, as I toured part of your assembly plant just for a short time here and watched how busy the assemblers and the other workers are, I couldn't help but think back to the days when America's economy had sputtered and stalled. Only a few years ago this industry and all America were in the worst economic mess in decades.

It didn't matter who you were or where you came from, double-digit inflation was slamming shut the doors of opportunity. And if you dreamed of owning a home or buying a new car, 21\1/2\-percent interest rates were closing the doors on those dreams, too. And that's what we faced in January of 1981.

An industry which burst onto the scene in the early days of the 20th century and became a vital part of our existence found itself crippled by too much regulation, too much government interference, and too much backseat driving by Washington. In 1980 alone, the Big Three lost $4.2 billion. Plant closings across the country plunged businesses and families into desperate financial straits. Many of those families were uprooted, as workers set out across the country looking for jobs.

And we knew that to do that, government had to get its own house in order. And at the same time we knew that government needed to get out of the way of the people and the spirit of enterprise that encourages risk taking and rewards innovation. And we knew it wouldn't be easy.

Both the economy and the auto industry were in recession, the culmination of years of overtaxing, overspending, and overpromising by those who claimed they could spend your earnings better than you could. We knew that progress would come in inches, not miles, but we knew that if we worked together, progress would come.

It hasn't been easy. Times have been rough and, yes, the recession was much deeper and longer than anyone had predicted. But these problems had been building up for 20 years, and we were determined to find a real economic cure, not just resort, as they had so often in the past, to another political quick fix. There have been eight recessions since World War II, and seven of those were the political quick fix. There's no compassion in snake oil cures.

American automobile industry that's moving forward again. Inflation, once out of control, has plummeted by nearly two-thirds. For 2 years it's been under 4 percent. Right now it's in the neighborhood of 4 percent or a little above, probably because of some weather conditions that changed food prices and so forth. The prime rate is down by nearly half from when we came to office. And a few weeks ago, we learned that last quarter's gross national product grew at a healthy 7.2 percent.

At the same time -- and this is the greatest figure of all -- 5.1 million more Americans have jobs today than had jobs just 16 months ago. We've had the steepest drop in unemployment in over 30 years. Factory orders, housing starts, and retail sales are up, and -- listen closely to this one -- auto sales are up dramatically. More than 100,000 of you auto workers went back to work in 1983, with more expected back this year. And right now there are 85,000 more people working in the automobile industry in general than were working there in 1980 in that period I was telling you about. The unemployment rate, we know, in America across the country, the average is 7.7 percent. I think you'd be happy to know that in the automobile industry, the unemployment rate is down to 5.5 percent. And I hope it's going down lower than that.

Here at Ford, because of your determination, dedication, and hard work, you sold more cars last year than any time since 1979. All of us, working together and ignoring the gloom criers and the pundits who said it couldn't be done, all of us have hung tough. And today, as we see the auto industry and the economy humming with activity, aren't we glad we did?

Your industry and many others have begun to shape up. You're getting lean and mean and ready to face the challenge of the future. By the end of this year, some $50 billion will have been invested in the 1980's by American automobile companies to modernize plants and design and produce attractive, fuel-efficient cars. At this plant, Ford has invested almost $200 million to modernize and refurbish for the future.

Shortly after we came into office, our administration discussed the auto industry's problems with the Japanese. They offered to voluntarily restrain auto exports to the United States. And this gave the domestic auto industry the breathing room it needed to build new plants and products, improve quality, increase productivity, and participate in the economic recovery.

Now, some advocate far harsher methods. They believe we should run up the flag in defense of our markets, embrace protectionism, and insulate ourselves from world competition. But we'll never meet the challenge of the eighties with that kind of defeatist mentality.

In there having lunch, I told just a few of you my own experience when I entered the job market back in the early thirties at the very depths of the Great Depression. Twenty-six percent unemployment; the government putting radio ads on -- don't leave home looking for work, there is none -- and a great deal of that was due to what somebody thought might be an answer to our Depression problems, the Smoot-Hawley tariff bill, which literally destroyed free trade worldwide and perpetuated the Depression at that time -- which, incidentally, was only cured then by World War II.

I believe if Americans work together to improve quality, become more productive, hold down costs, and invest in tomorrow's technology, then we can out-compete, out-perform, and out-sell the pants off anybody. And echoing Mr. Caldwell, I believe in America being first, because America is best.

You know, if the dream of America is to be preserved, we mustn't waste the genius of one mind, the strength of one body, or the spirit of one soul. We need all our people, men and women, young and old, individuals of every race to be healthy, happy, and whole. This is our goal. And we won't rest until all Americans can reach as high as their vision and God-given talents take them.

Don't worry, I'm not going to do an encore, but one of the things that I enjoy most in this job is the opportunity to get out of Washington and to meet people from every walk of life and from every corner of the world. But I have to tell you that no matter where I go, there are no more finer people than those men and women who raise our food and patrol our streets and man our mines and factories and teach our children, keep our homes, and heal us when we're sick. These people are everyday Americans, but they're heroes in their own right. They're the unsung heroes of America.

And today I'd like to honor one such hero. Barney Maxon, could you and your wife, Jewell -- I thought your daughter, Carol, was with you. Carol, come on up here. Today I'd like to honor one of those heroes I was talking about, Barney Maxon. Barney's someone who's always been there, given above and beyond what was required of him. And, Barney, Chairman Caldwell and I would like to present you with a plaque in honor of the 50 years of loyal and dedicated service you've given to the Ford Motor Company.

Note: The President spoke at 12:21 p.m. in the finished product auto assembly line area of the plant. He was introduced by Phillip Caldwell, chairman of the board of the Ford Motor Co. In his opening remarks, the President also referred to Paul Nolan, manager of the plant.

Prior to his remarks, the President had lunch in the cafeteria with plant workers and executives and then toured the assembly line. Following his remarks, the President went to a conference room at the plant for a meeting with labor and managment leaders.

Our two countries bear a special responsibility toward our fellow human beings, both of this generation and of generations yet to come. We must ensure that our differences, however large, are resolved without the use of force and we must seek to build a better set of relationships based on those values that are common to all mankind. As you assume your new duties, I want to assure you that the United States remains ready to pursue a constructive dialogue aimed at reducing the risks of war and the levels of armaments, resolving regional conflicts peacefully and promoting trust and confidence which will enable the people of our two countries, and of the world, to live freer and more prosperous lives.

Well, I just wanted to say good morning, and I've been seeing this and hearing about this construction and all. And, of course, you all know that one of the reasons for coming here is that in this industry, in the housing industry, you're out in front of the rest of the United States as to the comeback -- and more going on here than -- and a higher percentage than any place else.

This is an industry that can cause a depression when things are bad all by itself. But it's also an industry that can lead, as this one has been leading, in a recovery from the recession that we've had. And I just have to say, from what I've seen here -- now, I don't know exactly when I'll be in the market. It could be several years; it could be next year. [Laughter] But I've been watching with great care, because I'll probably be in the house market, having sold the one we owned due to the change in locale.

But I have to tell you, I'm so pleased about the recovery that we have and what has happened with this industry, and that at last, a dream is restored that probably is more prevalent here than in any other country in the world. And that is everyone's dream of wanting to own their own piece of ground and their own house.

And I have a little confession to make to you also. I was sort of in this business from the hammer-and-nail side and pick-and-shovel side. One of the first jobs I ever got -- summer jobs -- was I was 14 years old, and it was with an outfit that wasn't building new ones, but they were buying old ones and remodeling. And before the summer was over, I laid hardwood floor, I shingled roof, I painted. But I do remember also, I started -- some of these houses, they wanted to add basements and so forth, and didn't have the tools and equipment that we have today. It was pick and shovel. And I was on the pick and shovel.

Well, I just, again, I just want to commend you for all of this. I think this is a picture of what's happening all over America, and you can be very proud that you're out in front on it here. Thank you for letting me come in and stop production for a while.

Mr. Wood. Well, we understand you've been visiting a nearby housing subdivision, and we're very interested to hear your reactions to it. But we thought before that you might like to know what we've been talking about here.

The map in front of us, the topographical map, is a new town in this area about 25 minutes from here called Las Calinas. And it has commercial buildings, as you can see, and ultimately will house fifty to sixty thousand people. It's being developed by the Southland Financial Corporation. Many of the biggest homebuilders in the country have bought pieces of land and are building their own developments there.

And before you came, we went around and introduced ourselves and talked about how business was, and the consensus was that business right now is good. Eleven of the 12 people on the panel mentioned concerns about interest rates.

Well, I know, too, that I'm going to have an opportunity later to greet each one of you, so that's why I didn't take time here in the beginning. It was most interesting and enjoyable, the project that I just -- and the fine homes that are being built there. And I had an opportunity to tell them a little bit about, in my boyhood, having a job with a unit that was building. But it was a little different then. We didn't have the machinery and skiploaders, and things weren't around -- you did it with a pick and shovel.

But you also weren't limited to just one type of work. As I explained to them, before the projects were over, why I would end up laying hardwood floor and shingling roofs, and even painting, and so forth. But today, the improvement in tools and productivity and all -- although if you see a slowdown in the Dallas area, why it's because I slowed it down by being there. Everyone stopped work. [Laughter] That happens in government, too. I don't even have to be around.

But it's certainly a pleasure for me to get out of Washington and to be with all of you today. It helps to get a fresh perspective. You know, if you stay in Washington too long, the world begins to look like ``The Twilight Zone.'' And I have, as I say, just come from that site in Grand Prairie, and I'm interested with what I saw and the people I met.

Far too many in our Nation's Capital have come to believe that progress is the result of passing laws and regulations. But I think this group knows better than most that that isn't so. It's opportunities for hard work and risktaking by people like yourselves that keeps this country building and growing. And more often than not, you're doing it in spite of the roadblocks put in your way by government.

For the last 3 years, we've been busy trying to remove roadblocks and create a stable economic environment in which enterprise can flourish. Irresponsible taxing and spending policies in the years prior to this administration gave us double-digit inflation and economic stagnation. You saw firsthand the failure of the liberal tax, spend, and inflate policies. Your industry had its legs knocked out from under it by ruinous inflation and killer interest rates.

It takes time to put a program in place, and it takes time for it to start working, and working its magic throughout the economy. But I think even the skeptics are admitting that our reforms are working. The American economy as a whole, and your industry in particular, are coming back strong.

Overall economic growth last year was a robust 6 percent. And the first quarter growth this year suggests the recovery is going to continue at a healthy rate. But I'm also encouraged by the fact -- and this may sound strange -- that the figures that were released this morning by the Commerce Department suggest that there is some slowing of that first quarter growth. And I think that's fine, because I think it indicates that this is a sustainable expansion, not just a quick fix or a splurge.

But the strength surging through your industry and the rest of our economy is no accident, and it's not a reflection of some uncontrollable cycle. They used to try to explain inflation away like a plague of locusts that we didn't know where it came from and it just was there. Well, when the last administration took over, inflation was running at 5 percent, and the prime interest rate -- and it hurts to say this -- was 7 percent. And after just 4 years, we were left with double-digit inflation, 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rates, and spiraling mortgage rates, of course.

The average monthly mortgage payment rose from $256 to $598, and that $342-a-month increase in the cost of buying a home made all the difference, as you all well know. Since our economic recovery program took effect, the decline in mortgage rates from a peak of about 18 down to 13\1/2\ translates into a typical savings of $225 in the monthly payment for families that are now buying homes.

Inflation has been reduced by around two-thirds. Home ownership is an essential part -- as I told these people out there today -- of the American dream. It strengthens the family. It's fundamental to our way of life, and we want to build an opportunity society where more and more families from all walks of life can afford to buy their own homes.

But, you know, one of the strangest things to me has been listening to people suggest that we should be frightened because the economy's growing too fast, that too many people are finding jobs, and this will push up interest rates. Well, no one will ever convince me that economic growth is bad for us. I think it's good for everybody, especially the homebuilding industry.

I believe there are three keys to bringing interest rates down further and keeping them down: first, real and lasting spending restraint by the Congress; second, an overhaul of our tax system to make taxes more simple, more fair, and to provide greater incentives for growth; and third, confidence that the Federal Reserve Board will provide sufficient liquidity to finance economic growth while maintaining long-term price stability.

The progress that we've made can't be taken for granted. We can't go back to the same taxing and spending patterns of the last decade and expect that we will not also fall into the pit of recession, inflation, and stagnation from which we're now just emerging. How we come to grips with the Federal deficit will set the tone. We can try to balance up by increasing taxes, undercutting economic growth and investment. Or we can try to balance down with lower spending and tax rates, permitting our economy to break free.

But we've heard considerable talk about crowding out, about government borrowing too much of the funds in the private credit markets. Well, that is indeed a threat and one of which you're keenly aware. Yet even with all the attention that's focused on this issue, not one of the advocates of raising taxes has ever answered a challenge that I have issued -- I've made it over and over again.

The same amount of money is going to be taken, whether the government takes it in taxes or the government borrows to fund the present activities of government. The problem is government is taking too big a share from the private sector, and we're not going to answer our economic problems until we harness government and bring it back down to within a reasonable percentage of the gross national product.

We've made a proposal, as you know, for a downpayment on the deficit that would be a good first step. And yesterday the Finance Committee in the Senate passed that. In 1982 an agreement was made with me -- and I'm remembering this to this day -- that the Congress would provide $3 in savings for every additional dollar of revenue that we would agree to. Well, it was against my grain, but I went along with a tax reform package that was designed to raise about a hundred billion dollars over 3 years, thinking that there would be a $300 billion cut in spending. Well, I haven't seen any serious effort to cut spending; in fact, there are even proposals to increase spending in certain areas. So, there's a great deal of politicking going on about the deficit. People are going to have to judge for themselves who's serious about the problem.

Now, I'm willing to do my part, but I will not simply give in to those who would take us back into recession and/or play fast and loose with the security of our country. You can expect some progress in the areas where the executive branch can act on its own. The Grace commission provided us with a great number of suggestions being evaluated through the departments and agencies right now. But for tangible progress to be made, we need commitment from the Congress, which until now has not been forthcoming.

I'm not pessimistic about the deficit or any of the challenges we face. And I was only joking when at the Gridiron the other night I said I wouldn't worry about it because it's big enough to take care of itself; that was a joke. [Laughter] But already the deficit has been coming down from the economic growth that we've been seeing throughout the country.

As you told our board of directors last May, homebuilders are leading the recovery by the sweat of their brow and the strength of their nerve. That is still true today. Last year, we built about 1.7 million housing units, an increase of 60 percent from the previous year. This year, we expect to start 1.8 million units. During February, new homes were being started at an annual rate of 2.2 million, and new homes are selling at their fastest pace in 4 years.

Looking back, this recovery represents a major triumph for your administration. You put America back on its feet. You put Americans back to work. You licked inflation and helped create an economic climate in which it was possible for small builders like myself to build affordable housing for young people just starting families and careers.

But the recovery, Mr. President, has reached a critical turning point. Looking ahead and beyond today's robust economic news, there's a great deal of uncertainty in the marketplace. This uncertainty is being expressed by the typical member of our association who constructs fewer than 20 houses per year. Builders are the ones out in front of this economic recovery. They are the ones that are taking the risk. Builders are the ones who'd live and die with the ups and downs in interest rates. And interest rates, Mr. President, are rising. That has the builders worried.

Now mortgage rates are approaching 14 percent and still rising. That's too high for millions of potential home buyers. Unless this upward trend in interest rates is reversed, it is only a matter of time before home sales drop, new construction declines, and unemployment rises.

But to do so requires your bold, demonstrated, decisive leadership. It requires immediate action on the Federal budget that would cut the deficit in the neighborhood of 150 to 200 billion over the next 3 fiscal years.

Builders view the deficit as the single greatest threat to the Nation's economic recovery. Deficits keep interest rates high. Deficits are inflationary. Deficits compete with investments. Deficits reduce our ability to compete in the world market. And deficits threaten to upset the current economic recovery.

Mr. President, the time is running out. The bipartisan program now in Congress appears to be our last chance of cutting the deficit during this election year. We appreciate your work on the bipartisan effort, and we hope you will continue to take a leadership in this deficit reduction program. By using your office to negotiate a consensus on the budget, you will be sending a powerful message throughout this land. Interest rates would decline or at least settle down.

The President. Well, whichever is suitable here. I would like to comment this with regard to the interest rates and what you just said here with regard to the connection to the deficit. As I hope I've made clear, deficits are something -- we shouldn't have had them for the last 50 years as a part of our regular policy, and we shouldn't continue having them.

But I think that there are two other reasons for the interest rates right now and one of them, in one way, is a sign of the progress that we've made. The other one is a pessimism that, because of the past experiences going back to the time of the Second World War, the seven previous recessions, that the market isn't quite convinced that inflation is going to stay down where it is.

The thing that is born out of the encouragement is that, yes, this last flurry of a little bit of climbing interest rates, I think, is more due to the fact that the robust economy saw a great upsurge -- we've gone to 12-something percent over about 5 percent of business investment in new plant and equipment, and so forth, and at the same time, the great upsurge in consumer buying. Now, that's the thing that as of this morning we find, there's been some slowdown in that, particularly in those areas that are tied to interest rates, such as appliances, the durable goods, and automobiles. And there we've just run in temporarily, I'm sure, to supply and demand. There's more market for the money out there than there is money. I believe that we're going to see before long that beginning to come down.

Now, if I could respectfully suggest that with no retreat from going after the deficits, I think that there it's more that they contribute to the pessimism of the people in the marketplace that would account for the interest rates than having any direct tie, because let me point one significant thing.

And the same thing is true if we look at foreign countries. If we look at our deficits on the basis of percentage of gross national product, we find that this great growth in them in the number of dollars is not as severe, that there are other countries among our industrial allies out there that have the same percentage of deficit in their gross national product, but they don't have the high interest rates we have.

But you are right that it is a problem, that in solving it I think we can restore the confidence in the market. And I am going to say that I believe that before the warm weather's left us, I think we're going to see some settling down of the interest rates.

Week. 625,000 realtors across the country are joined together with 60 million families that own their own home to celebrate private property in this country. And home ownership is, of course, the most important part of private property.

We're also concerned about how we go about to bring down the deficit. As you've said, if we tax investment on the front end to lower interest rates on the back end, we will have already taken taxes away from investment if the tax is paid on investment. So, we will not have any gain at all by bringing down the deficit by taxing investment.

That's why we're particularly concerned, not with what happened in the House, as you indicated passed yesterday, but also what's happening in the Senate Finance Committee. They want to erase away your accelerated cost-recovery program, going from 15 years to 20 years. And this would be primarily for rental housing. And the impact upon it when it's fully effective will mean rent increases for those in rental housing, $25 a month. And, as you know, that affects the safety net, that's a lower income part of the market. And we would hope that you would not favor the increase of the depreciation life or the accelerated cost-recovery period going from 15 to 20 years, because that's a huge increase. Also, we end up with about a million fewer rental housing units than we would otherwise have in this country.

The second point: There has been rumors, as there always will be, about your suggestion of a study to be made, a report to be made to you in December as to what an overall tax reform and simplification program might be. There are rumors that are starting to abound -- and some of them deal with some of your assistants, who, I'm sure, are not reflecting your viewpoint, but, nonetheless, cause some concern -- that increased taxation on homeownership is being considered, such as doing away with interest deductibility on home mortgages, while allowing deductibility of interest on all the other kinds of investments. That would increase taxes on the average homeowner, and there are 60 million households who are homeowners in this country, two-thirds of Americans. That would increase it by $2,500, a very large increase, if it was totally removed, or a smaller amount, if it was eliminated on a small basis.

And there is concern, because since 1980 the homeownership rate has gone down. And we've washed away half the gain that we got in the 1970's already during the 1980's. And clearly, as you have indicated in your proclamation on Private Property Week and also right here, that we want to move in the opposite direction because of the fundamental values that homeownership has. I would hope that you would disavow any effort to increase taxation on homeownership or increase taxation on rental units in this country.

Mr. Prior. Mr. President, I thank you for giving the opportunity once again to talk with you personally, as you have three previous times, and to discuss with you concerns of our savings institutions in the country.

Savings and loan associations and savings banks are the main sources of financing of all this activity, the real estate sales and new homebuilding that we're talking about this morning. We have been in that position of market dominance in the past, and despite some of what has been written and said in recent years -- some of which was just said on my starboard side before you got here this morning -- we remain the primary mortgage lending source today.

In 1983 we had an alltime record lending year in our institutions -- $137 billion in mortgage loans by savings institutions. Now, what made this volume possible is the increasing acceptance of the adjustable rate mortgage; 60 to 75 percent of our lending was represented by this flexible interest.

The financial institutions industry has also just gone through the very gratifying experience of more than recapturing the deposit base that we had lost to the money market funds, and that has helped to make the strong housing recovery possible.

But we're concerned about what lies just ahead, and what you said a minute ago is most encouraging. The fear that looms in people's minds today is, are we going to be hit again with higher and higher interest rates? And underlying that, will Washington be able to get these huge deficits under control?

Now, I manage a small financial institution in the cornfields of Indiana. And I talk to men and women every day when I'm in my office who wonder whether they'll ever be able to afford a house with the interest rates as high as they are and seeming to be headed still higher.

The U.S. League, 2 days ago, released a survey showing home buying patterns last year, and the good news is that more first-time buyers got into the home buying market than ever before. And home prices were not spiraling upward as they had been. In fact, to the surprise of many people, home prices were actually lower, our study showed, in 1983 than in 1981. That is median prices.

But we should not be misled by the recent strong showing of housing markets, because the fear of inflation and high interest rates is decidedly back in people's minds. Some of us here and our customers have been through a couple of very difficult years with high interest rates. And just as you have pointed out to us, Mr. President, we see the Federal Government at the core of the problem. Federal borrowing to cover Federal spending takes so much of the credit pool that businesses and families are shortchanged. We simply can't bid competitively for it.

There's no longer an insulation of borrowers from the impact of the money markets, because adjustable mortgages let that rise in market interest rates pass through to the borrower. This is one big reason why more and more people are becoming sensitive to these interest rate moves. A rate increase will cost them money every month, once their mortgage is adjusted. This time around it'll not be just the financial institutions and business borrowers that feel the pinch; it will be many families as well.

So, we in the savings institutions want to be sure the deficit problem is dealt with now, while there is still time to bring it under control. And we are hopeful as you are, Mr. President, and as you have said many times, that a nonpartisan approach will, in fact, get something done. We're not concerned with who gets the credit for bringing the deficit down as long as we get the job done.

Ms. Kirk. Thank you, Mr. President. Our question: The deficit, as you've heard, is a major concern to all of us, and especially to the building industry. We know that Congress is currently working on a number of proposals to control the deficit. Mr. President, what steps are you willing to take in this effort?

The President. Well, there virtually aren't any steps that I won't take if they can be taken without punishing any particular segment of our society. And apropos of some of the things that you were saying, sir, in this year -- and I know there's a lot of talk that, ``Well, everybody's waiting until the election year is over because of the threat of votes'' and so forth. Actually, one of the main problems is that in an election year like this, the Congress time is restricted. There is so much time that is now going to be taken out -- and understandably -- for campaigning that there's a limit to how much you can put on their plate. This is why we've called what we're asking for a downpayment.

But in the meantime, as I've said before, we have to and are looking at the whole structure. And I have to say we're all and should be indebted to Peter Grace and the more than 2,000 business and professional people in this country who not only volunteered their services, free time to go in and look at government but who also, for whatever financial overhead there was, contributed the money for that.

But they came back -- this idea had come to me when I was first elected Governor of California and the State was almost in as bad a shape as the Federal Government is. And only there we had a constitutional requirement that in the first 6 months that I was in office, I had to restore the balance that had been lost in the previous administration out there. And I called on business and the private sector in California to do what the Grace commission has done.

They came in, some 250 there, average giving 114 days full-time away from their own activities and their own businesses and professions, came back with about 1,800 recommendations. We implemented more than 1,600 of those and restored California to the point that, over the next few years, we would come to such surpluses that I was able to restore them to the people as one-time tax rebates come income tax collection time.

And I remember about the third time that we did that, a long-time senator, State senator, came into my office one day outraged about our giving that money back to the people. And he said he considered giving that money back to the people an unnecessary expenditure of public funds.

But we have some 2,470 recommendations from the Grace commission, and we have a task force now within government looking at these. A number of them can be done administratively, many of them will take legislation, but we're going to go -- just one simple example I used this morning that can show. Government is so hidebound. It gets into the habit of doing things the way they've always been done. And they don't realize, as business has to, that there are new ways and that there're improvements and efficiencies.

In the Defense Department, with all the complaints that people may want to make because we're trying to restore defenses, the percentage of the budget that goes to defense now is smaller than it historically has been back through the years. Defense, being the prime responsibility, used to take half the Federal budget. Well, it's down to a little less than 30 percent now of the Federal budget.

But there they found that they were putting out, due to the things of the day and the machinery of the day, they were putting out paychecks that were on a kind of cardboard type of paycheck. And they're now putting them out on the regular kind of paper paycheck, and it costs about half as much as it used to cost.

But we are going to continue. We're going to do everything we can, and it's going to take aiming down the road at a balanced budget. And I'm going to continue to insist on an amendment that demands a balanced budget in the Federal Government.

Governor that I would like to have as President -- line-item veto. Let a President be able to veto out that item that was tied into a necessary bill in order to get it passed because they knew they couldn't get it passed on its own.

As Governor of California, I vetoed 943 of those and was never overridden once. Even though the budget had to be passed by a two-thirds majority, the same as is required for overriding a veto, they would not stand up and vote for that single item out there exposed for what it was in order to override the veto. So, that is a tool we must have.

Some of the things in the tax that you're talking about -- deduction of interest on home mortgages and all -- I have told them I want them to look in the area of simplification at everything, but study everything that can be done. Now, would there be any harm if -- and this is theoretical; I don't know anything that so far has -- that we're engaged in in the study -- but if we could have a tax simplification that was so constructed that you could then actually reduce the individual's rates because of the simplification of the tax structure, and if that included such things as eliminating some things that today are deductibles, would that not resolve the problem, if we had an entirely different type of tax structure with a quite low rate?

Mr. Carlson. I would argue, Mr. President, that investment can be found in the home as well as in the commercial part of the economy. If we have deductibility elsewhere as to investments, we certainly ought to have it for homeownership. I would argue that that should be excluded.

The President. I won't argue with you on that. I believe very strongly in what you say. But I was just hypothesizing that suppose they came in with some entirely different form of taxation aimed at something different than income as a method of taxing. I don't know, but I've told them I want them to look at everything there is in that structure.

The President. Yes, we have to. I remember being told more than 20 years ago when I was out on the mashed-potato circuit and didn't think I'd be doing anything like this, but speaking about things and criticizing government. And I remember then, the defense of the deficit spending was that, well, the national debt didn't mean anything because we owed it to ourselves.

Well, today, when you stop to think about it -- that the interest on the national debt is more than the total Federal budget of some 20 years ago -- there's no way to explain how far we've gone and what we're doing there. And the answer has to be that I would think that today, we are sophisticated enough in our knowledge of business and finance to know what is the optimum point, the percentage level that government can take from the private sector before government becomes a roadblock or a drag on the economy, which it is now. And once you've established that point, then we should see that government never spends above that percentage of the gross national product. So, if there's a second term, that's what I'm going to be doing in the second term.

Mr. Howell. Mr. President, I think everyone has agreed that the housing industry lives and dies by interest rates, and my question is, with the progress that has been made in lowering the inflation rate, why do we still have these historically high spreads between the interest rate and the inflation rate?

The President. I have to say that I'm convinced that it is nothing but a pessimism out there. We've had -- well, this was the eighth recession since World War II, and in seven of those, we always resorted to the quick fix, artificial stimulant of the money supply. And what happened was, yes, you cured that present recession, and some, people -- the unemployment rate went down; but you wound up about 2 or 3 years later with another recession, and this time you started with inflation higher than it had been. And I think that they just -- and particularly with the opposition that we're having in getting, say, this downpayment, if we get this, I think this could be a great measure of reassurance out there. They just are not convinced yet that government is going to be serious about keeping inflation down.

And if I could cite myself as an example, again, I remember once back in those motion picture days, I knew that some day they'd come to an end, and I bought a retirement policy. And I wanted to think that I could retire and continue to live the same way I was living. So, I bought the policy on that basis. Well, the policy finally came to the payment date, retirement age, and the policy by that time wouldn't pay the property tax on the house that we lived in. So, I think that inflation is the biggest single enemy of it all.

There is no way that you can have a sound economy where a person is expected to invest or put money away and know that at the payoff time the dollar's only going to be worth half what it was or less when it comes time to pay out. So, the people with the money to loan, they're going to have to have more of a guarantee that it isn't going to happen again.

Mr. Wood. Well, thank you very much, Mr. President, for being with us today. It's been a terrific thrill for all of us in the industry and those of us at Builder magazine, who sponsored the roundtable. And I don't know if you had any final remarks you wanted to make.

Maybe we'll have a chance walking out or something to hear some of them. But I am more confident than ever -- I'm an optimist generally and normally -- but I'm more confident than ever, after what I've seen this morning and after meeting with all of you, that we're going to continue.

Hobbs, Inc., a California-based public policy and management consulting firm. His company has served a wide variety of Federal, State, and local government agencies in the development of public service programs and management plans.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, our Foreign Ministers are here to sign the science and technology agreement between Thailand and the United States. And the agreement represents another new area of cooperation and furthers the close ties that historically marked our relationship.

The Prime Minister. Thank you. Mr. President, Mr. Secretary, distinguished guests, the agreement on cooperation in science and technology just concluded constitutes a new dimension in the long established relationship and cooperation between our two nations.

As the United States is the world leader in science and technology, Thailand stands to benefit significantly from the transfer of your ingenuity. As a strong and unwavering friend and ally of the United States in Southeast Asia. Thailand -- [inaudible] -- has prosperity generated by the scientific and technological cooperation with the United States -- will complement American long-term interest in the region.

This is the Prime Minister's second visit with me, and on both occasions he's provided valuable counsel. And I am particularly happy to renew our personal relationship, because it mirrors the deep friendship between the Thai and American people. Thailand and the United States have a history of friendship and cooperation going back to 1833, when we signed the Treaty of Amity and Commerce.

Today we took our relationship one step further with the signing of a science and technology agreement. The 150 years of our relations have seen many changes, yet throughout this time the fundamental determination of that and American people to -- of Thai, I should say, and American people to live their lives in freedom is unchanged.

Whatever our differences of climate or culture, in our love of liberty we're the same. This is the unchanging basis of our friendship. The economic vitality found in Thailand is something else with which Americans identify. American investors and traders are proud of the part that they're able to play in Thailand's growth. Working together, Americans and Thais are building a better quality of life for both our peoples.

Congress to extend the repayment terms of our security assistance to Thailand. High-level defense consultations between our countries will continue. We'll discuss Thailand's overall defense needs, including its requirement for advanced aircraft, something we fully support. The administration will confer with the Congress on these defense matters, as appropriate.

Thailand today will be celebrating, by the old lunar calendar, the beginning of the new year. So, may I wish you, Mr. Prime Minister, and all the people of Thailand, a very fine Songkran holiday and, for all the Thai people, prosperity, health, and peace. We're pleased to have had you as our guest, again.

The Prime Minister. I was most pleased and honored to be invited to meet with President Reagan for the second time since my last visit 3 years ago. My discussion with the President on issues of mutual concern and interest were most constructive and fruitful. Together we have decided on ways and means to strengthen our bilateral ties and to enhance our cooperation.

The relationship between our two countries spans over one century-and-a-half. Over the years this relationship has increased in strength and expanded in dimension. Under the leadership of President Reagan, the United States has returned to the traditional values and demonstrated a determination in the pursuit of real peace. On our part, Thailand and the other ASEAN partners have distinguished themselves as a moderating influence on the international economic and political issues. Our collective efforts have served to enhance security in Southeast Asia, which is vital to the stability and prosperity of the East-Asian Pacific region and beyond.

Later on today I will meet members of the U.S. business community to explore opportunities for expanding trade and business ties for mutual benefits. Thailand shares with you the faith in the dynamism of economic relationships between countries in the Pacific community, the dynamism which has become more evident and which represents great economic potential for further development.

The recovery of your economy, which is undoubtedly the largest single economy of the world, is most welcome. For this to be longlasting, the recovery must generate prosperity of the wider front, particularly in the free-market economies such as that of Thailand.

Finally, on behalf of the Thai nation, I would like to express our heartfelt gratitude for the administration's full support to the modernization of Thailand's defense. This gesture reaffirms the United States commitment to Thailand's security in recognition of our role in strengthening the fabric of peace in the area, which the United States considers to be vital to her interests.

More than fifteen million Americans of all ages experience some degree and form of hearing impairment. These hearing-impaired Americans continue to share in the life of the Nation, contribute to family life and the home, and provide civic support to their communities. They have steadfastly striven not only to overcome their handicaps, but also to assist other members of our society. In so doing, the deaf and hearing impaired have made significant contributions to society, science, the arts and industry in virtually every field.

Research has shown us that hearing loss can sometimes be alleviated, corrected, or best of all, prevented. Scientific investigators supported by the Federal government's National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and by professional societies and voluntary health organizations are learning more about how the auditory system works, and what can go wrong and why. Innovative programs in research, education, and prevention have long been conducted and supported by many voluntary agencies working on behalf of the hearing impaired. I commend their dedication to this important service.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 13th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The great strength of America lies in the determination and caring hearts of our people. Reflecting diverse backgrounds and the experiences of all our citizens, this Nation is a hearty amalgam of individuals united in their commitment to freedom.

United States. They have made outstanding contributions to our Nation's progress in a wide range of fields, including science, the arts, medicine, law, literature, agriculture, industry and commerce, and government. Bringing with them the strong and varied traditions and heritages of their Asian and Pacific homelands, they have greatly enriched America's culture and institutions.

On March 20, 1984, I signed into law the Shipping Act of 1984. This important legislation removed several burdensome and unnecessary Government regulations restricting both United States-flag and foreign-flag ocean common carriers operating in the foreign commerce of the United States. This is the most significant ocean regulatory legislation since the enactment of the Shipping Act in 1916.

The United States is the greatest trading nation in the world, and this landmark legislation will provide for more flexible and responsive ocean transportation services, including intermodal service, that will benefit both our exporters and importers. United States flag-ocean carriers will benefit by being assured evenhanded regulatory treatment with foreign competitors. The Shipping Act of 1984 represents but one part of my Administration's commitment to foster and maintain the United States-flag merchant marine required by this great Nation for our national security and economic benefit.

In the course of America's existence, our citizens too often have been called upon to make the ultimate sacrifice for the cause of peace, freedom, and justice. From Bunker Hill to Beirut, these brave men and women have passed into the hands of our Creator so that we may enjoy the fruits of liberty. As Americans gather this Memorial Day to pay homage to their sacred memory and selfless commitment, we can offer no higher praise than that these patriots defended the high ideals bestowed upon this Nation by our Founding Fathers.

Today, as we commend their deeds, we also bear a heavy burden of responsibility to ensure that their sacrifice was not in vain by never wavering in our dedication and determination to maintain the peace, to safeguard human rights, and to protect the economic well-being of our Nation for future generations.

In honor and recognition of those Americans to whom we pay tribute today, the Congress, by joint resolution of May 11, 1950 (64 Stat. 158), has requested the President to issue a proclamation calling upon the people of the United States to observe each Memorial Day as a day of prayer for permanent peace and designating a period on that day when the people of the United States might unite in prayer.

Our educational system has always done far more than simply train people for a given job or profession; it has equipped generation upon generation of young men and women for lives of responsible citizenship, by helping to teach them the basic ethical values and principles that are both our heritage as a free people and the foundation of civilized life.

As the beneficiaries of that heritage, we bear a corresponding responsibility to ensure that the moral values on which freedom rests continue to be transmitted to each successive generation of Americans. If our educational efforts are rooted in first principles -- that human life is sacred; that men and women should be treated as individuals, with certain fundamental rights and responsibilities; that respect for law is crucial to the survival of freedom -- then our children and our children's children will share, as we have, in the blessings of liberty.

The Lubavitch movement, headed by Rabbi Menachem Mendel Schneerson, has provided people of all faiths a shining example of the true value of education. The Lubavitcher Rebbe's work is a living reminder that knowledge is worthy only when accompanied by moral and spiritual wisdom and understanding. In fostering and promoting a tradition of ethical values that can trace its roots to the Seven Noahide Laws, which have often been cited as universal norms of ethical conduct and a guarantee of fundamental human rights, the Lubavitch movement and its greatly respected leader have shown Americans of every faith that true education involves not simply what one knows, but how one lives.

As citizens of this free Nation, we support a system of justice which protects the rights of the accused by ensuring them due process of law, a just and fair guarantee inscribed into our Constitution. Yet, through ignorance and insensitivity, our criminal justice system has often failed to provide the victims of crime the compassionate treatment they deserve. These persons too often have had to endure alone the physical and emotional pain that crime inflicts upon its victims.

Victims of crime have had their lives threatened and disrupted, and their families have been subjected to unnecessary strains. Victims sometimes fear the loss of their livelihood, health, or life, and, most importantly, their cries for elementary justice too frequently go unheard.

Among the essential reasons governments are instituted among peoples is to establish a system of justice for the protection of their citizens. Justice is a primary goal and responsibility of government. As a country founded with the noble purpose of protecting and defending its people, our society cannot ignore the pleas of crime victims. Guided by recommendations of the President's Task Force on Victims of Crime, my Administration is working to implement much-needed changes throughout our criminal justice system to respond to the concerns of crime victims.

The national movement seeking more compassionate treatment for the victims of crime is led in large part by the victims themselves. I commend these courageous men and women who have overcome their pain and despair and are working to help ease the trauma of other victims. But it is crucial to remember that no segment of our society should refuse to recognize its responsibility to help in this most worthy endeavor. We must all strive to preserve the principles of justice on which our free society depends.

This Manual shall take effect on August 1, 1984, with respect to all court-martial processes taken on and after that date: Provided, That nothing contained in this Manual shall be construed to invalidate any restraint, investigation, referral of charges, designation or detail of a military judge or counsel, trial in which arraignment had been had, or other action begun prior to that date, and any such restraint, investigation, trial, or other action may be completed in accordance with applicable laws, Executive orders, and regulations in the same manner and with the same effect as if this Manual had not been prescribed; Provided further, That Rules for Courts-Martial 908, 1103(j), 1105 - 1107, 1110 - 1114, 1201, and 1203 shall not apply to any case in which the findings and sentence were adjudged by a court-martial before August 1, 1984, and the post-trial and appellate review of such cases shall be completed in accordance with applicable laws, Executive orders, and regulations in the same manner and with the same effect as if this Manual had not been prescribed; Provided further, That nothing contained in this Manual shall be construed to make punishable any act done or omitted prior to August 1, 1984, which was not punishable when done or omitted; Provided further, That nothing in part IV of this Manual shall be construed to invalidate the prosecution of any offense committed before the effective date of this Manual; Provided further, That the maximum punishment for an offense committed prior to August 1, 1984, shall not exceed the applicable limit in effect at the time of the commission of such offense; Provided further, That for offenses committed prior to August 1, 1984, for which a sentence is adjudged on or after August 1, 1984, if the maximum punishment authorized in this Manual is less than that previously authorized, the lesser maximum authorized punishment shall apply; And provided further, That Part V of this Manual shall not apply to nonjudicial punishment proceedings which were initiated before August 1, 1984, and nonjudicial punishment proceedings in such cases shall be completed in accordance with applicable laws, Executive orders, and regulations in the same manner and with the same effect as if this Manual had not been prescribed.

The Treaty will facilitate United States efforts to prosecute narcotics conspiracies by expressly providing that conspiracies and attempts to commit extraditable offenses constitute extraditable offenses.

This Treaty will make a significant contribution to international cooperation in law enforcement. I recommend that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to the Treaty and give its advice and consent to ratification.

Early last month, the President asked that about half of that money ($93 million) be appropriated immediately to meet urgent security requirements until the Congress could act on the whole plan in the summer.

Two weeks ago, to help get things moving, the President authorized reducing our request to $62 million. This lower sum would have met only minimal medical, supply, and ammunition requirements. Our proposal passed the Senate with broad bipartisan support. Unfortunately, the two Houses were unable to meet and complete action before leaving for the 2-week Easter recess.

Meanwhile, in El Salvador a tragic irony is at hand. At the very moment when the people have turned out in massive numbers to register dramatically their hopes and beliefs in democracy, their armed forces are running out of means to defend against Marxist violence. We must not let that happen.

For the past 10 days, officials from State, Defense, and the White House have worked with bipartisan leaders of both Houses to secure the necessary funding. We would have preferred that the Congress complete its processes before the congressional recess. Congress will, of course, have that opportunity upon its return. In the interim, in order to prevent unnecessary loss of life and to assure security required for the run-off election, the President is today exercising authorities provided in law to deliver the essential materials to El Salvador.

Reverend Falwell, ladies and gentlemen, thank you very much, for there are no words to describe a welcome such as you've given me here. It's a real pleasure to be with so many who firmly believe that the answers to the world's problems can be found in the Word of God.

What I'm going to do -- and I know you're not supposed to apologize any time you start speaking for what you're going to say -- but I know that even you, whose calling it is to keep the rest of us, if possible, on the right path, in these days of cynicism, in these days when there are people that in the guise of separating church and state would go so far as to say we should not even have chaplains in the military service -- I know that there are times when all of us wonder whether we're being effective. And tonight, I'd like to share an account that I received that shows how God works in our lives even in the darkest of hours.

I'm going to read to you another man's words. And they're words that, perhaps, answer what I said a moment ago about whether we sometimes were shaken in our faith and in our beliefs. On that October day when a terrorist truck bomb took the lives of 241 marines, soldiers, and sailors at the airport in Beirut, one of the first to reach the tragic scene was a chaplain, the chaplain of our 6th Fleet, Rabbi Arnold E. Resnicoff. And here is what he finally felt urged at the end of that day to put down in writing of the experiences of that day.

He said, ``I along with Lieutenant Commander George `Pooch' Pucciarelli, the Catholic chaplain attached to the marine unit, faced a scene almost too horrible to describe. Bodies and pieces of bodies were everywhere. Screams of those injured or trapped were barely audible at first, as our minds struggled to grapple with the reality before us -- a massive four-story building, reduced to a pile of rubble; dust mixing with smoke and fire, obscuring our view of the little that was left.

We saw marines risk their own lives again and again as they went into the smoke and the fire to try to pull someone out or as they worked to uncover friends, all the while knowing that further collapse of huge pieces of concrete, precariously perched like dominos, could easily crush the rescuers.

I was talking about the guilt that was felt by the men who were alive; the guilt that they had somehow let down their comrades by not dying with them. That is something that happens a great deal in combat.

A baby had been born, and we were to deliver the good news. Only now, there was no father whom we could congratulate, no father to whom the news could be conveyed. That message stayed on the chaplains' desk for days. Somehow we couldn't throw it away, so it stayed on the desk and without mentioning it, we all seemed to avoid that desk.

U.S. area. Looking around at the others in there with me, I made the remark that we probably had the only interfaith foxholes in Beirut. The Druze, the Muslims, Christians, all had theirs. The Jewish forces in the Israeli Army had theirs. But we were together. I made the comment then that perhaps if the world had more interfaith foxholes, there might be less of a need for foxholes altogether.

These were the words of Lieutenant Commander Resnicoff. I read them because I just felt that all of us -- and I know how much you do of this -- let us strive to live up to the vision of faith that Chaplain Resnicoff saw that day, and let us never stop praying and working for peace.

But I hope you'll forgive me if I say that I'm filled with mixed emotions. I didn't know there were so many of you that couldn't get tickets to the Gridiron. [Laughter] And I appreciate your inviting me, but I do get a little nervous at a ceremony where the new president is replacing the old one.

And I hear that Lesley Stahl has been asking if anything can be done to improve my answers. Yes, ask better questions. [Laughter] But do you know what it's like to have Chris Wallace and Bill Plante screaming questions in your ear when you're only about 10 feet from the helicopter with the motor roaring, and you realize they're asking, ``What's wrong with your hearing, Mr.

But I've been enjoying this, and yet sometimes I find myself thinking about what it would be like to have a steady job with real job security, like managing the New York Yankees for George Steinbrenner. [Laughter] You've got to be a baseball fan to get that one. [Laughter] They're in and out in 3 weeks.

But, you know, I just don't understand those guys that are bellyaching about the economy and trying to make out that everything is so bad. Inflation is down. Taxes are down. Unemployment is down. Productivity is up. So, what's the beef? [Laughter] And what's all that talk about a breakdown of White House communications? How come nobody told me? [Laughter] Well, I know this: I've laid down the law, though, to everyone there from now on about anything that happens, that no matter what time it is, wake me, even if it's in the middle of a Cabinet meeting.

Well, thank you, thank you all for inviting us to be here tonight. You know, the American people need you, and they need the truth. And your challenge is to report the truth about America and about those societies where the truth is despised. And if the truth is served, then America is served, and we'll all remain free.

Much has been made of late regarding our proper role in Central America and, in particular, toward Nicaragua. Unfortunately, much of the debate has ignored the most relevant facts. Central America has become the stage for a bold attempt by the Soviet Union, Cuba, and Nicaragua to install communism, by force, throughout this hemisphere.

Last year alone, the Soviet bloc delivered over $100 million in military hardware. The Sandinistas have established a powerful force of artillery, multiple-rocket launchers, and tanks in an arsenal that exceeds that of all the other countries in the region put together.

And that's not all. Our friends in the region must also face the export of subversion across their borders that undermines democratic development, polarizes institutions, and wrecks their economies. This terrorist violence has been felt by all of Nicaragua's neighbors, not just El Salvador. There have been bombings in peaceful Costa Rica and numerous attempts to penetrate Honduras -- most recently last summer, when the Sandinistas infiltrated an entire guerrilla column [colony] which had been trained and equipped in Cuba and Nicaragua.

El Salvador, struggling to hold democratic elections and improve the conditions of its people, has been the main target of Nicaragua's covert aggression. Despite promises to stop, the Sandinistas still train and direct terrorists in El Salvador and provide weapons and ammunitions they use against the Salvadoran people. If it weren't for Nicaragua, El Salvador's problems would be manageable, and we could concentrate on economic and social improvements.

Sandinistas who govern Nicaragua have savagely murdered, imprisoned, and driven from their homeland tens of thousands of Miskito, Rama, and Suma Indians. Religious persecution against Christians has increased, and the Jewish community has fled the country. The press is censored, and activities of labor and business are restricted.

The Sandinistas have announced elections for November, but don't hold your breath. Will new parties be permitted? Will they have full access to the press, TV, and radio? Will there be unbiased observers? Will every adult Nicaraguan be allowed to vote? Given their record of repression, we should not wonder that the opposition, denied other means of expression, has taken up arms.

We've maintained a consistent policy toward the Sandinista regime, hoping they can be brought back from the brink peacefully through negotiations. We're working through the Contadora process for a verifiable multilateral agreement, one that ensures the Sandinistas terminate their export of subversion, reduce the size of their military forces, implement their democratic commitments to the Organization of American States, and remove Soviet bloc and Cuban military personnel.

But the Sandinistas, uncomfortable with the scrutiny and concern of their neighbors, have gone shopping for a more sympathetic hearing. They took their case to the United Nations, and now to the International Court of Justice. This does little to advance a negotiated solution, but it makes sense if you're trying to evade the spotlight of responsibility.

What I've said today is not pleasant to hear, but it's important that you know Central America is vital to our interests and to our security. It not only contains the Panama Canal, it sits astride some of the most important sea lanes in the world -- sea lanes in which a Soviet-Cuban naval force held combat maneuvers just this week.

The region also contains millions of people who want and deserve to be free. We cannot turn our backs on this crisis at our doorstep. Nearly 23 years ago, President Kennedy warned against the threat of Communist penetration in our hemisphere. He said, ``I want it clearly understood that this government will not hesitate in meeting its primary obligations which are to the security of our nation.'' We can do no less today.

In his discussions with President Reagan and senior American officials, President Jorge and his delegation showed once again that the Dominican Republic is an outstanding example of a people and leadership committed to democracy and to seeking solutions to social and economic problems through democratic means. President Reagan praised President Jorge for his skillful and courageous leadership in a time of serious economic difficulties and for his role in promoting solidarity among the Caribbean Basin nations.

Initiative (CBI), the Dominican Republic's proximity to the U.S., its installed industrial capacity, and agricultural potential make it one of the countries most likely to benefit from the CBI's trade and investment incentives.

President Jorge's announcement, during the course of his visit, of the conclusion of an agreement with the International Monetary Fund (IMF) on measures to resolve the Dominican Republic's economic problems further bolsters confidence in his government's economic program and prospects for the island nation's economic recovery. The agreement is the second President Jorge has negotiated with the IMF since taking office in 1982.

Reflecting the U.S. Government's confidence in its democratic neighbor, President Reagan informed President Jorge that U.S. assistance to the Dominican Republic will be increased during this fiscal year which ends September 30, 1984. Furthermore, as a result of the meetings between the two Presidents, the U.S. Government and the Dominican Government have already begun discussions regarding additional cooperation during the current period of economic recovery.

President Reagan told his guest that the United States is proud to have the Dominican Republic as a close friend. Wishing the departing President every good fortune, President Reagan stressed his confidence in the future of the Dominican Republic and its enlightened and capable leadership.

The President. The Vice President leaves tonight on an extremely vital mission in the cause of peace, and it's a mission which all Americans and people around the world, I'm sure, support. Our goal is to eliminate from this Earth one of the most horrible and terrifying weapons known to mankind -- chemical weapons.

To most people, when we say ``chemical weapons,'' I'm sure they realize we're talking mainly about the various poison gases. And some of us who are old enough remember the horror in World War I when only one side had those weapons and first used them against allied forces that were unable to protect themselves against them or to retaliate.

On Wednesday, in the 40-nation Conference on Disarmament in Geneva, the Vice President will present an American initiative for a comprehensive worldwide ban on chemical weapons. And we know this won't be easy to achieve. We're not the first nation that attempted to control chemical weapons; there've been previous international efforts, including the Geneva Protocol of 1925. But such efforts dealt only with the actual use of such weapons, and they lacked effective compliance provisions.

Chemical weapons provide a sad example, as I indicated, of past arms control failures. In recent years, both combatants and noncombatants have fallen victim to them in several areas of the world. We must move to ban these weapons now, but not only their use but also the development, production, and possession of them. And each country must have confidence that a new international agreement is being complied with.

That's what our treaty proposal is designed to do. We've worked long and hard to develop it, and we think it's a first-rate proposal. Of course, there will be hard negotiations ahead, but we're ready to work side by side with the representatives of the Soviet Union and other countries to achieve the goal of an effective ban on chemical weapons. And we hope that once they've seen the full treaty proposal, the Soviet Union and others will respond seriously and negotiate in good faith.

In seeing the Vice President off, I'd like to remind him of the motto of a school that he once attended. ``The end depends on the beginning.'' Well, these words are especially right for this occasion. The goals and standards we set now will do much to determine whether we're successful in banning chemical weapons. And that's why I've asked the Vice President to undertake this mission. His journey to Geneva with this new American treaty proposal reflects the United States commitment to eliminate forever the threat of chemical warfare.

Let me simply add, first I'm delighted that you and the Secretary of State and others are enthusiastic about this mission. Secondly, it's a return for me, a return to Geneva after the mission you sent me on 14 months ago to explain to this Conference on Disarmament your commitment on getting rid of these chemical weapons.

You represent 11,000 students from China who are here in our country now. And I don't know how much history you've studied, but you know, this all began many years ago in the history of your country when there was a situation -- similar to something we'd had in our own country -- called the Boxer Rebellion. And countries from Europe and the United States and others, we went in with armed forces to rescue our people who were there from this strife and trouble.

So, you are coming along here as a very definite part of what I think is a nice note in history that hasn't too often happened between great nations. And you're certainly welcome, but we'd like to see the 11,000 become a hundred thousand. And we're going to work toward that goal.

But I understand that the only way we can possibly have a chance to meet is that -- it's so crowded in here -- is if I step outside that door in the hall and then if each of you come out one at a time, and we'll all have our pictures taken out there and I get a chance to meet you individually.

Q. It's nice to have a chance to meet you here at the White House and to do an interview. And I think this will be the first interview given, Mr. President, to the journalists from the People's Republic of China. And I must add this will be the first press interview ever given by any U.S.

Republic of China. Would you like to comment on the significance of this visit and the impact of such mutual visits on the bilateral relationship between China and the United States, and on the world situation as a whole?

The President. Well, yes. The visits -- I had been invited by the Premier to visit China; I, in turn, had invited him. And the way it had turned out between the leaders of China and of the United States, we felt was proper that our invitation to him that he come here, and I would wait and take my turn after his visit.

As to the importance of it, I think our countries are friends. We recognize the nonaligned status of the People's Republic and respect that, but also, I know it has been my thinking for a long time that the United States is truly a nation of the Pacific Basin. And certainly the largest and most important state in that Pacific Basin is the People's Republic of China. I think that these visits are a sign of maturing our friendship, our relationship. There are some differences between us, but there are many more things that we have in common that can be mutually beneficial.

And I believe that the entire Pacific Basin is the world's future. It is the fastest growing area. And we can cooperate in some of the modernization that is going on in industry in the People's Republic. They, in turn -- well, the benefits would be mutual.

Just a few minutes ago, before you came in, I met with a little group of the students from China who are here in the United States. There are some 11,000 here, but this was just a small group representative of them. And I told them how we would hope to see that expand with more of our students going there, more young students from China coming here.

Chinese arts, textiles, handiwork from China's part in the trade. Now, while some of those same things are the basis of the trade, we've added high technology. And I think the future in trade and development for both of us holds out a great promise for our people.

Q. Mr. President, in a couple of days, you'll be on your way to China for a friendly visit, and observers describe your visit -- trip -- historical. And I believe you'll be warmly welcomed in our country. My question is, how would you assess the present state of Chinese-American relations, and what is your view of the prospects of these relations? And, finally, what results are you going to achieve from your scheduled trip?

The President. Well, as I said in answer to the first question, it is, I think, a maturing of the relationship between us. I do believe that there is a friendship between our two peoples that's historic. There are a number of areas having to do with trade that we're going to discuss. I know there are certain things that we hope we can come to agreement on with regard to trade matters. I know at the ministerial level we've been discussing a tax treaty that would protect China's people and our own from the penalty of double taxation.

There are a number of things in which we can come to agreement. We've been discussing nuclear relations and -- well, I've always believed that people only get in trouble when they're talking about each other, not talking to each other. So, I think this will be a time for talking to each other, as it was when the Premier was here.

The President. I think it could be summed up that I know I'm going to be addressing students at the university. I'm going to be speaking to the nation on television. I'm going to speak of our desire for increased friendship and relations with the People's Republic.

Q. Mr. President, one outstanding problem in the China-U.S. relations is the difference in dealing with the Chinese territory of Taiwan. As President of the United States, what measures are you prepared to take in eliminating this difference?

The President. I realize there is a difference there and it's been discussed, and on the recent visit here this was one of the subjects of discussion. I think our position is pretty well known to the leaders of the People's Republic, that we have a long and historic friendship with the Chinese people on Taiwan. We are not going to turn our back on old friends in order to, let's say, strengthen or make new friends. And all this I have made clear.

The problem between the People's Republic and the people on Taiwan is one for the Chinese to settle between themselves. We will do nothing to intervene; we will do nothing to pressure one side or the other. The only thing is, as I have stated many times, we believe that the solution must be peaceful in settling whatever differences there may be, and we look forward to and hope that there will be a peaceful settlement of that issue.

Q. Could I follow up with a little question on this? You said you are going to have continued friendly people-to-people relationships with Taiwan. I understand it's a people-to-people friendship, not in the sense of any relationship between governments. I want to ask whether am I right?

The President. We have diplomatic relations with the People's Republic. We have an unofficial relationship with the people on Taiwan, and it is one that is based on friendship and based on trade, things of that kind. And we have been perfectly frank about that, and I don't think that it is an obstacle to improved friendship between ourselves and the People's Republic.

The President. Oh, my goodness, that's an easy one to answer. That was the capital for 2,000 of the last 3,000 years. It has been the scene of some of the great and most historic excavations, archeological excavations, in the world. I've seen pictures, photos. I've read some of the discoveries there and the historic significance of that, and we want to see for ourselves, we want to visit.

Q. Thank you. Now would you tell us what kind of preparations are you making to prepare for the visit -- for instance, what kind of books and articles you and Mrs. Reagan have been reading and what kind of movies about China you have seen?

The President. Well, let me say, as to the first part of your question -- and the other one that I just answered also -- let me express my appreciation for the effort and the arrangements that the Government of the People's Republic has made in order for us to be able to visit that site.

But now, as to the overall visit, I, of course, have been reading many briefing tomes that have been provided, both with regard to the People's Republic and the matters that we're going to discuss. But also I have been trying to indoctrinate myself. I have met with scholars; I have met with -- who have been there. I have seen a number of books, and, well, the National Geographic has put together, as you know, a whole volume on China itself. Believe me, I have gone through that. And I don't know why I didn't know enough about China to be as aware, as I am now, of the great scenic beauty of the land.

You see normally in a newspaper pictures of cities or something -- and all cities have a certain amount of looking alike -- but in these other things that I've seen, the magnificent scenery, the beauty of the land, we're looking forward to that very much.

The President. I've just seen some film that our own people put together on the various locations of where we will be, in discussing the schedule and the trip itself. I can't -- well, I've seen some reruns of tapes of President Nixon's visit, first visit, there.

I have to tell you, you should have asked the question of Mrs. Reagan, though, because she has more time for reading. And she has been reading a number of accounts of people there, and stories and background -- more than I have. So, I'll ask her questions if I need to.

You know, this is the second trip to Asia in 6 months, the last one to Japan and Korea. And now this one. But I mention that because it is an indication of how strongly I feel that the Pacific Basin is the future.

Americans are living longer than ever before. Today, record numbers of men and women are living full and productive lives well into their seventies, eighties, and nineties. Indeed, some 32,000 Americans have celebrated their one hundredth birthdays.

But such progress is far from universal. Too many older Americans still suffer from health problems that are attributed, mistakenly, to the process of aging. Far from being ``normal'' aspects of aging, many health problems can be prevented.

Regular medical examinations can prevent serious illnesses by discovering problems when they are small. Physical exercise is also good preventive health care. If done on a regular basis, exercise aids the body's ability to maintain, repair, and improve itself at any age.

Prolonging health throughout life takes many kinds of efforts. While science continues its search for better ways to prevent and treat health problems associated with aging, we can increase our own efforts to maintain our health and prolong our lives.

Treaty will facilitate United States efforts to prosecute narcotics conspiracies by expressly providing that conspiracies and attempts to commit extraditable offenses constitute extraditable offenses.

The Treaty follows generally the form and content of extradition treaties recently concluded by this Government. Upon entry into force of this Treaty, the Extradition Treaty between the United States and the United Kingdom signed on December 22, 1931, shall cease to have effect between the United States and Jamaica.

I join all Americans in mourning the death of a true American hero, General Mark Clark. As a young officer of infantry on the battlefield in World War I, as one of America's top-ranking commanders in World War II, and as commander in chief of United Nations forces during the Korean conflict, General Clark proudly wore the uniform of an American soldier -- with courage, dignity, integrity, and, above all, honor.

General Clark's memory will live forever in the hearts of his countrymen. We are free because of men like him. His professionalism and dedication will be the standard of every soldier who takes the oath to defend our nation.

Acts of terrorism continue to plague us and our friends and allies. The toll of bombings, assassinations, and kidnapings bears terrible witness to the indiscriminate attacks and lawlessness that rules the behavior of terrorist groups. It is also apparent that several states have adopted these lawless acts as instruments of state policy. While we diligently seek the means to control this scourge, we must also take the steps that are necessary to protect our citizens, our institutions, and our friends and allies.

We have, in the course of a detailed review, reached some conclusions on what we must do to protect ourselves, and to assist others in protecting themselves from this growing threat. Our actions will be guided by the following principles: First, no nation can condone international terrorism. Second, it is the right of every legitimate government to resist the use of terrorism against its people, institutions, or property by all legal means available. Third, terrorism is a problem for all nations, and this government will work as closely as possible with other governments -- particularly other similarly threatened democracies -- to deal with it.

While we have cause for deep concern about the states that now practice or support terrorism, our policies are directed against all forms of international terrorism. The states that practice terrorism or actively support it cannot be allowed to do so without consequence. As a first step in dealing with these states, every channel of communication that is available to us will be used to dissuade them from the practice or support of terrorism. We will increase our efforts with other governments to obtain and exchange the information needed about states and groups involved in terrorist activities in order to prevent attacks, warn our people, our friends and allies, and reduce the risk. We will also do everything we can to see that acts of state-supported terrorism are publicized and condemned in every appropriate forum. When these efforts fail, however, it must be understood that when we are victimized by acts of terrorism we have the right to defend ourselves -- and the right to help others do the same.

Finally, it should be noted that our paramount interest is in improving our ability to prevent terrorist attacks on our citizens, installations, and those foreign persons and facilities in the U.S. we are obligated to protect. We believe we can best achieve these results through a combination of improved information and better security and protection. This does not present any change in U.S. policy -- rather, a refocused emphasis.

Buenas tardes, and welcome to the White House. You know, I'm delighted to have had this chance to break bread with you. I met with many of the organizations represented here today during my first weeks in office, and I had the pleasure of renewing that acquaintance at a roundtable discussion in El Paso.

I think being a Californian, even though some people may doubt this, I've always appreciated our country's rich Hispanic tradition. And I remember an incident I'm going to tell you about -- back when I was Governor. I remember visiting the site, it was just outside of Santa Barbara, where there'd been a truly national disaster -- or natural disaster, I should say -- our typical mudslides when it rains too much. And I visited an area there, an area of nice -- modest but very nice homes, but all of them had been inundated by the mud and water that came down from the hills.

And the furniture had all been carried by the mud and piled up against one wall, and it was pretty obvious from looking at it that it was rather new. And this man, with that characteristic dignity and courtesy, greeted me and said, ``Mi casa es su casa,'' standing there in the mud of his home. I never forgot him. It struck me that here was an individual, that amidst all his trials, having just lost so many of the things he dearly loved, still maintained his pride and composure enough to offer me that most traditional of Hispanic greetings.

Americans of Hispanic descent have every right to be proud of the contributions that they've made and are making to our way of life. The strength of your values, even in the face of discrimination and hardship, is an inspiring story of dignity and courage. The emergence of Americans of Hispanic descent in business and government proves that the American dream is alive and well if we just give it a chance. And we're going to keep on giving it a chance. Providing more opportunity to all our citizens through a strong and growing economy has been priority number one of this administration.

Four years ago, talk about economic advancement and increasing opportunity was, I think, a cruel hoax. Economic stagnation and murderous inflation were destroying the dream of a better life. A spirit of pessimism, not in keeping with the American character, was rising. And even our leaders were throwing up their hands and saying that there was a ``malaise'' throughout the land.

Well, by stopping people from being mauled by higher and higher taxes, decreasing the regulatory burden, and bringing down inflation, we've set this country back on the road to real economic growth. We've broken the grip stagnation had on our throats during the 1970's. And from the pit of pessimism, a stronger and more vital America is emerging. The gross national product was up 6 percent last year. This year's first quarter growth rate was 7.2 percent, suggesting that this recovery is continuing at a good clip. And in the last 16 months, 5.1 million people have found jobs, bringing employment to its highest level in our history -- more people working than have ever worked in the history of this country.

Training Partnership Act to help those who need it the most to develop marketable skills. Of all the job training and employment programs in the Department of Labor, and there are many, some of the most effective are sponsored by Hispanic organizations. Ranking among the top in placement and cost-effectiveness is the American GI Forum's National Veterans Outreach Program. Similar to the GI Forum is the well known SAIR -- Jobs-for-Progress Program. These organizations, both of which were helping people even before the legislation, have used this opportunity to do even more. And I want you to know how much I appreciate and applaud your good citizenship.

Of course, training would be useless unless jobs are available. And three out of four new jobs are created by small business. With a recovery gaining steam, 548,000 new businesses were incorporated last year. I believe that was a record in our history. Americans of Hispanic descent already own some 363,000 businesses, generating about $18 billion in sales per year. The small business surge is good news to your community.

Now, I know that education, the doorway to opportunity, has always been a major concern to all of you. Indeed, we were talking about it at our table here. When we arrived in Washington, educational standards had been falling for nearly 20 years. So our administration appointed the National Commission on Excellence in Education, and we've been mobilizing support across the country to implement its recommendations.

The immigration legislation that's now being debated on the Hill is also important to you and, I know, is a source of concern to some of you. Well, let me assure you, I will insist that any immigration legislation passed by the Congress provides for fair and effective enforcement.

If we do not have the courage and the political will to help them counter this power play, our friends will lose their freedom, and America's security from pole to pole will be threatened. We've made an ambitious economic effort in that region with the Caribbean Basin Initiative and an expanding aid program. But economic assistance, as much as some people on Capitol Hill would like to think otherwise, will not overcome the military threat.

Nicaragua, with the full support of its Cuban and Soviet allies, is arming, supplying, and directing an insurgency operation in El Salvador. If they succeed, it will set the course for the rest of Central America.

The United States has a balanced policy -- supporting democracy, effective negotiations, economic aid, and security assistance. The focus of our commitment is countering aggression. We face one of the major challenges to democracy in our time. Debate on this issue has strayed too far from reality. If we mean to oppose Communist aggression, then we cannot throw every possible roadblock in the way of helping our peace-loving friends defend themselves. We cannot ignore the consequences of passively watching guerrillas force Communist dictatorships down the throats of the people of Central America. If Central America is lost, then our own borders will be threatened. And that's why this issue is so important to the security of our people.

Now this, of course, is not new. A few weeks ago, I was honored to meet in the Roosevelt Room with 10 American heroes, Medal of Honor winners who represent the best of our country. And it was a privilege to be in their company. More than any others I've met here in the White House, I felt that this, indeed, was their house. They paid for it with their courage and service above and beyond the call of duty. Their valor kept this country free, and I was truly awed by them.

You realize that the Medal of Honor, the Congressional Medal of Honor isn't just given for someone who was brave in battle or did something exceptional in that regard. To win that honor, you must have performed a duty above and beyond the call of duty, the call of what could be expected of even the bravest person. And all 10 of these Americans of Hispanic descent were wearing, very proudly, that honor.

You know, having talked about those, I'm going to take just a second. I have to tell you one of them was, of course, from down in Texas, Roy Benavidez. I had the pleasure of giving him his medal. I don't know what had stalled it. It had been lying there, not being delivered to him, which he had earned in Vietnam -- wounded four times, going back and forth to a patrol in which every man was wounded, and he had been carrying these men to the helicopter for evacuation.

Derwinski and Special Cyprus Coordinator Richard Haass paid separate visits to the region to discuss developments with the governments of Greece, Turkey and Cyprus and to urge their cooperation with the Secretary General. In March, Turkish Cypriot community leader Denktash visited New York for discussions with the Secretary General and with Messrs. Derwinski and Haass. Also in March, Cypriot Foreign Minister Iacovou met with both the Secretary General and with Secretary Shultz.

These meetings have been held to discuss the proposal made by the two sides in early January, as described in my previous report, and to support the efforts of the Secretary General to promote negotiations between them in accordance with his Security Council mandate.

We are pleased to report at this time that the Committee on Missing Persons has met and agreed on the procedure it will follow at future meetings. We expect the committee to begin its first working session shortly.

We are encouraged by the Secretary General's active involvement in seeking common ground for progress, and we continue to offer him our support. We are hoping for positive results from this intensive diplomatic activity.

I am pleased to sign H.R. 4835, a bill authorizing the appropriation of $10 million dedicated to the equipping and furnishing of the Clement J. Zablocki Outpatient Facility at the Children's Hospital in Krakow, Poland, as well as the provision of medical supplies to the people of Poland.

Since the early days of the Continental Army, the wives of our servicemen have made unselfish contributions to the spirit and well-being of their fighting men and the general welfare of their communities.

Throughout the years, as the numbers of our married men and women in uniform have grown and as their military missions have become more complex and dispersed, their spouses have made countless personal sacrifices to support the Armed Forces. In many instances, they subordinated their personal and professional aspirations to the greater benefit of the service family. Responding to the call of duty, they frequently endured long periods of separation or left familiar surroundings and friends to re-establish their homes in distant places. And there they became American ambassadors abroad.

As volunteers, military spouses have provided exemplary service and leadership in educational, community, recreational, religious, social and cultural endeavors. And as parents and homemakers, they preserve the cornerstone of our Nation's strength -- the American family.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 17th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The principal reason for further amending the Convention is the recently enacted French wealth tax which could adversely affect Americans living in France. The Protocol exempts from this tax foreign assets owned by United States citizens temporarily resident in France. The Protocol also provides an exemption from tax at source on interest, and it includes rules for limiting the benefits of the Convention to residents of the United States or France.

Ireland. It fills a gap resulting from a 1965 change in Irish law which precludes the implementation of any applicable extradition agreements between the United States and Great Britain. The Treaty follows generally the form and content of extradition treaties recently concluded by this Government.

A key provision of this bill, which is a vital part of the deficit reduction downpayment, is to shift the annual cost-of-living adjustments (COLAs) in government retirement programs to the same timing and method of computation as is used in the social security system. In enacting this provision, which will produce budgetary savings of $5.6 billion over fiscal years 1984 - 1989, we are asking Federal retirees to accept a delay in their next COLA payment until December 31, 1984, in the case of military retirees and January 1, 1985, for civilian retirees. A similar delay has already been enacted for persons receiving other Federal benefits such as social security, veterans pensions and compensation, and supplemental security income.

To ensure timely, proper benefit payments to Federal retirees, action on the COLA delay must be taken immediately. That is why I have signed H.R. 4169 despite misgivings about other parts of this bill.

For example, the bill, which was developed last year, will increase from 3\1/2\ percent to 4 percent the pay raise already granted to Federal civilian employees as of January 1984. Although I consider this increase undesirable, the additional budgetary costs are far less than the savings that will be achieved from the COLA provision.

The bill also has an obsolete provision calling for a domestic economic summit conference consisting of the President, congressional leaders, and others responsible for economic policy development, to develop a comprehensive deficit reduction plan within 45 days. In light of the extensive discussions that have been held between the executive branch and the Congress this year on ways to reduce the projected budget deficits and the proposals already under active consideration by the Congress, I believe we should view the required conference as having taken place and therefore unnecessary.

The most serious problem I have with H.R. 4169 concerns its amendments to loan programs of the Small Business Administration. These amendments could result in unacceptably large increases in Federal budgetary costs unless both the administration and the Congress are prepared to take steps necessary to avoid that contingency.

Specifically, by substantially lowering interest rates for SBA's disaster loans, H.R. 4169 will have the effect of making farm enterprises once again eligible for them instead of their relying on loans available from the Farmers Home Administration. This reverses reforms that have resulted in significant budget savings in recent years.

H.R. 4169 also reauthorizes a nonphysical disaster lending program and expands it to authorize loans to small businesses adversely affected by the Payment-in-Kind (PIK) program and currency devaluations.

Although these programs are subject to ceilings on the total amount of loans that may be made, actual demand for such loans may well exceed those ceilings. I am, therefore, directing the Small Business Administration to control the costs associated with these programs to the maximum extent possible through its implementing regulations. In addition, if necessary to constrain the budgetary impact of these programs, the administration will work with the Congress to enact appropriate modifications of the small business loan provisions.

Through acts of courage, of selflessness, and of love fathers have lifted, inspired, and blessed the lives of those around them. It is fathers who have such a major role in giving their children guidance, leadership and direction and teaching them integrity, truth, and humility.

Children will forever remember the father who is devoted to his family, anxious for their welfare, proud of their successes, and whose example is a beacon to them. He has left them with memories that have enriched and molded their lives.

The love fathers express involves friendship, compassion, partnership, and unity. It inspires affection, confidence, trust, and self-control. It can never be separated from character, from devotion, from good humor, and from every tender virtue.

Children have the right to learn that love is the foundation of a good family, and that love cannot exist apart from such qualities as respect, consideration, responsibility, and loyalty. Fathers provide for their loved ones in an atmosphere of warmth and kindness that accepts and preserves the uniqueness of each as an individual person while building the unity of the home.

Every father rises to his tallest stature as he selflessly cares for his family, his wife, and his children. Our finest fathers have come to know what Martin Buber meant when he wrote that our treasure is hidden beneath the hearth of our own home.

The Social Security Amendments of 1983 were enacted since the negotiation of the convention and first protocol. They provide in part that social security benefits paid to nonresident aliens henceforth will be subject to an effective 15 percent withholding tax. The Canadian Government has requested that the pending convention be amended to exempt Canadian residents from such withholding.

The second protocol would amend Article XVIII (Pensions and Annuities) of the convention, so as to provide that social security benefits paid by one party to residents of the other ``shall be taxable only in that other State.'' However, United States citizens resident in Canada will continue to be taxable to the extent provided under United States law.

It is most desirable that this second protocol, together with the convention and first protocol, be considered by the Senate as soon as possible and that the Senate give advice and consent to ratification of the convention and two amending protocols.

The President. Well, this is a first for me. This is the first time I've ever seen anything, and while I knew I was going to see a ship being loaded here, I hadn't quite pictured what it was like. And I just speculated here to Dick, in showing us around, if somebody punched a hole in the bottom of that, it still wouldn't sink -- [laughter] -- not with the load it's got here.

You know, coming in here I happened to remember a lot of years back that the first time that I came to Tacoma was for the premiere of a movie that I was in called ``Tugboat Annie Sails Again.'' And I remember they brought us in the last stretch on a yacht. And they had fireboats out there, putting on a display and everything, and then that night they saw the movie. And the next morning, there we were all alone, out on a curb, trying to flag down a cab. [Laughter] Kind of a change of attitude -- probably correctly.

Listen, I'm not going to stand here and try to make a speech or anything. I know we've only got a few minutes to visit, and it's just occurred to me there must have been some times when you've said, ``If I had a chance to ask him, would I . . . .'' Well, go ahead. If you've got a question or something on your mind, maybe we could have a dialog instead of a monolog.

The President. Leaving Sunday morning. The reason is, I'm, from here, going down to the ranch and have a couple of days on horseback. But it's all a thing of trying to break the change to the time zone difference. You see there are 13 hours time difference between there and our Washington time. Now here, it's 10 hours difference. And what we're going to do is have a couple of days there to get changed -- this, 3 hours of it -- and then we're going to stop in Honolulu for two overnights there and then one in Guam, and hope by that time that we're getting closer to their time. [Laughter] These last several days, you know, every once in a while I'd stop and think -- you know here it is the middle of the afternoon, and what time is it in China? Well, it's the middle of the night. And I've been wondering about when I'm going to find my eyes closing, and it'll be at the wrong time. So, I think that everyone that's been there before says this is the way to do it.

Washington, you know, and we made an exchange that after his visit I would go there. We'll be taking up matters that have to do with just what's happening here -- in the dock trade matters -- with them; negotiating out some tax differences so that back and forth, people not only working there but investment and so forth that they've opened up to American investment there won't be taxed double. We're hoping to negotiate out a number of things -- and trade agreements that will build up more trade.

But then we'll go to Shanghai, where there's a lot of American investment now. In fact, I'll be going through a company there that is half and half. It's a partnership deal with an American private company and the Chinese Government. And also, visit a university outside Shanghai, and from there, home by way of Alaska.

The President. Yes. Yes, and we've been dealing with Japan on more open trade and some changes in tariffs and so forth, particularly with regard to wood and paper products that they've kind of had a restricted market to us. We were there some time ago, and Prime Minister Nakasone is all -- he really, honestly, and sincerely wants to have better trade relations with us.

The President. Yes, and I know I'm going to be talking about that at this next meeting that I go to here. Yes, we know that this interest rate is still a problem. You do know, though, that the housing industry has staged a comeback that is unbelievable, almost, the rate. Now, there was a drop in March, but that drop was only down to about 1,600,000 starts, where the previous month it had been about 1,900,000. And so the whole average for this last year, since the recovery started, is very good. As a matter of fact, February was, I think, a record, an all-time record for housing starts.

There's no question that this is still a problem. Right now, those interest rates -- there are two explanations for them staying where they are. One of them is on the positive side. They're up there because of the recovery, the old law of supply and demand. There is so much recovery going, and business investment in plant and equipment and so forth, consumer borrowing to buy, installment purchases and so forth, automobiles, heavy appliances and so forth, that that has kept it up. But the other one, I think, is just plain pessimism. The money market out there still isn't willing to let the money go on loan at a lower rate until they're sure that we really have got control of inflation.

I have a hunch that when the Congress comes back from this recess, if they'll go forward with this cut in spending that we want, this program to start whittling away at that deficit, I think maybe this could reassure the market, and we would see before too long the rates coming down again.

But I know what they mean to the housing industry, and I can only tell you that it is -- right now, it's very healthy. And there's been a great surge, I think, because of the number of years in this recent recession that people have been standing by waiting to buy.

Note: The President spoke at 12:03 p.m. following a tour of the facility. He was accompanied on the tour by George Weyerhaeuser, president and chief executive officer of Weyerhaeuser Industries, and Richard McLean, manager of the facility.

I know that we're going to talk about foreign trade this afternoon, and I'd like to begin by pointing out that the backdrop for all these issues is the economic climate here in our own country. And I know you're all familiar with the turnaround that we've accomplished. We're enjoying an economic revival here in the States, and I think we've got a lot to be proud of.

I thought it was very telling when for the month of March, the figures on unemployment came in and it had not changed in the percentage. We still had 7.7 percent unemployment, but there were 248,000 more people working than had been working in the previous month. And I'm not adept enough to figure how all that can take place and not change the percentage, but I know there's a reason for it. We're creating, in other words, the new jobs that we need to accommodate our growth.

I know you're eager to talk about trade with the Asian nations, especially China and Japan. And I just saw that big ship down there being loaded with logs and lumber for China, and that's as good an illustration as any of the big increase in U.S.-China trade over the past few years. The United States is now China's third largest trading partner. We have over a hundred American companies with offices there, and the United States is now China's leading foreign investor.

We want to further improve the investment climate. We've already signed a series of bilateral agreements with China covering trade and financial matters. And when we arrive in Beijing next week, I'll continue our talks on agreements involving taxes and financial investment.

There are other trade issues that we're still resolving with China, and I know that as in any relationship, there are going to be some growing pains. You know, as I do, that occasionally the interests of diplomacy and the interests of American industry sometimes seem to collide. Well, I see it as our job to reconcile the two and to make it easier for American businessmen to open up new markets on a fair footing.

We've begun some initiatives in that direction. Two years ago, after the preceding administration tried, we passed the Export Trading Company Act aimed at opening up new foreign trade opportunities for medium- and small-sized businesses. The bill removed impediments to trade and permitted companies to sell American products overseas more efficiently, more effectively.

Now, these are just some of the efforts. I know that you're good traders, but I know you have problems, too, including the continuing problem of state-subsidized goods from other nations, some of which are doing this in violation of international agreements.

And then there's Japan. Japan's been a fine friend of the United States in many respects. We still have a lot of trade questions to work out with Tokyo, but we've made some major progress in the last 2 years. Just a few weeks ago, Japan agreed to virtually double the beef quota. And they also dramatically eased restrictions on the import of various citrus projects -- or products.

And Japan helped our automobile industry get enough breathing room to recover from the siege of double-digit inflation and record interest rates that nearly destroyed us. As a matter of fact, today, the entire automobile industry, as an industry, has an unemployment rate of only 5\1/2\ percent. There are 85,000 more people working in the automobile plants -- manufacturing plants and assembly plants -- than there were back in 1980.

We're pushing hard for tariff cuts and to lower nontariff trade barriers. And by the way, George, I know, as we've discussed, your keen interest in limiting Japan's tariffs on forest products. Well, we're hoping that very soon we'll have progress to report on that.

But I want you to understand that this administration is on your side and is sensitive to your concerns. I think there's been too long a period in which our government had virtually an adversarial relationship with its own business community. And that doesn't make sense at all as far as we're concerned.

American -- that only American business can give us the jobs and prosperity of the future. And we're going to address that future these next several days in China, and in Washington next month when our U.S. Trade Representative, Bill Brock, meets informally with 13 key Ministers from around the world to see what we can do to raise our collective will to do better.

Mr. Robbins. Thank you, Mr. Weyerhaeuser. Mr. President, it's a delight for us to have an opportunity to have this discussion with you. We had a little discussion here, just before you arrived, among a number of the people from the business community. And one of the gentlemen pointed out that his firm spent 5 years cultivating a relationship with the People's Republic of China before they actually converted this into a business opportunity, which became a very important business thing for them. That's been a similar experience with us.

I speak from the perspective of small business, which is somewhat unusual in trade with China. I must say I'd like to compliment the Department of Commerce for the work, particularly, that they have been doing here in the State of Washington with ourselves and with other small businesses, helping us come together and deal as a group with possibilities in China.

We've had a couple of problems which perhaps the government could be helpful in dealing with in developing this trade. We find that when we are in Beijing, for example, trying to do business there, it's very difficult to communicate properly with home office and perhaps even other countries in which we have to communicate. Some facilities could perhaps be made available to us which could be in the form of secretarial services, meeting rooms, Telex, telephones, facts, et cetera, which would make it easier for us to do business.

Another point, which is more a comment than a question -- but you may comment if you'd like -- is that we've found that from the point of view of the small business, it's very difficult to handle the big expenses. With the sales and marketing expenses, it takes years to develop, and particularly in dealing with Chinese delegations that are coming to the United States and other countries in which our people have to travel with them and be with them and in which we are expected to go and attend seminars and training programs in China -- whether the government could provide some kind of funding or aid in some respect that would make it easier for small business to approach that type of expense and develop a business relationship.

Agency of International Development -- to work with small businesses and let them know that -- because the bulk of our foreign aid is spent for American products -- to let them know that there is a potential there for small business in America to participate. So far, it's been rather successful.

I know, when you speak about the communications problems and so forth back and forth, believe it or not, in arranging the Presidential visit to China, we found that there are certain procedures that took a great deal more negotiation than we had expected with regard to our own transportation, communication, and so forth. But everything was worked out very well.

And I just -- from all that you're saying here, I think the potential is so great. The change that has occurred there in, now, their willingness for American investment, their willingness to collaborate with private enterprise, free enterprise, is an amazing change and offers not only a great hope for us but, I think, a great hope for them and their own people.

And the purpose of this meeting is to see that all the doors are as wide open as they can be and what we can do to make some agreements. When the grain deal was mentioned a moment ago, and wheat -- we know that we had a grain deal with them, and in 1983, they failed to buy their quota. They have promised that this will be different in '84, and that they will even make up this slack.

The President. Oh, I don't think there's any question but that we're going to find Japan a competitor in many areas there. And yet, if we believe in free enterprise, as we do, there's nothing we can do about that. We also have competition right now, here in our own continent, with Canada, and in the very field that we've been talking about -- your field.

But I think that -- and this does not mean that in what we're doing that we're going there with any intention of slackening our efforts in our relationship with Japan -- I think we've made great headway there, also. Prime Minister Nakasone has been most forthcoming and, as I said earlier today, he has some political problems, of course, that have kept him from moving as fast as he might like. I've got some political problems, too, that slowed some things down. But I think that all of this is leading toward a greater development as a market in the People's Republic.

Mr. Wilson. Mr. President, the fact that you would just indicate a knowledge and interest would be most helpful. And incidentally, dealing with those people has been fun, and I think you're going to enjoy yourself.

Well, I can assure you that strikes a note that's warm to my heart, too, because I'm the first fellow that's ever held this job who's a lifetime member of a union and was six times president of his own union. So, I have long believed that what the founder of the AFL - CIO said is the truest thing in the world, and that is that labor and management are partners and one can't profit without the other. And he, Samuel Gompers, also said that the greatest sin that management can commit is to not make a profit.

No, I believe that none of us can measure yet what the changes are that are taking place in that great continent with virtually a fourth of the world's population -- the difference in -- as to what it set out to be when it first adopted its ideology, modern ideology. And labor has to be a great consideration in anything that we propose.

You know, one thing we mustn't fall into: When there was talk, also, of protectionism and what its faults can be -- that Smoot-Hawley tariff back in the Great Depression when I was looking for my first job, I remember the effect of that. But I also remember how we cannot see the whole picture.

We've heard rumors recently, Dick Ford and I, that they were going to cut back in Customs services. And at a time when we are expanding our port export and import businesses rapidly in the Puget Sound and northwest area, this is a very troublesome idea for us to accept, both in the maritime port and, as Dick would tell you, in his excellent international airport. And we have a little rule of thumb that we've worked on out here that says that every dollar spent on augmenting Customs personnel comes back 17 times -- 17 dollars for each one. So, I hope you would be able to persuade the Customs services, sir.

In the meantime, we need to be ready in the port systems. I'm against speaking -- let Dick speak for himself on this -- but all the indications are this vast increase of trade in the Pacific Ocean areas, some as much as 250 percent from some of the national concerns that have been studying this, we in the port system must be ready. It means we've got giant facilities to develop, and fast tracking of permit systems is absolutely essential, sir.

I actually can't comment here on what is back of that move or how they felt that they -- that it would be justified, unless it was an agency that thought that it was overstaffed, and there aren't very many government agencies that volunteer that kind of information. [Laughter] But I can promise you that we will deal with that, and we'll deal with it in a way that we're not going to shoot ourselves in the foot.

The President. Well, I wish we could sit around and visit longer and more on this. As I said earlier, I believe in the partnership of government and business and these various things that have been suggested here. I am definitely opposed to protectionism. It has failed whenever it has been tried. And the purpose of these meetings in China is going to be -- again, and with regard to Mr.

And I, again, realize that this is almost historic, because of the great turn to private investment that we're seeing in the People's Republic and be prepared to deal with that. I don't think that I ever anticipated that I would be going to discuss with them problems of eliminating the danger of dual taxation on our people and their people coming here. But that is going to be one of the subjects that we'll be talking about.

We'll continue, also, to broaden our markets to encourage export wherever we can. We're not only the biggest buyer and the biggest market in the world for other people's goods, we also can be far more productive and able to compete. And we're going to do everything to get government out of the way to make sure that we have the best means of competing in a world market.

Mr. Weyerhaeuser. Thank you very much, Mr. President. I would say on behalf of all of us, this is a red letter day for the State of Washington. It surely is for Weyerhaeuser Company our pleasure to lease the hall.

It's much more than that. When the President of the United States is both actively informed, fully involved, fully supportive of, and acting as the lead trader for the country, I truly believe it augurs well for this country. I think that we have tremendous opportunities facing the Pacific. And to have a Western President come up here into the Northwest, the leading trading area, and spend time with us and try to listen to some of our ideas and problems is really unique.

I was delighted to have him see some very, very high-quality products on their way to China today. And I can assure you that he is well informed and that we're well served to have him leading the charge for us.

Note: The panel discussion began at 12:42 p.m. in the conference room at the Weyerhaeuser corporate headquarters. The President was introduced by Robert Kapp, executive director of the Washington State China Relations Council.

I am very pleased to announce another major initiative in arms control. Earlier today in Vienna, the U.S. and our NATO allies tabled a new proposal aimed at breaking the impasse that has long stalled the negotiations between NATO and the Warsaw Pact on reducing conventional forces in Europe. This important initiative in the talks on mutual and balanced force reductions, known as MBFR, was developed in close consultations with our allies, and it reflects their significant contributions.

Although the Warsaw Pact has a significant manpower advantage in Europe, it has been unwilling to acknowledge the imbalance. Without agreement on the total number of forces on each side, there can be no agreement on the number that must be reduced to obtain equal levels.

This data issue is one major unresolved problem in the MBFR negotiations. The other issue is the continuing unwillingness of the Eastern side to agree on effective verification provisions. Today's proposal is designed to move the talks forward in both areas.

This new proposal in the MBFR negotiations comes just a day after the American initiative for a comprehensive, worldwide ban on chemical weapons. This was presented personally by Vice President Bush yesterday in Geneva to the 40-nation Conference on Disarmament. I hope these twin initiatives will lead to real progress in both negotiations.

We are bargaining in good faith. With equal willingness on the other side, real progress can be achieved quickly. I have no higher priority than reducing arms to equal and more stable levels and, where we can, banning them altogether.

Having made these significant new moves this week in chemical and conventional arms control, I want to emphasize once again my strong desire to get on with the urgent business of reducing nuclear arms. We call upon the Soviet Union to respond to the repeatedly expressed desire of the world community by returning to the two nuclear negotiating tables, START and INF, which they left 5 months ago. When they do this, they will find the United States to be an accommodating and creative partner in seeking nuclear reductions, just as we and our allies have shown ourselves to be in the negotiations on chemical and conventional forces.

Each year during Secretaries Week, we have an opportunity to express our appreciation to the thousands of individuals who play such an important part in the efficient operation of offices around the country.

Over the years, the role of secretaries has changed considerably. New technologies and innovation have added more complex assignments to traditional responsibilities. All Americans owe a great deal to secretaries for the outstanding job they do and for the dedication they demonstrate every day of the year.

In all facets of our society, whether in business, education, labor, industry, or government, secretaries perform tasks and bring a sense of coordination that is essential to the success of our economic system. Their cooperation and loyalty make our offices a more pleasant place to be.

Mr. Duggan recently retired as editorial page editor of the St. Louis Globe-Democrat. He is active in community affairs and serves as president of Dismas House, a rehabilitation center for former convicts. He is a director of Downtown St. Louis, Inc., president of the Society of Jesus, and a member of the advisory board of the Salvation Army.

I soon learned that swimming with the current downstream was a lot easier than swimming upstream. Nevertheless, today I'm going to swim against the current. The current I'm talking about is a riptide of criticism that claims this administration's economic policies impoverish the poor and bestow benefits on the rich. This distorted view was created by special interest demagoguery and political-year oratory, dutifully reported by a goodly portion of the press.

A week or so ago there was a report, complete with impressive figures, showing that our economic policy has punished people at the poverty level. The report was accurate that in 1978 an income of 6,662 was the poverty level. It is also accurate that inflation has now pushed the poverty level up to $10,180. In other words, it takes that much to buy what 6,662 would buy in 1978. Critics have concluded on the basis of this report that because of our economic program, those at that level were much poorer than they had been in 1978. Well, they're right that those at the poverty level have not kept up, but wrong as to what is to blame. It certainly isn't our tax cut, which is helping low-income earners keep more of their hard-earned dollars.

But this is only part of the reason those people at the poverty level are having trouble keeping up, and it hasn't anything to do with our across-the-board, 25-percent cut in the income tax. The simple truth is the income tax does not take into account the value of your dollars. It's based on the number of dollars you earn. So, even though $10,180 is only worth as much in purchasing power as 6,662 was a few years ago, you have to pay income tax on those 3,500 additional dollars just as if you gained that much in purchasing power.

Now, let's take a look at that other drumbeat that our tax cut is designed to help the rich get richer and either does nothing for the low- or middle-income earners or, even worse, adds to their burden, and how they arrive at that conclusion. Well, it's true that if your tax burden is $100, your tax cut is only $25. But if your tax is $1,000, your saving is $250, 10 times as much. But the ratio stays the same. If your tax burden was 10 times as much before, you're still paying ten times as much tax.

Next year, another part of our tax program will go into effect. It's called indexing and will begin on January 1st. Very simply, it means you will no longer pay an income tax on inflation, which you've done every time a raise or cost-of-living increase pushed you into a higher tax bracket. The greatest beneficiaries of indexing will be those in the lower and middle-income tax brackets. It will do little for the so-called rich, because they're already in top tax brackets.

Many of those who were the loudest in declaring our tax program unfair want to cancel indexing before it goes into effect. Canceling indexing would increase the tax burden for lower and middle-income earners by three times as large a percentage as it would for the rich.

Governor and Mrs. Ariyoshi, Admiral and Mrs. Crowe, and fellow Americans, Nancy and I want to thank you for your warm and very generous welcome. To all the people of Hawaii, we want to convey our thanks for the aloha spirit of your greeting and to say how thrilled we are to begin a long journey for peace in this place of overpowering beauty and tranquillity.

On this Easter, in the year of our Lord 1984, I ask for the prayers of all Americans and the peoples of the world for peace among men and peace among nations. Let the nations and the peoples of the world renounce war, and let us pledge ourselves to its permanent abolition. Let us forsake its anguish and agony and live in love with one another.

Like all Americans, the people of these islands cherish peace. Unlike most of their countrymen, the people of Hawaii have known firsthand the destruction wrought by nations that take up arms against each other. As we passed over Pearl Harbor this afternoon, I don't have to tell you of our silence as we reflected on the Arizona Memorial beneath us. The building that is now the Pacific Air Force's headquarters is still pockmarked with bullets from that fateful Sunday almost 43 years ago. And 32 years later, it was here to this airport that our first prisoners of war returned from an awful captivity in North Vietnam.

The American people have never sought war nor the test of arms. And yet in my lifetime I have seen four such wars -- none of them because the United States was too strong or too ready. The United States is resolved to avoid war, pursue peace, and to do so by remaining strong and remaining ready.

Hawaii remains key to this resolve and readiness. To our men and women in uniform today, I bring the greetings and gratitude of your country. In these islands there is testimony to the heroism and courage of others who've worn their country's uniform before you. And today you continue in that valiant tradition. Your vigilance makes peace possible; your readiness protects freedom and brings closer the day when mankind will renounce forever the use of force.

It's our fervent hope that the events of this coming week will also bring us closer to that day. One of the critical developments in our country's postwar foreign relations is our opening to China and the establishment of diplomatic relations with that nation of a billion people. Today in the economic, educational, and cultural areas we have a wide range of agreements with the Chinese, and the United States is now China's third leading trade partner. And we share similar concerns on many critically important geopolitical situations, such as our disapproval of the aggression waged against the peoples of Kampuchea and Afghanistan.

Our shared progress did not happen instantly; it took more than a decade to build. This week, we hope to continue the process of reconciliation. I believe the mission that we undertake is another careful yet sure step toward peace and friendship between the Chinese and American people.

While our friendship is vital to the cause of world peace, we should also acknowledge that our vital national interests are at stake. The Pacific Basin is one of the fastest growing markets for American goods, services, and investments. To a great extent, our nature's [nation's] future is in the Pacific.

Pacific. All Americans are proud of Hawaii, proud of her 25 years of statehood, proud of her history, her people, and proud of the role that she's played in the struggle for progress and human freedom. In the years and decades to come, Hawaii's importance will continue to grow. And it is America's great, good fortune that Hawaii is her 50th and youngest State. We're grateful to you for your hospitality, for this chance to rest and relax, to enjoy Hawaii's beauty and the warmth of her people.

Ladies and gentlemen, Nancy and I have greatly enjoyed our brief stay here in Hawaii. And we wish to thank Governor and Mrs. Ariyoshi, the superb staff here at Hickam, and all the people of Hawaii for their warm and generous hospitality.

Basin with this second visit to Asia in 6 months. From here we go on to Guam, where we will meet with the Governors of Guam, American Samoa, and the Northern Mariana Islands and the Presidents of the Marshalls, the Federated States of Micronesia, and Palau. These islands occupy a broad expanse of the Pacific Ocean equivalent in size to the continental United States.

Our trip will reciprocate the visit paid to our country 3 months ago by Chinese Premier Zhao, which began right here in Honolulu. This will be the first visit to China by an American President since 1975. Our trip symbolizes the maturing of the United States relationship with China, which was given a new beginning 12 years ago by President Nixon after more than two decades of isolation, and then carried forward by Presidents Ford and Carter.

It's fitting that we should depart for China from these enchanting islands. Residents of Hawaii are keenly aware of the great stake that America has in Eastern Asia. From your unique viewpoint, you see the importance of America's responsibilities as a Pacific power -- both for our security and for our own economic well-being.

The Pacific Basin is one of our fastest growing markets. America and her Pacific neighbors are nations of the future. We must work with our friends to keep the Pacific truly peaceful -- an ocean for commerce, not conflict.

Together, we can go forward in a mighty enterprise to build dynamic growth economies and make the world safer by working for peace and opposing expansionist aggression. And that's what our trip to China is all about. We journey to China in a spirit of peace and friendship, realistic about our differences, but desiring to build upon our common interests.

The American people have always held the achievements of Chinese civilization in the highest esteem, and we have the warmest feelings of friendship for the Chinese people. Last January, when Premier Zhao traveled around America, he said he was struck by the warmth the Americans feel toward the Chinese. Well, we go to China to convey this respect and friendship directly to the Chinese people, to hear their hopes and concerns, and to express our readiness to cooperate with China in its ambitious efforts to modernize its economy.

In the days ahead, I'll be holding a number of significant meetings with China's leaders. We will have the chance to review our respective positions on a variety of international concerns and to discuss the state of our bilateral relations. We hope to chart the direction of our relationship for the months and years to come.

U.S.-China relations are good. I believe they can and will be better. Close ties between our countries serve the interests of both our peoples. A stable and enduring U.S.-China relationship provides a vital contribution to the peace and well-being of all the peoples of East Asia and an important building block on the structure of world peace. We will carry with us your good wishes and those of all the American people.

I have to take a moment and say to you here, in this particular place, what it means to me to be here with you men and women in uniform and with all of those who are not in uniform but who also serve; those who know some of the privations and hardships, the inconveniences -- your families, your wives, your children -- they, too, serve.

There are some among us who say that the military is one of the causes of war. I'm sure they're sincere in their belief, but they're dead wrong to believe that the uniform, that the military could be among the causes of war is like believing that the police department is responsible for crime. You are the peacemakers. The better you perform, the less likely it is that we will ever see combat or hostilities directed against our nation.

Guam, the hub of the Pacific, is easily within range of almost all major cities in the Far East. For many people, Guam is a convenient stop on the way to someplace else, but for us, Guam means a great deal more. We may be nearly 9,000 miles from our Nation's Capital, but it's a real pleasure to know that we're among fellow Americans.

The men and women who serve on Guam are carrying on in the finest tradition of those before them. At Andersen Air Force Base and Agana Naval Air Station and on bases and ships all over the world, Americans in uniform are going about their duties with dedication, valor, and skill. And their mission is peace today, tomorrow, and for always.

This morning as we left the base in Honolulu -- Hickam Airfield there -- and I had the pleasure of speaking to those young men and women of ours in uniform -- and there are so many here today -- and I reminded them that at a time -- and I thought it should be said to them, that at a time when there are people who would link the uniform and the military with the other causes of war and say that that is one of the reasons for war, let it be said here and now that those who wear the uniform are the peacemakers. And blessed are the peacemakers. And the better they perform their tasks, the greater is our chance of not seeing war again. There have been four wars in my lifetime -- none of them started because America was too strong.

Incidentally, I might say, of all the things that go with the position I now hold, nothing, nothing has made me more proud than the young men and women, the people that are in the Armed Forces of all our branches. I am so proud of them, I can't look at them without getting a lump in my throat.

The United States is proud to be part of the Pacific community. Pacific Americans have always lived up to the values that make us a good and worthy people, values that begin with the sacred worth of human life, religious faith, family, community spirit, and hard work.

In times of crisis, few Americans have been more steadfast in the defense of our shared values and few have made more sacrifices to preserve them. Together, we have built an enduring partnership for freedom, peace, and prosperity. And once again, America's new strength, confidence, and purpose are carrying hope and opportunity to people far from the mainland.

While each island is proud of its own culture, economy, and history, all share the desire for a brighter future for their people. We have a natural interest in the progress of all the island peoples of the Pacific. We want to help the development of their economies, and we will help keep the region free from tension and rivalries. With our partnership, much can and will be accomplished.

Because the compact reflects the will of the people, I hope that both the United States Congress and the international community will recognize that complete self-government for the peoples of the Trust Territory should not be delayed.

We have submitted the compact to the Congress and have urged full consideration and approval as soon as is feasible. In the meantime, we will continue negotiations in order to resolve the constitutional issues holding up resolution of Palau's future political status.

The United States Government will work closely with the Micronesian Governments as they move forward in their new direction. We want to build on our shared values and develop an even better relationship. We're your close friends, and we will be reliable partners.

Well, I know that those eloquent words express the feelings of all Americans. And again, Nancy and I, from the bottom of our hearts, thank you for your very beautiful welcome here. God bless you all. Thank you.

In 1983 more than 250 American citizens were killed in terrorist attacks, the largest number in any year of record. In the wake of the tragic deaths of our diplomats and Marines, as well as French and Israeli soldiers in Lebanon, in light of the cynical murder of four South Korean cabinet officers and many others by North Korean terrorists in Burma, and as a result of the attack on our embassy in Kuwait, it is essential that we act immediately to cope with this menace and to increase cooperation with other governments in dealing with this growing threat to our way of life.

In the past fifteen years, terrorism has become a frightening challenge to the tranquility and political stability of our friends and allies. During the past decade alone, there have been almost 6,500 terrorist incidents. Over 3,500 people have been killed in these incidents, and more than 7,600 people have been wounded. American citizens have been the victims of more than 2,500 terrorist incidents. Of special concern to me has been the toll inflicted on our diplomats and members of the Armed Forces. I am also deeply concerned, however, about attacks against other American citizens, who have been the victims of forty percent of the terrorist incidents over the past decade.

In recent years, a very worrisome and alarming new kind of terrorism has developed: the direct use of instruments of terror by foreign states. This ``state terrorism,'' starkly manifest in the recent dreadful spectacles of violence in Beirut, Rangoon, and Kuwait, accounts for the great majority of terrorist murders and assassinations. Also disturbing is state-provided training, financing, and logistical support to terrorists and terrorist groups. These activities are an extremely serious and growing source of danger to us, our friends and our allies, and are a severe challenge to America's foreign policy.

The protection of our citizens, our official personnel, and our facilities abroad requires the close cooperation and support of other governments. We depend on other governments to provide security protection to more than 250 United States diplomatic and consular posts abroad. We look to other governments to maintain the normal protections of law in their countries for our citizens living and traveling abroad and for our business representatives and business properties.

In 1983, this Administration sent to the Congress legislation to enable us to provide adequate protection for foreign officials in the United States. Not only is their protection essential to meet the obligations of the United States under international treaties, it is equally important to demonstrate to officials of other governments that they can count on full protection while they are in the United States.

I also asked the Congress to provide legislative authority for anti-terrorism training, and in some cases equipment, to foreign governments in order to enhance cooperation with governments on whom we must depend for protection abroad. In my view, the more effective and knowledgeable local law enforcement officials and officers are, the greater will be their ability to provide the kind of security both they and we need. I commend the Congress for providing a two-year authorization for this program and an appropriation of $2.5 million for 1984.

I am determined that my Administration will do whatever is necessary to reduce the incidence of terrorism against us anywhere in the world and to see that the perpetrators of terrorist acts are brought to justice. I believe it is essential, however, that the Executive branch, the Congress and the public clearly understand that combatting terrorism effectively requires concerted action on many different fronts. With trained personnel, effective laws, close international cooperation, and diligence, we can reduce the risks of terrorism to our people and increase the deterrent to future acts of terrorism.

Dealing with the immediate effect of terrorist violence is only part of the challenge, however. We must also assure that the states now practicing or supporting terrorism do not prosper in the designs they pursue. We must assure that international forums, such as the United Nations, take a balanced and practical view of who is practicing terrorism and what must be done about it. We must assure that governments that are currently passive -- or inactive -- respecting this scourge understand the threat that terrorism poses for all mankind and that they cooperate in stopping it.

We must work to assure that there is no role in civilized society for indiscriminate threatening, intimidation, detention, or murder of innocent people. We must make it clear to any country that is tempted to use violence to undermine democratic governments, destabilize our friends, thwart efforts to promote democratic governments, or disrupt our lives that it has nothing to gain, and much to lose.

The legislation I am sending to the Congress is an important step in our war against terrorism. It will send a strong and vigorous message to friend and foe alike that the United States will not tolerate terrorist activity against its citizens or within its borders. Our legislative package consists of four separate bills, each of which is outlined below.

Taking of Hostages, which was adopted by the United Nations on December 17, 1979. The convention has not been implemented domestically through enabling legislation, however. This legislation would implement the 1979 convention. It would amend the Federal kidnapping statute to provide for Federal jurisdiction over any kidnapping in which a threat is made to kill, injure, or continue to detain a victim in order to compel a third party to do or to abstain from doing something. This is a common ploy of terrorists. At the time I signed the instrument of ratification, the Congress was informed that the instrument of ratification would not be deposited with the United Nations until enabling legislation had been enacted. To demonstrate to other governments and international forums that the United States is serious about its efforts to deal with international terrorism, it is essential that the Congress provide the necessary enabling legislation, so that we may fully implement the Hostage-Taking Convention.

The United States became a party to the Tokyo Convention, which covers certain offenses or acts committed aboard aircraft, in 1969 and the Hague Convention, concerning the suppression of unlawful seizure of aircraft, in 1971. The Convention for the Suppression of Unlawful Acts Against the Safety of Civil Aviation was adopted at Montreal in 1971 and ratified by the United States in November 1972. The Montreal Convention requires all states party to it to establish jurisdiction over certain offenses affecting the safety of civil aviation.

The Congress has approved enabling legislation for the first two of these conventions but not for the Montreal Convention. This means that certain criminal acts related to aircraft sabotage or hijacking are not adequately covered by United States law. This gap in the law sends a false signal to terrorists, and it also indicates to other governments that we may not be as serious as we should be, and as in fact we are, in our efforts to combat international terrorism. Action by the Congress now would provide the basis for long-overdue implementation of this convention.

Current law authorizes the payment of rewards for information concerning domestic crimes but is outdated. Maximum rewards are inadequate, and terrorism is not specifically included as a basis for paying a reward. Moreover, there is no authority for the payment of rewards for information on acts of terrorism abroad.

The proposed legislation, which is modelled on an existing statute that allows payment of rewards for information concerning the unauthorized manufacture of atomic weapons, recognizes that payment of a reward in connection with acts of domestic terrorism raises a matter of law enforcement that is properly within the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, but that the payment of a reward in connection with an act of terrorism abroad poses a political and foreign relations problem within the jurisdiction of the Secretary of State. By increasing the amounts of fines that may be paid, and by authorizing rewards for information concerning terrorist acts committed abroad, this Act would markedly improve the ability of the Departments of Justice and State to obtain information leading to the freeing of hostages or the capture of the perpetrators of acts of terrorism. In passing this legislation, the Congress can further underscore the intent of the United States to take every appropriate and necessary step to protect its citizens and property from terrorist acts.

The training and support of terrorist groups and activities by a number of countries has reached alarming proportions. In addition, the number of states now using terrorism as an instrument of foreign policy is both increasing and highly disturbing. The provision of assistance to countries that support terrorism and use terrorism as a foreign policy tool has thus become a matter of grave concern to national security. This Act, together with revised and strengthened regulations that the Department of State intends to issue shortly, would enhance the ability of the Department of Justice to prosecute persons involved in the support of terrorist activities and of states using terrorism. Enactment of this legislation would be a strong contribution to the effort to combat terrorism.

We must recognize that terrorism is symptomatic of larger problems. We must dedicate ourselves to fostering modernization, development, and beneficial change in the depressed areas of the world. We must renew our commitment to promoting and assisting representative and participatory governments. We must attack the problem of terrorism as a crime against the international community whenever and wherever possible, but we must strive to eradicate the sources of frustration and despair that are the spawning places and nutrients of terrorism.

The legislative proposals that I am sending to the Congress today will, when approved, materially benefit our Nation and help us to assist friendly countries. I believe that they are extraordinarily important, and I strongly urge that the Congress undertake their timely consideration and speedy passage.

President Li, Premier Zhao, distinguished ladies and gentlemen, it's a pleasure to be here with you tonight. Nancy and I are most grateful for the warmth of the reception that you've given us. I'm certain I speak for everyone in our entourage when I say we are overwhelmed by the loveliness of this hall, the gardens. The setting is certainly a tribute to the richness and depth of your culture.

It was just 200 years ago when the first American merchant ship called on a Chinese port. Two hundred years seems like the blink of an eye to Chinese civilization; yet, for Americans, this spans almost the entire history of our Republic. Looking back, President Li, we can see that at times the relationship between our two nations was not what it should have been. But thanks to the hard work and determination of farsighted leaders of both of our countries during the last 12 years, our future is bright with potential.

Premier Zhao's visit to the United States was the first visit ever by a Chinese Premier. And now this marks the first visit by an American President since our countries formally established diplomatic relations in 1979.

The travel of government leaders is symbolic of the surge of activity, of the exchange and cooperation going on between our peoples at all levels. Whether in commerce, the arts, science, or industry, our citizens are establishing personal bonds of trust and friendship that mirror the good will found at the highest levels.

This healthy intercourse is encouraged because our countries, our people as a whole, have determined that what we have in common, what we can accomplish working and building together, is vastly more significant than those things that separate us. This, of course, does not mean progress will be easy. Few things worthwhile ever happen without commitment and effort by good people. We can be proud, considering our differences, of how much has already been accomplished.

If you'll permit me, we believe even greater progress can be made if our future efforts are based on hu jing hu hui -- mutual respect and mutual benefit. If we have the will to live up to it, hu jing hu hui can make our countries more prosperous and more secure. It can keep us friends, even while recognizing that we do not totally agree on some things which we believe important. There is every reason for optimism about the continuing peaceful evolution of relations between our two countries.

I would hope in the not too distant future that you, President Li, as I have already expressed to you earlier, will come and be our guest in the United States, so that you can meet and talk with the American people.

Nancy and I are now looking forward with great anticipation to the rest of our visit to your country. We're especially pleased to see Premier Zhao again. I'm also eager to make the personal acquaintance of Chairman Deng and General Secretary Hu.

During our stay, Nancy and I hope to see and learn much about China and its people. The history, the beauty, and the culture of your country is legend throughout the world. I first learned about it as a boy in a small school in the farm country of America. I never dreamed back then that I'd have the opportunity to come and see these things for myself.

Now, as I suggested a moment ago, technology has made us neighbors. Neighbors are not family, but they can be dear and trusted friends. And that is the spirit I sense already. It's something upon which weighty accomplishments can be built. In that spirit, I invite all of you to join me in a toast.

Thank you very much, Dr. Zhou Peiyuan, and all of you distinguished ladies and gentlemen. I'm honored to come before you today, the first American President ever to address your nation from the Great Hall of the People.

Twelve years ago former President Nixon arrived in Beijing, stepped down from Air Force One, and shook hands with former Premier Zhou Enlai. Premier Zhou would later tell him, ``Your handshake came over the vastest ocean in the world -- 25 years of no communication.'' With one handshake, America and China each turned a new page in their histories.

I believe that history beckons again. We have begun to write a new chapter for peace and progress in our histories with America and China going forward hand in hand -- xieshou bingjin [walk together hand in hand].

We must always be realistic about our relationship, frankly acknowledging the fundamental differences in ideology and institutions between our two societies. Yes, let us acknowledge those differences. Let us never minimize them. But let us not be dominated by them.

I have not come to China to hold forth on what divides us, but to build on what binds us. I have not come to dwell on a closed-door past, but to urge that Americans and Chinese look to the future, because together we can and will make tomorrow a better day.

When Premier Zhao was in the United States, he told us, ``China has opened its door and will never close it again.'' Permit me to assure you today, America's door is open to you, and when you walk through, we'll welcome you as our neighbors and our friends.

We may live at nearly opposite ends of the world. We may be distinctly different in language, customs, and political beliefs. But on many vital questions of our time, there is little difference between the American and Chinese people. Indeed, I believe if we were to ask citizens all over this world what they desire most for their children, and for their children's children, their answer, in English, Chinese, or any language, would likely be the same: We want peace. We want freedom. We want a better life. Their dreams, so simply stated, represent mankind's deepest aspirations for security and personal fulfillment. And helping them make their dreams come true is what our jobs are all about.

To help fulfill that responsibility, the United States is rebuilding its defenses, which had been neglected for more than a decade. Our people realize this effort is crucial if we're to deter aggression against America, our allies, and other friends. But we threaten no nation. America's troops are not massed on China's borders. And we occupy no lands. The only foreign land we occupy anywhere in the world is beneath gravesites where Americans shed their blood for peace and freedom. Nor do we commit wanton acts, such as shooting 269 innocent people out of the sky for the so-called cause of sacred airspace.

And that's why we've proposed to the Soviet Union meaningful negotiations that go beyond rhetoric to actual arms reductions and why we must all work for the day when nuclear weapons will be banished from the face of the Earth.

Back in 1784, when the first American trading ship, the Empress of China, entered your waters, my country was unknown to you. We were a new republic, eager to win a place in international commerce. A slightly homesick American sailor recorded that first day in a letter home.

Well, since those early days, our countries have both profited from the exchange of people, goods, and ideas. Chinese settlers helped tame our continent during the 19th century. Today their families' descendants join other Americans in cooperating with you to build a new prosperity in China.

How did America, which began as an impoverished country and a melting pot, attracting immigrants from every corner of the globe, pull together and become the leading economic nation in the world? How did we go in so short a time from living by candlelight to exploring the frontiers of the universe by satellite, from each farmer laboring with horse and hoe for an entire year just to feed four people, to running his farm with the most modern machinery and producing enough to feed 75 people, making America the breadbasket of the world?

Well, we're people who've always believed the heritage of our past is the seed that brings forth the harvest of our future. And from our roots we have drawn tremendous power from two great forces: faith and freedom. America was founded by people who sought freedom to worship God and to trust in Him to guide them in their daily lives with wisdom, strength, goodness, and compassion.

Our passion for freedom led to the American Revolution, the first great uprising for human rights and independence against colonial rule. We knew each of us could not enjoy liberty for ourselves unless we were willing to share it with everyone else. And we knew our freedom could not truly be safe unless all of us were protected by a body of laws that treated us equally.

Abraham Lincoln defined the heart of American democracy when he said, ``No man is good enough to govern another man without that other's consent. . . .'' These great principles have nourished the soul of America, and they have been enriched by values such as the dignity of work, the friendship of neighbors, and the warmth of family. Like China, our people see the future in the eyes of our children. And like China, we revere our elders. To be as good as our fathers and mothers, we must be better.

Well, today, China's economy crackles with the dynamics of change: expansion of individual incentives for farmers in your new responsibility system; new bonuses for workers and more disciplined management in terms of profits and losses; improved methods of market distribution; opening your economy to the world through China's membership in the International Monetary Fund, the World Bank, and through your invitation to trade and invest, especially in your four Special Economic Zones; and your commitment to attract capital and scientific knowledge to create a high technology base for the future. All this reflects China's new role in the international economic community and your determination to modernize your economy and raise the standard of living of your people.

In the United States, as I mentioned earlier, we've always believed deeply that incentives are key and that free people build free markets that ignite dynamic development for everyone. For a time, America's government had drifted away from this key principle, and our economic growth suffered.

From now on, if you work harder and earn more than before, your reward will be greater than it was. We're putting America's future in your hands. You can spark the spirit of enterprise. You can get America moving again.'' And they have.

In 3 short years, the American people have revived a dynamic growth economy bolstered by incentives of lower tax rates, stable prices, reduced interest rates, a rebirth of productivity, and restored confidence in our currency.

Hope is high. Confidence is strong. America's future looks bright again. With a strong technological base, pioneering sunrise industries and modernizing older ones, the United States is beginning an economic renaissance and helping pull other nations toward worldwide recovery.

The United States and China have an historic opportunity. We can expand our economic and scientific cooperation, strengthen the ties between our peoples, and take an important step toward peace and a better life. And there is much we can share.

In a few short years, two-way trade has risen sharply. The United States is now China's third largest trading partner. Our bilateral trade shows great promise for the future, particularly in areas such as machinery, technology, oil equipment, petroleum, agricultural and manufacturing products.

Last June, I instructed our government to liberalize controls over the export to China of high technology products, such as computers and laboratory instruments. Our policies on technology transfer will continue to evolve along with our overall relationship and the development of broader cooperation between us. May I emphasize to the members of the scientific community here today: The relaxing of export controls reflects my determination that China be treated as a friendly, nonallied nation and that the United States be fully prepared to cooperate in your modernization.

Expanding cooperative ventures is another area of promising growth: American firms have invested almost $700 million in joint ventures and offshore oil exploration in China, making the United States your largest foreign investor. We welcome your determination to improve conditions for foreign business in China. Streamlining bureaucratic procedures, establishing a more predictable system for investment through domestic legislation and international agreements, reforming prices to make them internationally competitive, and providing foreign business people with the offices, housing, and schools they and their families need to work effectively, will stimulate more American investment.

We intend to strengthen these trends. When Treasury Secretary Regan was here last month for the meeting of the Joint Economic Committee, he concluded a bilateral tax agreement. Monday, our two countries will sign this agreement, which, I'm pleased to report, will increase incentives for even closer cooperation between American and Chinese firms. And we're continuing to work toward conclusion of bilateral agreements on greater investment protection and many other areas of cooperation.

I am particularly proud that the United States and China have reached agreement on cooperation in the peaceful uses of atomic energy. As many of you know, the negotiations between our two countries go back almost to the beginning of my administration. We have held a total of six sessions in Washington and Beijing. We made great progress during Premier Zhao's visit, and our negotiations have just now concluded successfully. The result: an agreement for cooperation in peaceful uses of nuclear energy.

I understand that several of the people here made major contributions to this effort, which meets the requirements of both sides. Once approval is complete, it will open broad opportunities for joint work in development of the energy base which China needs for her modernization.

Scientists, engineers, business leaders, and officials of both countries interested in peaceful nuclear energy will welcome this agreement. China has one of the world's most ambitious programs for expansion of electric power generation, and I believe that America's energy technology -- not just in nuclear energy but across the board -- is second to none, and perhaps most suitable for China's varied needs.

Our agreement is founded on important nonproliferation standards. We have noticed recent statements of China's nonproliferation policies, particularly those by Premier Zhao in Washington and Beijing over the past several months. Premier Zhao and I have discussed these matters directly. I can tell you that our countries share the same basic principles of preserving world peace and preventing the destabilizing spread of nuclear explosives. Neither of us will encourage proliferation nor assist any other country to acquire or develop any nuclear explosive device. Our cooperation in the peaceful uses of nuclear energy will be based on shared principles of nonproliferation.

There is also great potential in our joint efforts to increase managerial and scientific expertise. I know that many of you have heard through the Chinese press about the good work of the 9-month Dalian program of management training for industry, science, and technology. More than 750 graduates have received training in modern methods of industrial management. And I'm told some of you are graduates of that program. Well, I'm delighted to announce that we have agreed to establish a special new program there offering a full 3-year master's degree in business administration. The degree will be awarded by the State University of New York. We're to share with you the knowledge that is America's key technology -- management and science skills to develop a nation.

Under our Joint Commission on Science and Technology, we have a very productive agreement with exchange programs in 21 specific areas. We're sharing the benefits of research in medicine, energy, and other technical fields. Our scientists are learning a great deal from each other in public health, agricultural sciences, and many other areas.

Men and women of vision already see that working in the zero gravity environment of space offers dazzling opportunities to improve life on Earth. Experiments done on our space shuttle have shown that lifesaving medicines can be manufactured in space with four times the purity of the same medicines on Earth. And they can be made over 400 times more rapidly, so 1 month's production of medicines in space yields as much as 30 years' production on the ground.

These crystals are the basis of the semiconductor chips which run modern computers. By manufacturing them in zero gravity, we can make new strides toward producing larger, faster computers, the so-called supercomputers, and ultimately reduce the cost of computer manufacturing. We look forward to exploring with China the possibilities of cooperating in the development of space on behalf of all our fellow citizens.

In the humanities and social sciences, hundreds of American and Chinese scholars have visited each others' countries to teach and study subjects ranging from law and economics to poetry and history. For our part, we welcome this new Pacific tide. Let it roll peacefully on, carrying a two-way flow of people and ideas that can break down barriers of suspicion and mistrust, and build up bonds of cooperation and shared optimism.

The future is ours to build. Surmounting the risks and the fears of some may be difficult, but I'm convinced the challenge is worth it. The greatest victories come when people dare to be great, when they summon their spirits to brave the unknown and go forward together to reach a greater good.

So often, we see individual actions of courage and love in everyday life that give us faith to believe in ourselves and hope for a better future. In 1981 a bright, young American student, John Zeidman, came here to study China and to seek new friends. He was a boy of great heart and enthusiasm, and riding his bicycle on Beijing's streets, conversing and camping with artists and students, he fell in love with your country. Tragically, he was struck ill on his 20th birthday and later died. But his tragedy brought forth new life.

John's family and friends have established a Chinese studies program at the Sidwell Friends School in Washington. Hundreds have contributed, and the program now attracts young people from public and private schools and serves as a model for other schools all across America. Earlier this year, Premier Zhao visited the school. This summer the entire class will come to China as his guests to meet their student contemporaries.

From the great grief of one boy's death came a seed. And from that seed has grown a tree of understanding, a tree that now blossoms with the beauty of friendship and cooperation. If our people could go forward in this same spirit, planting not one tree, but millions, and then tending each so it may grow sturdy and tall -- then the dream of a single youth might grow into the golden dreams of all mankind.

Peiyuan, a Chinese scientist, hosted the event, which was attended by Chinese citizens who either have been involved in the various aspects of U.S.-China cooperation directly related to China's modernization program or who study Sino-U.S. relations.

Mr. Premier, this has been a stimulating day. Much was accomplished, not the least of which was the renewal of the personal rapport we established during your memorable visit to the United States. Your visit permitted you to judge for yourself the intentions of the American people. I hope the good will you experienced, just as I enjoyed from your people today, confirmed to you that our citizens want our countries to work in harmony.

Mr. Premier, by any accounting the cooperation between China and the United States already has been a boon to our people. We have both gained. In the last few years, two-way trade has taken off. There has been a veritable explosion of student, science, business, and tourist exchanges between our peoples. Joint business ventures which profit all concerned are multiplying.

We would be less than candid if we minimized the significance of the benefits we each receive from our good relations. Standing together, we can expand the trade and commercial ties that increase the quality of life in both countries. Standing together, we can further peace and security.

The commitment to stand as friends has been made. The promise is solid. The challenges that remain, however, will take both patience and mutual understanding. I have suggested and, with your permission, say again this evening: Let us use as our guide the principle of hu jing hu hui -- mutual respect, mutual benefit. This principle has within it both dignity and fairness.

We are each working hard to learn more about the delicate and detailed workings of the other's system -- ours with its complex legal procedures based on the separation of powers, and yours with its own intricate patterns. Insights into why and how decisions are made can help both of us appreciate our agreements and accept in good faith our disagreements.

Your modernization program, an ambitious undertaking, makes our future relationship even more promising. You are striving to quadruple your production by the year 2000, and the eyes of the world are watching as you progress on this peaceful and productive course. The American people wish you success and offer you our cooperation in this great endeavor.

When that first American merchant ship set sail for China 200 years ago, our Forefathers were citizens of a weak republic living in an unexplored and undeveloped land. We Americans are proud of our accomplishments in these last 200 years, just as you are rightfully proud of the enormous contributions Chinese civilization has made to mankind.

As China moves forward to modernize and develop its economy, the United States is eager to join in a cooperative effort to share the American capabilities that helped turn our country from a vast wilderness into an industrial giant. Those American capabilities flow from the creative enterprise our society encourages. Our progress is based on what we have found to work. If it did not work, the American people, who are pragmatic by nature, would likely have abandoned it long ago.

China today, I understand, is taking its own practical approach. By increasing incentives and decentralizing decision-making, you are promoting innovation, creativity, and a better ability to adapt to local conditions. The responsibility system in agriculture has spurred increases in food production throughout China, and the special economic zones are providing dramatic examples of how incentives can raise productivity and offer bountiful opportunities for a better life.

In your drive for modernization, you have our best wishes. If you ask our advice, we can only answer with truth as we see it. But let me assure you, we want you to succeed. Having 1 billion people -- nearly a quarter of mankind -- healthy, well fed, clothed, and housed, educated, and given the opportunity for a higher standard of living, is in the interest of good and decent people everywhere. It is certainly in the interest of the American people, who wish to trade and be friends with the Chinese people.

Premier Zhao, as we're all well aware, our cooperation is based on more than simply the desire to improve our economies. Today the peace of the world is threatened by a major power that is focusing its resources and energies not on economic progress but, instead, on military power.

The shift in military might of the last decade has made trust and friendship between us even more vital. I know it is your desire, and that of the United States as well, that peace be preserved. We seek to better the quality of life of our people, and that can be done only in a peaceful environment. War is the great destroyer of all the hopes of mankind.

To preserve the peace and protect our own sovereignty and independence, we stand together in opposing expansionism and hegemony. We stand together in support of the independence of Afghanistan and Kampuchea. Both of us seek to promote peace and reconciliation through dialog between South and North on the Korean Peninsula. Both of us seek the early independence of Namibia and an end to outside interference in the affairs of southern Africa. Although our prescriptions for getting there are quite different, we share a common desire for a resolution of the turmoil in the Middle East and Central America. Both of us seek an end to the use of chemical weapons and agree on the necessity of reducing nuclear arms.

It is the hope and prayer of the American people that someday there will no longer be a need for our nation to use any of its resources to produce weapons of any kind. The Chinese and American people are now showing the world by our example that there is a better way than hatred and violence.

Many of us in this room have seen much history in our lifetime. My own lifetime spans one-third of the history of the American Republic. Over the many years that God has permitted me to live, I have observed the changing nature of the relationship between our two countries.

At times, our feelings toward each other were hostile and negative. Today, we have the opportunity to keep our countries on a path of genuine good will that will reap rewards for generations to come. Let us not shy from the task. It will not be easy; yet, let us move forward so that someday when the young people of our countries reach a ripe old age, they will look back, and there will be no memory of a time when there was anything else but friendship and good feelings between the Chinese and American people. That is a gift we can give to them.

Premier, to the health of President and Mrs. Li who so graciously acted as our hosts yesterday, to the health of Chairman Deng, General Secretary Hu, and the other distinguished Chinese citizens it is my privilege to meet this week, and to the friendship and cooperation between our two countries.

On Thursday we were informed by the Information Department of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs that Chinese Central Television would carry the President's Friday speech to Chinese leaders in full in a taped program in prime-time evening television Friday night. Late in the day Friday, Mr.

Last night we learned that the broadcast also omitted several other segments of the speech, including key passages dealing with the President's view of values that Americans cherish, including religion and democracy. We had made it clear to the Chinese Government prior to the trip that we hoped for an opportunity for the President to communicate with the Chinese people on the American approach to world affairs, its bases in our system, and the goals we seek in our relationship with the People's Republic.

The Chinese Government, which controls information in the country, has given the President extensive news coverage; certainly more than we would consider likely for most foreign leaders visiting the United States. The decision to delete material from the President's speech from the Chinese television broadcast and from other Chinese news media is an internal matter for the Chinese to decide, and we understand that. We, nevertheless, regret the fact that statements by the President which would have given the Chinese people a better understanding of our country and its people were not included in Chinese media coverage of the speech.

The President. Well, thank you, and may I say how pleased I am to visit your great and historic country. As a boy going to school in a small town in our Midwest, I used to dream of coming here. In those days China seemed a million miles away, and today modern jet travel gives us the privilege of seeing China, meeting your hard-working people and learning more about the progress that you're making, and visiting the many treasures of your civilization -- one of the oldest in the world.

Americans they span the entire history of our Republic. Yes, your country is old while ours is young, and, yes, we speak different languages, have different customs, and our governments hold different political beliefs. But I believe if you could look beyond labels and into the homes and hearts of our people, you'd find they share many basic values, values with your own -- values like the dignity of work, the importance of opportunity, the love and strength of family, reverence for elders, the dream of leaving a better life for our children and our children's children, and finally our simple, heartfelt desire to be friends and to live together in peace.

Americans are people of peace. It's important you know that. We pose no threat to China or any nation. We have no troops massed on your borders. We occupy no lands. After World War II, we were the only undamaged industrial power, the only nation to harness the atom, and the only people with the power to conquer the world. But we didn't conquer anybody. We used our power to write a new chapter in history by helping rebuild the war-ravaged economies of both friends and foes. We love peace, and we cherish freedom, because we've learned time and again in place after place that economic growth and human progress make their greatest strides when people are secure and free to think, speak, worship, choose their own way, and reach for the stars.

We admire the progress your government has made in opening China's economy to the world and in providing more opportunities for your people to better their lives. And we've told your leaders that as the world's leading economy, the United States welcomes the chance to walk by China's side, sharing our technology and encouraging a greater flow of people, products, and ideas between our two countries.

Like China, the United States is a Pacific nation. A prosperous future is being built in the Pacific, and we're now your nation's third largest trading partner. We're working together to improve industrial, technological cooperation, increased trade and investment, and expand educational and cultural exchanges.

Let us resolve that communication, not confrontation, and commerce, not conflict, will always govern Chinese-American relations. If we do, there is no limit to the progress we can make by going forward hand in hand -- xieshou bingjin [walk together hand in hand].

Q. Mr. President, the Chinese public expect that your visit will give an impetus to the steady and the sustained growth of Sino-U.S. relations. In your view, what concrete steps the Chinese and American sides should take to promote the further development of Sino-U.S. relations?

The President. Well, we've taken a number already. The progress that we have made with regard to trade agreements, that we're discussing right now with regard to protecting your people and ours against double taxation. We have arrived at an agreement on nuclear cooperation for peaceful energy, and at the same time we have agreed to prevent as much as we can by ourselves nuclear proliferation of weapons to other countries.

But we've had, I believe, five members of our Cabinet here in the last several months meeting with their counterparts in your government, working out everything from commerce and trade relations. Our Secretary of Defense has been here, our Secretary of State. We're discussing energy problems.

Q. Mr. President, both you and the Chinese leaders have expressed the desire for further development of Sino-U.S. relations. Everyone knows that the issue of Taiwan is a major obstacle to the development of our bilateral relations. It is also an important matter affecting the national feelings of 1 billion Chinese people. Could you please tell us how the United States intends to gradually remove this obstacle?

The President. Well, we believe that this is a problem of Chinese people on both sides of the straits to work out for themselves. It is true that we have a long historical relationship, a friendship with the people on Taiwan. We believe that the solution when it comes should be peaceful, and we do not believe that we should involve ourselves in this internal affair.

Our position, however, has been with the utmost sincerity. We want to go forward with friendship for the people of the People's Republic of China. At the same time, we don't believe that it would be right to cast aside longtime old friends in order to make new friends. But we will do anything we can to encourage the peaceful solution of this problem by the peoples of China.

Q. Mr. President, there is a great potential for Sino-U.S. economic cooperation. What measures the U.S. Government is prepared to adopt to promote further economic and technological cooperation between the two countries?

The President. Well, I believe I answered that in part on your previous question here. We are going forward. We have made great strides in providing high technology information and high technology itself in trade with the People's Republic of China, and we have an agricultural agreement now with regard to our grain sales to you. But we also have worked out agreements covering other forms of trade.

The President. Well, I am very optimistic about this growth of the relations that have already been started. And I think in my two previous questions -- or your two previous questions -- I left out one of the most important things that should be mentioned, and that is the development of relations in education, the exchange of students.

Just before I left the United States to come here, I met with a group of your students who are attending our colleges in the United States. There are some 12,000 in all, and we, at the same time, are looking forward to an exchange -- our own students coming here. Of course, we also have a visitation in which roughly a hundred thousand of our people visit your country now with great interest and enjoyment.

So, this, I think, is one of the great things for the future, as our young people get to know each other. I have always said that our troubles begin when people are talking about each other instead of to each other. And if we can have our young people talking to each other, I'm very optimistic about the future.

And they thought I couldn't erase the deficit. [Laughter] Well, thank all of you for a very warm welcome. Nancy and I are delighted to be with you this evening. We've come to Beijing to strengthen America's ties, as you know, with China, something that each one of you has been doing very well already.

Now, about this honorary presidency: I greet it with mixed emotions -- [laughter] -- because once about 25 years after I'd gotten out of my alma mater, they had me back at commencement and gave me an honorary degree. And on that occasion, a sense of guilt that I'd been nursing for 25 years rose up and almost choked me, because I'd figured the first one they gave me was honorary.

For more than two decades, as you know, the United States and China had no relations whatsoever. And then in 1972, President Nixon's trip to China and the Shanghai Communique broke that long silence. Our relationship since that time has been a force for peace in the world and will continue to serve that end. But at the same time, China and the United States recognize that we have many other areas of mutual interest, particularly since 1978, when Chinese leaders decided to foster the growth of the Chinese economy and open more to the West.

While respecting the differences between us, the Chinese leaders and I have agreed to focus on all that unites us -- our determination to resist foreign threats, the fundamental desire of our people to earn their livings and raise their families in prosperity and peace. The Chinese have made it clear that they want to multiply the economic ties between us. And we, in turn, have sought ways to promote the equitable export of high technology to China and work to promote more Chinese-American joint ventures.

Each of you is playing a vital role in this new and historic relationship. The diplomats among you are seeking new areas of agreement between our two countries and implementing the many agreements that we've already made. And those of you in business are making possible the export of raw materials and manufactures from China to America and the shipment to China of many American goods including products of our technology.

Many business people are involved in joint ventures like this dazzling new hotel. The expansion of these commercial ties is due in no small part to the efforts of the National Council for U.S.-China Trade.

Those of you who are teachers or students are helping the Chinese to understand not just the strength and prosperity of the United States but the open and peace-loving character of the American people. Day by day, each of you is helping to build a firm friendship between the most prosperous nation and the most populous nation on Earth. On behalf of all Americans, believe me, I thank you.

The economy is still expanding briskly with leading indicators showing the expansion is here to stay. And polls tell us the national mood is the brightest that it's been in 5 years. Americans this springtime are proud of themselves, their jobs, and their country, and they're facing the future with confidence and courage.

States are doing just fine. And you can take pride in the knowledge that, although you're far from home, you're advancing the causes of world peace and international prosperity that are so close to your country's heart.

Before I leave, I just have to tell you a little incident. You all know, of course, about the Grenada rescue mission. And, incidentally, to those who have been trying to call it something ulterior like an invasion or something else, we had the great thrill -- Nancy and I -- of having several hundred of those medical students from Grenada who were rescued by our Armed Forces at the South Lawn of the White House and some of the first returnees among the troops of all four branches who were part of that rescue mission there.

And it would have put a lump in your throat to see these young people -- and many of them frankly telling you that they were from an era where they didn't look with kindliness on the uniform; they didn't take to it. But they couldn't keep their hands off those youngsters their own age there on the South Lawn, and they would come hug them, come back and tell us, ``They saved our lives'' and all.

Well, some days later, I got a message from the Armed Forces Journal in the Pentagon. They'd received a letter from a young marine pilot of a Cobra helicopter who had been at Grenada and then went on to Beirut. And after he got there, he wrote back to the Armed Forces Journal. And he said that every story that he read in the press about that incident, in every story, they said Grenada produces more nutmeg than any other spot on Earth. And he decided it appeared so often, it was a code. And he was going to break the code.

I know that we have to move on here, but this has been most wonderful, and I thank you very much for the honor that you've done me and for giving me the seal. And now, just as soon as I find out from the Treasury, I'll settle some other problems -- [laughter] -- that have been bothering us.

Note: The President spoke at 7:10 p.m. in the atrium at the Great Wall Hotel. Attending the reception were members of the American Club, a group of Americans living in China. The President was introduced by William Clarke, president of the club, who presented the President with a chop bearing the official American Club seal.

Premier Zhao, ladies and gentlemen, Nancy and I are delighted to welcome you here tonight. We hope to return in at least a small way the kind hospitality that has been extended to us since we set foot in this magnificent city.

For Americans, Mr. Premier, the very mention of China holds a sense of allure. It conjures up images of the Yangtze River alive with traditional fanchuan [sailboat] and modern steamers, with the wide deserts of the north, of the bamboo forests in the southwest that are home to pandas, golden monkeys, and so many other animals native only to China, of the rich, productive fields and farmlands of the east, and of the huge cities like Beijing and Shanghai.

All these provide a sharp contrast with America and remind us of China's sweep and vitality. Yet what strikes us most, perhaps, is the sense of China's history. Chinese records date back 3,500 years. Kingdoms rose and fell in China long before we in the West saw the rise and fall of Rome.

By contrast, Mr. Premier, it was barely four centuries ago that the first European settlers landed on our eastern coast. These hardy men and women and those who followed them came from virtually every nation in Europe. They felled trees, planted crops, built towns, and established legislatures. Later, many thousands came from China and joined the pioneers who were establishing farms and towns in the American West.

But together these diverse peoples built a great and free nation. Today that nation represents a powerful force for peace in the world and is leading a technological revolution that ranges from tiny microchips to voyages through the vastness of space.

Our national experience has instilled in all Americans certain fundamental beliefs. It has taught us that for a nation to prosper there must be peace, and that for men and women to work together, they must respect each other's rights. And just as these beliefs guide our dealings with one another, they've guided us from the first in our dealings with other nations.

Well, the policy that President Grant described then remains our policy now. For nearly four decades, the United States and her allies have kept the peace in Europe. Throughout the world, the United States is supporting the causes of national self-determination and economic progress.

Our aims and commitments are fully consistent with the sovereignty, independence, and economic development of all nations, including China. We seek no expansion but the expansion of good will and opportunity; no victory but the victory of peace.

China and the United States, Mr. Premier, differ markedly in their values, forms of government, and economic systems. To ignore or understate our differences would be to do an injustice to both. But we both believe that despite our differences our people are united in their desire to resist foreign threats, raise their families in prosperity and peace, and go as far in this life as their intelligence and imagination might take them. We hold more than enough in common to provide firm ground on which we can work together for the benefit of both.

Shanghai Communique, China and America have begun a productive partnership. Our cooperation has helped to provide a counterbalance to aggressive world forces. In recent years, we have formed new and important bonds in other fields as well, expanding our cultural and academic exchanges.

At the same time, our two nations have begun economic exchanges that are growing in importance every day. Today China exports tons of foodstuffs, raw materials, and manufactured goods to the United States each year. America in turn supplies China with grain, transportation equipment, and scientific instruments, and the United States is helping China to acquire the capital and technology so vital to a growing economy. Already, some of the many joint Chinese-American business ventures have begun to bear fruit. This magnificent hotel is the outcome of just such a joint venture.

Each has worked steadfastly to improve the Chinese-American friendship. Here in China, you, too, have had changes in leadership. But you, too, have remained firmly committed to the friendship between our nations. We in the United States are particularly pleased by the new emphasis on economic development. We congratulate you, Mr. Premier, and the other Chinese leaders who have worked so diligently and boldly to improve the lives of the Chinese people. We recognize that it took courage to set these policies in place. And you have our pledge to give you our full cooperation as you modernize your nation's economy.

To view China and the United States as immense lands a world apart is to see one aspect of the truth. But in this century, there's another view that is even more meaningful. It is the view of a small green and blue ball spinning in the darkness of space -- a sight that has so deeply moved all who have seen it. That view is a view of the future, for it shows one planet, our planet, where all nations seem as close neighbors. Our two nations, Mr. Premier, are firmly committed to that future.

I'm sure you've heard that Nancy and I are traveling a long way from home this week. We've already flown more than 9,000 miles, stopping off in the beautiful islands of Hawaii to visit the citizens of our 50th State; and then across the International Dateline to Guam, where the rays of each sunrise first touch the Stars and Stripes; and then on to our primary destination, China, one of the world's oldest civilizations and a country of great importance in today's Pacific community of nations.

This is our second trip to Asia in the last 6 months. It demonstrates our awareness of America's responsibility as a Pacific leader in the search for regional security and economic well-being. The stability and prosperity of this region are of crucial importance to the United States. The nations comprising the Pacific Basin represent our fastest growing trading markets. Many say that the 21st century will be the century of the Pacific.

Our relations with China have continued to develop through the last four administrations, ever since President Nixon made his historic journey here in 1972. In 1978 the Chinese leadership decided to chart a new course for their country, permitting more economic freedom for the people in an effort to modernize their economy. Not surprisingly, the results have been positive.

Today China's efforts to modernize, foster the spirit of enterprise, open its doors to the West, and expand areas of mutual cooperation while opposing Soviet aggression make it a nation of increasing importance to America and to prospects for peace and prosperity in the Pacific.

When Nancy and I arrived in Beijing, we were touched by the friendly hospitality of the Chinese people, and we've been delighted to see the sweeping vistas, the bustling activity, and the many hallmarks of history in this great, old city.

Forbidden City, a former Imperial Palace, first erected in 1420, are interspersed with modern highrises and wide avenues. The streets are normally filled with people riding bicycles. All of you who like bikeriding would love Beijing.

From the first moment, our schedule has been fully packed. I've already had extensive meetings with the Chinese leaders -- President Li, Prime Minister Zhao, General Secretary Hu, and Chairman Deng. I had the honor of addressing a large group of Chinese and American leaders in science and industry in the Great Hall of the People, and I've spoken to the people of China over Chinese television.

We've also squeezed in some side trips -- first, to the magnificent Great Wall, built by the Chinese more than 2,000 years ago to protect their country from outside invaders; and tomorrow, to the ancient city of Xi'an, an archeological treasure considered the cradle of Chinese civilization and located in a fertile plain near the Yellow River.

In all of our meetings and appearances, I've stressed one overriding point -- different as to our two forms of government -- different as they may be, the common interests that bind our two peoples are even greater. Namely, our determination to build a better life and to resist aggressors who violate the rights of law-abiding nations and endanger world peace.

When people have the opportunity to communicate, cooperate, and engage in commerce, they can often produce astonishing results. We've already agreed to cooperate more closely in the areas of trade, technology, investment, and exchange of scientific and managerial expertise. And we've reached an important agreement on the peaceful uses of nuclear energy for economic development.

Shanghai Foxboro Company, where Americans and Chinese are making high technology equipment to help advance China's industries. And I'll also visit with the students at Fudan University and speak to them about the meaning of America, the challenges our people face, and the dreams we share.

We can learn much from the rich history of China and from the wisdom and character of her people. And I've told the Chinese that Americans are people of peace, filled with the spirit of innovation and a passion for progress to make tomorrow better than today.

Our two nations are poised to take an historic step forward on the path of peaceful cooperation and economic development. I'm confident that our trip will be a significant success, resulting in a stronger U.S.-China relationship than before. For Americans, this will mean more jobs and a better chance for a peaceful world.

The developing relationship between China and the United States has been one of the principal events of postwar diplomacy. And today we're taking further steps to broaden and strengthen the ties based on shared principles of mutual respect and mutual benefit. We're concluding new accords that will facilitate trade and investment, enhance the exchange of people and ideas between our countries, expand the prospects for cooperation in developing China's nuclear energy capability, and help address China's critical need for developing skilled managers.

First, we're signing a tax agreement that will make it easier for Chinese and American firms to engage in trade and cooperate in joint ventures. With this agreement, private investors in professional exchanges can make a stronger contribution to Chinese development and to the benefit of both of our nations.

We're also signing the implementing accord for the Cultural Agreement between the United States and China. Our visit has reinforced our appreciation for Chinese hospitality and for China's ancient and honorable culture. I'm delighted that now millions of other Americans will be able to see the artistic and cultural achievements of the Chinese people.

This accord will open my own country's rich heritage to the Chinese people. And under the terms of the agreement, an exhibit from the Brooklyn Museum of Art is just now opening here in Beijing. We're pleased that many Chinese people will be able to see more American art and culture and learn more about our people and our country.

Ambassador Richard Kennedy and State Science and Technology Commissioner Jia Weiwen are initialing the text of an agreement, as the Premier told us, for cooperation between the United States and China in the peaceful use of nuclear energy. We congratulate the negotiators for their hard work and diligence. This agreement will permit American firms and experts to help China meet the ambitious energy goals of its modernization program. Our agreement is based on our shared desire to prevent the proliferation of nuclear explosives in the world. And it brings a new dimension of peaceful cooperation to our relationship.

The Chinese people are known to Americans as people of admirable patience and endless courtesy. Throughout our stay here, we have seen both of those virtues. Let us hope that as contacts grow between the Chinese and American people, each of us will continue to learn about the other, and this important, new friendship of ours will mature and prosper.

China (hereafter referred to as ``both sides''), desirous of enhancing friendly relations between the peoples of the two countries, and strengthening cultural cooperation between the two countries, based on the principles of mutual respect for sovereignty, of equality, reciprocity and mutual benefit, and in accordance with the Cultural Agreement signed on January 31, 1979, by the two governments, have agreed on the following program of cultural exchange between the two countries for the period 1984 and 1985.

Urban and Rural Life in America, Paintings from the Brooklyn Museum'' in China in 1984, and by the Chinese side with the exhibit ``Chinese Traditional Painting: Five Modern Masters'' in the United States in 1984 and 1985. The specifics for sending art exhibits will be decided through specific agreements signed by relevant organizations designated by each side respectively. Both sides agree to exchange views and propose suggestions on the types of art exhibits to be exchanged during the life of the next implementing accord, so that preparations can begin early.

Both sides will encourage continued exchange of personnel and professional cooperation between the National Park Service of the United States and the Bureau of Landscape Architecture under the Ministry of Urban and Rural Construction and Environmental Protection of China. Both sides agree that specific exchange projects will be decided through separate discussions between the two above-mentioned organizations.

Yesterday, in Xi'an, I had the privilege of seeing some of the wonders and majesty of China's ancient civilization. Your past achievements, illustrious history, and rich culture testify to the spirit and determination of the Chinese people. And today we're witnessing that same spirit and determination being carried forward into the world of high technology. I'm delighted that American businessmen are working side by side with their Chinese partners to develop new technologies for China's industries.

American firms. The Shanghai Instrumentation Corporation brings to this new venture a proud record as one of China's leading suppliers of automation products. And the advanced technology of the Foxboro Company will help open new horizons. Your pioneer efforts demonstrate that a promising future beckons for expanded cooperation between our people.

We both understand that the capabilities and requirements of our two countries complement each other. We both can be confident that our relationship is based on equality, cooperation, and mutual respect. And we both can be satisfied that the results provide mutual benefits. We're striking a balance between the needs of the Chinese economy and the principles that make for successful business relationships in America.

China. Today it was our honor to renew an agreement between our two governments that extends and expands our management cooperation, including the training center in Dalian. I'm delighted to learn that Shanghai Foxboro has on its team a graduate of the Institute, engineer Shen Guozuo.

Business partnerships between Chinese and American companies are bound to succeed. The bonds of friendship and partnership in this fine company are a wellspring of hope and progress, of modernization and prosperity.

Opportunity has brought results. Shanghai Foxboro is a fine beginning. And now it's time to go forward and to build on this promising foundation. We can make tomorrow even better. And with the skill and cooperation I'm seeing here today, I am sure that we will.

In his opening remarks, the President referred to Qin Fu Xiang, general manager of the joint venture, and Donald N. Sorterup, vice president for foreign affairs and trade of the Shanghai Instrumentation and Telecommunications Bureau. Following his remarks, the President viewed equipment in the display room and then went to the assembly building, where he joined Chinese women who were soldering chips onto panelboards for electronic circuitry.

My own college days, years, took place some 50 years ago. It was a difficult time in America then. We were in a great worldwide depression, and I used to wonder what kind of place I could find for myself after graduation. But here we are 50 years later, and our people, the American people, enjoy a standard of living that was undreamed of back then.

Each decade during those past 50 years, real income per person in America rose an average of nearly 30 percent. And today, in America, we have taken -- or things we take for granted that didn't even exist 50 years ago -- television, computers, space flights, and so many more things, including the very means of travel -- space or the jet travel brought me here to this country.

But the key to all this progress has not been minerals, electricity, or building materials, but the human capacity for intelligence, imagination, and wonder and the opportunity to put all of them to use.

Here in China, for example, centuries ago wood was used only for our most basic needs like keeping warm. It was the ingenuity of the human mind that devised methods of turning wood into paper, transforming civilization by making it possible to store and exchange the written word. In the United States just a few years ago when we thought of sand, we thought of little more than deserts and beaches. And today we use that sand to make the computer chips that guide satellites through space.

I'm convinced that each of you stands at a great beginning. The Chinese people have skill, ingenuity, and a rich heritage. And those of you who are privileged to come to this university will help lead your country to new prosperity. If I could offer one piece of advice to remember in the years ahead, I would suggest this: It's not so much what's inside the Earth that counts but what's inside one's heart and mind, because that's the stuff that dreams are made of. And China's future depends on your dreams and your faith and determination to make your dreams come true.

The President. All right. Well, you know, I went not to a large university like this. I went to a small liberal arts college similar to Smith College. And the funny thing is it was literally all of it. I majored in economics, and so, therefore, my studies certainly have played a part in what I'm doing now. [Laughter] I had two other great interests in addition. One was athletics, and I played football, basketball, ran on the track team, swam. And when I got out of school in that Great Depression, when even our own government was telling people on the radio not to go leave home looking for work because there was none -- more than a fourth of our work force unemployed -- believe it or not, it was the athletics that got me my first job in radio as a sports announcer.

Q. Mr. President, in recent years, Fudan has been developing academic exchange with a number of American universities, and we're looking forward to the further expansion of such exchange and collaborations. So, my question is, what do you think are the prospects of the further promotion of such ties?

The President. I think the prospects are very good. Indeed, I have been talking to your national leaders about that very thing. We have more than 10,000 of your students in our universities and colleges in America right now. A lesser number of ours are here. But we discussed this whole thing of making this exchange even better and more even and definitely want to continue it. And I had the opportunity just before leaving to come here of meeting with about a dozen of those 10,000 who came to the White House, and we had an opportunity to visit. And they're fine young people. And you'll be very proud of them when they come home.

The President. I think they're doing it very much the same as you are right here. There was a period when there was a kind of rebellious spirit in our land, and many young people -- not a majority, but enough of them to make quite a crowd -- were somewhat disillusioned, and they wanted to throw away all the values of the past, all the things that we've learned to believe in.

And, you know, this is true of every generation. We all think that the generation that went before us didn't quite do things right, and we were going to make some changes and all. But be very careful. Don't throw away the values that have been tested through time and that have proven over the centuries that they are basic values essential to civilization and to what we call civilization.

They're working hard. They're serious about it. And I think there's been a return now to acceptance of the basic values that have always made for civilization. And you have to remember this also: Every generation stands on the shoulders of the generation that went before. And so, you see farther because you're standing taller than we did and can look farther. But at least give us the credit that you're seeing farther because you're standing on our shoulders. Don't settle for the same level of view that we have. Realize that you are to look on and beyond and progress.

We signed this morning some agreements that had to do with commerce and trade and broadening the ability for exchange and for partnerships such as the one that I just visited here in Shanghai when I arrived, before I came here, the Foxboro Company, which is a partnership between the People's Republic and the Foxboro Company of Massachusetts in our own country. We talked of all these things, as to how we can broaden the base of friendship and understanding and knowledge of each other. And this includes that part with the exchange of students and all.

We are continuing to negotiate on a number of issues that are of concern. Cultural exchange -- right now in Beijing, and then I understand it's going to go to other cities -- is an art exhibit from one of our art museums in Brooklyn, New York. You, in turn, are going to send your art treasures to our country for our people to understand better.

So, I guess it comes down to something that's a favorite saying of mine: We only get in trouble when we're talking about each other, not when we're talking to each other. So, we're going to be talking to each other a great deal.

Q. Mr. President, what part do you think the American universities have been playing in the development of science and technology in United States? And in face of the new technological revolution, what are they doing about it now?

The President.  --  -- and I think could give you all the information that you would need about the research -- [laughter] -- that is going on in our universities. They have been the center of research in our country. And the future is unlimited.

Well, I was talking to the mayor on the way over here today about his generation and mine -- he's a few years younger than I am, but we're still of the same generation -- and our generation, you are going to see marvelous things. I'm not sure that you will see the great change or transition that we did in our single lifetime, because when I was very young, living in a small town in America, you traveled in horse and buggy.

I can remember my first automobile ride. There were no airplanes then, there was no television, there was no radio, and there was certainly no travel in space. But we have -- in one generation, we have gone from horse and buggy to the Moon in a spaceship. And all of that -- those are the building blocks that you have with which to go forward from here. And don't be afraid to dream and make your dreams come true.

Q. Mr. President, your China trip will soon come to its end. Could you tell us what impresses you most during this visit, and what impressions you especially want to convey to American young people when you are back home?

One thing above all that impressed me almost before we got to the Guest House in Beijing when we flew in the other day was the warmth and the friendliness of you, the Chinese people, toward us. It was a most and has been a most heartwarming experience ever since we've been here. We shall remember it for a long, long time.

But then was the vitality, the changes that are taking place -- the program of modernization itself, the courage that it took to embark on that, and then the manner in which it's succeeding. And coupled with that, which helps make it a kaleidoscope, was then also the few glimpses that we had of the great heritage, a civilization that began here long before it had begun anyplace in the world. You had gone through so much of civilization before, in the West, the Roman Empire ever even came into being or fell.

But the mix of the great civilization and heritage that you have -- and today, of the speed and drive of your modernization program. And I just go home with a dream in my heart that we perhaps have started a friendship here between two great peoples -- not an alliance; I admire the position of being nonaligned that you have -- but being friends and neighbors, and that we will be friends and neighbors. And we can be such a force for good in the world if we are.

Can I take just a second for something? The press will get very annoyed with me; they've heard me tell this so often. But just a few weeks ago, we had a visitor in our land -- the President of France and his wife, Madam Mitterrand. And in the White House at a state dinner, Nancy was accompanying the President, I was accompanying Mrs. Mitterrand, into the dining room -- everyone standing around the tables. And Nancy and the President stayed on this side of the room, and Mrs. Mitterrand and I start at the other side of the room -- and I tell this just as an example of how close you can come to a diplomatic crisis.

Great Wall of China, a structure so huge and marvelous that it can be seen from space; the ancient city of Xi'an; and the Tomb of the Great Emperor and the buried army that guards him still. These are the wonders of ages past. But today I want to talk to you, the young people of a great university, about the future, about our future together and how we can transform human life on this planet if we bring as much wisdom and curiosity to each other as we bring to our scholarly pursuits.

I want to begin, though, with some greetings. I bring you greetings not only from my countrymen but from one of your countrymen. Some of you know Ye Yang, who was a student here. He graduated from Fudan and became a teacher of English at this university. Now he is at Harvard University in the United States, where he is studying for a doctorate in comparative literature.

My staff spoke to him before we left. Mr. Ye wants you to know he's doing fine. He's working hard on his spring term papers, and his thoughts turn to you often. He asked me to deliver a message to his former students, colleagues, friends, and family. He asked me to say for him, and I hope I can, ``Wo xiang nian da jia'' [I am thinking of all of you].

I'd like to say a few words about our China-U.S. educational exchange programs. It's not entirely new, this exchanging of students. Your President Xie earned a degree from Smith College in the United States. Smith is also my wife Nancy's alma mater. And President Xie also attended MIT, Massachusetts Institute of Technology, one of our greatest universities of science, engineering, and technology.

But in the past few years, our two countries have enjoyed an explosion in the number of student exchanges. Five years ago you numbered your students studying abroad in the hundreds. Since then, 20,000 Chinese scholars have studied throughout the world, and more than half of them have come to American schools. More than 100 American colleges and universities now have educational exchanges with nearly as many Chinese institutions.

American students come to China to learn many things -- how you monitor and predict earthquakes, how you've made such strides in researching the cause and treatment of cancer. We have much to learn from you in neurosurgery and in your use of herbs in medicine. And we welcome the chance to study your language, your history, and your society.

You, in turn, have shown that you're eager to learn, to come to American schools and study electronics and computer sciences, math and engineering, physics, management, and the humanities. We have much to share in these fields, and we're eager to benefit from your curiosity.

Much of this sharing is recent, only 5 years old. But the areas of our mutual cooperation continue to expand. We've already agreed to cooperate more closely in trade, technology, investment, and exchanges of scientific and managerial expertise. And we have just concluded an important agreement to help advance our technological and economic development through the peaceful use of nuclear energy.

That term ``peaceful use of nuclear energy'' is key. Our agreement rests upon important principles of nonproliferation. Neither of our countries will encourage nuclear proliferation nor assist any other country to acquire or develop any nuclear explosive device.

We live in a troubled world, and the United States and China, as two great nations, share a special responsibility to help reduce the risks of war. We both agree that there can be only one sane policy to preserve our precious civilization in this modern age: A nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. And no matter how great the obstacles may seem, we must never stop our efforts to reduce the weapons of war. We must never stop at all until we see the day when nuclear arms have been banished from the face of this Earth.

With peaceful cooperation as our guide, the possibilities for future progress are great. For example, we look forward to exploring with China the possibilities of cooperating in the development of space on behalf of our fellow citizens.

Our astronauts have found that by working in the zero gravity environment of space, we will be able to manufacture life-saving medicines with far greater purity and efficiency, medicines that will treat diseases of heart attack and stroke that afflict millions of us. We will learn how to manufacture Factor 8, a rare and expensive medicine used to treat hemophiliacs. We can research the Beta Cell, which produces insulin, and which could provide mankind's first permanent cure for diabetes.

We hope to see the day when a Chinese scientist working out an engineering problem in Fudan will be able to hook into the help of a scientist at a computer at MIT. And the scientist in Boston will be able to call on the expertise of the scientist in Shanghai, and all of it in a matter of seconds.

Your government's policy of forging closer ties in the free exchange of knowledge has not only enlivened your economy, it has opened the way to a new convergence of Chinese and American interests. You have opened the door, and let me assure you that ours is also open.

Now, all of this is particularly exciting in light of the recent history of our two countries. For many years, there was no closeness between us. The silence took its toll. A dozen years ago, it began to change. Together, we made it change. And now in the past 5 years, your policy of opening to the outside world has helped us begin to know each other better than we ever had before.

I wonder if you're aware of the many ways China has touched American life? The signs of your influence and success abound. If I were spending this afternoon in Washington, I might look out the window and see a man and woman strolling along Pennsylvania Avenue wearing Chinese silk.

First of all, America is really many Americas. We call ourselves a nation of immigrants, and that's truly what we are. We have drawn people from every corner of the Earth. We're composed of virtually every race and religion, and not in small numbers, but large. We have a statue in New York Harbor that speaks of this, a statue of a woman holding a torch of welcome to those who enter our country to become Americans. She has greeted millions upon millions of immigrants to our country. She welcomes them still. She represents our open door.

And the marvelous thing, a thing of which we're proud, is they did not have to relinquish these things in order to fit in. In fact, what they brought to America became American. And this diversity has more than enriched us; it has literally shaped us.

This tradition -- the tradition of new immigrants adding to the sum total of what we are -- is not a thing of the past. New immigrants are still bringing their talents and improving the quality of American life. Let me name a few -- I think you'll know their names.

In America, Wang computers have become a fixture in offices throughout the country. They are the product of the energy and brilliance of Mr. An Wang, who himself is the product of a Shanghai university.

But we always hold together as a society. We've held together for more than 200 years, because we're united by certain things in which we all believe, things to which we've quietly pledged our deepest loyalties. I draw your special attention to what I'm about to say, because it's so important to an understanding of my country.

We believe in the dignity of each man, woman, and child. Our entire system is founded on an appreciation of the special genius of each individual, and of his special right to make his own decisions and lead his own life.

We are a fairminded people. We're taught not to take what belongs to others. Many of us, as I said, are the children and grandchildren and great-grandchildren of immigrants, and from them we learned something of hard labor. As a nation we toiled up from poverty, and no people on Earth are more worthy to be trusted than those who have worked hard for what they have. None is less inclined to take what is not theirs.

We're idealists. Americans love freedom, and we've fought and died to protect the freedom of others. When the armies of fascism swept Europe four decades ago, the American people fought at great cost to defend the countries under assault.

When the armies of fascism swept Asia, we fought with you to stop them. And some of you listening today remember those days, remember when our General Jimmy Doolittle and his squadron came halfway around the world to help. Some of those pilots landed in China. You remember those brave young men. You hid them and cared for them and bound up their wounds.

When the Second World War was won, the United States voluntarily withdrew from the faraway places in which we had fought. We kept no permanent armies of occupation. We didn't take an inch of territory, nor do we occupy one today. Our record of respect for the freedom and independence of others is clear.

We're a compassionate people. When the war ended we helped rebuild our allies -- and our enemies as well. We did this because we wanted to help the innocent victims of bad governments and bad policies, and because, if they prospered, peace would be more secure.

We're an optimistic people. Like you, we inherited a vast land of endless skies, tall mountains, rich fields, and open prairies. It made us see the possibilities in everything. It made us hopeful. And we devised an economic system that rewarded individual effort, that gave us good reason for hope.

There is one other part of our national character I wish to speak of. Religion and faith are very important to us. We're a nation of many religions. But most Americans derive their religious belief from the Bible of Moses, who delivered a people from slavery; the Bible of Jesus Christ, who told us to love thy neighbor as thyself, to do unto your neighbor as you would have him do unto you.

The silence between our governments has ended. In the past 12 years, our people have become reacquainted, and now our relationship is maturing. And we're at the point where we can build the basis for a lasting friendship.

Now, you know, as I do, that there's much that naturally divides us: time and space, different languages and values, different cultures and histories, and political systems that are fundamentally different. It would be foolish not to acknowledge these differences. There's no point in hiding the truth for the sake of a friendship, for a friendship based on fiction will not long withstand the rigors of this world.

But let us, for a moment, put aside the words that name our differences and think what we have in common. We are two great and huge nations on opposite sides of the globe. We are both countries of great vitality and strength. You are the most populous country on Earth; we are the most technologically developed. Each of us holds a special weight in our respective sides of the world.

Already there are some political concerns that align us, and there are some important questions on which we both agree. Both the United States and China oppose the brutal and illegal occupation of Kampuchea. Both the United States and China have stood together in condemning the evil and unlawful invasion of Afghanistan. Both the United States and China now share a stake in preserving peace on the Korean Peninsula, and we share a stake in preserving peace in this area of the world.

Neither of us is an expansionist power. We do not desire your land, nor you ours. We do not challenge your borders. We do not provoke your anxieties. In fact, both the United States and China are forced to arm themselves against those who do.

The United States is now undertaking a major strengthening of our defenses. It's an expensive effort, but we make it to protect the peace, knowing that a strong America is a safeguard for the independece and peace of others.

Over the past 12 years, American and Chinese leaders have met frequently to discuss a host of issues. Often we have found agreement, but even when we have not, we've gained insight into each other, and we've learned to appreciate the other's perspectives on the world.

This process will continue, and it will flourish if we remember certain things. We must neither ignore our problems nor overstate them. We must never exaggerate our difficulties or send alarms for small reasons. We must remember that it is a delicate thing to oppose the wishes of a friend, and when we're forced to do so, we must be understanding with each other.

I hope that when history looks back upon this new chapter in our relationship, these will be remembered as days when America and China accepted the challenge to strengthen the ties that bind us, to cooperate for greater prosperity among our people, and to strive for a more secure and just peace in the world.

America have a great role to play in both our countries' futures. From your ranks will come the understanding and skill the world will require in decades to come. Today's leaders can pave the way of the future. That is our responsibility. But it is always the younger generation who will make the future. It is you who will decide if a continuing, personal friendship can span the generations and the differences that divide us. In such friendship lies the hope of the world.

I've been happy to speak to you here, to meet you in this city that is so rich in significance for both our countries. Shanghai is a city of scholarship, a city of learning. Shanghai has been a window to the West. It is a city in which my country and yours issued the communique that began our modern friendship. It is the city where the Yangtze meets the East China Sea, which, itself, becomes the Pacific, which touches our shores.

The Yangtze is a swift and turbulent river, one of the great rivers of the world. My young friends, history is a river that may take us as it will. But we have the power to navigate, to choose direction, and make our passage together. The wind is up, the current is swift, and opportunity for a long and fruitful journey awaits us.

Generations hence will honor us for having begun the voyage, for moving on together and escaping the fate of the buried armies of Xi'an, the buried warriors who stood for centuries frozen in time, frozen in an unknowing enmity.

Twelve years ago, as we've been told, in this city, the American and Chinese Governments issued the Shanghai Communique. And this agreement pledged to broaden the understanding between our peoples. We agreed that cooperation in trade, science, and culture would benefit both nations.

Twelve years ago, America and China each turned a new page in their histories. Today, America and China share the commitment to go forward together to write a new chapter of peace and progress for our people.

My trip to China has been as important and as enlightening as any I've taken as President. My discussions with your leaders -- President Li, Premier Zhao, General Secretary Hu, and Chairman Deng -- were productive and far-ranging. I welcome the opportunity to make new friendships and to enhance the personal relationship we have already established. Only through such steps can we deepen the understanding between our two great countries, broaden our political, economic, and cultural relations, and stand firm against expansionist aggression.

China is a fabled land in America. Schoolchildren across our country have read about your ancient history, the Great Wall, and the discovery of the treasures at Xi'an. To see these wonders in person is a moving and impressing experience. To me, it is even more impressive to meet the Chinese people of today. To see and feel your energy, vitality, and hopes for a better tomorrow gives me confidence in China's future.

University. The students I talked to are serious about their learning. They want to know more, not just about my country but about the world that we all inhabit together. They're serious about their responsibility for their country's development and well-being. China is fortunate to have such talented young people to be its leaders for tomorrow.

This afternoon I also met with the workers and managers of the Shanghai Foxboro Company, a joint venture between an American and a Chinese company. There, Americans and Chinese are working side by side to make high technology equipment that will help advance China's industries, just as these new technologies are helping advance America's industries.

I'm greatly encouraged to note that the factory I visited today represents only one of the many forms of economic and technological cooperation between American and Chinese firms here in Shanghai. We're seeing cooperative activities in such diverse fields as advanced technology, glassmaking, civil aircraft parts assembly, athletic shoe production, pharmaceuticals, essential oils, offshore petroleum, and engineering, electrical machinery, and audiovisual products. Soon, with the support of both Shanghai and national authorities, we can expect our cooperation to increase.

My visit to China leaves me confident that U.S.-China relations are good and getting better. Our relationship is firmly grounded on realism, mutual respect, and a shared determination to expand our economies, provide greater opportunities for our people, and resist those who threaten peace.

Tomorrow, we leave to return to the United States. The famous poet Alfred Lord Tennyson wrote, ``I am a part of all that I have met.'' Well, the people and places of China that Nancy and I have met and seen will always remain a part of us. May I thank the leaders and the people of China for your warm hospitality and offer this toast: To the health of Mayor Wang, to the health of the other distinguished guests here this evening, and to enduring friendship between the Chinese and American people. Gan bie [Bottoms up].

While in China, I have been distressed to learn that some individuals back home have questioned whether my views on the Ku Klux Klan have somehow changed since 1980. Nothing could be further from the truth.

The politics of racial hatred and religious bigotry practiced by the Klan and others have no place in this country, and are destructive of the values for which America has always stood. Those of us in public life can only resent the use of our names by those who seek political recognition for the repugnant doctrines of hate they espouse.

Republicans alike must be resolute in disassociating ourselves from any group or individual whose political philosophy consists only of racial or religious intolerance, whose arguments are supported only by intimidation or threats of violence.

We must, and will, continue our unified rejection of such elements of hate in our political life, for while there are many issues which divide us, it is fundamental principles such as this which will always draw us together.

President Nimeiri recent economic policy actions undertaken by the Government of Sudan as part of a comprehensive economic reform program. The President believes that exchange rate adjustments, elimination of subsidies, and limitation on the budget deficit are highly commendable actions, worthy of international donor support. He recognizes that these are difficult steps to take, requiring sacrifice.

Q. Mr. President, you've often given your views of Nicaragua and called it a war machine and said it poses a threat to its neighbors and, ultimately, to our security. But the Sandinistas appear to be firmly in control, and there are a few signs that they're changing. What -- looking back on your policy over the last 4 years -- has it actually accomplished as far as Nicaragua is concerned?

Nicaragua than actually fought in the revolution against Somoza. And it seems to be growing -- the unhappiness of the people. You only have to look at the flood of refugees that are escaping from Nicaragua to realize that the people of that country are not happy with that totalitarian regime.

The President. Well, I know the Contadora is still trying to find an answer of that kind. The contras, themselves, have offered to lay down weapons and go into negotiations in an effort to have what they had fought the revolution for, and that is a democracy. And so, I think, as long as the people of Nicaragua are still striving for the goals of the revolution that they themselves fought, I think that we're obligated to try and lend them a hand.

Q. In this country, even though your popularity remains very high, on the issue of Nicaragua polls show that there are many Americans opposed to your policy there, and the Congress shows very little inclination to give you the $14 million you've asked. Do you have any new proposals or ideas that would change this view in Congress?

The President. Well, nothing that I can talk about here. But let me just say, I know this about what the polls show, and I know what happens up on the Hill. But we've been subjected in this country to a very sophisticated lobbying campaign by a totalitarian government, the Sandinistas.

Soviets and the Cubans have such a disinformation network that is beyond anything that we can match. And, of course, I don't think the people have heard the thing that we're tying to explain of what is going on.

People go down, some people, to Nicaragua and claim they come back now with views that are favorable to that totalitarian government. But why don't they go to some of the neighboring countries and talk to the thousands and thousands of refugees and ask them why they fled Nicaragua?

The President. I don't know. That's something I'd have to face if they do this. We're not alone in helping them. As a matter of fact, in spite of the polls, there is more and more private support for the contras.

The President. Lou, let me just say -- and this, I know, will be kind of frustrating -- I've had a response to my letter, but I never talk about content of communications between myself and other heads of state.

The President. Well, again, as I say, that would be commenting, and that would be opening a door to all kinds of speculation. I wrote, and he answered, and we're in negotiations. And we'll just leave it at that.

Some have made it seem as if I was being an appeaser or something -- not at all. This was a murder, a coldblooded murder; and it reflects on the difference between two societies -- one that has no regard for human life and one, like our own, that thinks it's the most important thing.

Q. Mr. President, on a related subject, the Strategic Defense Initiative, you have said that the world would be a safer place if the superpowers moved to strategic defense from mutual assured destruction. But the Soviets don't agree. Does this mean that the present negotiations at Geneva are really on hold until the Soviets come around to your point of view, or is there some way that we can move now to have these talks deal with the immediate questions of medium-range and long-range missiles?

One group is talking about space and defense weapons; one is talking about strategic weapons; and the third one is talking about the intermediate-range weapons in Europe. And the negotiations are going forward.

The Strategic Defense Initiative is purely research. And Mr. Gromyko himself said there's no way to control that, that it's not covered by any treaty. And the plain truth of the matter is, they've been doing the same kind of research in the same areas and started it before we did.

Now, I do mean that if this research could lead to the kind of a weapon that would make one have to think twice as to whether they could be successful with the use of nuclear weapons, then it would lead to the very thing that both the late Mr. Chernenko and Gromyko have said, and that is that they would like to see the elimination of nuclear weapons; so would we. And if a defensive weapon that could be successful against them helps bring that about by making them too costly to take the chance of putting those costly things in the air only to be shot down, then we'd be further on the way toward the elimination of nuclear weapons. And we'd all be better off.

But, yes, I would think that the logical thing would be to start with the reduction of the numbers of weapons, to get them down to a lower level. My hope has been that once we start on that path, that gradually everyone would see that it makes more sense to keep on going until you've eliminated them.

The President. Oh, I haven't really thought about whether that makes any difference or not. It's just that the world is living under a threat; and other people are going to try, as we know, to get missiles themselves. And some of them are less responsible than others, and they're not all superpowers. And I just think that it's a threat that humankind should not have to live under.

States has warned Iran that military retaliation would take place if any of the Americans who have disappeared in Lebanon were to be put on a show trial or murdered by pro-Iranian factions. Has such a warning been issued to Iran?

The President. Well, as I say, I can't comment on this specific question that you asked, beyond that. But we've been working as closely as we can with allied countries and friends to see if together, between us, we can't do something. And we have done something. I think we've had some measure of success. But in the exchange of information to get a handle on this widening terrorist activity -- we know it's not just one group; there are a number of groups representing different interests. Sometimes they apparently collaborate, and it's a new form of warfare.

The President. Well, we're making headway and have been successful in getting cooperation in trading information -- intelligence information -- getting agreements with other countries with regard to extradition and denying their countries a shelter for terrorists who then cross a border and have been in the past reasonably safe if they leave the country where they've been terrorizing.

Q. Mr. President, on the subject of South Africa, there have been 38 fatalities in civil strikes there in the past few weeks, and the government seems to be engaging in increasing repression, banning assemblies and meetings. Isn't it time to go beyond the policy of constructive engagement and silent diplomacy in our dealings with South Africa?

The President. We think that what we're doing has the best effect and the most effect of anything that we could do. Just walking away would leave us with no ability to influence them. We think some progress has been made. We do know that there is a factionalism there. It isn't just a simple question of two groups -- the government versus a group. Over in this group there is a division and there is a sector that wants violence as the answer and are even violent to the others, not to the government alone. And we think apartheid is the main problem that must be resolved, and we're going to continue doing all that we can to encourage the government in its course.

The President. Except that the violence -- nothing can be solved by violence, and that isn't the answer. But remember that violence is not just alone stemming from a government put-down of demonstrators. You have in the black community there -- you've got rival factions, and the violence is sometimes between them, fighting each other. And we've seen evidence of that, and we've seen murders. And some of the 40 deaths have been created in among the people, without the government participating.

The President.  --  -- no, and it wasn't intended to be. But it is true; I think some people -- and I would have to say that some who did maybe have a political bias -- but they tried to read into it that I was voicing a bias. And I wasn't; I was trying to point out just what I did here. Maybe I should have taken more time.

You know, in a press conference you feel a little pressed for time in your answers, and sometimes maybe you don't make them as full as they should be. But I was trying to point out that from this being simply people opposed to apartheid against a government that is supporting apartheid -- no, it has gone beyond that. There is an element that wants an overthrow of the government by violence and is not just limiting its fighting to the government. It is fighting its own fellow citizens, and even in the same communities.

Q. Mr. President, if we could change a little bit to domestic matters. I wanted to ask you a question about the budget. You said in a Saturday radio speech recently that you would not accept cuts in vital conventional or strategic weapons systems. The Senate Armed Services Committee has voted to cut 175,000 from the Defense payroll and bring down the deficit. Since you don't want to cut weapons systems, would this cut in personnel be acceptable to you?

The President. Yes. And, no, that is the type of thing I haven't had a chance to study -- since I heard that also -- and see what the effect and where they're choosing these people to go. But, as I've said with regard to defense, when you start to economize, you have to look at it from the standpoint not of the number of dollars that you're hoping to save, but what can you do without.

So, again, as I say, if we can find additional ways -- and we have already reduced the original budget considerably -- if we can find additional ways in which there could be some postponements of something or other -- not weapons systems -- there are a number of fairly civilian-type activities that take place in the military, also. If some of those would not, in any way, reduce our defensive capability and yet would provide some savings to help us as we try to get a handle on this budget -- all right, that's one way to look. But I don't see where there could be any compromise on weapons systems that have been chosen, because we believe they're necessary to redress the imbalance between ourselves and the Soviet Union.

I've heard some spokesmen, and some who should know better, in and out of government, some of the shows on television, and sometimes in the newsprint, voicing their opinions that somehow we're on a parity -- they've even used that term -- with the Soviet Union. This is the most ridiculous thing I've ever heard. The Soviet Union virtually outnumbers us in any type of weapon you want to name, has consistently modernized their land-based nuclear missiles, where we're just trying to with the traumatic experience of the 21 these last few days -- which is the first modernization of our land-based missiles in almost the lifetime of the men and women who are handling these weapons. They are about 3 to 1 in megatonnage, nuclear megatonnage, over us.

We've been making progress. We think that we've achieved, I think, a deterrent to the effect that they'd have to think twice about taking us on. But we haven't caught up with them or surpassed them in any sense.

Nakasone's problems in trying to open up markets there. Nevertheless, it appears that the negotiations continue to be very difficult with Japan, particularly on telecommunications most recently. Are you satisfied, after the report from your special envoy, that some sort of agreement can still be reached, or do you think you're going to face an increasingly frustrated Congress on this issue?

The President. Well I'm going to place my confidence in Prime Minister Nakasone -- and confidence that he wants to arrive at a solution to these trade problems as much as we do. And, of course, just as I do, he's got some political problems of his own. But our representatives came back, and they are reassured that there is no lack of intent on his part. And they're assured that he is going to continue doing his utmost to bring about some changes, evening up this trade imbalance. And, so, we just have to wait and see what he can accomplish. We have made some progress so far and some time ago with regard to citrus fruits, beef, things of that kind. And the negotiations aren't over by any means.

Q. Mr. President, for a long time you've been theoretically strongly committed to the idea of free trade. Will you make an active effort to try and oppose the protectionist legislation that now appears to be building in the Congress?

The President. Yes, I will, because protectionism, if you go back over the years -- all of you have only read about it -- but the Great Depression, I think the Great Depression was extended and carried on and worsened because of a tariff situation on our part, called Smoot-Hawley, that reacted unfavorably against us. It was supposed to be protectionist.

But protectionism is a two-way street. And it may be that here is an industry that is suffering from, let's say, some unfair competition. What we're trying to cure is unfair competition, to see that the markets are free to each other, both ways; that we're not competing with subsidized products, government subsidized and so forth. And all of these things we're doing our best to change.

But in normal competition and international trade, to set down here a restriction that is based on some import in our country from another, they, then, may retaliate and affect another industry of ours. So, to help one industry by protectionism when you can't help all the others that are our exporters -- and what's going to happen to them at the other end?

The President. Well, Lou, here again is one that maybe -- well, no maybe about it -- I guess I should have elaborated more in my answer. I have made it very plain and spoken publicly on a number of occasions, and will continue to say, we should never forget the Holocaust. We should never forget it in the sense that this must never happen again, to any people, for whatever reason in the world.

What I meant -- and this time, to be a guest in that country at this particular time, when it is the coincident date with the end of the war, and recognizing that most of the population there -- I grant you, there are some people there my age who remember the war and were participants in it on that side -- but the bulk of the population, you might say everybody below 50 or 55, were either small children or not born yet.

And there's no question about their great feeling of guilt -- even though they were not there to participate in it -- of what their nation did. And then to take advantage of that visit, on that occasion, to go there -- I just think is contrary to what I believe. We should all start recognizing the day of the end of the war as and make it more of a celebration of the fact that on that day, 40-odd years ago, began the friendship that we now know -- 40 years of peace between us. And at the same time, you can say: And let us keep it this way and never go back to that other way.

And it just seemed to me that it would be just out of line to emphasize that when I was there, as a visitor in their country. I am supportive of the Holocaust Museum; I've done everything I can to be supportive of that. And I will say anytime that anyone wants me say it, as publicly as I can, that, no, we must never forget that chapter in this history of humankind and our determination that it must never happen again.

Q. Mr. President, on tax reform, Secretary Baker is at work, as you know, trying to come up with a revised proposal. And you have frequently talked about your desire to lower individual tax rates, yet the first Treasury plan envisioned a higher corporate tax burden. Are you willing to accept higher burdens on corporations as a tradeoff for lower burdens on individuals?

The President. Well, no, the corporate tax was going to be cut even lower than the top personal rate in their plan. What we're talking about is generally more money from the corporate sector, but by way of broadening the base -- that the rates would be lower for everyone, but there would be an end to some loopholes that probably were never intended to allow large profit-making corporations to escape totally tax free for years on end. And it would simply mean that there'd be more fairness, that you'd know that your neighbor was paying a tax, too, and not getting off scot-free.

So, no, we don't want to penalize some taxpayer into paying a higher share by way of higher rates. We want all the rates to be lower, but, as I say, close those loopholes that have permitted this thing of very profitable businesses not paying any tax.

Q. Yes. Mr. President, you said at St. John's last week -- I know you were in a lighter mood -- but you said to the students that you're not a young man anymore. Now, you're a person who has always celebrated you own vitality, and I guess I wanted to ask you whether you feel yourself aging or growing any older in this job.

And when I became Governor, I had something of the same problems in California that we had here. I came in in the middle of the fiscal year -- you don't quite come in in the middle here; you only come in 4 months into it; you've got 8 months to go on the other fellow's budget -- but middle of the fiscal year and with already a deficit that had been piled up in California. And the difference there -- and I wish I had it here -- the difference there was that -- but in the 6 months remaining to me in that, when I took office, of the budget -- that first budget -- I had to balance the budget, which was one of the reasons why, in contrast to everything I'd said in campaigning, I had to go for a tax increase, because when July 1st came, that budget had to be balanced. But I promised the people that as soon as we could, we'd give it back, and we did. You know that.

Q. Well, Mr. President, speaking of the balanced budget, you apparently or reportedly got very upset at a Congressman who said that he asked you if you want a balanced budget, why don't you submit one. Well, I'd like to ask you, what was your response to that question?

The President. What? Well, there's a member of a party that for 50 years, with only a couple of years' exception, 2 or 4 years' exception, has been responsible for the government spending -- the Democratic Congresses of the past 50 years -- and we've had deficit spending for 50 years and a trillion dollars piled up in national debt before we got here. That for someone now to suggest -- when they themselves have refused to give me the cuts I asked for -- to suggest that I should have asked for so many more cuts, that we had a balanced budget all at once -- no; it is hypocritical. He knows and everyone knows there's no way that you could pull the rug out from so many people by trying to balance this budget in one term, in one year. The people have become accustomed for a half a century to many of the things that government is doing. So, you've got to warn them that down the road here it's not going to be doing some of these things. And you start us on a downward path of reducing the deficits to where you can point to a time reasonably certain and say, ``Here is where we can reach the balanced budget.'' And this is our goal.

The President. Mr. Prime Minister, it's been a great pleasure to welcome you to the White House and to our Nation's Capital. I'm delighted that we've had this opportunity to discuss a wide variety of issues of mutual importance to our two countries.

Prime Minister Ozal's official visit, the first in more than a decade by a Turkish leader, has been an important part of a long-overdue revitalization in U.S.-Turkish relations. Our two governments can be justly proud that by working together we have made great strides in improving bilateral understanding and cooperation. The Prime Minister has brought me up to date on major changes that have recently occurred in Turkey and on his plans for Turkey's future.

Mr. Prime Minister, you and President Evren have good reason to be proud of your success in rebuilding democratic institutions and rekindling economic growth. You have brought a difficult international debt problem under control and opened your country to expanded trade and foreign investment. Turkey's economic reform program reflects your courage and vision and is testimony to the determination of the Turkish people. I understand and appreciate the sacrifices that your countrymen have made in this difficult but necessary undertaking.

With regard to NATO, Prime Minister Ozal and I reaffirmed our firm commitment to increase our cooperation within the alliance. The strength and cohesiveness of NATO have assured the security of the Western democracies for more than three decades. But our past success does not mean we can become complacent. The forces opposing NATO continue to modernize, and continuing dangers face us in southwest Asia and the eastern Mediterranean. We agree that our multilateral security ties and bilateral military cooperation are more important than ever.

Americans have known Turkey best as a NATO ally. Well, Mr. Prime Minister, thanks to your leadership and the forward-looking policies you're pursuing, we're now getting to know your country better as a trading partner and for growing opportunities in finance and investment.

A new U.S.-Turkish trade organization is being established, and new treaties and agreements in the economic field are being concluded. The United States welcomes these important and progressive developments. Let me also assure you that the United States remains committed to high levels of security assistance for Turkey to speed the modernization of your armed forces and to support your economic reform program. And, of course, this assistance serves the interests of both our countries. I reiterated to the Prime Minister that I will continue to urge the Congress to fund my full security assistance request for Turkey in fiscal year 1986.

Cyprus problem, and I expressed satisfaction with the progress made in the U.N.-sponsored proximity talks last fall and with the Turkish Government's positive role in promoting that progress. Resolution of the Cyprus problem remains a high priority for our administration.

Secretary-General's Cyprus initiative. Turkey is a land bridge between Europe and Asia and provides us with a special view. The Ottoman Empire managed East-West problems long before America was even known to Europe.

Today, as before, Turkey serves as a particularly important cultural and diplomatic bridge between East and West. I thank you, Mr. Prime Minister, for briefing me on Turkish policies and diplomacy in areas of great importance to both of us. You're a good friend and important ally, and I thank you for all that you're doing to strengthen our cooperation. Together, we're serving the cause of peace and freedom.

Mr. Prime Minister, in your visit to America and as you reach out to the American people to acquaint them better with Turkish achievements and hopes, please be assured that we'll do all we can to make our bilateral relations even closer.

I have renewed to President Reagan the heartfelt congratulations of my government for his impressive victory at the elections. I have also expressed my congratulations for his success in expanding the American economy, which I hope will be to the benefit of all of us.

I have expressed to the President my assessment of the issues which Turkey follows with utmost attention. We live in a turbulent world, and as far as Turkey is concerned, our region is at the present full of dangers. Again, on this occasion, I have realized how deep and strong are the bonds of friendship, alliance, and cooperation between Turkey and the United States.

Turkey's new economic policies, I believe, are well understood by the Reagan administration. Our exchange of views confirmed the existence of broad and encouraging convergence. Both administrations, I believe, are strongly committed to dialog as the best means to solve international problems. The basic cause of both of us remains peace and stability in the world.

We are also firmly convinced that a substantial balanced and verifiable reduction of armaments is an essential condition for a safer world. I have explained to the President our views as far as the situation in our region is concerned. I must say that we view the situation as quite dangerous and unstable.

I wish to thank President Reagan for this fruitful exchange of views. For me it was a confirmation of how much the sharing of values and aspirations in a context of longstanding friendship makes it easier to reach mutual understanding and agreements.

The President. We are delighted to have so many distinguished guests here today as we pay tribute on his birthday to one of America's most distinguished public servants. John McCloy has had a long life -- 90 years -- and most of it marked by unparalleled service to his country and humanity.

Let me testify personally to the wisdom of John's counsel. I'm proud to say he was a member of our 1980 transition team, and I can recall the insight and advice that he gave me on American-German relations at the time -- insight and advice that is just as timely today as they were then.

American peoples. But let me say now what no one can question: It was the heroic work of men like John McCloy during the difficult postwar period that did much to preserve world freedom and unite our two nations in friendship.

And on this note, President von Weizsacker, let me say how pleased we are to have you here today to celebrate this occasion. Your presence is an honor for the American people, but I think it's also a sign of the deep affection and high esteem the German people have for John McCloy.

We're also honored to have with us today the mayor of Berlin, Eberhard Diepgen. He has a special presentation to make on behalf of the people of his city -- a people who gratefully remember John McCloy's extraordinary work in the aftermath of the Berlin blockade and airlift.

It would take too long to recite for you the rest of John McCloy's many important contributions to our country and to the cause of peace and freedom. From wartime intrigue and espionage to European reconstruction after World War II, to disarmament negotiations spanning more than 30 years, John McCloy's high intellect and selfish heart -- selfless heart; I shouldn't have mispronounced that word above all -- John McCloy's selfless heart has made a difference, an enduring difference, in the lives of millions.

So, as your President, John, I salute you today not only for myself and all the Presidents you've served so well but for all your countrymen and the millions of people around the world whose lives you helped make safer because of your devotion to duty and to the cause of humanity. And again, a very happy birthday from all of us.

John McCloy. It was his human decency in helping the beaten enemy to recover. It was his trust in freedom, his confidence in the deep roots of freedom among the Germans, that largely contributed to reestablish the free society in my country and to enable us to join the free nations in Europe and in the Atlantic community.

The official visit which you, Mr. President, are going to pay to my country soon will reinforce the deep ties that bind us together. We share our values of freedom; we share the responsibility for peace; we share our future destiny.

So, it remains our common task to transmit this spirit to a younger generation. It is in this light that you, Mr. President, will be our most welcome guest a month from now. And it is in this mind that I have come to bring the warmest wishes of the German people and to pay tribute to John McCloy, a great statesman, a great American, and a great friend.

Mayor Diepgen. Mr. President, the Bundestag President, the Berlin Senate, and the Berlin House of Representatives are today conferring upon you, Mr. McCloy, the dignity of an honorary citizen. This is the highest distinction that free Berlin can award.

That the free part of Berlin could become birthplace and symbol of membership of the free part of our country in the Western community -- the community of ideas -- is something which in a large extent we owe to you.

But in this hour, we do not look only back into the past with gratitude. In the spirit of the honorary citizen, in the spirit of the city of Berlin, we want to cement the German-American partnership and develop it further. Together, we must, and I'm sure we can, find the answers to the great questions of our time -- war, hunger, unemployment, and the destruction of nature.

I'm a little sensitive about my age, Mr. President. But I think I ought to record the fact that I have served in two World Wars, and I served in World War I with a man who fought the Indians on the Plains. How short the span of American history really is. But that connotes -- that particular fact -- that, although I'm a little long in the tooth, the country has really got a very young life, and its great destinies are ahead of it.

Now, as for this very, very fine honor you've done me, Mr. Burgermeister -- you know, in Berlin, every time we went up there, it was very pleasant. As I got off the train or the plane -- whatever it was in that period of the blockade -- but as soon as I got off the plane, it was: ``Willkommen, Herr McCloy.'' We could make a lot of mistakes down in the zone, but we couldn't make any mistakes up in Berlin. They were glad to see ya. And it was really a very comforting thing -- the welcome that you got up there. And I stop and think frequently how much we owe to the Berliner, the Berliner with his geist [spirit] and his mut [courage] and his civil courage guess is the word. Did I pronounce that right?

What the -- not only Western city or Germany but the entire free world owes to the vigor and the strength and the spirit, the mut and, as I say, the civil courage of the Berliner. And we will continue for a long time to be grateful for the inspiration which he gave us because of his display of those features.

Secretary of State and the Vice President and this entire turnout. I see a great many people with whom I've had a good many vicissitudes. And let me just say how deeply appreciative I am of this tribute to me and how grateful I am for it.

The President. I know the problem, of course, that brings us together -- missing and exploited children. And it's a major issue, I believe, in America today and a problem that can threaten every American family, rich or poor. And the possibility of a kidnaping or abuse to a child is one of the major fears that I think parents now face. So, each of you are here today because you're integrally involved in the missing and exploited children issue.

Just last May we launched the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children to help address part of this issue. I know its success. And I'm pleased to see so many of the Board members, along with the Directors, here today. They have set up, among other things, a hotline where people can call in instantly. And, as I understand it, they've been getting about 225 calls a day.

So, I'm asking you today to form a new partnership for child safety. And this partnership can involve law enforcement organizations, school systems, community service groups, in coordination with the Attorney General and his offices at the Department of Justice. And I'd like to ask if you could report back to me in 3 weeks' time with your recommendations of how such a partnership should be structured. And I'll let you keep track of the calendar.

And it's my hope that this partnership can be launched so that every child in the country will have the opportunity to be safe and secure, and you're the people who will make it work. And you have my heartfelt thanks for what you're doing and what you continue to do.

And, Rollie, you deserve a great deal of credit for that preparation and also for everything you've done to turn a group of tremendous individual players into a team that will go down in the history books.

I know that Monday night's victory was also a bittersweet one for you. A person whose life was so much a part of the history of Villanova basketball passed away that morning. Alex Severance left a long legacy with 60 years at the university.

And there's someone else here who deserves recognition: Jake Niven. And, Jake, I know how much you mean to this team and to all of the students at Villanova. This championship is a tribute to you and to Alex Severance. You've made your mark, and your personal courage has inspired greatness.

But all of you did an extraordinary job. With the eyes of the Nation on you, you didn't buckle under the pressure; your hands stayed steady. One of the longest moments in sport must be during a jump shot, in that fraction of a second when you're suspended in the air, and the crowd is yelling, and you're looking for a small white cylinder that seems to be a mile away, and you have to throw the ball into that tiny net before Pat Ewing comes out of nowhere to block it.

The game was a testimonial to the enormous talent on both sides. I think you'll all agree with me that Georgetown's team did a great job and that their sportsmanship was in the highest tradition of the game. As one of their team members said, ``We went out with style.'' Well, they did just that.

Seriously, this is your day. You know the people of Philadelphia are proud of you, your families are proud of you. And today I just want you to know that all of your countrymen join your family and friends in applauding your achievements.

This is certainly a tremendous opportunity for all of us, our families, the players, Jake Niven, whom you brought out, and everybody else associated with the Villanova family. Again, I want to sincerely thank you. This just culminates the total dedication and all the hard work that these young men have done.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Edward A. Curran to be Chairman of the National Endowment for the Humanities, National Foundation on the Arts and the Humanities, for a term of 4 years. He would succeed William J. Bennett.

Previously he was press secretary to Congressman Mark Siljander and before that was campaign manager and press secretary to the Siljander for Congress Committee. In 1978 - 1981 he was assistant press secretary to the Michigan House Republican Caucus.

President Reagan. President Betancur, it's a pleasure to have you visit us here in Washington. I, in particular, am pleased to have had this opportunity to reciprocate the hospitality that you extended to me during my visit to Bogota in 1982.

Your present visit, Mr. President, gives us the opportunity to affirm, once again, the solid ties of friendship and good will between our two countries. As the leaders of free people, we share a commitment to the democratic ideals, which are at the heart of our societies.

Today we have renewed our mutual commitment to promoting democracy in this hemisphere, pursuing peace in Central America, and eliminating the scourge of narcotics trafficking from our societies. We have also explored areas of cooperation which can enhance the economic well-being of our peoples.

Colombia and El Salvador, for example, have invited talks with their opponents and encouraged them to be part of a truly democratic process. Those who seek democracy in Nicaragua have asked the Sandinistas to engage in talks as a step toward peace and democracy in Nicaragua. We hope that the Sandinistas will take that step toward reconciliation.

Later today I will be talking to the American people in greater detail about this subject. I am glad that President Betancur and I were able to discuss how the United States can best help the Contadora countries achieve all of the agreed-upon objectives for Central America, including national reconciliation in Nicaragua.

We wish you success and hope that those who have fought with weapons learn to work within the democratic process. It is appropriate that we praise your efforts to foster peace and brotherhood during this holy week.

The production of illicit narcotics and the peddling of these drugs corrupt our societies, our children, and, with them, our future. The struggle against this unmitigated evil unites all good and decent people. We look forward to Mrs. Betancur's return here later this month to join Nancy and other First Ladies in discussing the problem, especially as it affects our young people.

In the United States, the fight against drug use has a top priority. We're trying to help those on drugs get off, to prevent those not involved from starting. And we're doing our best to smash the trade in illegal drugs. This matter is of vital concern to us both, and in finding solutions to the problem, Colombia and the United States are full partners, as we affirm today in our joint statement on narcotics.

The illegal drug trade, as we both agree, is a cancer. Commercial trade, on the other hand, serves the interests of both our peoples. While Americans enjoy Colombian products such as coffee, cut flowers, and tropical fruits, Colombians benefit from U.S. technology and goods such as heavy machinery, chemicals, and wheat.

At a time when both our governments grapple with trade deficits in a world of many trading partners, let us build on our history of cooperation to develop trade policies which strengthen our economies, give incentive to enterprise, and encourage exchange between our peoples.

President Betancur. Mr. President, members of the Cabinet, my visit to the United States, which was planned some months ago at the invitation of President Reagan, comes to an end today in the cordial climate of the White House.

Secretary Shultz, and with other members of this administration on several issues -- some bilateral, others multilateral -- which are of interest to the people of the Americas and, in particular, to our two nations.

Today, at your invitation, we have met in Washington to examine a number of multilateral and bilateral issues: among the first, the Central American crisis, the process of greater democracy in Latin America, the problems stemming from the foreign debt, the strengthening of the international coffee agreement and of multilateral lending institutions, and the international fight against the drug traffic; among the latter, the macroeconomic adjustment program, with self-discipline and economic growth, and the trade relations between Colombia and the United States.

I have also taken advantage of this visit to exchange ideas with distinguished Congressmen, with senior officials from the international financial institutions, with outstanding personalities from the academic world, and important leaders from the U.S. private sector.

Regarding the Central American issue, I was able to bring up my concern with the problems that affect that region. I insisted on the urgency of reactivating the negotiating process of Contadora and of exhausting all efforts of conviction to implement the principles, commitments, and recommendations which are part of the document of objectives of the act of Contadora.

During a recent visit to the Central American region's countries, I was able to see for myself the renewed desire on their part to provide new possibilities for a dialog and, for the countries which are a part of the Contadora group, their determination to offer whatever possibilities there may be in this same respect.

I am pleased to state that in my talks today with President Reagan I have encountered the same constructive spirit and his decision to provide propitious conditions to carry out reconciliation dialogs that will ultimately lead to the full participation of the political and social forces in the democratic process of the countries affected by violence and civil strife.

On the subject of narcotics, we are carrying out a frontal assault in my country in this respect. I refer you to the communique that President Reagan and I have issued, which clearly and categorically expresses the will of both countries to work together to rescue humanity from this scourge.

During the conversations with the authorities of the United States, I underscored the existing link that there is between the external debt and democracy and requested that a new round of negotiations, multilateral negotiations, be held to ease exports from developing countries. I have noted with interest that the United States looks upon the coming economic summit to be held at Bonn as a good occasion to examine this important subject.

In connection to Colombia's autonomous program of macroeconomic adjustment, I wish to place on record the positive support that we have received from the Inter-American Development Bank, from the World Bank, from the International Monetary Fund, as well as from the Government of the United States through its Federal Reserve, and from the Treasury Department. I have personally seen tangible proof of this support while on this visit.

America to redefine the parameters of their mutual relations. We need what I would call a new treatment -- a new understanding, a common doctrine -- an alliance for peace, with the determination to go from mere tolerance, that has marked the relations between Latin America and the United States, to the formulation of a new scheme of open, constructive, and fruitful cooperation.

This new treatment, this alliance for peace, will not only improve economic relations in the hemisphere, but it will also mean the adoption of political objectives to defend democracy, which is the great spiritual value of American civilization. This consensus would allow us to strengthen the hemisphere's political institutions, would enhance the likelihood of peace and the possibilities of an enduring economic growth.

Finally, Mr. President and members of the Cabinet, it is not altogether possible in these brief remarks to bring out the significance that I assign to this historic visit to the United States, which has had a very tight schedule, as you know. I have made known to the authorities, candidly and without subterfuges, the totality of my ideas on issues which are of interest to us both.

I have been heard with attention and respect as befits the tradition of freedom and democracy of this great nation. I am pleased to state that it has been so and that I hope that my views and remarks will create a greater climate of understanding between the United States and Latin America -- this vast, beautiful, and dynamic subcontinent that cherishes freedom and understands that to maintain and strengthen it, we need justice, and we need development.

Hemisphere at large, and mankind generally. We reviewed the measures our two nations are taking and will take, separately and together, to combat the production, trafficking, demand and use of illicit narcotics.

Our nations recognize the terrible effect drug abuse has on the health and well-being of individual users, as well as more generally on the economies and public morality of both societies. It is especially deplorable when the drug poisons are found among the young and even small children.

Drug trafficking is a criminal activity that has no frontiers and can only be controlled by a combined effort of all countries involved. We have shared our concern that the financial power resulting from the enormous profits of illicit narcotics trade poses a terrible threat to democracy in the Americas. Our mutual dedication to the anti-narcotics struggle is an integral part of the close relations that exist between our two nations. We both see a vital need to enlist the cooperation of other governments in this intensified effort.

We understand that the gravity of the problem is a consequence of both illegal production and distribution of drugs as well as growing demand. We also understand these factors are closely related and all efforts to suppress one without at the same time taking equally vigorous actions against the other will be fruitless. For these reasons, each government is prepared to assume its responsibilities, eliminating both illegal production and drug abuse.

Colombia has made in destroying crops and laboratories, seizing shipments and bringing suspected drug traffickers to justice, including the extradition of traffickers accused of narcotics crimes in the United States. For the United States' part, enforcement activities are increasing and prevention and education programs are having positive results in reducing drug abuse.

We are in entire agreement on the need to continue these intensified efforts and to ensure the closest possible collaboration in the war against narcotics. Both nations reaffirm respect for our mutual legal obligations to extradite traffickers under our existing treaty, and will remain in close contact to periodically examine and improve the framework of our legal and law enforcement cooperation as necessary to adapt to changing conditions as we learn from our experiences.

Reagan and Mrs. Betancur, who met earlier today at the White House, look forward to their meeting at the First Ladies' Conference on Drug Abuse, which will be held in Washington on April 24th. We are confident those meetings, in which they will play leading roles, will have a lasting impact.

Colombia renews the commitment to fight against drug trafficking at all levels in order to destroy the crops, the laboratories where drugs are processed, to interrupt the transportation to the U.S. market and to see that those responsible for the trafficking are severely punished. The United States commits itself to increasing its efforts to diminish use and demand of drugs, destroy crops and to strengthen its support for the war against narcotics.

Minister, Rodrigo Lara Bonilla, and law enforcement officers from both countries. We cannot allow such sacrifices to have been in vain. We pledge to each other to revitalize and intensify our efforts to destroy the trafficking network. Our decision is irreversible, our dedication total.

The President. Good afternoon, and for those of the Christian and Jewish faiths, this is the eve of the most holy season, and it's a season for peace and a season for all people of good will to strive together for peace.

I want to announce today a proposal for peace in Central America that can enable liberty and democracy to prevail in this troubled region and that can protect the security of our own borders, economy, and people.

On March 1st in San Jose, Costa Rica, the leaders of the Nicaraguan democratic resistance met with a broad coalition of other exiled Nicaraguan democrats. They agreed upon and signed an historic proposal to restore peace and democracy in their country. The members of the democractic resistance offered a cease-fire in return for an agreement by the Nicaraguan regime to begin a dialog, mediated by the Bishops Conference of the Roman Catholic Church, with the goal of restoring democracy through honest elections. To date the Nicaraguan regime has refused this offer.

The Central American countries, including Nicaragua, have agreed that internal reconciliation is indispensable to regional peace. But we know that, unlike President Duarte of El Salvador, who seeks a dialog with his opponents, the Communists in Nicaragua have turned, at least up until now, a cold shoulder to appeals for national reconciliation from the Pope and the Nicaraguan bishops. And we know that without incentives, none of this will change.

For these reasons, great numbers of Nicaraguans are demanding change and taking up arms to fight for the stolen promise of freedom and democracy. Over 15,000 farmers, small merchants, whites, blacks, and Miskito Indians have united to struggle for a true democracy.

We supported democracy in Nicaragua before, and we support democracy today. We supported national reconciliation before, and we support it today. We believe that democracy deserves as much support in Nicaragua as it has received in El Salvador. And we're proud of the help that we've given to El Salvador.

You may recall that in 1981 we were told that the Communist guerrillas were mounting a final offensive, the government had no chance, and our approach would lead to greater American involvement. Well, our critics were wrong; democracy and freedom are winning in El Salvador.

The formula that worked in El Salvador -- support for democracy, self-defense, economic development, and dialog -- will work for the entire region. And we couldn't have accomplished this without bipartisan support in Congress, backed up by the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America, headed by Henry Kissinger. And that's why, after months of consulting with congressional leaders and listening carefully to their concerns, I am making the following proposal: I'm calling upon both sides to lay down their arms and accept the offer of church-mediated talks on internationally supervised elections and an end to the repression now in place against the church, the press, and individual rights.

To the Congress, I ask for immediate release of the $14 million already appropriated. While the cease-fire offer is on the table, I pledge these funds will not be used for arms or munitions. These funds will be use for food, clothing, and medicine and other support for survival. The democratic opposition cannot be a partner in negotiations without these basic necessities.

If the Sandinistas accept this peace offer, I will keep my funding restrictions in effect. But peace negotiations must not become a cover for deception and delay. If there is no agreement after 60 days of negotiations, I will lift these restrictions, unless both sides ask me not to.

States continues to seek: One, Nicaragua's implementation of its commitment to democracy made to the Organization of American States; two, an end to Nicaragua's aggression against its neighbors; three, a removal of the thousands of Soviet bloc, Cuban, PLO, Libyan, and other military and security personnel; and four, a return of the Nicaraguan military to a level of parity with their neighbors.

Democracy can succeed in Central America. But Congress must release the funds that can create incentives for dialog and peace. If we provide too little help, our choice will be a Communist Central America with Communist subversion spreading southward and northward. We face the risk that a hundred million people, from Panama to our open southern border, could come under the control of pro-Soviet regimes and threaten the United States with violence, economic chaos, and a human tidal wave of refugees.

Central America is not condemned to that dark future of endless violence. If the United States meets its obligations to help those now striving for democracy, they can create a bright future in which peace for all Americans will be secure.

Q. Mr. President, [House Speaker] Tip O'Neill says that this is a dirty trick, that you're trying to hoodwink the American public into thinking that it is humanitarian aid, but it really is a secret plan to proceed militarily.

The President. Well, because Congress, in all of their efforts to hinder our continued aid to the contras and to democracy down there, have emphasized the need for a peaceful and political solution and a solution of the kind we've talked about here that would result from discussion between the parties.

Q. Mr. President, you've made it plain that the $14 million, you think, is essential. But if Congress should turn you down, will you look for some other avenue to help the contras, some other way to continue your desire to see a restructuring of the Nicaraguan Government?

The President. It isn't a case of overthrowing, it is a case of returning to the goals of the revolution that both the contras and the Sandinistas fought for. And as far as our making war or anything, that has never been our intention. And we've repeated that over and over again.

The President. I said after 60 days, if no agreement can be reached and unless both sides ask us to continue the same process, then, I would think that we could use that $14 million to help the contras in any way.

The President. We agree with him, and he agrees with us. Well, we both are together on the fact that not only must we continue the program that he has started with regard to intercepting and preventing the shipment of drugs but also here where the largest market is, that we continue our efforts to take the customers away from the drugs, which must complement the efforts to take the drugs away from the customers.

The President. No. We think that this is part of the agreement that must be reached. We said these are the points that were made also by the contras, that they must stop being a threat to their neighbors, get the foreign forces out, and return to the democratic goals which they, themselves, told the Organization of American States was what they were fighting the revolution for.

The President. Because I think there are other things that are involved here. I don't think that they want to be alone completely in the Americas with all of their neighbors on the other side. And we believe that we'll have the support of the Contadoras on this. And we think, as I say, they are having great problems as these hostilities go on.

The President. Well, I have a feeling that they are not well-fixed enough to provide any of these things for themselves. And this, again, is one of the things that we have offered, that this will be used for that purpose for as long as they're negotiating to try and have a peaceful settlement.

Q. But they are now somehow managing to survive; I mean, they're getting food and that sort of thing. So, If you give the money for food, can they not then use the money they're now using for food and buy weapons?

The President. If you'll look back through history, you'll find out that we traditionally have used among our neighbors for jungle training exercises of this kind. And they're not -- as some loud voices up on the Hill have said -- they're not down there as a threat to anyone. They're down there as we're training new enlistees in our Army, to have a well-trained military that can fight any place that might be required. And this has been done in Honduras repeatedly before. And that's all it is.

Weather satellites have proven exceptionally valuable in detecting, monitoring, and giving early warning of hurricanes, severe storms, flash floods, and other life-threatening natural hazards, on a local, national, and international basis.

The international weather satellite search-and-rescue program has saved over three hundred lives since 1982. The achievements of the scientific and aerospace communities in developing weather satellites have contributed significantly to the United States' leadership in satellite technology, international cooperation in space, and an integrated global weather forecasting system.

Weather satellites have evolved into environmental satellites that also monitor snow and ice cover, forest damage, vegetation, forest fires, volcanic eruptions, sea surface temperatures, and ocean currents.

Environmental satellite data are used for research and for commercial purposes in meteorology, hydrology, agriculture, oceanography, forestry, and fisheries. The United States' prestige is enhanced by the direct dissemination of environmental satellite data to more than one hundred and twenty countries.

The National Aeronautics and Space Administration has been the world leader in the development of experimental and prototypical weather and environmental satellites. The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of the Department of Commerce has demonstrated outstanding leadership in the management of operational weather and environmental satellite systems and programs.

There is no more important test of a society than how it treats its children. Children are not only a joy to the parents who raise them; they also represent a society's future. It is imperative for American society to protect its children and nurture them.

More and more Americans are turning once again to strong and loving families as the best way to provide a nurturing environment for children. This is as it should be, but there are still many indications that we must do more to protect our children and show that we love each and every one of them. One of the most disturbing of these indications is the fact that more than 1.5 million children will be reported to local child protective agencies this year as suspected victims of child abuse or neglect. As a direct result of their maltreatment, many of these children will suffer diminished opportunity to develop physically, intellectually, emotionally, and socially, or to become fully contributing citizens.

Their loss is our Nation's loss. In the past decade, our knowledge of how to prevent and treat child abuse has grown substantially. The most important thing we have learned is that the active involvement of neighbors and friends -- indeed of everyone in a community -- is the key to success. Community child protection agencies cannot do the job alone but must rely on neighbors, friends, teachers, relatives, doctors, and volunteers to provide critical support, information, and guidance to families in which child maltreatment may occur.

Problems such as child pornography, violence on television, teenage suicide, missing children, and child abuse are all related to the strength or weakness of our society's values. We should resolve to strengthen the fundamental values of family and community on which our Nation was founded and which can alone provide it with a good future for all our children.

World Health Day, which marks the founding of the World Health Organization, serves to remind us that good health is a priceless commodity, which all the world's people should have the opportunity to enjoy throughout their life span.

Today's youth represent a tremendous potential for society. In all countries, rich and poor, this group is the healthiest age group of all and is far better educated than preceding generations. They have survived the infectious diseases of childhood, such as measles, whooping cough, and polio.

But they are also the most vulnerable to lifestyle practices that threaten later adulthood -- poor food habits, cigarette smoking, abuse of alcohol and drugs, and inadequate exercise. It is our responsibility as parents and teachers to educate our youth on the importance of avoiding harmful drugs, practicing good safety measures, maintaining a proper diet, and getting regular exercise.

In order to achieve its highest goals, education must be more than just a training in facts and figures, or even in basic skills, as important as they are. It must also include instruction in the deepest ethical values of our civilization.

The word ``Lubavitch'' comes from the name of a Russian city and means city of love. That is very appropriate because, of all the ethical values which inform our civilization, none is more important than love -- love of wisdom, love of our fellowman, and love of our Creator.

These are the values which Rabbi Menachem Mendel Schneerson exemplifies. And they are the values, with their roots in the Seven Noahide Laws, which have guided the Lubavitch movement throughout its history. They are the essence of education at its best, and we should be certain that we pass on this precious heritage to all young Americans.

Q. And when Mrs. Thatcher was here, she mentioned in her toast that this year was the bicentenniary, not just of Anglo-American relations, but also the establishment of a venerable institution, which is my newspaper, the Times of London. And in honor of that event, I'd just like to make a small presentation. This is our office -- over a hundred years ago -- I'm afraid it doesn't look like that anymore. It's all glass and steel and high technology. But -- times have progressed since then.

Q. Thank you very much for this opportunity of meeting with you. Could I take this opportunity just to ask you about -- I know you can't say anything about the date or time or agreement of a summit -- but if a summit were to take place with Mr. Gorbachev, would you regard this as a turning point in American and Soviet relations?

The President. I don't know whether you could say that, because there have been summit meetings before. I would look on it as an opportunity to clear the air and express our desire to have a relationship that would eliminate this great threat that seems to hang over the world. If in any way it could help in the negotiations that are going on in Geneva -- and very frankly, I'd like to speak to him to clear up some things, like the kind of tragedy with our officer there in Germany.  [Maj. Arthur D. Nicholson, Jr., USA, who had recently been shot and killed in the German Democratic Republic.]  Those things are so senseless; there's no need for them. But I don't know that you could see it as a turning point. After all, he has been for 4 years a member of the Politburo, 14 years a member of the party council. So, we know that the government really is a collective -- the Politburo has the ultimate authority. So, I can't see that, as some speculated, there would be a great change of direction. It would only come about if that was the desire of that same Politburo.

The President. They could improve if we can show them that it would be to their material advantage as well as someone else's. I think about the Geneva talks that we're in right now. It's the first time in about 50 years and more than 20 arms talks with them between World War II and the present that they sit down faced with the possibility that either we join together in reducing arms or they engage us in an arms race, which they know they can't win.

The President. We believe that our interests and those of Central America would best be served by the conclusion of a workable, comprehensive, and fully verifiable regional agreement based solidly on the 21 objectives of the Contadora process. We continue to support that process strongly through our diplomacy.

We also seek an end to Nicaragua's aggression against its neighbors. We think they should remove the thousands of Soviet bloc, Cuban, PLO, Libyan, and other military and security personnel and return the Nicaraguan military to a level of parity with their neighbors.

Realistically, we recognize that there must be incentives to get the Sandinistas to change their behavior. If incentives are taken away, they will have no reason to compromise, and there will be no hope of a negotiated settlement.

The democratic opposition has proposed a peace initiative to the Communists, which is completely fair. It includes mediation by the Catholic bishops of Nicaragua, who have accepted the proposal. It agrees to recognize the current regime pending a free election. It asks for guarantees of free speech and the political opportunity for the opposition to state its case there. A key feature of the peace plan is a cease-fire by both sides and a lifting of the state of emergency.

This proposal is fully consistent with the 21 objectives of the Contadora process. It has the approval of President Betancur of Colombia, President Duarte of El Salvador, and other neighbors of Nicaragua. Why won't the Sandinistas accept this proposal from their own people?

The President. As much as our military strength or the vigor of our economies, the continuing vitality and solidarity of the Atlantic alliance lies at the heart of the West's ability to protect its freedoms while preserving the peace. The very nature of our democratic and open societies ensures that there will always be diversity of opinion within the alliance. Nonetheless, it is critically important that the United States and its European partners stand united on the basis of our common efforts to protect our mutual security.

Therefore, it is not at all surprising that the Soviets are now seeking, as they have in the past in regard to other issues, to incite and exploit differences within the West as a means of undercutting alliance efforts to strengthen our defense and deterrent forces. Their propaganda tools are familiar ones, involving misrepresentation, threats, and now a call for a moratorium that would freeze the imbalance in Europe.

Though their current propaganda campaign contains little that is new, I can't help but be struck by how disingenuous it is for the Soviet Union -- which possesses the world's only operational ABM system, which has been energetically pursuing an extensive research program in the area of ballistic missile defense, and which has taken actions counter to the letter and spirit of the ABM treaty -- now to express such public criticism of the idea that the United States might also engage in its own research into the feasibility of strategic defense.

SDI. They know that it is a research program designed to provide the technical basis that would allow a future President to decide whether to develop advanced systems to defend against ballistic missiles. They also know that limits on research activity are neither feasible nor verifiable.

The goal of SDI research is to find nonnuclear technologies which, if deployed, would strengthen stability and enhance our mutual security. Our research will be conducted in conformity with all treaties to which the U.S. is a party, including the ABM treaty.

The President. We are prepared to negotiate constructively with the Soviet Union with the goal of radically reducing nuclear arms and, ultimately, eliminating nuclear weapons entirely. If the Soviets approach the negotiations in the same serious fashion, it should be possible to reach agreement in the relatively short term. At the same time, we recognize fully the differences between us and the Soviets. Historically, it has often taken considerable negotiation to work out arms control agreements.

The U.S. will not make unilateral concessions in an effort to come quickly to agreement nor will we be subject to artificial deadlines before which agreement must be reached. We want to negotiate good agreements which enhance the security of the United States and our allies. We are prepared to negotiate as long as necessary to achieve this.

Q. The strong dollar has been causing chaos in European currency markets, forcing governments to raise interest rates. A sharp fall in its value could also be very damaging. Given the interrelationship between the U.S. and other Western economies, why doesn't the U.S. actively intervene with other governments to achieve greater currency stability?

The President. The strength of the U.S. dollar against European currencies over the past 4 years has primarily reflected the strong U.S. economic performance and prospects, particularly relative to the economic performance and prospects elsewhere in the world. The dramatic improvement in U.S. growth, employment, productivity, and profitability, coupled with a lower inflation rate, has stimulated demand for dollars relative to demand for other key currencies. Additionally, foreign confidence in the U.S. economy as a ``safe haven'' has contributed to the demand for dollars.

Experience indicates that government intervention in exchange markets can have only a very limited and temporary impact in the absence of changes in the underlying fundamentals. We remain prepared to intervene, to counter disorderly markets in instances where we believe it would be helpful. But policies that promote a convergence of economic performance, including those designed to increase incentives for stronger noninflationary growth, are the key to achieving greater exchange rate stability.

Q. You have stated that a reduction of the Federal budget deficit is a top priority, but many economists and businessmen on both sides of the Atlantic are skeptical that you will be able to achieve significant cuts. What is your strategy, given the opposition your proposals are already facing in the Congress?

The President. Congress and the administration have a common goal: We want to reduce the budget deficit. The administration and the Senate Republican leadership have reached agreement on a budget proposal for FY 1986 which restrains both civilian and military expenditure -- without endangering our military preparedness -- while cutting some $50 billion from our budget deficit. Our budget proposal would utilize expenditure restraint and expanding revenues from economic growth to yield a declining trend of deficits, both in absolute terms and as a share of GNP, in the coming fiscal years.

In some quarters in Congress there is inclination to spare domestic spending from reductions we have proposed and instead just cut defense expenditures, or raise taxes, or both. The administration is certainly willing to consider proposals from Congress, but I will not agree to defense spending cuts that weaken our national security or to tax increases. Despite our differences with some Members of Congress, I believe that our strong, shared determination to reduce the deficit will prevail; that we will get the cuts in spending our economy requires; and that later in the year, we can secure passage of an historic reform and simplification of our tax code that will strengthen incentives for vigorous and sustained economic growth.

The President. We have ideas as to what subjects might be covered, and we are confident that the other participants have their own ideas as to priority areas for the negotiations. We are anxious to proceed to the preparatory phase of the negotiations in the GATT and to draw up an agenda for the new round, which we believe should be launched formally by early next year. We do not believe it is right to link progress on these negotiations with international monetary questions; issues in each should be addressed on their merits when they arise. For example, the international monetary system was discussed at the Williamsburg summit in 1983. As a result, the Group of Ten undertook a study of ways to improve the operation of the world monetary system, and we look forward with interest to seeing the report, which is to be examined by Finance Ministers this June.

The President. When I made my proposals in September 1982, my goal was to stimulate efforts to achieve a just and durable peace in the Middle East. That goal remains the same today. My initiative outlined the positions we will support when negotiations resume. I believe that direct negotiations between the parties is the best way to achieve settlement. But the challenge at the moment is to get those negotiations underway.

The Hussein-Arafat accord and the ideas put forward by Egyptian President Mubarak and others in the region are positive developments. I have decided to send Assistant Secretary of State Richard Murphy to the area to explore the possibilities raised by these proposals and to see how the peace process can be moved forward.

The President. Our policy has been to help these countries develop their capabilities to defend themselves against regional threats to their security. We will complete a review of our Middle East security policy in the very near future. Meanwhile, we are not initiating the sale of major new systems or augmentations to any country in the Middle East. We will respond to various requests for arms in light of the results of our review.

The President. In a few weeks, it will be the 200th anniversary of the date on which John Adams was received by King George III and diplomatic relations were established between the United Kingdom and the United States. With a few exceptions, the two centuries which followed have been marked by a growing closeness between our two countries. Our nations have been drawn together by common traditions and heritage and a common devotion to the concepts of liberty and human dignity. These bonds have been forged over the centuries as our countries have stood together to meet both the challenges of war and the opportunities of peace. Today relations between Great Britain and the United States are marked not only by cooperation and mutual respect but also by a deep and abiding friendship.

President with a facsimile of the front page of a 100-year-old edition of the Times of London. A tape was not available for verification of the content of the oral portion of this interview, which was released by the Office of the Press Secretary on April 11.

In the efforts of the Contadora group to resolve the conflict in Central America, one key objective has been to achieve national reconciliation in those countries rent by internal conflict. In El Salvador, President Duarte has taken the initiative in launching a dialogue with the guerrilla forces seeking to overthrow that country's democratic government; in Guatemala, which has been the scene of decades of strife, hope for national reconciliation has been kindled by the interest of a broad spectrum of parties in participating in elections later this year.

Only in Nicaragua have we seen efforts to promote national reconciliation frustrated by the government's negative response. I believe we now have an important new opportunity to promote peace and reconciliation in Nicaragua.

As you are aware, the principal leaders of Nicaragua's democratic opposition groups signed a declaration on March 1, 1985, in San Jose, Costa Rica, in which they offered a ceasefire in return for agreement by the Nicaraguan Government to a dialogue mediated by the Bishops Conference of the Roman Catholic church. This offer represents a bold and important initiative which I believe the United States and the Contadora countries should work together to promote.

My government intends to take action designed to strengthen Nicaragua's democratic resistance forces while encouraging the Sandinista regime to agree to Church-mediated dialogue. I have asked Congress to make available $14 million for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance forces. On Thursday, April 4, I plan to announce to the American people that I will use these funds only for humanitarian assistance while the democratic opposition's March 1 call for dialogue remains in effect. I will ask the democratic opposition to extend their offer until June 1. If the Nicaraguan government accepts the offer of dialogue with the opposition, then my government's assistance will remain limited to humanitarian purposes for a sufficient period to allow a serious dialogue to achieve progress. If the Sandinistas do not respond positively to the March 1 offer or, if 60 days after the offer of dialogue is accepted no agreement has resulted, I will lift this restriction on U.S. assistance unless both parties ask me to keep it in effect.

Mr. President, I am informing you of my actions before I announce them to the American people because I know the importance you attach to obtaining a negotiated settlement of the conflict in Central America on the basis of verified implementation of all of the twenty-one Contadora objectives. I believe this proposal for peace and democracy in Nicaragua can contribute toward achieving the key objective of national reconciliation in that country.

Q. Well, they say, sir, that your position was that unless you were faced with an overwhelming mandate from Congress -- your words -- you weren't going to do that. And they say that this group of small Republican leaders from the Senate is not a mandate.

The President. No, they were talking about totally canceling it; that regardless of what inflation might be, that there would be no increases in the COLA -- or no COLA's at all. And we're providing a guaranteed -- more than 6 percent, because it's compounded over the 3-year period regardless of what inflation is.

The President. Well, they were saying that before they even heard what the plan was. I can understand it; they don't want to give up the cushy spot that they've got right now. But we believe that the people of Nicaragua will be highly supportive of this because they still want the goals that they fought for in the revolution.

The President. Well, I think when they see the Contadora process and neighboring countries all in support of this -- and the contras are the ones who are willing to lay down their arms, to simply ask for the right to negotiate and discuss what kind of a government this should be.

It's a curious thing that no one seems to have paid any attention that in El Salvador it was the democratic government, the elected government of the people, that asked the guerrillas there to lay down their arms, offered them amnesty and to talk about participating legitimately in the government. And it was the guerrillas that refused. In the neighboring country of Nicaragua, the contras -- that some are calling the guerrillas and all, and I still say are freedom fighters -- they were the ones that have made the offer to lay down their arms and enter into discussions about instituting democracy. And it was the government of Nicaragua, a totalitarian government, that refused.

Q. Mr. President, when Secretary Weinberger and others and even words from you suggested that if you lowered your military request you would seriously begin to cut into the security of this country, why have you now agreed to lower your military request?

We've all been in agreement; yes, it is a compromise. There are things that I think were worthwhile that will not be done now for awhile -- be delayed -- but it will be an increase, continuing increase, and no weapons systems will be slowed down or cut out of the military budget; so that we can honestly say that with this our national security capability has not been reduced.

All Americans have been horrified at the unfolding human tragedy in Africa. The overwhelming response has been heartwarming and in the best tradition of American values and ideals. Through a community effort at all levels of American society, Americans have selflessly contributed resources, food, and their services to meet the needs of African famine victims. I am proud to say that America's massive response has been successful in preventing millions of Africans from dying.

Last month Vice President Bush visited Sudan, Niger, and Mali, three of the most seriously drought-affected countries, to study firsthand the dimensions of the famine problem, what we and other donors have been able to accomplish, and what still needs to be done. Though profoundly shocked by the degree of human suffering witnessed during the trip, the Vice President did see signs of hope. He saw that the tremendous amounts of U.S. food are indeed reaching famine victims with the help of private voluntary agencies and local governments.

The U.S. response has been far larger and faster than that of any other nation or institution. Yet, it is apparent to all that more needs to be done. This is the reason for the legislation that I submitted to Congress in January and have now signed. H.R. 1239 makes available an additional $1 billion to meet Africa's emergency needs -- an amount which I should note substantially exceeds the administration's current estimate of need. However, this bill, as I requested, does support the U.S. objective of providing up to 50 percent of the emergency food aid requirements in Africa.

Moreover, there is sufficient flexibility for the administration to ensure that all food aid is used effectively. Thus, I intend to abide by the intent of Congress in ensuring that all the food and funds that the United States provides are directed efficiently at meeting real needs and that aid will not exceed logistical capacities. Misuse of assistance is particularly unacceptable when human lives are at stake. Moreover, as we continue to increase our shipments of food aid to those at risk in Africa, we also will continue to ensure that our aid does not provide a disincentive to increased local production that is critical to solving Africa's food problem in the long term. We are confident that, together with contributions from other donor nations, we now have the resources to combat the immediate crisis and that as a result further millions of lives will be saved.

Mr. Gold is chairman of the board of Super Yarn Mart in Los Angeles, CA. He is also a general partner with the Commercial Business Credit Co. and Shenandoah Properties. He is national vice president and member of the international board of directors of Shaare Zedek Medical Center of Jerusalem, Israel. He is past chairman of the State of Israel Bonds for the greater Los Angeles area and past chairman of the Western States/Israel Chamber of Commerce.

I'm speaking to you today from our ranch in California. And I'm happy to report that in keeping with the spirit of Passover and Easter, this week is ending on a very hopeful note. We received encouraging reaction to our peace proposal for Nicaragua, and we've reached an immensely important budget agreement that can help keep America's economic engines running full speed ahead for years to come.

Well, as I've said many times, we don't have a deficit problem because you're not taxed enough. In the last 10 years, revenues to government increased by over $400 billion, but spending by government went up over 600 billion.

Nor do we have a deficit problem because of military spending. We're spending $16 billion less in this fiscal year than Mr. Carter's last budget had projected would be spent. As a matter of fact, as a percentage of the Federal budget, we spent more on defense 15 years ago, and the world was a lot less dangerous then.

This week, the Senate Republican leadership agreed with us on the most far-reaching spending reduction plan in postwar history. If approved by the full Congress, almost $300 billion in red ink will be eliminated over the next 3 years. This agreement provides the foundation for historic progress because those deficits will be wiped out without raising taxes a nickel, without jeopardizing vital defense programs or any essential services.

What the Senate Republicans have done is bite the bullet on spending, and I believe they deserve your support and that of the other Members of Congress. Some 17 programs will be terminated, others will be thoroughly reformed, and spending on scores of other programs, including pay for government workers, will be frozen.

The Defense Department budget will increase by only 3 percent in real terms. We'll have to squeeze costs everywhere if our buildup is to go forward, but Secretary Weinberger assures me that our men and women in uniform can get this job done.

And we're guaranteeing Social Security recipients an increase of at least 2 percent each year over the next 3 years. If inflation ends up less than 3 percent this year over last, then under present law, Social Security recipients would not be entitled to any increase. Under this new proposal, they'll be guaranteed a 2-percent increase even if there is no inflation. And if Congress cooperates on spending, we can keep bringing inflation down until it is zero. Courage and leadership are crucial if we expect to bring deficits down in a manner that protects our security and permits continued strong economic growth. And that's what we'll be asking for in the days ahead when the Congress returns from recess.

In this season of peace, we have put forth an olive branch. We've sought to make a new beginning in a time of hope for all who yearn for freedom. And around the world, those who support democracy are rallying to support our proposal. I ask only that the Members of our own Congress do the same.

The President today announced his intention to award the Presidential Medal of Freedom, the highest civilian award of our Government, at a luncheon to be held at the White House on May 23, 1985. The following individuals will be awarded this prestigious award by the President.

Today I am announcing the creation of two Cabinet-level bodies -- the Economic Policy Council and the Domestic Policy Council -- to assist me in the formulation and execution of domestic and economic policy. I will chair both Councils. These two Councils will replace the seven existing Cabinet Councils and the Senior Interagency Group-International Economic Policy. The new entities will streamline policy development and decisionmaking. Together with the National Security Council, they will serve as the primary channels for advising me on policy matters.

Trade Representative, and the Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers. It will provide advice to me concerning all aspects of national and international economic policy. The heads of the national security community departments and agencies and the Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs will participate in Council meetings whenever international policy or budget matters are discussed. In my absence the Secretary of the Treasury will serve as Chairman pro tempore.

I want to talk today about one of the most historic reforms our administration will propose as a top priority for passage in Congress this year. Next month, we'll unveil our plan to completely overhaul our tax code, changing it from a source of confusion and contempt to a model of fairness, simplicity, and incentives for work, risk-taking, and growth.

For millions of us, this weekend marks the final countdown to April 15th, the dreaded day we must bare our financial souls, account for every nickel earned, and deliver to the IRS all taxes due. It is a legal obligation we must meet. But paying taxes is painful, nonetheless.

Not only because tax rates remain too high, which they are despite the reductions we've made, but because over the years the entire tax system has come to mirror Washington itself -- a complicated, frustrating, unfair mystery of legalistic gobbledygook and loopholes never designed, it seems, to help everyday wage earners, only those who can afford high-priced attorneys and accountants.

How many times have we heard about profitable companies paying little or no taxes, or seen advertising for sophisticated tax shelter schemes that enable individuals to avoid paying their fair share of taxes, or seen luxuries being written off that must eventually be paid for by somebody else -- that somebody, of course, being you. I wonder how many Americans realize that tax deductions are available for seminars and conferences held on cruise ships. We know that our tax code is unfair. We know that it's complicated beyond belief. Millions of Americans need professional assistance just to complete their returns. And we know that it has bred another problem every bit as serious -- the wasting of economic resources.

With all the special provisions in our tax laws, too many economic decisions are being made for tax reasons alone, rather than in response to the marketplace. And that causes precious investment to be diverted from areas that could make the United States more productive and competitive in world markets.

Let me cite one example. Have you ever heard of a see-through building? Well, it's one that has no interior walls because it has no tenants. Between 1983 and 1984, only about half of the increase in available commercial office space was reflected in rentals. The other half resulted in vacancies. You see, the tax benefits for investment in some kinds of real estate deals are so generous that being able to rent space may be secondary. The result is overbuilding and high vacancy rates in many American cities. It's time for change -- sweeping change. And when we return from the economic summit in May, we intend to move.

Historically, tax reform has become a code word for tax increases, but our reform will not be a tax increase in disguise. And it probably won't please Washington's army of high-powered lobbyists. What our plan will do is give to the average family and every American with courage to invest in a new idea opportunities to make this economy the greatest miracle for growth and human progress the world has ever seen.

Our plan will mark an historic commitment to American families, for we intend to increase significantly the personal exemption, which will be especially beneficial to low-income families, helping them leave welfare behind, find productive jobs, and join those now paying taxes and contributing to a bigger gross national product. We'll lower personal rates by broadening the base, in other words, eliminate the shelters that make tax avoidance legal. But longstanding provisions like deductions for your home mortgage will be maintained. As we lower rates on the people, we'll reduce corporate rates, too. In meeting concerns for fairness and neutrality, we must not jeopardize economic growth.

My goal is to keep America the premier job-creating nation on Earth, and we intend to unleash the full power of entrepreneurship. Together, we can seize this historic moment. We can create a new tax code -- clean, simple, and fair. We can make ours the land of the future, offering unlimited opportunity to all Americans who dare to live for their dreams.

Sec. 2. (a) The Task Force shall review thoroughly the accomplishments, management, goals, and anticipated contributions of the defense inertial confinement fusion program and shall advise the President and the Congress concerning its findings of fact and recommendations regarding priorities for future work in the inertial confinement fusion program. In conducting its review and recommendations, the Technical Review Group shall contract with an appropriate independent, nationally recognized organization of scientists to study the inertial confinement fusion program and to submit its evaluation to the Technical Review Group for consideration in preparation of its reports.

Sec. 3. (a) The heads of Executive departments and agencies shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide the Technical Review Group with such information as may be necessary for the effective performance of its functions.

The President. I've been pleased to confer with these distinguished Americans, and they agree with me that if any area of the world is of vital interest to the United States, it is neighboring countries in Central America. Former Secretary of State Kissinger also has asked me to express his continuing support for our Central American policy.

Our plan has been endorsed by Nicaragua's neighbors; Presidents Duarte, Suazo, and Monge have all sent letters of strong support. Other Latin American nations view it as a positive step. El Salvador's President Duarte called it the right step at the right time and urged Members of Congress to support it.

I'm asking Congress to give this peace initiative and democracy a chance. I'm asking Congress to work with me to stem the flood of refugees, the threat of hostile forces on our borders, and the loss of faith in America's commitments around the world that could definitely result if we do not act quickly and responsibly.

I'm asking Congress to join me in the bipartisan spirit so essential to our security in providing this small amount, $14 million, for the more than 15,000 Nicaraguans who are struggling for democracy. It is so little, yet such an important symbol of our resolve, a signal to all of Central America and, yes, to those everywhere in the world who depend on us.

Our overall policy in the region has been working, but continued success depends on Congress' prompt release of aid for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. Democracy and peace deserve a chance. The freedom-loving people of Nicaragua deserve a chance.

The President. I will. And I want to say thanks to all of you and to all of the performers that we're going to see here for what they're doing for all of us. And later on I'll have a few words to say to all of you, but right now I'm not going to hold the show up. So, I think that's what the whistle is for. All right.

The President. Thank you all very much. But more importantly, all of you there in the stands -- including myself now up here -- shall we just once let out a yell and show how much we appreciate what all these wonderful people have been doing for us here for the last hour?

The President. There it is. We really thank you. You know, this year is Ringling Brothers' 100th birthday. They're just a little older than I am. And this year they're going to do more than just entertain people. The Ringling Brothers Barnum and Bailey Circus, traveling across the country, is going to have a program that is called the Safe Kids campaign.

With all of the lost children, the problems that we're having in this country, they're going across the country; they're going to give children and parents an opportunity to obtain free educational material, identification documentation, and help keep their families safe and secure.

Earlier this month I met at the White House with a group of leaders from the communities, from law enforcement, schools, business, government to talk about what can be done to keep all children safe. And I asked them to form a national partnership for child safety.

Each and every one of you is very important to all of us. I think you could see that when these wonderful people here were willing to give of their talent and their time to entertain us the way they have. And now, throughout the country, they're going to be participating in campaigns to see if we can't prevent the disappearance of children, that has been happening in our country.

Export-Import Bank financing could change with continued growth in the U.S. economy and global recovery. In addition, the ability to respond to greater than anticipated demand could be a means to ease the transition from the direct loan to the interest rate subsidy program which I have proposed as an alternative. Therefore, I have concluded that the statutory fiscal year 1985 limit for Eximbank authority should be retained unchanged.

The President today announced his intention to appoint George F. Moody to serve on the Board of Governors of the American National Red Cross for a term of 3 years. He will also be designated to act as the principal officer of the corporation.

Pacific Corp. and Security Pacific National Bank. He is also a member of the office of the chief executive for both organizations and serves on the bank's management committee. He joined Security Pacific National Bank in 1953.

No, because of that other engagement, I'm just going to take a minute here. I'm going to tell a story that Milt knows, and he likes it very much because it's about another barber, one in California -- and it's really true; it's not just a joke -- and in a place that, before Washington, I used to go get my hair cut.

Nicaragua and all the rest of you, too. Many of you have been driven from the land of your birth by a sad turn of history, but you've refused to forget your homeland or abandon your fellow Nicaraguans. And for this you deserve, and you have, both our high regard and our thanks.

Six years ago, many of you were part of the fight to overthrow an oppressive regime that had ruled your country for decades. You succeeded; the regime fell. And many rejoiced knowing that true freedom and true democracy would finally rise to take its place.

Nicaragua moved into the Soviet orbit. The best of the revolution, members of the original revolutionary government who had fought for high ideals, left the country. In all, more than a quarter of a million souls fled Nicaragua, and they're fleeing still. Many of the refugees are the poorest of the poor -- Indians and peasants and terrified mothers and children. All of them need our help. But even more, perhaps, they need the attention of the world. After nearly 6 years, attention must be paid.

As you know, the Sandinista dictatorship has taken absolute control of the government and the armed forces. It is a Communist dictatorship. It has done what Communist dictatorships do: created a repressive state security and secret police organization assisted by Soviet, East German, and Cuban advisers; harassed, and in many cases expunged, the political opposition, and rendered the democratic freedoms of speech, press, and assembly punishable by officially sanctioned harassment and imprisonment or death.

There is growing evidence of Sandinista brutality. We've recently learned that 10 or 11 members of the Social Christian Party have been rounded up and jailed. The Sandinistas are trying to get them to confess to being counterrevolutionaries. And you might be interested in knowing one way the Communists are coercing these confessions. They have also arrested more than a hundred relatives of the political prisoners. And according to our most recent information, the Social Christian Party members are being held in the dark in small, overheated cells. Prisoners are served meals at irregular intervals -- after 12 hours, for instance, and then the next in another 2. The purpose is to disorient them and wear them down. Where do they get that idea? This same method has been used against political prisoners in Cuba.

Now, we do not know the exact number of political prisoners in Nicaragua today, but we get an indication from the testimony of Jose Gonzalez, a former vice president of the Social Democratic Party. Gonzalez told Pope John Paul II there were about 8,000 political prisoners in 1981. He also told the Pope the Sandinistas practice repression and torture. Gonzalez, as you know, was arrested when he returned from Rome. He left Nicaragua and now lives in exile.

Sandinistas' scorched-earth policy. We know the Sandinistas have ordered and are carrying out the forced relocation of tens of thousands of peasants. We have reports that 20,000 peasants have been moved in the past 2 months from their homes to relocation camps. Peasants who have escaped call themselves hostages and call the relocation camps concentration camps. The Communists themselves had admitted they're engaged in the forced resettlement of an estimated 65,000 people. Peasants and journalists tell of entire villages, homes, stores, and churches being burnt to the ground. They tell of animals slaughtered, crops burned, and villagers taken away at gunpoint in government trucks.

Well, the Sandinistas came close. There were massacres. Eyewitnesses said some Miskitos were buried alive. Ten thousand Indians were force-marched to relocation camps. Miskito villages were burned down; they're still being burned down. Miskito villages were bombed and shelled, and they are still being bombed and shelled. In the name of humanity, these atrocities must be stopped.

Unfortunately, it's widely believed outside Nicaragua that the Sandinistas enjoy the support of the people inside, but you know this is completely untrue. We know this from many sources, even recently the American press.

A few months ago, The New Republic carried a report by Robert Leiken, who had long been sympathetic to the Sandinistas and who had formerly testified in Congress against aid to the contras. He wrote, ``One of the most common means of sustaining the myth of popular support is the Sandinistas' use of the rationing system as a lever -- ration cards are confiscated for nonattendance at Sandinista meetings.'' And talk of inflation is branded as ``counterrevolutionary plot.'' Sympathy with the contras, he said, is more and more pervasive. In fact, the peasants now call them Los Muchachos, the affectionate term they once used exclusively for the Sandinistas.

But these defenders admit there is a problem in Nicaragua. The problem, they say, is the freedom fighters. Well, just a few weeks ago, the whole world was treated to a so-called independent investigation of charges that the freedom fighters have committed atrocities. It spoke of these so-called atrocities in a rather riveting manner. And the report received great attention on television and in leading newspapers and publications. The report ignored Communist brutality, the murder of the Indians, and the arrest, torture, and murder of political dissidents. But we really shouldn't be surprised by that because, as our State Department discovered and Time magazine reported, this so-called independent investigation was the work of one of dictator Ortega's supporters, a sympathizer who has openly embraced Sandinismo and who was shepherded through Nicaragua by Sandinista operatives.

The truth is, there are atrocities going on in Nicaragua, but they're largely the work of the institutionalized cruelty of the Sandinista government. This cruelty is the natural expression of a Communist government, a cruelty that flows naturally from the heart of totalitarianism. The truth is Somoza was bad, but so many of the people of Nicaragua know the Sandinistas are infinitely worse.

We have here this evening many individuals who know these truths firsthand. Some of you may know of Bayardo Santaeliz. He is a 29-year-old Nicaraguan refugee and a former lay preacher of the Pentecostal Missionary Church in Nicaragua. And this is his story, a story told in sworn testimony before a Honduran civil rights commission.

A few years ago, the Sandinistas began pressuring Bayardo to stop preaching and start fighting for the revolution. And one night after holding a prayer session in a home on the slopes of the Momotombo Volcano, Bayardo went to bed. He was awakened by Sandinista soldiers who asked if he was an evangelical preacher; Bayardo said yes. The Sandinistas arrested him, accused him of counterrevolutionary activity, verbally abused him, and then tied him and two others to a pillar.

Then the Sandinistas doused the house with gasoline and threw in a match. The room went up in flames, but they burned the rope that bound Bayardo, and he escaped with his clothes in flames and his body burned. He hid in the countryside and was rescued by campesinos who got him to a hospital, where he lied about the causes of his injuries. And not long after, he left Nicaragua.

You know, I was going to ask all of you fellows with the cameras if you wouldn't kind of turn them off me and on him, but then he came up here; so I didn't ask you that. He's just one of the many who've suffered. He knows things and has experienced things that many of us in this country can barely imagine. And I think America has to see the true face of Nicaragua. Thank you, Bayardo.

Democratic states do not find it easy to declare and carry out war. Democratic states are not by their nature militaristic. Democracies are traditionally reluctant to spend a great deal of money on arms. Democratic states have built-in controls on aggressive, expansionist behavior because democratic states must first marshal wide popular support before they move.

The Sandinistas have been engaged for some time in spreading their Communist revolution beyond their borders. They're providing arms, training, and a headquarters to the Communist guerrillas who are attempting to overthrow the democratically elected Duarte government of El Salvador. The Sandinistas have been caught supporting similar antidemocratic movements in Honduras and Costa Rica; Guatemala, too, is threatened. If these governments fall, as Nicaragua has fallen, it will send millions of refugees north, as country after country collapses.

Already, the refugee situation is building to unacceptable levels. More than a quarter of a million refugees have fled Nicaragua since the Sandinistas took control. Some weeks, a hundred Nicaraguans a day stream into Costa Rica alone. It must be noted here that many of these refugees carry no papers, register in no official camps, and wind up on no one's official list of those who've fled. They simply cross the border of one country or another and settle where they can.

And let me emphasize a very important point: These refugees are not simply people caught in the middle of a war. They're people fleeing for their lives from the Sandinista police state. They are fleeing from people who are burning down their villages, forcing them into concentration camps, and forcing their children into military service.

The refugees come into camps in Honduras with no food and no money. Many are sick with parasites and malaria. And the great tragedy is that these people are the innocents of the war -- people without politics, people who had never presumed to govern or to tell the world how to turn. They are both innocents and victims.

If the Communists continue unfettered by the weight of world opinion, there will be more victims, victims of a long march north. We've seen this before. We've seen the boat people leaving Southeast Asia in terror. We saw the streams of refugees leave East Berlin before the wall was built. We've seen these sad, lost armies fleeing in the night. We cannot allow it to happen again.

You know of our efforts to end the tragedy in Nicaragua. We want the killing and the bloodshed and the brutality to end. We've put forth a proposal for peace. We've asked for a cease-fire. We're asking the Sandinistas to join the democractic opposition in a church-mediated dialog. The church itself a year ago independently asked the Sandinistas for this dialog. We're asking the Sandinistas to take steps to hold truly democratic elections and restore freedom of speech, press, and assembly.

President Duarte, President Suazo, President Monge have all personally written to me to express support for this peace plan. And who bears better witness to the merits of this plan than Nicaragua's own neighbors?

As part of our proposal, we've asked the Congress of the United States to release $14 million for food, medicine, and other support to help the patriots who believe in democracy survive in the hills of Nicaragua. This has been called a controversial request, and it's garnered some opposition in the Congress. I believe the reasons for this must be addressed.

Some claim that the freedom fighters are simply former Somozistas who want to reimpose a dictatorship. That is simply not true. Listen to the roll call of their leaders: Adolpho Calero, a Nicaraguan businessman who was imprisoned by Somoza; Alfonso Robelo, a member of the original Sandinista government, now leading freedom fighters in the south; Arturo Cruz, another former member of the Sandinista government who is supporting the freedom fighters; Eden Pastora, the famed Commander Zero, a hero of the anti-Somoza revolution.

These men are not putting their lives on the line to restore a dictatorship of the past; these men are fighting for freedom. Already they control large sections of the countryside. And as for their level of support, there are now three times as many freedom fighters fighting the Sandinistas as there were Sandinistas fighting Somoza.

There are those who say America's attempt to encourage freedom in Nicaragua interferes with the right of self-determination of the Nicaraguan people. Self-determination -- you wonder what the ghosts of the Miskito Indians would say to that; you wonder what the journalists who cannot print the truth and the political prisoners who cannot speak it would say about self-determination and the Sandinistas. I think they would say that when a small Communist clique seizes a country, there is no self-determination and no chance of it.

I believe that a vote against this aid is more than a rejection of the freedom fighters. It is a rejection of all the forces of moderation from the church to the Contadora countries, which have called for freedom and democracy in Nicaragua.

I believe one inevitable outcome of a rejection of this aid would be that it would remove all pressure on the Sandinistas to change. And if no constraints are put on the Sandinistas, I believe the brutality and abuse they already aim at their own country and their neighbors may well be magnified a thousandfold.

Thank you. I truly believe that this not only imperils the United States and its allies, but a vote against this proposal is literally a vote against peace, because it invites the conditions that will lead to more fighting, new wars, and new bloodshed.

No evil is inevitable unless we make it so. We cannot have the United States walk away from one of the greatest moral challenges in postwar history. I pledge to you that we will do everything we can to win this great struggle.

The countries of the Western Hemisphere are bound together by their humanitarian ideals, their respect for individual liberty, and their yearning for peace and prosperity -- goals eloquently expressed in the Charter of the Organization of American States. Just as our Revolution of 1776 was an inspiration for Simon Bolivar and Jose de San Martin, so we in the United States took inspiration from the struggle of our neighbors to be free from foreign domination. We continue to take courage from those great struggles for liberty today, when new forms of tyranny and modern totalitarian systems threaten the peace and security of the Hemisphere, especially in Central America.

The Organization of American States, embodying the Inter-American System, links together this diverse group of nations, with their Spanish, Portuguese, French, English, African, and Indian heritages. But whatever their creeds, languages, or cultures, the peoples of our Hemisphere are united in the common cause of ending poverty, disease, and illiteracy. The O.A.S. has played a notable role in this cause.

More and more countries of the Hemisphere are turning to democratic institutions to solve political, social, educational, and economic problems. They realize that peace, prosperity, and freedom are best served when the people, faced with a real choice of political parties, freely elect their own governments.

On this Pan American Day of 1985, the people of the United States extend warm greetings to all their neighbors in the Americas and reaffirm their active support for the Organization of American States and the principles for which it stands.

Providence has favored our land, with its abundant resources and industrious people, and the years of adversity in our history have been few. Yet even during the dark hours, the times of conflict or economic hardship, Americans have demonstrated their unwavering devotion to the noble ideals upon which this country was founded. Our faith in the principles of freedom, justice, and opportunity has sustained us. We have prevailed over every challenge and our success shines as a beacon of hope for the world, an enduring reminder that adherence to the fundamental values of liberty will overcome any obstacle.

Nations that seek to compel the love or fidelity of their citizens without tolerance for their unalienable rights are inherently unstable and frequently dangerous to others. Now that the windows of communication and commerce are bringing nations into increasingly close relationships, the truths our forefathers found self-evident are becoming apparent to all: the future belongs to the free -- to peoples who are free to work, to assemble, to vote, to travel and to emigrate, to print and to speak, and to worship as they choose.

Nation, because they represent a promise, an ideal, and an opportunity. It is the promise of liberty and justice for all that has brought millions of immigrants to American shores. It is the ideal of liberty and justice for all that has guided our government in making and enforcing our laws. It is the opportunity for liberty and justice for all that has inspired Americans from all walks of life to participate in and give life to our unique form of government.

The fact that we continue to strive to be one Nation, under God, with liberty and justice for all, is a tribute to the memory of the millions of Americans who, throughout our history, have been willing to die to secure or preserve these ideals. The great partriot Patrick Henry's impassioned plea, ``Give me liberty or give me death,'' continues to symbolize today the fervor with which Americans treasure these freedoms.

Law Day is an important opportunity for all Americans to improve their understanding and appreciation of the contribution law makes to the preservation of liberty and justice. I urge all Americans to join with me in renewing our dedication to those principles for which so many Americans have sacrificed their lives.

Since my previous report, the leaders of the two Cypriot communities participated in a summit meeting in New York January 17 - 20 under the auspices of United Nations Secretary General Perez de Cuellar. At the outset of the meeting, the Secretary General expressed his expectation ``that the parties would conclude an agreement containing the elements necessary for a comprehensive solution to the problem, aimed at establishing a Federal Republic of Cyprus.'' Had this effort succeeded, it would have set in motion a process that -- over a period of time in which further concrete negotiations would take place -- could have led to a true resolution of the Cyprus problem. Following the summit's close the Secretary General announced that the Turkish Cypriot side has ``fully accepted the draft agreement'' and that the Greek Cypriots had accepted the documentation ``as a basis for negotiation.'' While he acknowledged that the failure to bridge the gap between these two positions meant that the summit had not achieved its goal, the Secretary General added that the two sides ``had never been so close'' and that he would continue his efforts.

The Turkish Cypriots, following the failure of the January summit, announced their intention to proceed to parliamentary elections in June 1985. The Turkish Cypriots have said the elections would not preclude their continued participation in the Secretary General's process and in an eventual federal Cypriot state. We have registered with both communities our conviction that any actions that might damage chances for the UN Secretary General's pursuit of a fair and lasting solution should be avoided. The Secretary General met with President Kyprianou in Geneva on March 11 where they discussed next steps in the pursuit of a solution.

President Kyprianou and Mr. Denktash. We continue to work closely with the two Cypriot parties, and with the governments of Greece and Turkey, in support of the Secretary General's program. We urge flexibility by all parties, and we are encouraged that they continue to support a negotiated solution.

Dr. Silber has been president of Boston University since 1970. At Boston University he is university professor of philosophy and law. He is a spokesman on the maintenance of academic standards and the financing of higher education and has several publications on those subjects. He is also the author of numerous writings on ethics and the philosophy of law.

Texas at Austin, where he also served as dean of the College of Arts and Sciences. He has received four awards for distinguished teaching, including the Morris Ernst Award for excellence in teaching and the Danforth Foundation's E. Harris Harbison Award for distinguished teaching.

I have signed S. 781, an amendment to the Biomass Energy and Alcohol Fuels Act of 1980, that extends for 5 months the deadline for four ethanol fuel production projects to meet the terms and conditions required for Federal loan guarantees.

Conservation and renewable energy sources are an important component of this administration's national energy policy. We support efforts by the private sector to develop alternative energy sources that are economically viable in the Nation's competitive marketplace.

To give the alcohol fuels industry an opportunity to develop into a competitive alternate energy source, the Department of Energy entered into four conditional commitments in 1981 to guarantee loans for the construction of ethanol fuel production facilities. Three of these conditional commitments have since expired, and a fourth expires on April 30, 1985. Although the sponsors of these projects have not yet been able to meet satisfactorily the terms and conditions, they believe that an extension of the conditional agreements until September 30, 1985, will enable them to complete these transactions. By passage of S. 781, the Congress has determined that they should be provided a last additional opportunity to do so.

This amendment does not grant any new loan guarantee authority or provide for any new commitments. However, the conditional agreements being extended commit the Government to a potential liability of some $250 million should the projects default. Utmost care must be taken to protect the taxpayers from a loss of this magnitude. In view of these circumstances, I have directed the Secretary of Energy to issue loan guarantees only to those projects that pass a rigorous economic analysis. The ethanol industry must ultimately stand on its own in the energy marketplace, competing fairly with other energy sources. The Nation will not attain greater energy security if the Government subsidizes energy sources that do not demonstrate their competitiveness. Therefore, we will not make any Federal commitments on behalf of projects that are not determined to be economically viable. To do otherwise would shift the burden of a high-risk business venture onto the shoulders of the American taxpayer.

I'm deeply honored to address this conference. I know that a good many of you've come a long way to be here today, and I know you've given greatly of your time and energy and concern. And I could only hope, as you do, that those now suffering around the world for their beliefs will draw renewed courage from your work.

The history of religion and its impact on civilization cannot be summarized in a few days or -- never mind minutes. But one of the great shared characteristics of all religions is the distinction they draw between the temporal world and the spiritual world. All religions, in effect, echo the words of the Gospel of St. Matthew: ``Render, therefore, unto Caesar the things which are Caesar's; and unto God the things that are God's.'' What this injunction teaches us is that the individual cannot be entirely subordinate to the state, that there exists a whole other realm, an almost mysterious realm of individual thought and action which is sacred and which is totally beyond and outside of state control. This idea has been central to the development of human rights.

Only in an intellectual climate which distinguishes between the city of God and the city of man and which explicitly affirms the independence of God's realm and forbids any infringement by the state on its prerogatives, only in such a climate could the idea of individual human rights take root, grow, and eventually flourish.

We see this climate in all democracies and in our own political tradition. The founders of our republic rooted their democratic commitment in the belief that all men are endowed by their Creator with certain inalienable rights. And so, they created a system of government whose avowed purpose was and is the protection of those God-given rights.

All of this illustrates a truth that, I believe, must be understood. Atheism is not an incidental element of communism, not just part of the package; it is the package. In countries which have fallen under Communist rule, it is often the church which forms the most powerful barrier against a completely totalitarian system. And so, totalitarian regimes always seek either to destroy the church or, when that is impossible, to subvert it.

In 1945 Josef Stalin met with Harry Hopkins, who had been sent by Harry Truman to discuss various East-West problems. In the middle of a talk about politics, Stalin interjected the following: In 1917, he said, the Russian Communist Party had proclaimed the right of religious freedom as part of their political program. But, he said, the churches of Russia had declared the Soviet Government anathema and had called on church members to resist the call of the Red Army. Now, what could we do, said Stalin, but declare war on the church! He assured Hopkins, however, that World War II had ended the church-state antagonism and now freedom of religion could be granted to the church. But that, as you know, never happened.

History has taught us that you can bulldoze a church, but you can't extinguish all that is good in every human heart. And so, in spite of the dangers involved, there are Christians and Jews and Muslims and others throughout the Communist world who continue to practice their faith. Some of them have been imprisoned for their courage. There's the late Valerie Marchenko who died in a Soviet prison hospital a few short months ago. He was 37 years old, a scholar, and a Christian who, at his most recent trial, spoke of his belief in God and his faith in human goodness. There's Father Gleb Yakunin, who was recently sent to Siberia for 5 years of internal exile. He's another prisoner of faith. And Bronislav Borovsky, recently sentenced for smuggling Bibles into Czechoslovakia. These are only a few of many.

We in the United States have protested this terrible abuse of people who are nothing less than heroes of this century. Most recently when congressional leaders met in Moscow with General Secretary Gorbachev, they gave the Soviet leadership a list of Baltic and Ukrainian prisoners of conscience. And the Council on Soviet Jewry and other groups were magnificent in making sure that the congressional delegation did not leave without extensive data on repression against Jews in the Soviet Union.

Religious persecution, of course, is not confined to Europe. We see it in Iran, whose leaders have virtually declared war on the Bahais; we see it in Afghanistan, where the Soviet military has resorted to increasingly cruel measures against the Moslem people; and we see a variation on how to abuse religious freedom in the Sandinista regime of Nicaragua.

The Sandinistas are actively attempting to discredit and split the church hierarchy. And there's one new area to be watched. The Sandinistas, like all Communist regimes, are injecting their ideology into the educational system and have begun widespread campaigns to indoctrinate children and adults. But the Catholic Church is fighting to maintain autonomy and keep this indoctrination out of their churches and schools. I just had a verbal message delivered to me from the Pope urging us to continue our efforts in Central America.

Well, this thing that I was mentioning has not been resolved. Cuba solved the problem by closing all private schools, including religious schools. The general state of religious liberty in Nicaragua is suggested by testimony from various sources but most vividly by those who have fled this brutal regime.

We recently learned of a pastor of the Evangelical Church in a Nicaraguan town who told the freedom fighters that the Sandinistas had threatened to send the 3,000 members of his church to relocation camps. The pastor and his church members are now hiding out in caves and temporary settlements in the countryside.

May I interject here that stories like these of organized coercion and brutality and terror are the reason we're asking Congress for aid to help the freedom fighters and to help the victims of the Sandinista regime.

When I think of Nicaragua these days, it occurs to me anew that you can judge any new government, any new regime, by whether or not it allows religion to flourish. If it doesn't, you can be sure it's an enemy of mankind, for it's attempting to ban what is most beautiful in the human heart.

But we mustn't feel despair, because it's not appropriate to the times. We're living in a dramatic age. Throughout the world the machinery of the state is being used as never before against religious freedom. But at the same time, throughout the world new groups of believers keep springing up. Points of light flash out in the darkness, and God is honored once again.

I believe that the most essential element of our defense of freedom is our insistence on speaking out for the cause of religious liberty. I would like to see this country rededicate itself wholeheartedly to this cause. I join you in your desire that the Protestant Churches of America, the Catholic Church, and the Jewish organizations remember the members of their flock who are in prison or in jeopardy in other countries. We are our brothers' keepers, all of us. And I hope the message will go forth from this conference: To prisoners of conscience throughout the world, take heart; you have not been forgotten. We, your brothers and sisters in God, have made your cause our cause, and we vow never to relent until you have regained the freedom that is your birthright as a child of God.

Now, let me turn to an issue, if I could for just a moment, that has provoked a storm of controversy: my decision to visit the war cemetery at Bitburg and my decision, on the state visit to Germany, not to visit the site of the concentration camp at Dachau. It was and remains my purpose and that of Chancellor Kohl to use this visit to Germany on the 40th anniversary of the war's end in Europe to commemorate not simply the military victory of 40 years ago but the liberation of Europe, the rebirth of German freedom, and the reconciliation of our two countries.

My purpose was and remains not to reemphasize the crimes of the Third Reich in 12 years of power, but to celebrate the tremendous accomplishments of the German people in 40 years of liberty, freedom, democracy, and peace. It was to remind the world that since the close of that terrible war, the United States and the Federal Republic have established an historic relationship, not of superpower to satellite but of sister republics bounded together by common ideals and alliance and partnership. It is to cement the 40 years of friendship between a free Germany and the United States, between the German people and the American people, that Chancellor Kohl and I agreed together to lay a wreath at the cemetery for the German war dead. That's why I accepted the invitation to Bitburg, and that's why I'm going to Bitburg.

Chancellor Kohl's recent letter to me, however, has made it plain that my invitation to visit a concentration camp was, indeed, a part of his planned itinerary. So, I have now accepted that invitation, and my staff is in Germany exploring a site that will fit into our schedule there.

Deficit Reduction Coalition. And I want to thank all of you here today. With your help, we're making tremendous progress. And now we have before us, I think, an historic opportunity: the chance to finally get control of the budget behemoth and make government once again the servant of the people, rather than the other way around.

It used to be that talk of deficits was all doom and gloom. As a matter of fact, I did some of that talking out on the mashed-potato circuit years ago. But without the political will in Congress to reform its big-spending impulses, our economy was thrust into a position of peril, caught between the devil of higher taxes and the bottomless sea of growing deficits.

Now we can see that even our greatest problems are, as Henry Kaiser once said, simply opportunities in workclothes. Together with the Senate Republican leadership, we've fashioned a compromise budget plan that will virtually eliminate the deficit by the end of the decade. And just as important, we'll begin the long-overdue work of reforming Federal spending.

Passage of this bill would be a decisive break with our spendthrift past, an achievement of comparable importance to the historic tax cuts of 1981. Instead of a budget for the special interests, we've proposed a budget for the public interest. It'll be introduced as an amendment to Senate Concurrent Resolution 32, but I just like to call it the taxpayers' protection plan.

There are, of course, some up on the Hill who aren't happy with budget reform. They are the ones who still secretly are hoping to raise taxes. Their last hope is to sabotage budget reform, so endangering the economy that Congress will be panicked into taking desperate measures, which they hope would be a tax increase.

The tax-increasers are like those soldiers after World War II out on some of those Pacific islands who didn't know the war had ended. They've lost the fight, and they're now reduced to hit-and-run attacks on budget reform. I have this to say to those tax-increasers huddled away up on the Hill. If I were talking to them, I would say: You're fighting a lost cause. Throw down your tax hikes and come on out into the sunlight with the rest of the American people. Get on the taxpayers' protection plan and join us in celebrating the return to fiscal sanity and a strong, healthy economy.

Let me also say that the budget freeze that some are suggesting is the wrong medicine at the wrong time. Why should we continue to fund wasteful, unnecessary programs at their present high levels while limiting those programs that are truly worthy? We also know that if we leave the pork barrels intact, the same political pressure groups will be back next year trying to fill them with pork. Every time an Amtrak -- well, no, I'm getting ahead of myself there. I shouldn't.

But some programs whose costs far outweigh their benefits have been eliminated entirely. And now I'll say it -- Amtrak, for instance. It's a perfect example of how government spending gets out of hand. Originally authorized for only a 2-year trial, Amtrak's proponents assured the American people that the railroad would soon be making a profit. Well, instead, Amtrak has cost taxpayers billions of dollars. That shouldn't have surprised us, because in World War I we had an experience with the Government running the railroads, and it was a disaster. Every time an Amtrak train leaves the station, it costs the taxpayers $35 for each passenger. In some cases it would be cheaper, actually, just to hand those passengers a free plane ticket to their destination.

The Small Business Administration is another example of government poking its nose into areas where it has no business, if you'll excuse the pun. Since the tax cuts took hold, this country has become the undisputed world leader for business creation. Over 600,000 businesses were incorporated in 1983, an all-time record. And it looks like 1984 will turn out to have been another record year.

Just two-tenths of 1 percent of all U.S. businesses in fiscal year 1984 received subsidized credit from that program, and most of those loans went to restaurants, bars, and car dealerships, where ample private credit is available.

Other major programs in the taxpayers' protection plan have been reformed on the theory that it isn't fair to have people with low incomes subsidize special programs for the well-to-do. College student aid, for instance, will still be provided to low- and middle-income families, and this aid will cover the full cost of attending public colleges, but aid to the well-to-do will be scaled back.

As the law stands now, low-income taxpayers, who may not be able to afford college for their own children, are helping subsidize the education of children whose families make as much as $100,000 a year. Now, unlike the current law, our bill would guarantee at least a 2-percent increase in Social Security benefits, more if inflation picks up, while the low-income elderly and disabled will receive full -- as I said before -- cost-of-living adjustments.

Throughout the budget process, defense spending has been the favorite scapegoat of those unwilling to make necessary reforms. The compromise defense appropriations of the taxpayers' protection plan allows us to keep the vital work of building up our defenses on track. We can feel secure with these spending levels, but I think it's clear that any further cuts could derail our defense program, cause expensive delays and inefficiencies, and very likely undermine our national security.

After almost two decades in which it seemed that Congress had lost control of spending, the taxpayers' protection plan is the first step to regaining that control and earning the respect of the American people. It's a model of what the democratic process can achieve. The result of intensive negotiation and compromise, it addresses a serious problem fairly and protects our national security and makes special allowance for the poor and needy. Most important, it breaks apart the congressional spending machine. And when combined with tax reform and substantial tax rate reductions, it will open the door to a growing, prosperous economy through the end of the decade and beyond.

Well, I'd like to take a minute and ask your support on another issue today, an issue that I believe touches on the very heart and soul of what it means to be an American. In a few days, Congress will vote on whether or not to support our proposal to help put Nicaragua on a path toward peace and democracy. Recently I proposed a plan for peace and democracy in Nicaragua, an immediate cease-fire to be followed by church-mediated negotiations leading to free and honest elections and Congress supporting this peace initiative with humanitarian aid.

Few votes will ever be so important. Either way it's decided, Congress will send a signal. A ``yes'' vote would signal new hope for peace and a return to the original democratic promise of the Nicaraguan revolution. But if Congress votes ``no,'' if they in essence wash their hands of our responsibility to support peaceful development and democracy in this hemisphere, they'll be sending a message of desertion, a clear statement that the greatest democracy on Earth doesn't care if communism snuffs out the freedom of our neighbors and endangers our own security.

The Soviet-bloc and terrorist nations flood Nicaragua with arms and personnel, sparing no expense in support of the totalitarian Sandinista regime, while the U.S. Congress remains paralyzed over a mere $14 million in humanitarian aid, less than the cost of the deadly Hind helicopters the Soviets have given the Communists to use against the resistance, the freedom fighters.

Well, please let Congress know that there's another side, that Americans don't want the creation of another Cuba, a warehouse of subversion on the American mainland; that they don't want Libyans, the PLO, and the followers of Khomeini bunkered down just 2 hours from our southern border. Let's not let the Sandinistas be the only ones lobbying our Congress. Tell them not to sabotage our efforts for democracy in Nicaragua and peace in our hemisphere.

So, we have two major votes coming up in Congress. One will directly determine our economic security throughout the end of the decade, and the other could influence our national security throughout the end of the century. So, I feel free to ask you this because America needs your help on both of these.

Our mutual concerns about Middle East peace, North African stability, and African economic development and political process -- or progress, I should say, are among items which I look forward to discussing with you. Through these discussions we seek understanding and progress.

In this respect, I note with satisfaction that we will sign tomorrow an agreement to establish a joint economic commission and will shortly conclude an accord on cultural exchanges. These achievements are tangible signs that the relations between the United States and Algeria are moving in a positive direction. And they're only two of the areas in which our interests coincide and are growing.

Your visit should serve as a catalyst for further friendship-building activities between our peoples and governments. The United States is already one of Algeria's major trading partners. We buy hydrocarbons from you and market American goods, services, and technology in your country.

I'm aware, Mr. President, of your particular interest in American agriculture, especially our irrigation methods and farmer technology. Your trip to California, after your visit with us in Washington, should be most enlightening, and we're delighted you're going. There in my home State, you'll have the opportunity to see American know-how put to use in producing food and fiber and to visit firms which already are working with Algeria.

We're gratified that at this time Algerian students are studying at American universities and technical institutes. The knowledge they gain will enable them to contribute to Algeria's progress and to help create a more prosperous future for your country. They will also serve as a human bridge of friendship between our peoples. This is the kind of technology transfer that we can all be proud of. American educational institutions are open and will remain open to those who would master the keys to development. In doing so, we seek to build a more prosperous world and to establish with you relations based on good will and mutual respect.

Mr. President, again, I give to you my good wishes and those of the American people. And in closing, I want to express our collective gratitude for the role which you and your government played in obtaining release of our Tehran hostages in 1981. It was a gallant effort and was in keeping with Algerian tradition. The records show that your great national hero, Abd Al-Qadr Al-Jaza'iri, personally saved Americans and others from similar danger in Damascus in 1860. And we're grateful that you're following in his proud footsteps.

President Bendjedid. Mr. President, thank you for your warm welcome and for the quality of the reception given to both my delegation and myself upon our arrival. I should also like to express the pleasure I feel coming for the first time to this rich land that has brought together people from all lands into one great nation.

American people. The Algerian people have a strong sense of communion with the principles that animated and guided the American Revolution, which represented one of the turning points in the history of the quest for freedom. They also recall the ties that our two nations developed very soon after the independence of the United States of America.

It is only natural that once it had regained its sovereignty, Algeria dedicated itself to restoring a dialog with your country. I can say that through the years this dialog allowed us to know each other better, to define our perceptions, and to better understand our respective approaches toward the challenges of our times.

This visit will be an opportunity to enhance our communication with regard to bilateral as well as international issues that are of common interest. Through cooperation and trade, the United States and Algeria have undoubtedly experienced benefits to both our economies. It is undeniable that there is room for development of a dynamic cooperation that respects the interests of both partners.

Mr. President, my country is strongly committed to the ideals of the goal of the United Nations to achieve peace and development for all the nations of this world. It is an established fact in this context that progress and peace should maintain an intimate and interacting relationship. The objective of the interdependent prosperity called for by the nonaligned countries is founded on the principle of mutual interdependence and upon a quest for a world of peace and progress.

While crises accumulate and areas of tension multiply, there is, more than ever, an urgent need for the international community to combine its efforts, to summon up its collective imagination, and to take the actions necessary to bring about an era of peace, security, and worldwide development. Algeria believes that man is endowed with limitless abilities that can benefit the collective work of peace and progress. And as long as these capabilities are shared in order to achieve the most important task, human destiny will take a course other than that of dissension and poverty.

The President today announced the following recipients of the National Medal of Arts. They will be honored at a White House luncheon on April 23, 1985. This is the first time that the award will be presented.

Jose Vicente Ferrer, of New York, has been a stage and screen actor since 1935. His stage and screen portrayal of Cyrano has won him acclaim and awards. He is also a director and has many roles on television.

Martha Graham, of New York, is a dancer, teacher, choreographer, and directs her own dance company. Since 1926 Miss Graham has been a leading force in American dance and is known throughout the world for her work.

Louise Nevelson, of New York, originated environmental sculpture by assembling bits of materials in what she called a ``unified whole.'' Her work is displayed in many major museums, and she has used wood, plaster, terra cotta, stone, bronze, aluminum, and other materials in her own sculptures.

Leontyne Price, of New York, first debuted on television but since 1955 has gone on to sing leading roles with the major opera companies of the world. She is famous for her performances in operas by Giuseppe Verdi.

Georgia O'Keeffe, of Albuquerque, began her career as an advertising artist but now is world famous for her bleached animal skulls and giant flower blossoms. She has been honored by many restrospective shows, and her work is displayed in leading museums.

Hallmark Cards, Inc., of Kansas City, has been the sponsor of the Hallmark Hall of Fame for 34 years, during which it has received 49 Emmy Awards. This giant corporation also supports a number of local arts institutions in towns and cities where it maintains facilities.

Dorothy Buffum Chandler, of Los Angeles, is credited with the major effort behind the conception and construction of the Music Center of Los Angeles. The Dorothy Chandler Pavilion, a part of that performing center, is named for her in recognition of that effort.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Roger William Jepsen to be a member of the National Credit Union Administration Board for the remainder of the term expiring August 2, 1987. He would succeed Edgar F. Callahan. Upon his confirmation, the President intends to designate him Chairman.

Mr. President, we're proud that the United States was among the first to recognize Algeria's independence in 1962. In the years which have passed since that time, we've not always seen political issues in the same light, but total agreement is not the basis of friendship; instead it's based on respect and forthrightness. And if this be the case, Algerians and Americans should and ought to be friends.

I enjoyed our conversations today, Mr. President. They were productive, and the spirit was positive. These talks have reinforced the ties between our two governments and our peoples. In the course of our discussions, we covered a wide area -- trade and economic planning, humanitarian efforts in Africa, and cultural exchanges. And I believe that the steps forward we made will be followed by many more. And we look forward to that progress.

After getting to know you, Mr. President, I'm certain you agree that nothing would better serve the joint interests of our peoples than peace and stability in the Middle East. We're aware of your particular concerns, ties, and friendships in the region, as you're aware of ours. Let us, Mr.

President, use our influence toward positive ends. Let us urge our friends toward peaceful resolution of disputes. Let us encourage them to build and to create and to do those things that make for a better life.

Americans have had a challenging Middle Eastern role for almost four decades. We've done our best to create new opportunities for peace. And we'll continue our efforts, but peace depends on all those of good will in the region, on all sides of the conflict, taking the initiative.

For our part, we continue to believe Middle East peace must emerge from direct negotiations between the parties based on U.N. Security Council Resolution 242. As you so eloquently have noted, a solution to this complex problem must address the legitimate rights of the Palestinians and provide security for all in the region, including Israel.

Algeria lies at the northern edge of a continent beset by drought and famine. Mr. President, we applaud your government's humanitarian efforts to help your less fortunate neighbors, both by donating funds to supplement food and shelter for the people of the Sahel and by accepting and caring for thousands of refugees from the famine. Algeria has been a leader in African self-help efforts in this crisis and a shining example to others.

President and Madame Bendjedid, your visit to the United States is a new high point in Algerian and American relations, and we're honored to have you here. I'm happy to have the opportunity to get to know you as a leader of a great people and as a man of vision and strength.

President Bendjedid. Mr. President, first of all, I appreciate your kind words to me and in speaking of the Algerian people. I take great pleasure in expressing to you and through you to the American people, the sentiments of respect and friendship felt for you by the Algerian people.

Mr. President, Mr. Vice President, Excellencies, ladies and gentlemen, in this hospitable city that carries the prestigious name of one of the Founding Fathers of your great nation, allow me to evoke the deep historical roots of the relationship between our two countries, illustrated by the treaty of peace and friendship signed on the 5th of September 1795.

It equally pleases me to point out the similarity between the resistance of our two peoples to colonial occupation. Perhaps the best testimony to that is the foundation in 1846 of the city of Elkader -- or in Arabic, [different pronunciation] Elkader -- in the State of Iowa in memory of the Amir Abdel Kader Al Jaza'iri and of the Algerian national resistance. There is certainly in that symbol that our two people share the ideals of liberty and independence, as confirmed during our struggle for national independence.

It is thanks to your invitation, Mr. President, that I am here with you today at this important time in the development of our relations. I took personal pleasure in meeting you at Cancun. I also learned from Vice President Bush during his visit to Algeria the personal interest that you attach to a dialog between our two countries. It is indeed satisfying to observe that under your Presidency, exchanges between our two countries have been greatly reinforced and that many members of your Cabinet have contributed to that process.

Mr. President, beyond existing trade relations there is, in the development of our national economy, considerable potential for multifaceted cooperation between our countries. The genius of the American people has enabled man to conquer nature. Algeria aspires to enter an era of scientific and technical progress that will lead to the acquisition and mastery of advanced technology in various fields in order to spur our national development. This is another field for fruitful cooperation. On the whole, cooperation between our two countries has produced appreciable results. The expansion of these ties is both possible and desirable.

Confronted with the demands of peace, security, and development, nations known for their power and prosperity should make an even more substantial contribution. But whether the matter concerns reversal of the arms race, disarmament, or improving international political atmosphere through crises reduction and the elimination of tensions, or establishing more equitable economic relations and eradicating world hunger, the challenge is to create a better world for all.

The course of nonalignment, which inspires and guides the international policies of Algeria, seeks to promote harmony between all peoples, whatever the path they have chosen. The African Continent has witnessed the cumulative anguish of institutionalized racism, of desertification, of drought, and of famine. A universal outcry is necessary to achieve the dismantling of apartheid, the achievement of Namibian independence, and bring peace in southern Africa.

In the Middle East, it is Algeria's conviction that the Palestinian problem is at the heart of the crisis in that region. Therefore, Mr. President, recognition of the inalienable national rights of the Palestinian people is the only path to a just and durable peace in that region.

In the Maghreb, Algeria will never cease to work in the interest of regional stability. An effort must be made to find a negotiated solution based on an African and international consensus over the question of the Western Sahara.

In thanking you once again, Mr. President, for your kind invitation and for your courtesies to me and my delegation during our stay, I would like to propose a toast to friendship between the American and Algerian peoples; to understanding, agreement, and universal cooperation; to the health of Mrs. Reagan and yourself; to the health of Mrs. Bush and Vice President Bush; to the health of all the friends gathered here this evening.

The President. Ah, thank you. I thought maybe I might have missed you. Well, listen we know you've had some frustrations up there. But overall, I think we can all be proud of the fourth mission of the Discovery and all that you've accomplished.

I want to congratulate astronauts Bobko and Williams on the maneuvers you've been putting the shuttle through. This is the 16th shuttle to go up. And we're learning more about its versatility every trip.

I've seen you playing -- excuse me -- I mean demonstrating with balls and jacks and yo-yos and even a slinky toy in the zero-gravity of space. And now, I know you're doing this to make some education videotapes for students learning about the laws of physics. That's really the best thing about our space program -- the inspiration and challenge that it gives our young people.

You've been conducting extensive tests on the human body's blood flow and digestion. And I want to ask astronaut-physician Rhea Seddon, how are these tests working out? And, Rhea, I'd also like to commend you on your dexterity on hitting that pin on the side of the satellite. If you don't mind, I could think of a job on a ranch in California that you might be interested in.

Commander Bobko. Thank you very much, Mr. President. We certainly enjoy being here. And I'm sure you realize that we're just the people in space, who are the working edge of the great team that's on the ground supporting us. Thanks again.

Festival of India during his official visit to the United States in June. The Festival is an unprecedented, nationwide celebration which will include exhibitions, performance programs, symposia, and other educational projects in 37 States and more than 80 cities. The idea for this Year of India grew out of the visit in 1982 to Washington of Mr. Gandhi's mother, the late Prime Minister Indira Gandhi. At that time, Mrs. Gandhi and I agreed that the Festival would be an excellent vehicle for the people of the United States to learn of one of the world's most ancient and vibrant civilizations.

Recalling Mrs. Gandhi's vision for India and her devotion to the arts, it is appropriate that we dedicate this Festival of India to her memory. The Festival will comprise an affirmation of the universal value of the fascinating and richly varied civilization which was her personal heritage, as well as of the vitality of the great democracy to which she devoted her life.

Mr. Whitehead recently retired after a 37-year career with the international investment banking firm of Goldman, Sachs & Co., where he served as senior partner and cochairman. Since his retirement as senior partner, he has continued to serve as chairman of the firm's international advisory board. He has also been a director of many leading American corporations.

Mr. Whitehead has served as president of the International Rescue Committee and as a member of the Council on Foreign Relations and the Georgetown Center for Strategic and International Studies. He is a trustee of Haverford College and the Carnegie Corp., and a Commissioner of the President's Commission on Executive Exchange.

House. I'm always pleased to be able to meet with you who operate in the business in which every minute counts, where everyone struggles to maintain the highest quality while, at the same time, fighting against an ever-approaching deadline. Making a decision under pressure of a deadline can be helpful.

America is facing a deadline, of sorts, in the form of an ever-increasing national debt. Under the pressure building to come to grips with this problem, we have an opportunity to make real progress cutting spending, progress that should have been made a long time ago.

Now, it's not going to be easy. We went the extra mile to reach an agreement with the Republican leadership of the Senate, and I agreed to compromise concerning defense and domestic spending issues. Now, it may be hard to do, but it's about time that everybody in government gritted their teeth and started being part of the solution, rather than part of the problem.

The public doesn't want a tax increase, and more to the point, tax increases will not lower the level of deficit spending. Tax increases will not reduce government's demand on the private economy, which is the core of the problem. Tax increases would only serve to kick us back into recession, leading to higher deficits.

When it comes to taxes, what we need is simplification and reform, not increases. I think we can and will simplify the system and significantly reduce personal and corporate tax rates. We can lay the foundation for lower deficits and a vigorous expanding economy.

I see a consensus building on the idea of tax simplification. And the last few days' news should really make that build fast. If we can also agree on reasonable cuts in spending, there's every reason for optimism about America's economic future.

For years, we've known that we must get our fiscal house in order. Now, we have a proposal to do so that will encourage strong and steady growth without raising taxes, without jeopardizing assistance to the needy, and without endangering our security.

The news media is a vital part of decisions like this. That's why I'm talking about it here. Through you, people are made aware of the issues at hand and the alternatives and the consequences. Your function is vital to the viability of democracy. Without a free press democracy won't work, and all of our other rights would be in jeopardy.

One of the first institutions to be attacked by tyrants, whether they're dictators of the left or right, is the press. We've seen this happen far too often, and it's happening in Nicaragua today. It shouldn't be forgotten that the one incident that precipitated the uprising against the Somoza dictatorship was the assassination of Pedro Joaquin Chamorro, editor of La Prensa, the nation's largest and fiercely independent newspaper. Yet control of the press under the Somoza dictatorship, which was decried by the Sandinistas, was miniscule compared to the ironfisted censorship now endured today by Nicaraguan journalists.

Pedro Joaquin Chamorro, Jr., who took his father's place as editor of La Prensa, watched the insidious destruction of press freedom and the suppression of other fundamental human rights by the Communist regime, and he fled the country.

Today news in Nicaragua is as controlled as that in any Eastern European state. Even a broadcast of religious services has been interfered with. The papers are filled with what the Communists consider to be good news. And as Senator Pat Moynihan once observed, countries with newspapers filled with good news are likely to have jails filled with good people.

Social Christian Party were rounded up and imprisoned. To force them to confess to being counterrevolutionaries, more than a hundred family members of these political prisoners were also arrested. And that's the kind of country the Sandinistas are building.

The other night, I told of what was happening to those 10 or 11 prisoners. And it was straight out of the Cuban handbook. They're put in overheated, dark cells. Then they are fed at varying intervals, like 12 hours between 2 meals, but giving you the next meal 2 hours later and so forth.

This pattern, as I say, we've seen before. Bigger jails are being built, and they're called relocation camps. Refugees are pouring out of the country. What we're witnessing in Nicaragua is the imposition, with ever-increasing intensity, of a pro-Soviet dictatorship, serving as a base camp for the spread of communism in our hemisphere.

Several years ago, there was honest disagreement over the nature of the Sandinista regime. That regime had been obscuring its true goals, deceiving its own supporters, and using a reformist cover to lull the press and potential adversaries. But by now there have been too many incautious statements, leaked memos, and secretly recorded speeches to deny the violent character and intent of this dictatorship.

The Miami Herald, which only 8 months ago had not come to this conclusion, recently editorialized that the Sandinistas are indeed trying to establish another Cuba and that this is a severe threat to Central America and to our own national security.

If we permit the Soviets, using the Sandinistas, to establish a beachhead on the American mainland and to spread their subversion, the free world will face a major challenge to the geopolitical balance of power. Economic instability, political subversion, and terrorism and a flood of refugees will likely be the price of our paralysis. We could turn around one day and find a string of pro-Soviet dictatorships in Central America and a threat to our southern border.

Congress had better come to grips with just how high the stakes are if Central America is lost. I'm asking Congress to work with me to support our peace proposal and not to desert those who are struggling for democracy against the Communists. Together, we can prevent a crisis from happening.

And I'd like to request something of you, as well. I'm not asking for stories in support of my program in Central America. I only hope that the news media takes the time and effort to present both sides.

The Communist disinformation machine is hard at work. We have reason for concern in this account about charges against the freedom fighters. For example, the falsehood that the democratic resistance is mainly composed of ex-backers of Somoza, and this is patently untrue.

Last week, a major publication disclosed that in handling the story of alleged crimes committed by the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, it relied on information thought to be from an independent investigation. As it turned out, the supposed investigation had been carried out by people closely aligned with the Sandinistas and was done in close collaboration with that regime.

Q. Mr. President, we all know about the situation in Nicaragua and the threat it represents for this country and the hemisphere, but yet, don't you think that the people of the United States have gotten used to having, 90 miles away in Cuba, a Communist dictatorship, a sworn enemy?

The President. Do I think that they have become used to it, you say? I've never thought about that before, but this could be possible, that they've kind of wiped it out of their minds. I don't think, in government, we can afford to.

Nicaragua; there it's proceeded to the point of a revolutionary government, the Sandinistas. But we do know that throughout all of Latin America, under various names, there are guerrilla groups. And invariably, they have received their training, and they received their support and encouragement from Cuba. And they are assailing the duly elected governments in many of the democracies there in Latin America.

Q. Mr. President, to change the subject briefly, this is the month that marks the 10th anniversary of American disengagement from Vietnam. I wondered if you could give us a single recollection that you have, a vivid recollection of that time. And also, sir, tell us what lesson you believe that we've learned as a result of that experience.

The President. I hope we've learned some lessons. My recollections -- I was Governor at the time when that was going on. I was burned in effigy on every campus in California. Things have changed since then.

Oh, there are many memories. And one of the first would have to be that with all that was going on and with all the propaganda here in our own country and the forces that were rising up in opposition to that war was the unselfish heroism of the young men and women in our military who were over there and giving their lives and fighting and who believed in the cause they were fighting for.

I think if I had to come out with one thing learned, I would have to say that never again must a government of the United States ask young men to go out and fight and die for a cause that we're unwilling to win. And that was the great tragedy -- that was the great disgrace, to me, of Vietnam -- that they were fed into this meatgrinder, and yet, no one had any intention of allowing victory.

Well, the truth of the matter is, we did have victory. And incidentally, could I just say, one complaint that I have: We continue to talk about losing that war. We didn't lose that war. We won virtually every engagement. The Tet offensive was distorted back here in the reporting. That was a victory for our side.

But what happened? We signed the peace accords, having built up the South Vietnamese Army to where we thought that with our equipment and all, they could defend themselves. And we made a pledge to them that if the North Vietnamese violated the cease-fire, the peace accords, and attacked, that we would supply the fuel for the tanks and the helicopters that we'd left there; we would supply the ammunition for the guns and all for them to defend themselves. And when the North Vietnamese did violate the agreement and the blitz started toward the south and the then administration in Washington asked the Congress for the appropriations to keep our word, the Congress refused. We broke our pledge as a government on that basis.

Congress approve the aid for the Nicaraguan contras? Do you feel that this has to be a showdown vote next Tuesday, in some fashion, that pits the personality of the President against the Speaker in some fashion? Or do you want to see this worked out this afternoon?

And the plea that I'm making is that this is another one of those things where, historically, in our tradition of closing ranks at the water's edge -- we shouldn't be dealing with this as Democrats and Republicans. We should be dealing with it as Americans that have a problem involving our own national security and our relationship with friends and allies.

Now, many of the people that I've been meeting with are basically supportive of the plan, except they feel that there are others that are wavering one way or the other, that if we could make some alterations in the plan, keep basically the agreement or the arrangement that we have and the goal, but that there are places here and there and timing and so forth. And I have made it plain to all of them, we'd love to talk to them about that. My feet aren't in concrete on this. Yes, there's leeway.

The President. Well, as I say, we've been meeting, and I don't know that I would have a meeting with him, but I've been meeting with chairmen of committees. I've been meeting with groups. I've been meeting with individuals on all of this and have heard some of the proposals and have sent by them my word that this, this, and this in the plan -- yes, we're prepared to be flexible. Yes, we'd like to listen to alternate suggestions.

The President. Well, one that basically leaves the goal that what we're trying to get, in contrast to the propaganda of the Sandinistas that we're waiting with an upraised club to clobber them, that we want what the contras themselves asked for several weeks ago -- the laying down of arms, a cease-fire, and then the coming together in a peaceful negotiation as to how they can restore the original goals of the revolution.

And we've asked for this in connection with the Contadora countries and their participation. We're in total agreement with the 21 points that have been adopted by the Contadora countries. I have called personally and met with the leaders of the neighboring countries -- Honduras, Costa Rica, Guatemala, El Salvador. President Duarte has said this program of ours is the right idea at the right time. I have called Alfonsin, the President of Argentina, as a matter of fact, the President [Prime Minister] of Spain. And I've found widespread support among all of them for this plan.

And we've set a period here for negotiation and then a checkpoint at which, if there is no evidence that the one group is trying to negotiate seriously, that then there is a trigger there that opens up more aid from us to the contras.

Now, some have suggested that maybe that period should be longer. I'm very pleased -- I'd be very willing to sit down and discuss that with them as to whether it be longer, things to do with the fencing of the money and so forth, things to do with the assurance that the money would go to food and clothing and shelter, medicine for the families of the contras.

We know that there are some unusual problems that have come about basically through the credit situation with farmers and the fact that farmland was one of the great inflationary items that went up as a hedge against inflation and borrowing was done on that inflated value of the land. And now with the reduction of inflation, which I think is of value to all of us, that land price has gone down, and they find themselves unable to borrow or burdened with debts that no longer have the proper collateral surrounding them.

But I think we have to face one thing: The overall situation of the American farmer is due to government's interference in the first place. The two-thirds of farming that is out there not participant in any of the government regulation or subsidy programs does not have these economic problems and has been knowing an ever-increasing per capita consumption of its produce compared to the farms that are overly regulated with the Government.

Q. President Reagan, you say on the budget -- it's going to take a lot of giving on a lot of people's part. Well, something near and dear to a lot of people who live along the Northeast corridor is Amtrak. No hope for Amtrak?

Well, the Government has taken over the railroads again. We now have a sizable offer for Conrail, and I hope that the Congress will let us accept that offer, and we'll put freight back in the private sector, and we'll get a pretty good chunk of money. And the second, with Amtrak and the passenger traffic, I was told by the president of one of our leading rail lines that if the Government, in the beginning, had allowed the railroads to operate under the same rules and regulations that they applied to Amtrak, they wouldn't have had to give up the passenger traffic.

But now Amtrak is so subsidized that you have to wonder why people should be taxed to pay $35 for every passenger that gets on an Amtrak train in addition to the fare that that passenger's paying. And I gave one example here about a train in the Midwest that takes passengers in the winter down to Florida for the winter vacations, and I was given some figures that indicated that the Government could buy every one of the passengers on that train a roundtrip airline ticket and give them $100 spending money and be money ahead, instead of taking them down on Amtrak. I think it's time for us to admit we don't know how to run a railroad.

Q. Regarding the upcoming trip to West Germany -- 53 Senators have signed a letter requesting that you drop the trip to the cemetery. In light of this and the wave of other opposition, would it damage German-American relations to seek some other gesture of reconciliation and drop that visit? And secondly, would you say that it was a failure of political analysis to realize the fallout that resulted from the itinerary as it was scheduled?

Now, the summit places us in Bonn in Germany close to the time of the anniversary. And he invited me to accept an invitation to be a state visitor following the summit meeting. And he suggested to me this visit, as he had done with Mitterrand, to a cemetery there. The cemetery that was picked, Bitburg, was picked because at the same time, also, there has been a church service with our military at Bitburg -- we have a base there and our Americans -- and I'm going there and go to church with them and have lunch with them. And the Kohls will be with us, also.

When the invitation to visit a concentration camp was offered, whether it was my confusion or the way in which it was done, I thought that the suggestion had come from an individual and was not a part of the state visit. And I thought there was no way that I, as the guest of the government at that point, could on my own take off and go someplace and, then, run the risk of appearing as if I was trying to say to the Germans, ``Look what you did,'' and all of this when most of the people in Germany today weren't alive or were very small children when this was happening.

And I know the feeling they have. And I know this government that for 40 years -- what he'd asked me to do in the cemetery was that we should start this day now, observing this day as the day that 40 years ago the world took a sharp turn, an end to the hatred, an end to the obscenities of the persecution and all that took place. And today, after 40 years of peace, here we are -- our staunchest allies in that summit are the countries that were our enemies in World War II. Now, their leaders have come here and visited Arlington, leaders from Germany, from Italy, from Japan.

But there are 2,000 graves there. And most of those -- the average age is about 18. These were those young teenagers that were conscripted, forced into military service in the closing days of the Third Reich, when they were short of manpower, And we're the victor, and they're there. And it seemed to me that this could be symbolic, also, of saying -- what I said about -- what this day should be. And let's resolve, in their presence, as well as in the presence of our own troops, that this must never happen again.

The President. I think that it would be very hurtful and all it would do is leave me looking as if I caved in in the face of some unfavorable attention. I think that there's nothing wrong with visiting that cemetery, where those young men are victims of nazism also, even though they were fighting in the German uniform, drafted into service to carry out the hateful wishes of the Nazis. They were victims, just as surely as the victims in the concentration camps. And I feel that there is much to be gained from this, in strengthening our relationship with the German people, who, believe me, live in constant penance, all these who have come along in these later years for what their predecessors did and for which they're very ashamed.

Britannica companies, and the Council of Chief State School Officers for sponsoring the Teacher of the Year Award. We're very happy to welcome a contingent of aspiring teachers today, and we're delighted to welcome the family members and associates of our most distinguished guest.

All of us are here to honor a very special American. She and her colleagues are day by day, in their quiet, unsung way, probably more important to the survival and the success of our freedom than anyone else in this nation. And that's how much teachers mean to America.

Good teachers must be so many different people: our child's third parent and lifelong friend; the person who makes hard things seem easy; who teaches us to think apart, yet act together; and who conveys the meaning of ideas and, through personal example, the nobility of ideals.

Each gifted instructor, each leader helping restore excellence in education today is a vessel of hope for America -- hope that ignorance may be cast away; hope that young minds may be awakened to new discovery; and yes, hope that we may always be free, for with freedom, our guiding star, America's future will never be a burden dragging us down but a great soaring adventure of creativity, powered by the deepest treasures of the human mind and heart -- wisdom, faith, and love.

Mrs. Dozier, for all that you do so well, not only teaching but coordinating homecoming half-time activities, cheerleading in the student-faculty basketball game, and even dressing up for Punk Rock Day -- [laughter] -- we salute you.

Let me just say for the entire country, what your family, your fellow members of the faculty, and your students at Irmo High already know, you are Teacher of the Year because you've taught so many, so much, and so well, and even more, because your gift has given them joy and love of learning. And I don't think I'm speaking out of school when I add, the love they share for learning is a love they share for you.

Q. Mr. President, you are going to Europe to take part in the economic summit. Europe is not in its best shape economically, contrary to the United States. Do you think that the recipe you used so successfully in your country will work for the rest of the world?

The President. We have been pleased at the pace of the U.S. recovery, especially our record in job creation. It has required some difficult choices, but we continue to move in the direction of a freer, more competitive economy. We are already reaping the benefits in many sectors. U.S. businesses, for example, have enjoyed a substantial rise in the real rate of return to investment, and this has further contributed to the recovery.

Our European allies are now entering a recovery phase, although their rates of growth and job creation remain below their potential. Some European governments have stated that they consider structural rigidities, especially in labor markets, to be the major obstacle to improved growth and job creation, and they are looking at new alternatives. Every country must choose its own path, but I hope our success in America might serve as an example.

We will be discussing economic strategies at the Bonn Economic Summit. I look forward to the exchange of views. While each country has a different resource base, different needs, and approaches, there is much to be learned from this sharing of national experiences.

Q. There is a certain concern in Europe about the Strategic Defense Initiative. Some fear that it will accelerate the arms race, while others suspect that it will only defend American cities. Do you find these fears justified?

January that the new set of arms control negotiations should aim to prevent an arms race in space and to terminate it on Earth, to limit and reduce nuclear arms, and to strengthen strategic stability.

SDI is examining technologies which may make possible nonnuclear defenses against ballistic missiles. If these technologies prove themselves, they would enhance deterrence and stability by discouraging any aggressor from contemplating a first strike. If successful, our efforts will direct resources of both sides away from offense to defenses, and thus pave the way for further reductions in offensive nuclear arsenals. Over the long run, new defensive technologies may make possible the elimination of nuclear weapons.

Our security is inextricably linked to that of our allies, and SDI is an investment in our mutual security. SDI research is designed to examine technologies with applicability not only to intercontinental-range ballistic missiles but also to shorter range missiles. So, I think that the concerns you mention are not valid, that SDI research is an important part of the search for peace and stability in the world.

Q. Your visit will also coincide with the 40th anniversary of the end of World War II, which meant the end of fascism and the division of Europe. Everything indicates that fascism does not have a chance to reappear. Do you think that the division of Europe is also an irrevocable fact?

Minister Gonzalez. Our two governments consult closely on a variety of subjects, just as we do with other friends and allies. And aside from the official part of the relationship, there is a constant exchange in trade, culture, and education that helps cement the traditional ties of friendship between our two countries. Of course, the many Americans of Spanish descent make us feel especially close to Spain. We've been very interested in Spain's progress as a democracy -- the form of government we believe in and one which is now the trend in Central and South America.

So, I think the security of the entire Western World is enhanced by the participation of each member of the NATO alliance. But, as with every other country in NATO, it is up to Spain to decide how best to meet its own security requirements.

Democracy implies a marketplace of ideas, some conflicting ones, but an opportunity for everyone to look, examine, and then choose. But it's good to remember that to interfere with the representation of ideas is not democratic. Of course, it's pointless to speculate about what extremists might or might not do, either in Spain or elsewhere. I am sure that the traditional warmth, friendly hospitality, and courtesy that have been hallmarks of the Spanish people will be the things we remember after this visit.

Q. Mr. President, as you know, Spain has a special relationship with Latin America. How do you see the situation there, including Cuba, Chile, and Nicaragua, especially considering that the Sandinistas have asked Mr. Gonzalez to act as a mediator between them and your administration?

The President. Well, we value Spain's counsel on Latin America as on a wide variety of other subjects. I think the U.S. and Spain agree on what we would like in Latin America -- democratic governments, economic progress, and regional peace and stability. Each of those goals reinforces the others. Progress has been made, but there is a lot more we all have to do.

In that connection, Spain is playing an important role in fostering democracy in Latin America, above all by virtue of the example it has set over the past decade. We, too, are trying to promote democracy, as well as equitable economic growth through development assistance programs and private sector investment.

The President. One of the greatest strengths of our nation is the rich mixture of people from various cultural backgrounds, and few groups have contributed more to our nation than Americans of Hispanic heritage. In many communities across the land, Hispanics are a vital element in fostering America's achievements in the arts and industry, in agriculture and education, in religion and business, in science and politics, and in every other aspect of American life.

Hispanic Americans were among the first settlers in the New World, some arriving in America long before the United States became an independent nation. They came in search of a better life for themselves and their children, and they have helped to create a richer life for all of us.

In our international relations, Hispanic Americans also contribute to our nation's identity -- our own perception of who we are and our role in the world, as well as others' perception of us. The strong family and cultural ties which bind Hispanics in the United States with our nearest neighbors and with Spain are an important element of the strength of the Western Hemisphere and the world. We Americans seek economic progress and justice for mutual benefit throughout the hemisphere and throughout the world, and we look to Americans of Hispanic heritage for leadership as we work together toward these goals.

The President. Well, I'd better leave it to history to be the judge of that. But our basic goals are pretty straightforward: at home, to keep the economy growing while reducing the burden of taxes; and in the world, to keep the peace and preserve freedom, while fostering economic prosperity.

I think we've made a lot of progress in these areas, but I'm the first to recognize that the job is far from finished. The secret to achieving all these goals is individual freedom -- releasing the creative energies of the human spirit. I hope history will say that we moved in that direction during my time.

Week. We recall today the great accomplishments in science, philosophy, literature, art, and music made throughout history by the Jewish people. And we remember that it is the spiritual and moral values of Judaism which encompass the dream of peace and human dignity that has enabled the Jewish people -- and ennobled the Jewish people, I should say, and through them, their fellow men.

But this week, we commemorate a nondeliverance, a time when exodus was refused, when the doors of refuge were closed, and in their place came death. In the Passover narrative, the Haggadah, there is the phrase, ``In every generation, they rise up against us to annihilate us.'' In the generation of the Holocaust, that annihilation nearly succeded in Europe; 6 million murdered, among them, over a million children.

We kept it when we supported the establishment of the state of Israel, the refuge that the Jewish people lacked during the Holocaust, the dream of generations, the sure sign of God's hand in history. America will never waver in our support for that nation to which our ties of faith are unbreakable.

Today we work on and on to help Soviet Jewry, which suffers from persecution, intimidation, and imprisonment within Soviet borders. We will never relinquish our hope for their freedom, and we will never cease to work for it. If the Soviet Union truly wants peace, truly wants friendship, then let them release Anatoly Shcharanskiy and free Soviet Jewry.

But our pledge was more than ``Never again.'' It was also ``Never forget.'' And we've kept that pledge, too. We kept that pledge when we established the Holocaust Memorial Commission and set the cornerstone for its museum. We keep that pledge when, in our colleges and universities, we teach each new generation of Americans the story of the Holocaust. And in our lives, we keep that pledge when we privately, in our own families and in our hearts, remember.

From the ashes of the Holocaust emerged the miracle of Israel and another miracle, that the survivors began life again. They came to new lands, many to Israel and many, thank God, to America. They built new families and with each child gave us the greatest symbol of this faith in the future. They brought to us the eloquence of a people who, in surviving such suffering, asked only for the right to remember and be remembered, a people who did not permit themselves to descend into the pits and quagmires of hatred but lifted themselves instead -- and with them all of humankind -- out of darkness up toward a time when hatred is no more and all nations and all people are as one.

We who had not suffered the tragedy of the Holocaust directly shared their grief and mourned for their victims. We, too, prayed for a better future and a better world, where all peoples and all nations would come together in peace and defense of humanity.

As the people of Europe rebuilt their shattered lands, the survivors rebuilt their shattered lives, and they did so despite the searing pain. And we who are their fellow citizens have taken up their memories and tried to learn from them what we must do. No one has taught us more than Elie Wiesel. His life stands as a symbol; his life is testimony that the human spirit endures and prevails.

He teaches about despair but also about hope. He teaches about our capacity to do evil but also about the possibility of courage and resistance and about our capacity to sacrifice for a higher good. He teaches about death. But in the end, he teaches about life.

In honoring Elie Wiesel, we thank him for a life that's dedicated to others. We pledge that he will never forget -- or that we will never forget that in many places of the world, the cancer of anti-Semitism still exists. Beyond our fervent hopes and our anguished remembrance, we must not forget our duty to those who perished, our duty to bring justice to those who perpetrated unspeakable deeds. And we must take action to root out the vestiges of anti-Semitism in America, to quash the violence-prone or hate groups even before they can spread their venom and destruction. And let all of us, Jew and non-Jew alike, pledge ourselves today to the life of the Jewish dream: to a time when war is no more, when all nations live in peace, when each man, woman, and child lives in the dignity that God intended.

Mr. President, speaking of reconciliation, I was very pleased that we met before so a stage of reconciliation has been set in motion between us. But then we were never on two sides; we were on the same side. We were always on the side of justice, always on the side of memory, against the SS, and against what they represent.

It was good talking to you, and I'm grateful to you for the medal. But this medal is not mine alone. It belongs to all those who remember what SS killers have done to their victims. It was given to me by the American people for my writings, teaching, and for my testimony.

When I write, I feel my invisible teachers standing over my shoulders, reading my words and judging their veracity. And while I feel responsible for the living, I feel equally responsible to the dead. Their memory dwells in my memory.

Forty years ago, a young man awoke, and he found himself an orphan in an orphaned world. What have I learned in the last 40 years -- small things. I learned the perils of language and those of silence. I learned that in extreme situations when human lives and dignity are at stake, neutrality is a sin. It helps the killers not the victims. I learned the meaning of solitude, Mr. President. We were alone, desperately alone. Today is April 19th, and April 19, 1943, the Warsaw Ghetto rose in arms against the onslaught of the Nazis. They were so few and so young and so helpless, and nobody came to their help. And they had to fight what was then the mightiest legion in Europe.

You spoke of Jewish children, Mr. President; one million Jewish children perished. If I spent my entire life reciting their names, I would die before finishing the task. Mr. President, I have seen children -- I have seen them being thrown in the flames alive. Words -- they die on my lips.

I have learned that the Holocaust was a unique and uniquely Jewish event, albeit with universal implications. Not all victims were Jews, but all Jews were victims. I have learned the danger of indifference, the crime of indifference. For the opposite of love, I have learned, is not hate but indifference. Jews were killed by the enemy but betrayed by their so-called allies who found political reasons to justify their indifference or passivity.

But I've also learned that suffering confers no privileges. It all depends what one does with it. And this is why survivors of whom you spoke, Mr. President, have tried to teach their contemporaries how to build on ruins, how to invent hope in a world that offers none, how to proclaim faith to a generation that has seen it shamed and mutilated. And I believe, we believe, that memory is the answer -- perhaps the only answer.

Mr. President, we are grateful to the American Army for liberating us. We are grateful to this country -- the greatest democracy in the world, the freest nation in the world, the moral nation, the authority in the world. And we are grateful especially to this country for having offered haven and refuge and grateful to its leadership for being so friendly to Israel.

Mr. President, do you know that the Ambassador of Israel, who sits next to you, who is my friend and has been for so many years, is himself a survivor? And if you knew all the causes we fought together for the last 30 years, you could be prouder of him. And we are proud of him.

And we are grateful, of course, to Israel; we are eternally grateful to Israel for existing. We needed Israel in 1948 as we need it now. And we are grateful to Congress for its continuous philosophy of humanism and compassion for the underprivileged.

And as for yourself, Mr. President, we are so grateful to you for being a friend of the Jewish people, for trying to help the oppressed Jews in the Soviet Union and to do whatever we can to save Shcharanskiy and Abe Stolyar and Iosif Begun and Sakharov and all the dissidents who need freedom. And of course, we thank you for your support of the Jewish state of Israel.

We have met four or five times, and each time I came away enriched, for I know of your commitment to humanity. And, therefore, I am convinced, as you have told us earlier when we spoke that you were not aware of the presence of SS graves in the Bitburg cemetery. Of course, you didn't know. But now we all are aware. May I, Mr. President, if it's possible at all, implore you to do something else, to find a way, to find another way, another site. That place, Mr.

Oh, we know there are political and strategic reasons, but this issue, as all issues related to that awesome event, transcends politics and diplomacy. The issue here is not politics but good and evil. And we must never confuse them, for I have seen the SS at work, and I have seen their victims. They were my friends. They were my parents. Mr. President, there was a degree of suffering and loneliness in the concentration camps that defies imagination. Cut off from the world with no refuge anywhere; sons watched helplessly their fathers being beaten to death; mothers watched their children die of hunger. And then there was Mengele and his selections, terror, fear, isolation, torture, gas chambers, flames -- flames rising to the heavens.

But, Mr. President, I know and I understand, we all do, that you seek reconciliation. So do I. So do we. And I, too, wish to attain true reconciliation with the German people. I do not believe in collective guilt, nor in collective responsibility; only the killers were guilty. Their sons and daughters are not. And I believe, Mr. President, that we can and we must work together with them and with all people. And we must work to bring peace and understanding to a tormented world that, as you know, is still awaiting redemption.

Christianity and Islam -- can recognize their roots in Judaism. Western literature owes many of its most inspiring themes and allusions to the Hebrew Bible. Great Jewish thinkers -- from Philo of Alexandria, to Maimonides and Saadya Gaon, to Spinoza and Martin Buber -- have engaged in powerful symbiotic dialogue with Christian and Muslim writers to add vital insights to the Western philosophical tradition. In addition, individual Jews have made extraordinary contributions to the arts, literature, sciences, and humanities.

Inquisition to pogroms throughout Europe. None of these remotely approaches the genocidal undertaking of the Nazis who planned the wholesale destruction of European Jewry. In our own time this plan was conceived and, before we could stop it, it had taken the lives of six million Jewish men, women, and children.

Even as we herald the glory of the Jewish heritage, we commemorate as well Jewish suffering in this era. It is up to us to show the way out of this shameful cycle. We must remember the sins of the past and rededicate ourselves to shaping a future marked by tolerance, respect, and compassion. We must rededicate ourselves to the proposition that the Holocaust will remain a solitary horror and that its like will never be repeated.

Egpyt and the deliverance from slavery. The Jewish people came forth from the house of bondage and flowered with an abundance of creativity which has maintained itself until the present day. We learn from this that the emergence from slavery to freedom can release powers hidden within the human spirit, as the Jewish people have once again shown since the end of the Nazi terror. The faith in God and in the Jewish people which sustained them through these tribulations has infused new life into the Jewish communities in America and the State of Israel.

In recognition of the special significance of this time of year for America's Jews, in tribute to the contributions they have made to American life, and in an effort to foster understanding and appreciation of the cultural diversity that has made America a unique society, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 17, has designated April 21 through April 28, 1985, as ``Jewish Heritage Week'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

The primary function of a government is to ensure that its citizens can live safely in their communities. Yet each year millions of our citizens face the reality of violent crime, and their lives are forever changed by these acts. Many are afraid to leave their homes after dark. Others are barricaded inside with multiple locks on their doors and steel bars on their windows.

The strength of our justice system depends, in large part, upon the willingness of the innocent victims of crime to cooperate with it. Unless victims participate in the judicial process, society cannot punish criminals and prevent them from committing more crimes. While we need the help of innocent victims, they in turn deserve our support. They do not ask for pity. They ask only for our support as they recover from an unexpected, unwanted, and undeserved trauma.

After decades when most concern was focused on the rights of criminals, the public has recognized that the victims of criminals have rights also. Guided by the recommendations of the President's Task Force on Victims of Crime, my Administration is striving to ensure fair treatment for innocent victims. We are working with national organizations, as well as State and local agencies, to help people whose lives have been shattered through no fault of their own.

Act of 1984, which offers unprecedented assistance to States to meet some of the needs of the targets of violent behavior. We have examined in particular the plight of people who are assaulted by people they know and trust, and we have proposed reforms to assure them the full protection of the law. It is the nature of the crime, not the relationship of the victim to the offender, that should guide the actions of the justice system.

We may reduce the frequency of violent crime, but we will never eliminate it. Every year millions of our fellow citizens will face it for the first time, and millions more will continue to face the daily challenge of lives forever changed by it. As citizens of a Nation promising justice for all, they must be treated with respect and compassion.

Since our first days in office the problem of crime has been a major concern of this administration, even while we had to act immediately to deal with the twin crises of a declining economy and a jeopardized national defense. Making our homes and streets safe again remained among our highest priorities. At the time we took office, government was bloated and had taken on responsibilities in areas where it was neither competent nor needed. Yet, at the same time government was failing in its most legitimate and important functions, particularly preserving domestic order and protecting society from those who would prey on the innocent.

In the past few years we've seen a return to the values that are the basis for a free and a just society: the belief that right and wrong matters, that individuals are responsible for their actions, and that punishment must be swift and sure for those who transgress against the rights of their fellow citizens. It was such values and beliefs that guided us when we took office.

In the early years of this administration we launched a massive attack on the illegal drug trade and on the infrastructure of organized crime, achieving a leap in the number of prosecuters and agents who are assigned to these cases, in the number of drug cases filed, and in the number of drug convictions. We appointed judges who understood that the innocent members of society have a right to be protected from criminal offenders. We achieved some of the most significant anticrime legislation in our history, accomplishing desperately needed reforms in parole and sentencing procedures and in a wide variety of other areas, reforms that will make life tougher for career criminals and easier for the law-abiding. Indeed, we need to make life tough for many criminals, as is illustrated in the fact that the median time served for the crime of murder is 5 years, 3 months and for rape, 2 years, 9 months. This is intolerable.

At the local and State level, too, the voice of the people was heard. States passed tough new sentencing requirements; judges or prosecutors who were lax in their duty were held up to public scrutiny, and communities and neighborhoods began a new era of cooperation with law enforcement to protect lives and liberty.

I know there are some who claim this is merely a reflection of demographic trends, that there's less crime now because there are fewer members of our society who are in the crime-prone age group. But a coincidence is not a causation.

For example, during the 1960's crime rose at a much faster rate than did the crime-prone age group. Between the years 1976 and 1981, the number in the crime-prone age group rose by less than 1 percent; yet violent crime rose by over 35 percent. A critical reason for the rise in crime in past years was a failure to administer prompt and sure justice.

During the 1960's the likelihood of being imprisoned if arrested for a serious crime fell by 75 percent. In recent years these figures have turned around. The likelihood of going to prison now is almost twice as high as it was in 1970.

That fact must be acknowledged and its meaning understood. It's happening because our criminal justice system is responding to the public outcry over crime. It's happening because we're doing more to protect the innocent and punish the guilty. And that's why, today, our homes, our families, and our societies are safer.

America's social progress can usually be found -- the resolve of the American people to speak out, to make their voices heard, to demand justice. There's no better example of this resolve than the work of those we honor here today, who have worked with their fellow citizens to bring public attention to the plight of the victims of crime.

I'm proud that this administration led the way in passing new legislation and new programs for the victims of crime. But most of all, I share the pride of all Americans today in honoring those who have, through their work for the victims of crime, turned anguish and fear into constructive action.

Linebaugh, and Sharon Komlos. Each of you rose above the fear and the frustration that all victims of crime must face. You turned terrible moments in your lives into something beneficial and helpful to your fellow Americans. You used your suffering so that others would suffer less.

Our American tradition of neighbor helping neighbor has always been one of our greatest strengths and most noble traditions. American ingenuity, coupled with organizational know-how, has provided the basis for innovative approaches to meeting the needs of our communities.

The spirit of voluntarism and compassion for others is a vital part of our national character. Each year close to a hundred million Americans help their neighbors through voluntary service. Citizens from every walk of life volunteer their time, energy and resources to help those less fortunate than themselves. We can never fully measure the positive effects that each kind word or deed has upon this great and wonderful land of ours.

One of the chief aims of my Administration has been to emphasize the vital contributions which individuals, families and private organizations make to our community life. Every day we are learning about successful Private Sector Initiatives which are the result of people caring about other people. It is my hope that during National Volunteer Week, American volunteers both at home and around the world, will receive the recognition they deserve for their generosity. It is also my hope that still more Americans will be inspired to join these volunteers who are the backbone of our community life.

And so I hail the spirit of compassionate patriotic enterprise that National Volunteer Week is meant to strengthen. I ask my fellow Americans to exercise their right and responsibility to take an active role in their neighborhoods, town, cities and their nation.

Secretaries Week offers us a yearly occasion to recognize the indispensable part played by secretaries not only in our nation's commerce and industry but in other activities essential to society, such as government and the professions.

In many cases the order and smooth functioning of an enterprise hinge on the efficiency and alertness of secretaries. Their attention to detail is well known. Communications would be cumbersome without them. It is no exaggeration to say that their work is essential.

With the rapid progress of technology, new challenges face secretaries. To maintain current standards they must often master new techniques of communication, and of the storage and retrieval of information. Constantly advancing systems of administration make the work of secretaries more efficient but at the same time make it more demanding. Secretaries often bear the heaviest responsibilities for adapting to new techniques.

I am happy to call attention to the important role of secretaries in our national life, and to the demands that their responsibilities place upon them. Nancy joins me in saluting the indispensable role they play in our nation's life.

In a few days, Congress will vote on whether or not to support our proposal to help restore peace and democracy in Nicaragua. Few votes will ever be so important to the survival of democracy in Latin America and the Caribbean. Few votes will ever be so important to the national security of the United States.

On March 1st, the leaders of the democratic resistance of Nicaragua, the so-called contras, sent a peace proposal to the Communists, who've taken over their country. The proposal called for a cease-fire and church-mediated negotiations that would lead to free and honest elections.

Negotiations would be our best and possibly last opportunity to steer the Sandinista Communists away from their present brutal course and back toward the democratic and peaceful promises of their revolution.

The responsibility now rests squarely on the shoulders of Congress. A vote for humanitarian aid to the democratic resistance will signal the United States' resolve on this issue. And courage and resolve are the only way to convince the Sandinista Communists to come to the negotiating table.

A vote against our proposal, however, could mean the beginning of the end to all hopes of peace and democracy in Central America. Already, the followers of Qadhafi and the Ayatollah Khomeini are in Nicaragua -- about 2 hours by air from United States borders. And just this week, we confirmed the presence of Russian military personnel in the battle zones of northern Nicaragua.

The Soviet terrorist-bloc nations know what is at stake in Nicaragua. That's why, in the 7 months since Congress cut off aid to the democratic resistance, they've been pouring in weapons and personnel to their Communist allies, hoping to wipe out the democratic forces while they're most vulnerable.

And that's why, rather than negotiate with the democratic resistance, the Communists are still betting that the United States will abandon its friends. A recent article in the New York Times reported that the ``Sandinistas pin hopes on Congress.'' You heard me right. The Sandinista Communists are lobbying your Senators and Representatives. Together with the misguided sympathizers in this country, they've been running a sophisticated disinformation campaign of lies and distortion.

Communists may put forth an 11th hour so-called peace proposal, a proposal aimed at blocking aid to the democratic resistance and giving the Communists a free hand to tighten their grip on the Nicaraguan people. The Communists know that if they can persuade Congress to cut off aid, they'll never have to negotiate with the democratic opposition. And they believe if they can stop aid to the democratic resistance, nothing can stop them.

Unfortunately, some are using this issue to play partisan politics. Before we'd even announced our peace plan, the Speaker of the House called our peace offer a dirty trick. How could church-mediated peace negotiations be a dirty trick? Do they really think the church would ever cooperate in a trick?

The opponents of our plan in the House have announced a formula for turning the democratic resistance into homeless refugees. Their alternative to a plan for peace and democracy would only provide assistance to the democratic forces if they abandon their struggle to liberate Nicaragua -- in other words, surrender to communism. They would, in fact, aid the Soviet-Cuban-Sandinista effort to get rid of the democratic resistance.

Let me speak plainly. Any proposal that abandons over 15,000 members of a democratic resistance to Communists is not a compromise; it's a shameful surrender. If Congress ever approves such a proposal, it would hasten the consolidation of Nicaragua as a Communist-terrorist arsenal. And it would give a green light to Soviet-sponsored aggression throughout the American mainland, ultimately threatening our own security.

Today we kick off a week of activities that are honoring the spirit of voluntarism, a spirit which we can see by you gathered in this room is very much alive and still growing in America. It's no overstatement to say that America is a nation of volunteers.

I think philosophers might want to contemplate the question: Why is the freest nation on Earth also the one in which it is so common to see people from every walk of life -- rich and poor, young and old -- rolling up their sleeves and pitching in to help others? Maybe it's just that we want to say thank you to the Lord who blessed our country with freedom. And the best way to do that is to care for our fellow human beings. And maybe that's why polls say that most Americans agree that no matter how big and powerful government gets and how many services it provides, it can never take the place of volunteers.

This is the fourth year that we've been giving these awards, and I thought you might be interested to hear some current news of those who've been honored in the past. Like America's volunteer spirit, their activities continue to grow, reaching out to help more and more people.

Two years ago, a group of concerned mothers received an award for their efforts to combat drunk driving. Since then, Mothers Against Drunk Driving, or MADD, as they're known, has tripled in size, and now it has chapters in almost every State of the Union. I don't think there's any question that it has been largely their energy and determination there that has helped bring about a significant drop in fatalities due to drunk driving.

These are just a few examples of how volunteers make a difference. But these generous people are not alone. Recently it seemed as if all of America volunteered to help feed the starving in Africa. The plight on that unfortunate continent inspired some of the most generous giving in history, with private donations from Americans topping $100 million. I guess it's true that if you tap any American deeply enough, you'll find a volunteer.

We're going to be giving out only 18 Volunteer Action Awards today and 44 citations. The difficult part was singling out those relative few from the thousands upon thousands of worthy Americans. But in honoring you, we honor them and the best in every American -- that selfless giving spirit of voluntarism, which lends a helping hand in brotherhood and neighborliness to those in need.

In 1972 she founded the National Committee for Prevention of Child Abuse, a volunteer organization that became a catalyst in heightening international awareness of child abuse. It's estimated that, while only 1 in 10 people were concerned with child abuse in 1972, today nearly 90 percent know about it, are aware and concerned, and want to help with this problem.

Clem Stone, would you please come up here to accept this award for your daughter, Donna. The good work that she did will live on in the organization that she founded and in the hearts and minds of the children that she helped from abuse and tragedy. Congratulations to you and yours.

I was profoundly saddened to learn of the untimely demise of President-elect Neves. It is a tragic event for his family and for Brazil. In my meeting with him last February, I was deeply impressed by both his human warmth and his intellectual insight. He was indeed a man for the time and his country, and will be sorely missed.

Brazil will be well-served by the heirs of Tancredo's legacy. I am confident that you and the members of his cabinet, inspired by his memory, will provide the leadership Brazil needs at this critical hour.

I would like to express my most profound condolences to you and the people of Brazil, at your great loss. My prayers, and those of Brazil's many friends in the United States, are with you as you take up your new responsibilities.

Since 1981 Mr. Kuhn has been serving as a staff assistant in the Presidential Advance Office. In that capacity, he coordinated the development and execution of Presidential events at and away from the White House.

Of the remaining 44 decisions, 22 dismissed claims for lack of jurisdiction, 3 partially dismissed claims for lack of jurisdiction, 13 dismissed claims on the merits, one approved the withdrawal of a claim, four were awards in favor of the Government of Iran, and one was an award in favor of the United States Government.

With the arrival of the two new Iranian arbitrators, the Chambers have once again begun hearing and deciding cases. On March 1, the Tribunal awarded R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co. an additional $12 million in interest on its claim, the decision in which was described in my last report. In total, more than 35 percent of the claims for over $250,000 have now been disposed of through adjudication, settlement, or voluntary withdrawal, leaving 344 such claims on the docket.

These claims include a claim on behalf of the Agency for International Development for over $38 million based on outstanding developmental loans to the Government of Iran. In addition, the Department of State, working together with the Department of the Treasury and the Department of Justice, filed responsive pleadings in two major interpretive disputes. One related to Iran's claim to over $400 million remaining from funds transferred pursuant to the Algiers Accords for payment of Iran's syndicated debt. The other was in response to Iran's allegations that the United States breached its obligation under the Algiers Accords to terminate litigation against Iran. The Department of State also filed pleadings in four other interpretive disputes. The Tribunal held one hearing in an interpretive dispute on whether the Tribunal has jurisdiction to arbitrate approximately 111 claims brought by Iran directly against U.S. banks which do not involve standby letters of credit. Finally, two of the Tribunal's chambers have confirmed that action will be taken on or about May 20 to strike or otherwise dispose of 248 claims brought by Iran against U.S. banks based on standby letters of credit.

Iran's claims against them. About 17 banks have yet to settle their claims. In addition, attorneys from the Department of the Treasury and the Federal Reserve Bank of New York have been negotiating an ``Agreed Clarification'' with Bank Markazi to allow the payment from Dollar Account No. 2 of certain amounts still owing on Iran's syndicated debt.

Prehearing conferences and hearings that had been cancelled are being rescheduled. The Tribunal has made provision for the issuance of awards in cases heard prior to the removal of the two Iranian arbitrators and the resignations of President Lagergren and Chairmen Riphagen and Mangard. This resumption of Tribunal activities provides reason to expect that more progress will be made in the coming months.

Increased trade strengthens our own economy, as well as helping to sustain and spread world economic growth. American exports help create new growth opportunities for our businesses and new opportunities for employment for our workers. To the American consumer, freer and fairer trade has meant better products in greater variety and at lower prices.

Through contact with other societies, we receive new ideas and gain a better understanding of our traditional values. We reinforce our ties of amity and peace with other countries through strong bonds of commercial interest and mutual respect.

We Americans are used to a role of responsible leadership in world affairs. It is a role we value, and it has won us the respect of other nations. We know that more jobs, greater prosperity, and dynamic economies are based on freer and fairer trade. Other countries take courage from our confidence and competitive spirit.

Despite stronger competition for world markets, record trade deficits, and a growing threat of protectionism abroad, the United States has resisted the temptation to adopt self-defeating protectionist measures of its own. We have called upon other countries to open their markets to fair competition. We are working with our trading partners to launch a new round of multilateral trade negotiations by early next year aimed at opening markets worldwide.

Americans can be proud that economic growth in the United States has helped fuel the recovery of our trading partners who can now affort to buy more of our goods and services. Americans can be proud of the U.S. commitment to policies promoting unrestricted trade and investment consistent with our security interests.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

On several recent occasions, I have asked the American people to be aware of the opportunities to donate their organs, and I have made special pleas for young children in need of liver transplants. The response proved to be overwhelming. Tragically, however, many desperately ill persons, including young children, have died while awaiting a suitable organ.

The need for organs far surpasses the number donated each year. To increase the availability of organs for transplantation, I signed the National Organ Transplant Act on October 19, 1984. This law created an Office of Organ Transplantation in the Public Health Service and authorized a Task Force on Organ Transplantation.

The Pacific Ocean today is ringed by a large number of successful developed and developing nations. So rapid has the progress of this area been that many scholars are beginning to speak of an emerging Pacific Civilization similar to the Mediterranean Civilization of the ancient world or the Atlantic Civilization of modern times. America is well-placed to play a major role in this emerging civilization not only because of its geographic position but also because many of its citizens are themselves of Asian and Pacific ancestry.

Whether as immigrants to our country or as native inhabitants in the islands of the Pacific Ocean, they have retained a strong sense of traditional values emphasizing vital family and communal bonds. These values remain strong today and play an important role in the success achieved by these proud Americans.

Asian and Pacific Americans have been successful in virtually every field of endeavor. Through their achievements in many areas, they have enriched the lives of all Americans. By sharing their cultures with other Americans, they have increased our Nation's rich cultural vitality. Asian and Pacific Americans have truly helped the United States to fulfill its most cherished ideals.

The Free Trade Area Agreement is the first such agreement entered into by the United States. It fully meets the international rules regarding free trade areas contained in the GATT. When fully implemented in January 1995, the agreement will eliminate restrictions on all trade between the United States and Israel -- trade which in 1984 amounted to $3.6 billion. The agreement also contains unprecedented recognition of the increasing importance of trade in services and investment, which will serve to further liberalize our bilateral economic relations.

We hope that it also will serve to encourage greater liberalization of the multilateral trading system and that it will help us move ahead in our continued attempts to expand world trade. I want to thank the chief negotiators, Danny Halperin from Israel and Doral Cooper from the United States, and their respective teams for a job well done.

The United States has a basic commitment to Israel's economic well-being, and we have pledged to continue to help Israel fulfill its great potential. In my discussions with Prime Minister Peres last fall, we explored ways to address Israel's pressing economic problems. We agreed that the Free Trade Area will be instrumental in helping Israel put its economy back on a foundation of vigorous, self-sustaining growth. I am confident that as this agreement is implemented, the U.S.-Israel Free Trade Area will prove to be one of the cornerstones of Israel's future economic development program.

The Free Trade Area Agreement symbolizes once again our two countries' deep community of interest and our shared values and aspirations for a better future. It underscores the importance of Israel to the United States as an ally, as a trading partner, and as a friend, and it underscores the U.S commitment to Israel's security and prosperity.

The President. Thank you, David Roberts, Clark Wallace, distinguished guests, and all of you. I appreciate this opportunity to be with you today. Ever since my days as Governor of California, I've felt a special bond with realtors. When the fundamental issues were being decided and the political lines were drawn, I consistently found realtors as my strong and energetic allies.

But as to your being allies, this has been no mere coincidence. There are few industries in this country that reflect the free market ideals, the respect for property ownership, and the vigorous devotion to individual freedom as yours. We share a philosophy of freedom that has served our country well.

But no one ever claimed that preserving freedom would be easy. I want you to know that I'm personally grateful for the time and effort that you commit to keeping government on track, and I mean Federal, State, and local government.

But this is the story of a realtor who was out driving on a back road on his way to look at some property and suddenly noticed down beside him was a chicken keeping pace with him, and he was doing 60 miles an hour. [Laughter] And suddenly, the chicken spurted out ahead of him, and it looked to him as if the chicken had three legs. And then it turned and went down a side road and into a barnyard. And the driver turned down that lane, drove into the barnyard.

Seriously though, in these last 4\1/2\ years together, we've accomplished much. And unlike that farmer with the three-legged chicken, the American people, I think, are enjoying the rewards of our efforts. The economy we inherited was anemic and faltering. The American people were being bled white by inflation and ever-increasing taxes. And today, thanks to you and the other involved citizens who made it possible, the American people continue to reap the benefits of a healthy economy, low inflation, and stable taxes.

The Employee Relocation Council says that 48 percent of their member companies experienced a higher transfer volume in 1984 over the previous year, and they expect that trend to continue in 1985. For people who sell houses for a living, that's great news, as is the level of sales on existing family homes. They're off to their best start in 5 years.

Instead, we set our sights on encouraging investment, production, and growth. We relaxed or eliminated controls and reduced the growth in Federal spending. And we increased incentives by lowering the people's tax rates.

Well, thank you. There is much to do. And let's not kid ourselves, it isn't going to be easy. The first order of business is to come to grips with Federal spending. We hear a lot about the deficit, but what really is being talked about is deficit spending. And the way to reduce that is to reduce spending.

There are, of course, different approaches to this task. Some would have us freeze every item in the Federal budget across the board. But, now, while that may seem appealing, it doesn't get the job done. It's the wrong medicine at the wrong time. Instead, we should use this opportunity to trim programs that are wasteful, ineffective, and unnecessary -- many of which never should have been funded with Federal tax dollars in the first place. To keep pouring your tax dollars into these unworthy programs at the current levels while at the same time limiting worthwhile, efficient, and absolutely necessary programs would be a travesty. A freeze is a decision not to make a decision, a retreat in the face of special interest pressure.

Our proposal, which was worked out after long, hard negotiations with the Republican leadership of the Senate, calls for a leaner, healthier budget, trimmed of much of its deadwood but ready and able to do those essential tasks which the Federal Government must do. We would protect the poor, elderly, and disabled. Full inflation adjustments will be given to those receiving supplemental security income, and also there will be an increase in monthly benefits of $10 for an individual and $15 for a couple. The food stamp, AFDC, WIC, and other safety net programs will stay intact.

Keeping the safety net intact, an increasingly expensive proposition, is a moral imperative. As far as other projects, we can no longer afford to finance everything. As a people, we must set priorities. Those programs whose costs outweigh their benefits should be terminated.

The Job Corps is one good example. It costs taxpayers about $15,200 a year. For that kind of money, we could be sending them to Harvard for a year. The price tag is high, and only one-third of those trained get jobs. And let's remember, while the Government has been doing this, the private economy has produced 8 million new jobs in the last 2 years.

And then there's Amtrak. When Amtrak leaves the station, they're being fueled by $35 in subsidies for every passenger. They just keep shoveling in those tax dollars, but it's you, the people, who are getting railroaded. What theoretically started out to be only a 2-year trial period, which was supposed to have provided Amtrak time to become self-sufficient, ended up as a mobile Federal money-burning machine. We can't afford it anymore. Amtrak and other programs like it are taking us on a one-way trip to the poorhouse.

This means that increases in defense will be limited to only 3 percent per year. I must tell you that this is the rockbottom level needed to sustain and follow through with the defense improvements we've initiated over the past 4 years. We can no longer afford to use defense spending as a whipping boy for the failure of Congress to make the necessary reductions in our domestic spending.

Incidentally, just add some of those $400 hammers and things that you've been reading about -- well, those are our figures. That's what's been going on, and that's what we've found out and are stopping.

Now, these and other budget cuts, as vital as they are to the economic health of the country, will not be easy to get through the political process. It's been said that any government that robs Peter to pay Paul is bound to have the support of Paul. [Laughter] I think it's time we noticed that we can't rob Peter anymore. He went bankrupt a long time ago. [Laughter] The interest groups are out in force. They and the elected representatives with whom they've formed a symbiotic relationship are pushing not to decrease Federal spending but instead to increase taxes.

American people overwhelmingly oppose upping the tax load. But laying the opposition of the people aside, let's look at the practical argument. Raising taxes will not lower the deficit; raising taxes will simply drain more money from the private sector, kick us back into recession, and in the end increase deficit spending. For this reason, let me pledge to you: I will not be a party to a tax increase.

We should do something about taxes, and it isn't increase them. What we need to do is to reform and simplify the system -- cut out the loopholes, bring the rates down for everybody. But let me pledge something else to you: I will not be a party to a so-called tax reform if it is a disguised tax increase or if it eliminates the deduction families need for their home mortgage.

I've said so often, we don't have to make them see the light, just feel the heat. [Laughter] But what we are doing is more than just deciding economic policy; we're charting the future of this country. We have it within our power to build a new era of good feeling.

Last year it became clear that a change had occurred in America. The uncertainty and pessimism of the 1970's had been left behind. The new patriotism, a positive spirit which unites all of us of every race and religion, was front-cover material for major magazines. That's the kind of America -- proud, strong, and united -- that we are trying to build, and it is up to us. And I am happy that, as always, we are on the same team -- America's team.

House with men, women, and children from across our country who are outstanding examples of the volunteer spirit. But I've come to realize that even if we celebrated Volunteer Week every week, all year long, it wouldn't be enough time to honor all the remarkable, selfless Americans who give their time, money, labor, and love to help their neighbor. Even if, as in your case, the neighbor lives across an ocean on another continent.

Well, the tide of giving and concern that has risen in response to the plight of millions in Africa is one of the latest and proudest examples of that quality in the American character that makes us rush to volunteer. New private sector initiatives are developing at unprecedented rates to find innovative ways to help those in need. Americans of every age, from every city and region, have pitched in to do their part.

Since we first learned of the crisis in Africa, private donations have been flooding in, and they now total over $100 million. With our recently approved supplemental for humanitarian assistance, the United States will have committed over a billion dollars to African famine relief.

Loret Miller Ruppe announced a recruitment drive for agricultural volunteers for Africa. In the following weeks the Peace Corps was beseiged by responses. All across America there were people rushing to volunteer, willing to interrupt their lives and devote the next 2 years to meeting the emergency.

And you are a cross section of America. Now, some of you are first generation Americans; some of you are naturalized citizens. You come from all across the country, from Honolulu, Hawaii, to Madawaska, Maine, and you represent a wide range of ages. I'm told that one retired couple, the Bells, is following their son into service in the Peace Corps.

Soon you'll be in Africa, where you'll be a vital part of the relief aid to help the millions suffering from malnutrition and starvation. You'll be living in some of the most impoverished countries of the world, working in food production, soil conservation, fisheries production, forest preservation, and water supply development. By bringing your training and skills to bear on the underlying problems of agricultural and economic development, you can help your host nations make the difficult but vital journey from dependence on short-term aid to self-sufficiency.

Africa, he gave me a personal account of the heartbreaking conditions in that land. While there, he visited one Peace Corps project, and he told me of the outstanding work of the Peace Corps volunteers. The crisis in Africa is severe and the problems deeply rooted, but relief efforts are already making a great difference.

Today we also honor three outstanding individuals who are making a difference around the world and have been selected as Peace Corps Volunteers of the Year. Kathy Lynn Gilchrist of Salem, Oregon, established a seaweed farm in Micronesia, providing a new food source and employment opportunities. Mr. Lynn Blaylock of Minneapolis, Minnesota, is working with dairy farmers and sheepherders on the Caribbean island of Barbados to increase and improve livestock feeds. And Phil Heilman of Gibsonia, Pennsylvania, is working with school-age children in the west African nation of Burkina Faso to start home and school gardens and raise small animals to increase food availability. All three of these Volunteers of the Year deserve our warmest thanks for their untiring commitment to the peoples of the host nations.

Mr. Hart is a sculptor in Washington, DC. His works include the Vietnam Veterans Memorial and the west facade sculptures for the National Cathedral, both in Washington, DC. In 1975 he founded the firm of Hytla & Hart, Ltd., a design and production company specializing in architectural sculpture and traditional decorative elements for restoration projects as well as new construction.

Generals Otis and Zaytsev. Mr. Burt informed Mr. Sokolov that he found the Soviet statement totally unacceptable. After reviewing the Soviet statement with Secretary Shultz and other senior officials, Acting Assistant Secretary Kelly, in Mr. Burt's absence, called Mr. Sokolov into the Department that afternoon and reiterated in the Secretary's name that we found the Soviet statement totally unacceptable. We understand that prior to that meeting the Soviet Embassy had released the substance of its statement to the press, although Mr. Sokolov did not mention this fact at the meeting.

Major Nicholson was acting in accordance with procedures and practices which have been completely normal and accepted for many years. He was acting in accordance with the spirit and letter of the Huebner-Malinin Agreement of 1947, which governs the activities of the military liaison missions (MLM) on both sides. Soviet military missions operating in the Federal Republic of Germany under this agreement function in exactly the same way. That is an essential point, which the Soviet account unacceptably distorts.

While performing the normal and accepted duties of a member of our military liaison mission, using a clearly identified MLM vehicle and wearing an insignia clearly identifying him as a member of the U.S. military liaison mission, Major Nicholson was shot and killed by a Soviet sentry. No verbal warning was issued. The shot or shots which the sentry fired before killing him did not constitute warning in any accepted or acceptable sense of the word.

We do not know why they did this. We cannot imagine that they did it in keeping with the instructions of the ``military manual'' referred to in the Soviet statement. Like the shooting itself, it was and remains unacceptable to us.

There is another essential point: What we find appalling about the Soviet statement of April 22 is the apparent inability of Soviet officials to understand the human issue involved in Major Nicholson's death. In the wake of this tragedy, we agreed to discuss changes in procedures to ensure that such a tragedy could never happen again. We note that yesterday's Soviet statement reiterates this commitment on the Soviet side. But by again repeating their restrictive interpretation of the procedures in force at the time, the Soviet authorities demonstrate that they do not grasp the unacceptability of continued use of force and violence as a first reaction against even the most minor issue.

Union. He was unarmed, as all military liaison mission members are unarmed. The task of the U.S. military mission is to build confidence by openly observing the placement of Soviet forces. The use of lethal force against a member of a military mission was contrary to the practices for dealing with respective military missions which have been in effect for over 35 years. We have not used and will not use lethal force in dealing with such practices on the part of Soviet MLM personnel in the Federal Republic of Germany. Members of the U.S. forces in Germany have written instructions to this effect. The use of lethal force against Major Nicholson was not only a violation of normal practice under an agreement in force, it was an outrage.

Major Nicholson's death was a senseless, unnecessary act which raises serious questions about orders provided to Soviet military personnel throughout the world. The Soviet statement again expresses regret. We believe that this is not enough. What is needed is some sense that they recognize the enormity of this outrage.

It is for this reason that we have from the beginning expressed our belief that the Soviets owe us and Major Nicholson's family an apology and compensation for Major Nicholson's widow and for his child. In his meeting with General Zaytsev, General Otis set forth these considerations fully and clearly. General Zaytsev did not accept them. Instead, he referred them to higher authority as was accurately stated in our account of the meeting. The Soviets subsequently have so far refused to respond to these requests. For our part, we will continue to point out that they are matters of elementary justice. Continued Soviet refusal to address this matter in a responsible and reciprocal fashion can not fail to have adverse consequences on future relations.

This is an historic occasion. Two years ago, I asked Frank Hodsoll to work with Congress to establish a National Medal of the Arts. And last year Congress passed this legislation, and today we award the first medals.

Frank Hodsoll, the National Council of the Arts, and Robert Graham, the artist who designed the medal that we're about to award today. And finally, thanks to Ambassador Terra for that wonderful reception last night. So, thanks to you all.

Now, that was the serious part; now to the fun part. We award today for the first time in our history the National Medal of Arts. The purpose of this medal is to recognize both individuals and groups who have made outstanding contributions to the excellence and availability of the arts in the United States. And through this medal, we recognize both the artist and the patron, both the creator of art and the supporter and encourager of the creator of art. The one needs the other, and the United States needs both.

In recognizing those who create and those who make creation possible, we celebrate freedom. No one realizes the importance of freedom more than the artist, for only in the atmosphere of freedom can the arts flourish. Artists have to be brave; they live in the realm of idea and expression, and their ideas will often be provocative and unusual. Artists stretch the limits of understanding. They express ideas that are sometimes unpopular. In an atmosphere of liberty, artists and patrons are free to think the unthinkable and create the audacious; they are free to make both horrendous mistakes and glorious celebrations. Where there's liberty, art succeeds.

In societies that are not free, art dies. In the totalitarian societies of the world, all art is officially approved. It's the expression not of the soul but of the state. And this state-sanctioned art is usually, as a rule, 99 percent of the time, utterly banal, utterly common. It is lowest common denominator art. In fact, it is not art at all; for art is an expression of creativity, and creativity, as I've said, is born in freedom -- which is not to suggest that great artists who love the truth of art cannot be found in totalitarian states. They're there. Visit a prison, you'll find a number of them.

Their garrets are jail cells; their crime is that they refused to put their minds in chains and their souls in solitary. Some artists are forced to the fringes of society. Their work is repressed. These artists may be unpersons, but all of them are heroes.

I know you feel solidarity with them; I know you often think of your brother and sister artists throughout the world. And I hope you continue to pay tribute to them by celebrating freedom in your work and in your lives.

I happen to think, though, that to be an artist is always difficult, even in free societies. Expressing the truth in ideas requires risk -- risk for the artist and risk for the patron. There's no way of knowing in advance how society will receive a new idea. Ralph Waldo Emerson said, ``To be great is to be misunderstood.'' It's my hope that this medal today will go some way to telling the great artists here in this room that I think we finally understand you.

We celebrate also the courage, generosity, and far-sightedness of the patrons who have helped bring American art to broad audiences and to preserve great works for the future. We thank all of you for your great work. You've done honor to your nation.

Mrs. Reagan. Hallmark Cards is represented today by Donald Hall, chairman of the board and chief executive officer. Hallmark is an outstanding example of enlightened corporate support of arts, nationally and locally. Hallmark supports ballet, opera, symphonic music, and theater. It's brought the arts to the children of Kansas City and has won 49 Emmies for its production, ``The Hallmark Hall of Fame.'' And last night, it added to its awards by being given the TV Academy's Hall of Fame Award. So, we're just adding our own to that.

Georgia O'Keeffe was born in Sun Prairie, Wisconsin. She worked in her early years as a commercial artist and art supervisor in public schools. For 30 years, she resided in New Mexico painting landscapes, flowers, stones, and skeletons with singular vision. She's turned ordinary objects into fascinating subjects. Her giant-sized, single flower blossoms are recognized around the world. Mrs. O'Keeffe's contribution to painting is now part of the American heritage. She's unable to be with us today, but accepting her medal will be Carter Brown, Director of the National Gallery of Art, who just last week visited her in New Mexico.

Lincoln Kirstein was born in Rochester, New York. Mr. Kirstein devoted his life to the patronage and development of American ballet. It was his dream to start a ballet company. He preserved, and out of his collaboration with George Balanchine grew both the School of American Ballet and the New York City Ballet. A poet, art critic, and writer on dance, he founded the dance index and the dance archives of the Museum of Modern Art. Mr. Kirstein's imprint on ballet is truly indelible.

Leontyne Price was born in Laurel, Mississippi. And she's one of our greatest opera singers. She made her debut with the San Francisco and Metropolitan Operas in 1961. She's appeared abroad with numerous companies but has spent the major part of her career in the United States doing opera, concerts, recitals, and recordings. Through recordings, Ms. Price's artistry will live on for future generations as one of the greatest opera artists of our time.

Paul Mellon has devoted a lifetime to the enrichment of the arts. He began by accumulating books and paintings on sports, and this eventually extended to other fields. His generosity has supplied a variety of cities with museum structures and collections of European art. All of us are familiar with the magnificent Mellon treasures at the National Gallery of Art, where Mr. Mellon's leadership as Trustee and Chairman of the Board has been extraordinary. Mr. Mellon has truly enriched our Capital and the Nation.

Alice Tully was born in Corning, New York. Ms. Tully is a leading patron of music in New York and throughout the Nation. She's also an artist. And after studying voice in Paris and giving concerts, she gave up performance and devoted herself to philanthropy. Her major gift was the chamber music hall at Lincoln Center, which was dedicated to her in 1969. She's been a board member of Juilliard School of Music and the New School of Music in Philadelphia and helped organize the Chamber Music of Lincoln Center. Ms. Tully's generosity has enhanced the field of music and brought excellent music to millions.

Martha Graham was born in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. She's dominated the field of dance as a teacher, performer, choreographer, and director. She's invented new forms and movements and influenced generations. So many of our best dancers owe their beginnings to this great lady.

It's fitting that these first National Medals of Art are being presented on the 20th anniversary of the National Endowment of the Arts. I congratulate the Endowment and the honorary chairwoman of the 20th Anniversary Committee, who also happens to be my most generous patron, my roommate -- [laughter] -- and also my friend, Charlton Heston, the chairman of the committee.

For two decades now the National Endowment has been doing wonderful work. Most recently, they've been involved in a great endeavor to preserve and protect our rich heritage of film and television and the dance. And they've been building endowments for fine art institutions and helping struggling young artists find an audience. And the members of the Endowment would all be the first to say that none of their great work would have succeeded without the generous financial help and support of the American people, of unknown, unsung citizens who each day volunteer their time and money to encourage the arts.

Just last week, as a matter of fact, the New Orleans Symphony was too low on funds to continue their performances. The city rallied round the group in a new private sector initiative called Proud Citizens for Our Culture. In just 4 days, $445,000 was raised by the volunteers. And I am told that hundreds of thousands of dollars will be forthcoming from the business community. Now, this is quite a tribute to the performing arts.

And today we celebrate the people of New Orleans and the people from all over our country who've made contributions such as this. And so, again, a thank you to all of you -- artists and patrons and recipients and encouragers -- thank you for being what you are and doing the great work that you do. And thank you for honoring your nation.

During colonial days, Americans were dependent on the river systems and ocean ports still used in commerce today. President Thomas Jefferson commissioned Lewis and Clark to explore the West through our rivers, providing new opportunities for trade and commerce. In 1825, the Erie Canal, connecting Buffalo to New York, opened the Great Lakes for settlement and industry.

Pioneers broke new ground to the West by way of the Cumberland Road in 1811. Other highways were soon developed to move people and goods across the wilderness. Completion of the first transcontinental railroad in 1869 joined East to West, ushering in a new era of transportation, strengthening American commerce.

As has been true throughout our history, transportation today is critical to our economy and necessary to our defense. America's transportation systems have made our society the most mobile on earth. A diverse transportation network has assured the rapid, safe, and dependable movement of people and goods throughout the country and around the world.

In recognition of transportation's importance, and to honor the millions of Americans who serve and supply our transportation needs, the Congress, by joint resolution approved May 16, 1957, has requested that the third Friday in May of each year be designated as National Defense Transportation Day; and by joint resolution approved May 14, 1962, that the week in which that Friday falls be proclaimed National Transportation Week.

Tonight the Senate cast an historic vote for freedom and democracy in Central America. A clear majority has spoken in favor of a consistent and effective policy that is true both to our principles and to our interests.

To reach this result the White House and Senators of both parties worked together to find common agreement; and we now stand upon common ground. Support for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance is a crucial component of the proposal approved by the Senate. Our hemisphere will not be a safe place if the United States ceases to stand by its friends.

Since April 4, I have had the benefit of many fruitful discussions with Latin American leaders and with members of the Congress. I have been encouraged by these discussions, which have shown that a broad consensus exists on the need for reconciliation in Nicaragua, based on democratic principles, as an essential aspect of achieving peace in Central America.

Today the Senate will vote on a resolution, S.J. Res. 106, the text of which is required by a law enacted last October. That text purports to release appropriated funds and free the Executive Branch from restrictions against the support of military or paramilitary action in Nicaragua.

First, I will provide assistance to the democratic resistance only for food, medicine, clothing, and other assistance for their survival and well-being -- and not for arms, ammunition, and weapons of war. Second, I will not use more than the $14 million already appropriated during the current fiscal year for such assistance. No other U.S. Government funds would be spent for such material assistance to the armed democratic resistance. I will personally establish thorough procedures for the detailed management and accountability of the program in order to assure that these limitations on both the nature and amount of U.S. assistance are scrupulously observed.

States and Nicaragua and the establishment of a ceasefire. I have considered these views and believe that such steps could help to promote the internal reconciliation called for by Contadora and endorsed by so many Latin American leaders.

Therefore, I intend to resume bilateral talks with the Government of Nicaragua and will instruct our representatives in those talks to press for a ceasefire as well as a church-mediated dialogue between the contending Nicaraguan factions. I must emphasize, however, that such bilateral talks must be in support of the Contadora process and the internal dialogue and cannot become a substitute for these efforts to achieve a comprehensive, verifiable agreement among all the nations of Central America. Also, as I said on April 4, peace negotiations must not become a cover for deception and delay. If the Sandinista government shows bad faith by seeking to gain unilateral advantage, for example through a further arms buildup during a ceasefire or intransigence in negotiations, I would feel obligated to respond accordingly in our diplomatic efforts and would not expect the democratic resistance to continue to observe a ceasefire which was unfairly working to their disadvantage.

I will report to the Congress no later than September 1, 1985, on the progress made in achieving a verifiable peace and reconciliation in Nicaragua based on democratic principles. Such report shall also include an accounting for the funds obligated or expended under this joint resolution and may include such recommendations as I deem appropriate with respect for Nicaragua. I shall expect any recommendations for additional legislation for further assistance or sanctions to receive expedited handling.

Nicaragua's behavior, the Sandinistas should not benefit from their present access to the U.S. market while continuing their intransigence on issues affecting our national security. The Administration will favorably consider economic sanctions against the Government of Nicaragua and will undertake multilateral consultations with other Central American states in this regard.

The U.S. condemns atrocities by either side in the strongest possible terms. We will use our assistance to help ensure against wrongful acts by those who seek our help and we will urge them to take steps to investigate allegations of such acts and take appropriate actions against those found to be guilty.

The United States now stands at a moment of judgment. Experience has shown that a policy of support for democracy, economic opportunity, and security will best serve the people of Central America and the national interests of the United States. If we show consistency of purpose, if we are firm in our conviction that the promising developments over the past year in El Salvador, Honduras, Costa Rica, and Guatemala also show the way for a better future for Nicaragua, then over time we can help the democratic center prevail over tyrants of the left or the right. But if we abandon democracy in Nicaragua, if we tolerate the consolidation of a surrogate state in Central America, responsive to Cuba and the Soviet Union, we will see the progress that has been achieved begin to unravel under the strain of continuing conflict, attempts at subversion, and loss of confidence in our support.

There can be a more democratic, more prosperous, and more peaceful Central America. I am prepared to devote my energies toward that end. But, I also need the support of the Congress. I hope that you will give me your support today.

Today's votes in the House are not the final actions on this issue. The House of Representatives should reverse its mistake and develop a responsible approach that assists those fighting for democracy and freedom in Central America.

Notwithstanding today's votes, I intend to return to the Congress again and again to seek a policy that supports peace and democracy in Nicaragua. The United States will continue to work for these goals.

Since our first days in office, encouraging the kind of volunteer work you do has been one of our highest priorities. Now, this doesn't stem from any pride of authorship. Believe me, nobody in this administration thinks that we invented voluntarism. From the foundation of our Republic to the taming of the frontier, right up to modern times and your wonderful work, voluntarism, the idea of neighbor helping neighbor, has been one of the distinguishing marks of the American experience and one of the primary causes of our nation's greatness.

I don't think many of us realize how very unique we are in this country. There aren't very many countries where it's done this way. I'm sure many of you've heard or read about the works of a Frenchman named de Tocqueville. He was very famous. He wrote remarkably accurate accounts of America back in the mid-1800's in a book called ``Democracy in America.'' He had come here especially from France to see what was the reason for this great miracle of the United States. And one of the things that truly astonished him was the extraordinary capacity that Americans have for identifying a social problem, forming a self-help group of a fraternal, religious, or charitable nature, and then pitching in to solve the problem. So, voluntarism was hardly our idea. It's always been a great American tradition.

But what motivated our efforts to revitalize voluntarism and stimulate private sector initiatives was the lack of emphasis put on it during much of the 1960's and 1970's. You see, back then the idea grew that government, rather than free people working in a free economy and society -- that government was somehow the principal engine of social progress. And this point of view was, of course, at great variance with the wisdom of our Founding Fathers, who understood the danger to liberty and creativity caused by intrusive government.

And sure enough, it wasn't long before the proliferation of bureaucracy began to suffocate that voluntary spirit which had always been a hallmark of the American people. Sometimes it seemed as though a social problem couldn't be addressed without a government grant, a roomful of highly paid consultants, and an office staff with lots of Ph.D.'s and impressive titles.

I remember when I was Governor back in California, we were one of the first to question this outlook. And at the time, we were helped by the publication of a remarkable book called ``Reclaiming the American Dream'' by Richard Cornell, a book that questioned the role of big government and showed how voluntarism could work in America. Well, we adopted many of its ideas in our California administration, and we're continuing them here in Washington today.

And I remember another experience from those California days that I think has meaning for all of you. It was one of those nights in the storm season, and down at Newport Beach, those homes, those beach homes all along the waterfront were being destroyed by an unusually high tide and the high waves that went with it. And they were hitting those homes. And they were crumbling and being washed away into the ocean.

TV was down there covering the rescue operation all night long. And I remember at 2 o'clock in the morning, I was still watching the efforts of the people who were loading sandbags -- picking up the sand from the beach into bags and trying to build sandbag parapets there to save the homes, to break the waves.

Perhaps many of you here saw the television special last night. It told another incredible story of what young Americans who feel needed are doing to help the less fortunate. The children of New York's public schools put their own private sector initiative together to help fight the tragic famine in Ethiopia. In a program called Children for Children, the students in every public school in New York worked together to raise money for food and supplies for the sick and the starving in Africa.

I think today it's fitting to salute this heroic act of generosity by the children of New York. They, just as all of you here today, show us why we should work hard to encourage voluntary action in America. We're particularly honored to have with us each of you who have gone out and done so much to recover this great American tradition.

Others of you are involved in private sector initiatives like Crime Stoppers, who steer youngsters away from trouble and toward self-reliance; Junior Safety Officers, who teach younger children about ``stranger danger''; Friend-to-Friend Volunteers, who help handicapped youth; the Red Cross Clown Corps, who bring laughter and fun to those who need it so badly.

Hundreds of Magic Me volunteers brought great happiness to many elderly people in Baltimore last year. And Super Volunteers are springing up all over the country to spread the good news about how much fun it really is to get involved with people who need you.

Well, today I have some young friends here with me who exemplify that sentiment, and at this time I would like to present each of you with a Presidential commendation for the outstanding work that you've done.

Monica Perez, of Washington, DC. This fourth grader from Nativity Catholic Elementary School conducts a summer school in her home for neighborhood children to teach them basic reading and writing skills.

Lucy Theodore, of Brooklyn, New York. Lucy, the daughter of Haitian immigrants, volunteers in her high school at a counseling center, on a local French language radio station, in a hospital in the patients' screening area, and tutors students in a local college. While on vacation with her family in Haiti, she did extensive volunteer work in the poor sections with doctors.

Mark Perry, of Little Rock, Arkansas. This 20-year-old has been doing volunteer work since he was 14. He has done considerable work with patients at the children's hospital in Arkansas, and he also conducts a job search program for young teens.

Trevor Ferrell, of Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. Trevor's campaign began in December 1983, when after seeing a TV report, he started taking blankets to street people sleeping on steam vents in downtown Philadelphia. Since that time, hundreds of volunteers have rallied around Trevor to help distribute food and clothing and to refurbish a house for the street people, known as Trevor's Place.

Well, congratulations to all of you. As you leave us today and grow older in this world, may all your dreams come true. God Bless you all. And now I'm going to go down and see that you get those certificates.

Trevor Ferrell. Thank you very much, Mr. President. I'd like to thank everybody for all the help, and I'd like to thank Mr. President for the certificate. And I'm accepting it for all the volunteers who give and do, not because they're paid to do it.

Many scientists fear that exposure to DES may be linked to some forms of cancer. This fear is enough to call attention to the possible health threats faced by past users of DES and their children. Many of the cancers that may be related to DES can be effectively treated if detected at an early, localized stage. Awareness of the threats posed by past DES use should result in increased attention to regular checkups, the first step to effective detection and treatment.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 25th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The tremendous strides that we as a Nation have made in our standard of living and health care have also meant that each succeeding generation of older Americans is proving to be more vigorous and self-sufficient than were its forebears at comparable ages. This translates into a real increase in independence for our Nation's older people.

In the years ahead, we can enhance our personal independence even further by pursuing lifestyles designed to protect our health; by thoughtful planning for our retirement years; and by maintaining strong and close ties with our families, neighbors, and friends.

Our rich heritage of neighbor assisting neighbor continues to thrive not only in its original form, but also as manifested in the emergence of a variety of private helping organizations at the community level. For those older Americans who need outside support to maintain the independence we cherish, it is reassuring to know that assistance is available through a nationwide network of State and area agencies and also private agencies who devote services to the elderly.

Each of us can enrich the lives of others -- and ennoble our own lives -- by volunteering in whatever way we can to help older Americans in need of assistance. Age is no barrier to this effort, which should involve families, neighbors, and friends, as we help others continue to realize the dream of independence.

Fairness is the foundation of our way of life and reflects the best of our traditional American values. Invidious, discriminatory housing practices undermine the strength and vitality of America and her people. In this seventeenth year since the passage of the Fair Housing Act, let us work together to strengthen enforcement of fair housing laws for all Americans so as to make the idea of nondiscriminatory housing a reality.

Mrs. Wyatt is actively involved in community and charity projects. She serves as vice chairman of the Houston Grand Opera and as a trustee of the Museum of Fine Arts in Houston. She is chairman of the St. Joseph's Hospital Foundation and a board member of Children's Mental Health Services, both in Houston. Mrs. Wyatt is a founding member of the Princess Grace Foundation and chaired its first inaugural gala in Washington, DC.

What we are talking about is simply a research program to determine the feasibility of effective defenses against ballistic missiles. The object of the program is to provide a technical basis for a decision, sometime in the next decade, on whether to develop mainly nonnuclear systems to defend the United States and our allies against ballistic missile attack. We believe a deterrent balance incorporating greater reliance on defense would provide a sounder basis for a stable strategic relationship.

As the communique of NATO's Nuclear Planning Group meeting in March shows, our allies support the SDI research program. The communique reflects our common belief that it is in our mutual interest as an alliance to examine technologies which have the potential to enhance deterrence and stability. The allies are well aware that the Soviets have for several years been pursuing a large-scale program of research into advanced defensive systems. It would be folly to allow Moscow to hold a monopoly on these technologies.

The security of the U.S. is inextricably linked to that of our allies. The SDI program is examining technologies with potential against not only ballistic missiles of intercontinental range but also those of shorter range. Because SDI seeks to strengthen allied security as well as our own, it is entirely appropriate that allied nations should be able to participate in SDI research. We welcome such participation.

In Geneva we will work for a verifiable agreement on deep reductions in nuclear arms, both strategic and intermediate range, with the objective of strengthening strategic stability. We also seek to reverse the erosion of the ABM treaty, which has occurred as a result of Soviet activities inconsistent with its letter and spirit. Finally, we hope to engage the Soviets in a constructive dialog about the possibilities for a mutual transition to a world in which defensive systems, complemented by further reductions in offensive nuclear weapons, might lay the foundation for a safer and more stable deterrent balance.

Our negotiators have great flexibility in pursuing these goals, but we have no illusions; the talks may be long and complex. They will demand great patience and fortitude from us. However, we are well prepared, and I am optimistic that we are in a good position to negotiate an equitable agreement.

The President. The upsurge in terrorist attacks has heightened awareness of the threat in Europe and elsewhere. The new phenomenon we have seen of the use of terrorism as an instrument of state policy demands new approaches from us. It must be halted. The resources being given to terrorist groups and movements by certain nations is a serious threat to democracy.

NATO Foreign Ministers, in their December communique, expressed determination to prevent and suppress terrorism. Bilateral, technical cooperation among a number of NATO members has been intensified, such as that recently announced by France and the Federal Republic of Germany, and European governments have announced other initiatives in the European Community framework. The economic summit partners have also focused attention on the need to combat terrorism.

The U.S. is committed to consult and work closely with its European partners to combat terrorism on a bilateral or multilateral basis. In short, we are united in our commitment that international terrorism must be stopped.

The President. Spain is a valued member of NATO, a fact which already strengthens the alliance and thus enhances the prospects of preserving the peace. The principal issue at the moment -- and it is for Spain itself to decide -- is whether it wishes to remain in the alliance.

We of course support continued Spanish membership, as do the other allies. NATO is a free alliance of free peoples; that is the real source of its strength. The choice is up to the people of Spain. We respect that.

The President. Well, if you mean military intervention, certainly not. But we will do all we can to support democracy in the region. For the United States, genuine democracy is the best defense the Western Hemisphere can have against the threat of Communist expansion, and we are committed to support our democratic friends. The establishment of a dictatorial pro-Soviet regime in Central America would constitute a serious threat to the freedom of the people of Central America and to the security of the United States.

Americans in several areas. We will help the development of democratic societies and the consolidation of democratic institutions, the promotion of economic growth, and the pursuit of diplomatic discussions aimed at resolving differences among the countries of the region, particularly the Contadora process.

In addition, we will help our friends defend themselves against armed attack and subversion. Just as democracy cannot flourish in an atmosphere of chronic underdevelopment, neither can democratization, development, and diplomatic dialog be pursued in an atmosphere of military intimidation. And for these same reasons, I have supported the offer of the democratic resistance in Nicaragua for a cease-fire and for negotiations with the Sandinistas there. We want to see the original promises of that country's revolution against the Somoza dictatorship kept -- promises of democracy, freedom for the church, a free press, and free elections. These are our goals everywhere in Central America.

Panama -- have narrowed the differences of the Central American countries considerably. For a long time the Government of Nicaragua did not deal seriously in Contadora, insisting that the problems of the region should be settled on a bilateral basis. The other countries persisted, however, and some progress has been made. The problems that exist in Central America have been a long time in the making, and they will not be resolved overnight. The Contadora process has been functioning for a little more than 2 years, which is not a long time for a complex international discussion. We should take heart in the progress that has been made and support the Contadora countries in their efforts to reach a comprehensive and fully verifiable agreement.

All nine Contadora participants have formally agreed that reconciliation within the countries experiencing internal conflict and the establishment of democratic governments are indispensable for any regional agreement. El Salvador under President Duarte is pursuing a policy of internal reconciliation which includes reforms, a general opening of the political system, and dialog with its armed opposition. The Sandinista regime in Nicaragua should follow his example and move to reconcile its differences with the armed and unarmed democratic opposition. This would be an extraordinarily positive development as far as the Contadora process is concerned.

Q. Mr. President, thank you very much for having us in this very famous Oval Office. When our group discussed the framework of this interview, it was very hard to achieve a consensus regarding the priority of questions. We hope there will be no such problem at the summit meeting in Bonn, which is, of course, the main purpose of your visit to Europe.

The world is faced with the problem of if the economic momentum can be sustained and secured after the great locomotive seems to be slowing. How do you see the economic scenario in America and globally? And what would be, in your view, the best outcome in Bonn? What should be done at the summit meeting?

The President. I'm not going to attempt to set an agenda for it. I know that we will be talking about political problems, we will be talking about this economic situation, and I know that our economic recovery did get out ahead of the others. I think one of the things that is of great importance that we want to be talking about is another round of trade talks, to resist the protectionism that raises its head every once in awhile and to see if we can't come more and more to open trade between ourselves and other industrial countries. That will be, I am quite sure, prominent on the agenda.

I know that in the last two summits we've also exchanged ideas about what we all can do to help in the recovery, and I am glad to see recovery beginning to take hold in those other countries. It will, hopefully, equalize the currency values and so forth.

Q. Especially for Western Europe you recommended recently at the New York Stock Exchange, I remember, to follow your recovery program of '81 by cutting taxes, spending, and overregulation and throwing off the weight of government. What kind of tax cuts did you mean? Lesser income taxes or only incentives for investments and innovations?

The President. High tax rates do not necessarily mean high revenues for government. As a matter of fact, this, we think, was responsible for our recent recession -- our government was taking too big of a share of the private sector. And I think that other countries -- some of our allies and friends -- are looking at themselves to see if this is the same situation. When we reduced the rates there was an increase, a surge in the overall revenues because of the economic expansion that resulted. Incentive, whether it's for business and industry or for individuals, does result in higher earnings. There was an Arab philosopher about 1,400 years ago by the name of ibn-Khaldun who said that in the beginning of the empire the rates were low, and the revenues were great. And he said at the end of the empire the rates were great, and the revenues were low.

Q. Mr. President, I wanted to ask you something about the dollar and the international monetary system. The dollar has lost in the past month about 20 percent of its value and before then, in a matter of a few weeks went very, very high, reaching high records against the Deutschmark and other currency. The monetary system, it's unstable and volatile. Your Secretary of the Treasury said that he was willing to do something about it, and it seems that something should be done.

The President. Well, I'm afraid your question is too specific for the answers that I have available at this time. Two years ago at the Williamsburg summit we all agreed upon embarking on a study -- the European Ten, ourselves and others, our trading partners -- and that study has been going on for 2 years. The study will be, and the report will come in in June, after the summit conference in Bonn. And I think when we get that report and see the recommendations and what has been proposed, then it can be determined whether a meeting of the kind that has been suggested is warranted and what the agenda would be, as that meeting would then take up the report of this 2-year study. So, until then I can't comment on an agenda.

The President. Oh, no. No, I think that this is also what he was trying to say -- that we are perfectly willing, but we feel that we should wait and see what's the result of that study, what are we going to be hearing and seeing as a result of that.

The President. Well, we think we've been making great progress in the bilateral meetings that we've been having. I can tell you that Prime Minister Nakasone, I think, himself, is committed to a belief in more open and free trade between nations. I realize that, just as all heads of state do, he has some political problems, too, in opposition to some moves he might want to make. The same would be true of me here in our own country.

But we have made great progress, and I think we'll continue to make progress in opening up markets to open trade between allies. And I have a great admiration for what he is doing and what he has set out to do.

Q. Mr. President, in recent years your trade policy officials have made much of their efforts to promote the multilateral trade system. At the same time, they've used the possibility of bilateral deals with individual countries as something of a lever to bring other trading partners to the bargaining table. There are experts who suggest that subjecting a fifth or a quarter of your trade of the United States, external trade, to a deal, perhaps with Canada, could weaken the multilateral trading system. I'm wondering: A, how you feel about that; secondly, what happens if there is a new GATT round? What happens to the bilateral deals at that point?

The President. Well, because of the direction the bilateral is taking between us and Canada, we've been, for each other, we've been the greatest of trading partners. Here we are with a very unique border that extends for several thousand miles with no guards or forts along that border. We have a pretty common heritage in this country. It's been reflected in trade, and sometimes there have been efforts here and there in particular areas to curb trade. Just as we're meeting with Prime Minister Nakasone, we have been meeting with Canada to eliminate some of the problems that, in reality, are peculiar to our two countries.

Q. Mr. President, I imagine that there'll be a number of leaders in Bonn who would like to discuss with you your Strategic Defense Initiative during your visit there. The question I wanted to ask was that the British Foreign Secretary recently raised some concerns about your initiative. He warned that there would be no advantage in creating a new Maginot Line, which could be outflanked by simpler countermeasures, and he also suggested that the huge research program might acquire an unstoppable momentum of its own.

We have a situation now between the major powers where we have a deterrent based totally on offensive weapons, and in our own country, it's called the MAD policy, and what it stands for is mutual assured destruction, meaning that -- and to me, there's always been something a little immoral about that -- that our deterrent is if you try to blow our people up, we'll blow yours up.

Now, in the whole history of the world, every offensive weapon has always led to a defensive weapon. We're doing a research -- if we would come up with a defense that would, in effect, make nuclear weapons obsolete, I think it would aid in what we're doing in Geneva with our arms reduction talks: an effort to reduce greatly the number of such weapons in the world to the point that we don't leave as a heritage to our children this threat of destruction, literally of the world, if some madman comes along someday in one country or the other and decides to take that action.

And I've made it perfectly plain that if our research -- while I have any claim to it -- is successful in any way, before there would ever be deployment, I would want to sit down with our allies and discuss this totally and share. And I haven't even ruled out sharing with our potential adversaries.

If we could substitute for simply an exchange of offensive threats, either totally defense or a combination of the two, so that we weren't just living under this total threat that threatens even the rest of the world who might not even be participants -- except in the destruction.

Q. Still on this subject, Mr. President, President Mitterrand of France has invited other European countries to joint efforts to create European technological cooperation. I was wondering what you think of this initiative and if you don't think that SDI has set the stage for a technological confrontation between Europe and United States?

The President. I don't know that I can answer that. I imagine that I'll be hearing about that at the summit, and I'll be looking forward to the discussion of it. The only restriction we've ever wanted to place on technology is letting or giving that technology to a potential adversary, who then could use it to an advantage over us militarily. And that's been the result of COCOM, which we have with our allies in our restraint on providing such technology to the other country.

The President. Is it strong enough? I think basically -- for a deterrent, yes. There is no question we do not match the Soviet Union in its military buildup, either in the strategic or in the conventional. But I think in the sense of a deterrent that a war, trying to take advantage of their superior forces, they would face more damage than they would want to accept. So, I think that from a deterrent standpoint -- yes.

The President.  --  -- we've not stopped that on a basis of changing a policy -- no. We're going forward with that plan. Those countries requested those weapons of us, and the Soviets have continued to augment their intermediate-range weapons that are targeted on European targets.

No, we would like, in the talks going on at Geneva, we would like something that would indicate that they were willing to reduce those. You know, our original proposal on the intermediate-range weapons was total elimination, zero-zero. Well, we gained half our point. The Soviets agreed to zero for us, but not zero for them. But we're going to continue.

Incidentally, I want you to know also that SDI and the research that's going forward is not just aimed at strategic weapons, such as a protection for ourselves. It would be very definitely a factor with regard to those SS - 20's, those Soviet intermediate-range weapons, for protection of the allies.

Party has said that if it should win those local elections, it would give them a political, national meaning. And they would want to be in charge of the government, to put a crisis on the Craxi government and have a new government headed by Communists. How would you feel about that?

The President. Well, if you look at any country in the world that is run by a Communist government, you see that the people are denied all the democratic rights that we and our societies have come to believe are democracy and are the rights of the people. I can't quite believe that the Italian people, with their love of independence and freedom, would settle for what the Communist government would mean to them and would take away from them.

Q. And just one second about Europe, Mr. President. It seems that Europe is at a balance. You have asked Europe to take responsibility on the economic side, and it's also a quite balanced point of equilibrium from the political side. How strong do you feel that Europe should be united politically? And how do you feel about a unified European monetary system to balance the general equilibrium?

The President.  --  -- yes, between those countries. But it seems to me that, as you so graciously said about the alliance and its closeness now, it seems to me that there is a greater bond -- certainly in Western Europe, which is all we can talk about -- a bond, between the countries than I can remember in my rather long lifetime, a friendship, and now with the Congress that I will be addressing there that represents all the countries of Europe, elected directly by all the people of Europe, and the European Community -- all of these things I think represent great progress.

The President. Well, so far everything has shown progress. There haven't been very many setbacks in the sense of countries adopting more protectionist measures. My own feeling is that protectionism just leads to a restraint in trade and a lowering of prosperity for everyone involved.

And I know in our own Great Depression back in the early thirties, I believe that depression was worsened and was maintained over a longer period of time than need be because our country turned to a thing called the Smoot-Hawley tariff. And I think that was a great factor in our decline.

The President. No, because I know that there are factions in our country, as there are in every country, who want protectionism. But I think the progress we've made so far and the economic recovery we're having, I believe we can defeat those protectionist factions.

Q. The less-developed countries, of course, aren't at the table in Bonn. They have a special interest in what takes place. Of course, their debt problems we all know about. Will you be pushing your fellow summiteers to perhaps drop their own protectionist policies with regard to the Third World? Textiles comes to mind, sugar quotas.

The President. I think it could help those countries. We've all expressed a desire to help the lesser developed countries. And too much of the time that has taken the form of just economic aid, handouts.

I think that we should be directing ourselves more to helping them help themselves. And in that connection, I have to say, our own country, this country, has purchased more of the production, particularly manufactured goods, of the lesser developed countries than all of the rest of the world put together. And I don't think it's hurt us; our recovery continues.

The President. We have had a setup on textiles with regard to growth because -- and this, I think, every country agrees on -- that here and there, when an industry is faced with a crisis, a temporary situation, to help rather than let them go down to destruction. Yes, we've all done that, and we have done it.

We have a steel program in our country that is only invoked in the event of unfair competition first, but also if it is leading to a disaster. And then we have temporarily invoked some regulations to help them get on their feet again.

Q. Mr. President, when Mr. Gorbachev took over as Soviet leader, Mr. Shultz greeted the event as a moment of opportunity for an across-the-board improvement in relations. Do you think that the killing of the U.S. major in East Germany and Mr. Gorbachev's latest accusations about the Geneva negotiations mean that we're now in for another rough period of East-West relations?

The President. Well, I think it was in keeping with what has been the Soviet attitude on other things of that kind, including the shooting down of the Korean airliner. We certainly, out in the Western World, I don't think can quite understand that kind of attitude.

I think they missed a great opportunity to achieve some stature in the world by not admitting that this was a most regrettable thing and a tragic thing and extending an apology to the widow and child of the major and, yes, offering some compensation.

The President. I'd be very willing to. I've expressed the belief that we should have a meeting, and his letter to me acknowledged that and said that he felt the same way. Now, I don't know what his schedule -- he will be coming here for the United Nations -- whatever it is, if that should be the time. I certainly could arrange mine to accommodate and have that meeting. And one of the reasons why I think such a meeting should take place is that I've always believed that people get in trouble when they're talking about each other instead of when they're talking to each other.

The President. Well, I think that when we meet there should be some open discussion about some of these differences, some of the things that cause us all to be suspicious of each other, and see if we can't get some things out in the open on the table so that we understand each other better.

Q. Thank you very much, Mr. President, for granting us this interview. Please allow me this last question. We Germans hope your heart is not too heavy after all these misunderstandings regarding your visit.

The President. The message that I would have for them, and particularly in this anniversary situation that is coming up, is one of recognition that for 40 years we have been friends. The summit meeting consists of the heads of state of countries that were 40 years ago bitter enemies.

We're friends; we have been at peace. I would extend my own admiration for the democracy that the people of Germany have created in these 40 years, for their dedication to democratic ideals, and that would observe this particular time as one of recognition of the reconciliation that has taken place between one-time enemies and which we are more than reconciled -- we have become close friends and allies.

I'll be working with the leaders of other countries to make progress on economic and political issues and to strengthen the ties between good friends. But I will be asking for European help and support in the greatest moral challenge of our time. I am going to ask help in encouraging freedom throughout the world.

West lacks energy -- the moral and spiritual energy to carry forth our great hopes and plans, but that is just not true. Europe, including Spain, is greater than ever in history. Europe is the treasury of centuries of thought and culture. As the leader of an allied country and friend, I value the ties between the United States and Europe; and the United States and Spain have never been closer.

Whether Spain stays in NATO is clearly a decision for Spain to make, as was the decision to seek partnership in the Economic Community. We respect the right of the Spanish people to make their own decision on this.

The President. The United States and Spain work together closely in the military field in accordance with the 1982 agreement on friendship, defense, and cooperation. We will continue to do so. The only plans we have are to do our best to carry out all our obligations under the terms of that agreement.

Q. Last January this correspondent wrote about the Pentagon's plans to deploy nuclear weapons in eight Western countries, among them Spain. Was the Government of Spain aware of these plans? Which political steps would have been necessary for the Defense Department to carry out this nuclear weapons policy?

The President. There has been a lot of misunderstanding about this question. The 1982 agreement between the U.S. and Spain is unambiguous: No nuclear weapons can be stored or installed in Spain without the agreement of the Spanish Government. I stand by that agreement fully and completely.

Q. The fourth problem is: How do you explain that a friendly country like the United States, which has a treaty signed with Spain, sent two American diplomats to take pictures of the residence of Prime Minister Gonzalez?

Q. My last question would be: As one of the principal leaders of the West of conservative ideology, what is your opinion, Mr. President, of Felipe Gonzalez, one of the younger Socialist leaders in Western Europe?

This year, we observe the fortieth anniversary of the end of the most destructive war the world has ever known -- a war the United States did not want but nevertheless fought with total commitment to protect the most cherished human ideals. Throughout that war, and in our foreign relations afterward, we have sought to achieve true and lasting peace for all the people of the world.

Today, our desire for peace is equally great. In our observances this Memorial Day, we honor the brave Americans who paid the highest price for their commitment to the ideals of peace, freedom, and justice. Our debt to them can be paid only by our own recommitment to preserving those same ideals. But our recommitment cannot be for ourselves alone. It must also be for our children, and for the generations yet to come. Peace, freedom, and justice are not things that were won for us two hundred years ago or forty years ago; they must be won again and again by each successive generation.

Balancing the development of our Nation's many natural resources with the need to preserve our national treasures is a formidable challenge. Continued economic growth depends in part upon prudent use of our natural resources. At the same time, we must protect wilderness areas and wild, free-flowing rivers for this and future generations to enjoy in their natural, undeveloped state.

Pursuant to existing law, the Secretary of the Interior and the Secretary of Agriculture have also concluded that certain areas studied are not suitable for wilderness designation or for inclusion into the national rivers system.

I concur in all of these recommendations, and I am transmitting to the Congress today letters and reports from the Secretaries of the Interior and Agriculture regarding all of these wilderness and rivers proposals. I applaud the Congress for responding to my last wilderness and rivers transmittal in September 1982 by designating the Aravaipa Canyon Wilderness in Arizona, the Paddy Creek Wilderness in Missouri, the Verde Wild and Scenic River in Arizona, and the AuSable Wild and Scenic River in Michigan. I reaffirm my support for the rest of the wilderness and river designations included in my September 1982 transmittal, and urge the Congress to act expeditiously and favorably on those designations as well as the legislative proposals I am transmitting today, so that these precious and irreplaceable resources may be protected and preserved.

The United Nations is an important body and one that deserves our most serious attention. At the same time, as the legislation that gives rise to this report suggests, it is generally recognized that the United Nations as it now functions does not fulfill many of the aspirations of its founders. The central question for the United States, then, is whether the United Nations can be made a more effective institution for the solution of international conflicts, for the promotion of national independence, democracy, and economic and social development -- in short, whether the United Nations can renew its dedication to the ideals enshrined 40 years ago in its Charter.

After the tragedy of the Second World War, the United States called upon the nations of the world to create an international institution in order, in the words of the Preamble to the United Nations Charter, ``to save succeeding generations from the scourge of war, which twice in our lifetime has brought untold sorrow to mankind.'' All too soon, however, it became apparent that this vision, in which the territorial integrity and political independence of each state were universally acknowledged, did not inspire universal respect.

The United Nations, acting through the Security Council -- the U.N. organ vested with primary responsibility for ensuring international peace and security -- has had some notable successes in keeping the peace. But as U.N. Secretary General Perez de Cuellar has pointed out, the Security Council has in recent decades proved increasingly ineffective in fulfilling this most critical obligation. I share the Secretary General's desire to make the United Nations a positive force in the maintenance of world peace. This report, like the legislation under which it is submitted, reflects our commitment to that greater goal. I hope this review will be a significant contribution to the reexamination and reassessment that the Congress contemplates.

Volunteer Week. And in the past few days, it's been my pleasure to meet different groups of volunteers. Yesterday, it was over a hundred fifty youngsters. It was enjoyable, but I have to admit I've been looking forward to today. Now I get a chance to meet some kids of my own age.

Allow me to begin with a story; and it's a true story. This past February in New Mexico, a school bus in the Navajo Head Start program got stuck in the mud. Inside were the driver, Willie Castillo, a woman who often served as a volunteer, and 10 preschool children. As Willie tried to free the vehicle, he smelled smoke. And a moment later, he saw flames. Willie shouted at the children and began to clear them from the bus. The volunteer remained calm and helped Willie carry to safety several of the smallest children, including one little girl who was sound asleep.

As the flames spread, Willie returned to the bus to make a final check and found a 3-year-old boy who couldn't unfasten his seatbelt. Willie freed the belt, scooped the boy up in his arms, threw him from the bus, then jumped clear himself. In an instant, the gas tank exploded, and the bus was engulfed by flames.

Willie and the volunteer had saved the lives of 10 children. The volunteer had also proved that heroes need not be young. You see, she was Willie's grandmother. Her name is Mae Chee Castillo, and she happens to be 72 years old.

But in that early day, those people harvested the next fellow's crops when he was ill. They raised school funds at quilting bees and church socials. After earthquakes and floods, we took it for granted that our neighbors would be there.

At the end of World War II, however, our volunteer efforts began to wane. Government was growing, and step by step, it took over tasks that used to be performed by towns, churches and synagogues, neighbors and families.

Why should I get involved? -- people asked. Let the government handle it. Well, this growth of government began to undermine our sense of self-reliance and erode our individual rights. No one understood this better than President John F. Kennedy.

One of the chief aims of our administration has been to reemphasize the vital contributions which individuals, families, and private organizations make to our community life. As we've done so, we've begun to see a rebirth of the volunteer spirit. Today thousands of new private sector initiatives are making life better for millions.

According to a Gallup Poll, the number of Americans who volunteer their time has reached 92 million -- well over half our adult population. As volunteer efforts multi-ply, older Americans are playing a central role. Perhaps the most significant volunteer work by older Americans is that represented by the group to which each of you belongs -- the Retired Senior Volunteer Program, RSVP.

Chester Turner, 77, lives in Charlottesville, Virginia. Chester is deaf, but that doesn't stop him; not by a longshot. Each week, Chester visits the residents of a nursing home and those of a home for mentally retarded and handicapped children. In his own home, a senior citizen highrise, Chester acts as a handyman. Chester Turner, for making such a difference in the lives of so many, I thank you.

Fred Bonanno, 74, lives in Deerfield Beach, Florida, and volunteers nearly full time as a counselor at the Fort Lauderdale Vietnam Veterans Hospital. Fred has a particular bond with the veterans of the war in Vietnam -- his son was killed there. With immense courage, Fred has transformed his grief into gifts of kindness and understanding, helping Vietnam veterans come to grips with their lives a decade after the war itself came to an end. Fred, no President can pay you higher honor than to simply say: Your son would have been proud of you.

And, Harry, you volunteered for the John Meekum Microsurgery Institute, served as a spokesman for the National Arthritis Foundation, and used your M*A*S*H role to draw attention to veterans' needs, making public service announcements and speaking at benefits and charities.

Recently you were named honorary chairman of RSVP, a new and challenging role. And, Harry, I want to present you with a certificate of appreciation for accepting the honorary chairmanship and offer you my personal congratulations.

Now, if I could just take a few minutes to establish my credentials as a senior citizen by way of, I think, kind of a cute story. Years ago -- and not so many years ago -- when Prince Charles was visiting America -- of course, eventually he came to Hollywood, and they had a big luncheon for him in the commissary at Twentieth Century Fox. Well, practically every star in Hollywood was there, including Henry Fonda, who was an old friend of mine going back to summer stock days, and we hadn't seen one another in a long time, so we had a lot to talk about.

Just to finish this up, maybe on a little more serious note, which is what this is all about, after all: I was in M*A*S*H for 8 years, and I think that that is probably the reason that I am standing here.

My grandson Willie and I were very fortunate to remove these children from the bus before it burst into flames. I risked my life to save these children because the children are the future of the Navajo Nation. I have traveled a great distance to be with you today. I see these children as my own children, and I want the best educational opportunities for them. Likewise, as an elderly, I see the many unmet needs of other Native American elderly, who do not have the basic necessities of life such as food, housing, electricity, water, and health care. I plead with you to recognize the needs of Native American children and elderly. Among the many needs we have are educational facilities, hospitals, senior citizen services, and policies for the aged.

We have no roads. The roads where I live are not paved. In your position, please help us. In appreciation for your recognition of my grandson, my tribe, and I, I am honored to present this robe to you to show my respect and heartfelt thanks.

The President. Thank you very much. And, Mrs. Castillo, I would like to say that I think most of those things that you were talking about here, those problems, come under what we have called the safety net and which we intend to continue. Even with regard to our battles to lower the deficit, these things will not be done away with or reduced. I thank you, and I'm very proud to have this Navajo blanket.

And to each of you out there, you're heroes of selflessness, making America better and warmer by allowing others to benefit from the wisdom of your lifetimes. So, on behalf of all Americans, thank you, and God bless you.

President Reagan. President Chun was the first head of state to visit during my Presidency. And it was my pleasure to meet with him again today for a useful discussion of international and bilateral issues.

I vividly recall standing at the Korean demilitarized zone 17 months ago. Perhaps nowhere in the world is the contrast between our shared democratic values and communism clearer than it is there on the DMZ. And nowhere is it clearer that strength is the surest path to peace.

In reference to his country's security, President Chun and I shared concern about the continuing forward deployment of North Korean forces toward the demilitarized zone. We agreed that this deployment heightens the need for vigilance on our part.

The two Koreas today stand apart. But this may not always be so, and we pray it will not be. I expressed support to President Chun for the Republic of Korea's creative approach in engaging North Korea in direct talks. We share the conviction that the key to reducing tension lies in a direct dialog between the parties.

President Chun and I agreed on the need to defend and expand the free market in our own relationship, and multilaterally. I expressed appreciation for the steps Korea has already taken in this regard. And we agreed to intensify the close consultations between our governments.

President Chun explained the steps his government has taken to further promote freedom and democracy. I welcomed the considerable progress that has already been made and expressed continuing support for such steps, which are contributing to the attainment of political progress. I reiterated our support for President Chun's commitment to a peaceful transfer of power at the end of his term in 1988.

President Chun also discussed another event of momentous importance, which is coming to Korea in 1988, the Seoul Olympics. I expressed our complete support for Seoul as the Olympic site and offered to share our experience from the 1984 Olympics to help make it the best ever.

The United States and Korea enjoy an especially warm relationship, and that was reflected in our talks today. We agreed that in addition to the annual U.S.-Korean security consultative meeting, the two governments should intensify their consultations on political matters in Northeast Asia.

The President and Mrs. Chun will be stopping in Hawaii on their way back to Korea. Nancy and I wish them a safe and a pleasant journey home. And we send with them the greetings of all of us to our friends, the Korean people.

President Chun. Mr. President, I deeply appreciated the opportunity today to discuss with you matters of significance to our two countries. First let me say that the reaffirmation by the President of the United States of the importance of continued endeavors to further develop and strengthen the existing ties between Korea and the United States will be wholeheartedly welcomed by the people of the Republic of Korea. It is my great pleasure to convey to the great people of the United States of America the expression of unswerving friendship of the Korean people along with my own, and I transmit their high respect to you for your excellency, President Reagan, as the leader of the free world.

I'm satisfied with the results of the very good talks that I had with you today. The talks demonstrate the solid foundation on which the traditional strong ties between our two countries rest. We pledge our continued effort to further consolidate the partnership between our two countries. We face the year 2000 with a sure feeling of confidence and hope.

Peninsula. I am convinced that the firm determination of the United States, in close cooperation with Korea, will resolutely cope with any military adventurism or terrorist attacks of North Korea against the peace of this region and that such efforts will greatly contribute to peace and stability of our region.

Peninsula and to establish a permanent peace on the Korean Peninsula. It is most reassuring therefore that the President of the United States has reaffirmed the firm commitment of the United States to the defense of Korea.

We also shared views that the endeavor to resolve the Korean question through direct dialog between South and North Korea are more important now than ever before. At the same time we exchanged views on a wide range of diplomatic cooperation with a view to maintaining and strengthening peace on the Korean Peninsula. The Korean Government is making, in good faith, efforts through direct dialog to do something about the antagonism and mutual distrust that have been allowed to accumulate over the years. We must ultimately achieve peaceful reunification of the divided land through democratic means. I believe that the cooperation of our friends, as well as other countries concerned, is of importance to the success of such peace efforts. In this connection, Mr. President, I appreciate your understanding and support for the efforts aimed at stability and peace of Korea and the region.

President Reagan and I also agreed that the expansion of trade, based on the principles of free trade, is important to the development of the world economy and that we will continue to strengthen our efforts to this end. Recognizing the steady increase of bilateral economic exchange, including trade, would contribute to the interest and common prosperity of both Korea and the United States. President Reagan and I have pledged our efforts to further enhance the economic partnership between our two countries. In particular, we discussed ways to achieve a balanced expansion of our bilateral trade and to strengthen mutual cooperation in the fields of energy, technology, and joint ventures in third countries. We agreed to further develop the framework for economic consultation between our two countries, including the annual Korea-U.S. economic consultations. In this regard, I stress that sustained growth of the Korean economy is essential to the security of the Korean Peninsula and thus to the stability of Northeast Asia. President Reagan also shares this view.

In addition, the President and I agreed to further promote bilateral exchanges in many areas, including social, cultural, educational, and sports fields, with a view to establishing a solid foundation for a deepened mutual understanding and friendship between our two countries.

Korea continues its efforts to build an open society on the basis of stability as we march toward a bright future of a democratic society with greater benefits for all, ensuring abundance and freedom for all citizens. Based on such development, Korea will be able to make ever more valuable contributions to the stability and prosperity of Northeast Asia and to further strengthen regional cooperation among the Pacific Rim countries.

Before closing my remarks, I would like to express my greatest respect and continued support for the unwavering and dedicated efforts of President Reagan to safeguard world peace and promote democracy everywhere. I wish to extend my sincere appreciation to His Excellency Ronald Reagan and Mrs. Reagan for the warm hospitality that has been accorded to us. I thank you very much indeed.

On Tuesday Nancy and I will be on our way to Bonn, West Germany, where I'll be meeting with the leaders of our most important trading partners. This is another in a series of meetings designed to enhance the economic cooperation between the free people of the world. By working together with our allies, we hope to ensure that the engines of growth and progress keep running with efficiency. We want to make certain that the fruits of open and free exchange are enjoyed by all and that free trade is a two-way proposition.

One of the purposes of this trip to Europe will be to commemorate the 40th anniversary of the end of the Second World War, the monumental catastrophe that inflicted death and destruction as mankind had never before witnessed. I think it's also fitting for us to commemorate this as an anniversary of peace and the beginning of a new relationship with former enemies, to take stock of all that's been accomplished in these 40 years of friendship.

In these last four decades, the rise in the living conditions of people in the Western democracies has been nothing short of a miracle. The abundance we enjoy should lay to rest the lie that freedom must be sacrificed for progress to be made. Freedom not only is right; freedom works. It builds societies that are humane and positive in spirit.

Citizens of democratic countries enjoy opportunity and well-being far beyond anything available to those forced to endure tyranny. A lack of faith in freedom often stems from the belief that people are not capable of making the tough decisions necessary for a country's security and economic health.

Americans have proven these cynics wrong time and again. It wasn't that long ago we faced monstrously high inflation and economic stagnation here in the United States. As a people we stood at a crossroads, and instead of fearing our challenge Americans pushed forward with confidence and enthusiasm. Together, we cut the rate of inflation and brought back healthy growth. Our economy has produced 8 million new jobs in the last 28 months. Some of our European friends are calling it the American miracle.

Well, it wasn't a miracle. By working together and making some needed changes, we turned a bad situation around. Now it's time for the next step -- tackling some fundamental problems and laying the foundation for a decade of economic growth.

I worked out with Senator Dole and the Republican leadership of the Senate a proposal that will bring us within reach of a balanced budget by the end of the decade. It is a balanced effort of holding down the cost of defense and domestic programs while cutting from the Federal budget nonessential programs that are wasteful, inefficient, and, in more than a few cases, should never have been financed with your tax dollars in the first place. Many of these programs were brought on line at a time when Congress was acting like there was no limit to how much of your money they could spend. Today we know better, and it's time to trim the deadwood from the Federal budget.

Many of our opponents in Congress are advocating a freeze in Federal spending and an increase in taxes. The across-the-board freeze they advocate would limit worthwhile and absolutely needed programs while at the same time freeze in wasteful and inefficient ones. A freeze is really a decision not to make a decision. It is a retreat in front of special interest pressure.

You demonstrated that overwhelmingly in the last election. Second, raising taxes carries the risk that it'll kick us back into recession, which would end up increasing the deficit. Third, raising taxes will simply make it more likely that Congress will increase spending.

Slogans and easy answers, like a freeze or raising taxes, are not the way to go. The answer is responsible reduction of Federal spending. It will work if we have the courage to say no to the special interest groups.

I hope you'll let your elected representatives know how you feel, that you support our efforts to trim wasteful programs and to put our economic house in order. When I'm meeing with our friends and allies in Europe this coming week, I'll do so with confidence because ultimately I know you'll make the right decision. Our free society is based on faith in the people.

I have determined that the 32 countries listed above qualify as least-developed nations. The list includes all those countries now eligible for GSP under the U.S. program and recognized by the United Nations as least-developed countries.

Implementation Act to be considered by the Congress in accordance with the procedures of section 151 of the Trade Act of 1974; and a statement of administrative action that is proposed to implement the Agreement. Section 102 also requires a statement of reasons, first, as to how the Agreement serves the interest of United States commerce, and second, as to why the implementing bill and proposed administrative action is required or appropriate to carry it out.

Israel. The passage of the proposed implementing legislation, I believe, will mark the beginning of a strong new trading relationship with our friends in Israel. This Agreement, the first of its kind for the United States, provides for the elimination of substantially all the trade barriers between the United States and Israel and will be instrumental in the development of bilateral trade for our mutual benefit.

This Agreement serves the interests of United States commerce because it will create significant expansion of our trade with Israel. For the United States, the Agreement will provide duty free access to an $8 billion market in which we currently face relatively high duties and certain non-tariff barriers and in which we face a tariff disparity resulting from an Israeli agreement with the European Community. This Agreement will ensure that American firms can compete fairly and competitively in the Israeli market.

I've read your plan for a public-private partnership to encourage child safety, and I concur with your proposals. And I am here today to sign both the proclamation for National Child Safety Awareness Month and the Executive order concerning the Child Safety Partnership. And I'd just like to say, before I put my name on these papers, that Nancy and I have been so moved, so touched by the recent efforts of the citizens of our nation in response to the sad problem of missing children, kidnaped children, exploited and abused children. There's a wonderful thing about Americans: They discover a problem; they publicize it; they talk about it; and they come up with plans to deal with it. And they always succeed.

Innovative private sector initiatives are surging up all over the country. As you can see from this wonderful display behind us here, there's no limit to what can be done to combat the problem of missing and exploited children.

K-Mart and the Guardian Corporation will put pictures in over 43 million photo-finishing bags each year. Pictures of missing children will appear on over 4 million tollway tickets in New York and on milk cartons around the Nation. And the Mobil Corporation is working to display photographs in their stations in the Washington, DC, area.

These efforts have been valuable in locating thousands of children. Safeway supermarkets have been putting pictures of missing children on their grocery bags. Last month two children were located within 2 days because of that effort.

Health and Human Services administers programs to prevent and treat child abuse and neglect as well as provide services to runaway and homeless youth. And the National Center on Child Abuse and Neglect continues to work on this problem, with much cooperation from the private sector.

As a result of their good works, I believe that the public awareness campaign that is being waged will bring us that much closer to ending the scourge of child abuse and child sexual abuse. I could go on with what has and has not been happening. These private sector initiatives are tremendous.

But it just occurs to me that even though the abuse and exploitation of children is a big problem, it is simply no match for the heart and the commitment of the American people -- of the people, you here in this garden today.

May has been designated as National Child Safety Awareness Month this year, but for a mother or father who has suffered the tragedy of a missing child, the nightmare is not confined to one day, one week, or one month. It stays with them until their child is found. For all too many parents, it stays with them forever.

More than 1,500,000 children have been reported missing in the United States, but until recently there was little concerted action to deal with this problem. Today, however, a new spirit of activism is bringing together parents, law enforcement officials, and community agencies in an energetic drive to increase public awareness of the need to protect our Nation's children.

Center for Missing and Exploited Children. This Center disseminates educational material about child safety, offers information about voluntary identification procedures for young people, and maintains a toll-free hotline to help locate missing children. It is providing a needed focus for our Nation's efforts to stem this serious problem.

The safety of our children is everyone's responsibility, and by working together we can make a difference. It is important for parents to instruct their children at an early age and ensure that they know their complete name, address, and how to dial their telephone number. The public and private sectors can provide the assistance that is needed by children who are victims of abuse, including safe and secure shelter for runaway and homeless youth to protect them from the dangers they might encounter on the streets. Corporations can be helpful by publicizing the plight of missing children to facilitate their identification and return home.

The most important thing we can all do, however, is to create a society in which our children are respected, loved, and cherished. The family is the natural place for demonstrating this love and respect, but the spirit of respect for family values should be spread widely throughout society.

Activities such as child pornography should be straightforwardly condemned as inconsistent with a society that truly loves its children and respects the integrity of the childhood years. By speaking up and making their voices heard, concerned Americans can make a big difference in the kind of society our children will grow up in and, even more, in their ability to grow up with the love and security that should be every child's birthright.

For most of this century, we have set aside the second Sunday in May as a special day when we honor our mothers. It is very appropriate that we do so because from the earliest days of our country, mothers have played a major role in building America into a great Nation. The fortitude, courage, and love of family and country shown by these brave pioneer women lives on in mothers today.

It is especially important that we honor mothers today, because we are more aware than ever before of the importance of the family unit, in which mothers play so central a role. Families are truly the foundation of society, and mothers the vital foundation of the life of the family. Their influence on the training and education of our youth is so deep and pervasive that it is impossible to measure.

When we honor mothers, therefore, we honor the women who shape our Nation's future. Their collective effect on the America our children will inherit is greater than that of any act of Congress or any Presidential decision. I am happy, therefore, to have this chance once a year to pay them tribute.

Travel has long been recommended as a way to broaden the mind and refresh the spirit. But in previous ages, travel was often hazardous and difficult. The rewards of a romantic adventure could sometimes be more than overbalanced by the dangers a traveler might encounter along the way.

Today, the travel and tourism sector of our economy constitutes the second largest retail industry in the United States. The benefits of travel remain as enticing as ever, but the hazards and dangers have largely disappeared. Americans who want to travel abroad can experience the tremendous diversity of the world's cultures on group excursions or on individually designed tours.

Many Americans, however, are choosing to remain near home and explore the natural beauties and historic monuments of our own Nation. And many citizens of foreign lands are joining them in discovering that America's rich history and scenic wonders make it an excellent place to take a vacation.

Sec. 4. General. (a) The Departments of Justice, Health and Human Services, and Education are directed to join with the Partnership to encourage the development of public/private sector initiatives to prevent and respond to the victimization of children.

Advisory Committee Act, as amended, except that of reporting to the Congress, which are applicable to the Partnership, shall be performed by the Attorney General, in accordance with guidelines and procedures established by the Administrator of General Services.

And that was just a sneaky way for me to say that it's time we got on the ball -- as I said in my address to the Nation on Wednesday night -- got on the ball with regard to the budget. And permit me to say a few words about the budget to you now.

We came to office in 1981. With your assistance, we took the first steps in decades to restrain the growth and the power of government and to bring to an end its encroachment on American enterprise. We cut the growth of spending and regulations, supported a sound monetary policy, put in place new incentives for business investment, and enacted a personal income tax rate cut of nearly 25 percent.

Our reasoning on the tax cut was simple. Throughout the seventies, effective tax rates had risen relentlessly, eroding economic incentives, and thereby driving millions to choose leisure over work, conformity over innovation, and immediate gratification over saving and investment. The impact of inflation on outdated depreciation schedules, meanwhile, was undermining capital investment. We believed that a tax cut would reverse the process, producing wide and lasting economic growth.

Well, Mr. Galbraith was correct that it was an experiment. He simply should have waited for the results. As of this April, the economy has been growing for 29 straight months. The recovery of business investment has been the strongest in 35 years. Productivity has risen, bringing to an end the stagnation that characterized the ending of the last decade. Inflation is at the lowest rate in almost two decades, and the economy has been creating new jobs at the rate of nearly 300,000 each month.

As for government revenues -- despite the impression that many have to the contrary -- they're actually on the rise. In 1984 Federal receipts increased 11 percent -- a healthy gain of 7 percent even after accounting for inflation. This fiscal year that remarkable pace is being sustained.

Our tax cut program has worked so well that next month I will unveil our plan to go farther. This plan will simplify the tax code, broaden the tax base, and cut both personal and corporate tax rates. And by adding to tax incentives, or the incentives our first tax cuts provided, the new plan could widen the economic expansion.

When I announce our new proposal next month, I hope you'll study it carefully; judge it in its entirety; ask whether it will make our economy as a whole still stronger, our tax code fairer, and whether it will provide new incentives that will foster economic growth in which all of us can share. My friends, I can assure you the answer will be yes.

The promise of our economic future is great, and the achievements of recent years have been historic. But both have been cast in shadow by a problem that could wipe them out -- the Federal deficit. It's important to be clear about the source of the deficit. It has not arisen as a result of the tax cut. On the contrary, as I have said, government revenues are actually on the rise. The deficit problem is a problem of spending -- spending without direction or discipline, spending that in the past 20 years has burgeoned absolutely out of control. In 1966 Great Society programs cost $16 billion; by 1975 that figure had risen to $78 billion; by 1981 to a staggering $148 billion.

But we've concluded that it be cut no further. The military might of the Soviets is growing. We simply cannot afford to break off our program to modernize our forces, and we dare not place in jeopardy weapons systems that are central to American security. Keeping our country secure is government's first job, and as long as I'm President, I intend to see that job gets done.

Option three is to shrink the safety net for the needy. Yet it's the duty of the government to care for those in genuine need. In 1981, moreover, programs that provide income, food, housing, medical aid were reformed and are now targeted only at those who need them. Shrinking the safety net is out.

And that brings us to option four: cuts in a vast number of subsidies and entitlements that are out of date, serve only special interest groups, result from bureaucratic attempts at redistribution and social engineering or give funds to those who do not need them.

As George Bush told you, it's here that the Senate leadership and our administration decided we must concentrate our cuts. In brief, we went after the fat. As I mentioned on television last Wednesday night, our taxpayers' protection plan will reduce deficits by $300 billion over 3 years and bring us within reach of a balanced budget by 1990. It asks fundamental questions and acts on the conclusions.

I know this might strike a little close to home, but is it fair to force small businesses to subsidize their competitors or to force taxpayers to subsidize our biggest corporations? No, it is not. So, our plan will deal with both those inequities.

The need for our plan is obvious, but you can count on it to run into stiff opposition. It cuts across an array of special interests. It'll cause many to make difficult adjustments by paring back middle class entitlements and curtailing subsidies to business.

Indeed, many of you may find that the rollback in business subsidies will affect the enterprises that you lead, and yet we're calling for sacrifices at a time when they can be most easily borne. As I said earlier, the economy is healthy and growing. When we put our plan into effect, it is certain to grow still stronger.

Thank you. You've made my day. To put our plan into effect, we'll have to let the opposition know that the American people have had enough. The budget this year is more than a matter of balance sheets; it'll decide whether spending will make us all government servants or whether the American people can once again master the governmental process. In a fundamental sense, what is at stake is nothing less than our democracy itself.

It's been a pleasure to join you this morning to talk about the budget and, in a wider sense, the cause that unites us -- economic growth. Growth is what we have already fostered. Growth is what we continue to seek, and growth, I'm confident to say, is what together we shall achieve.

Q. Mr. President, thank you very much for giving us the opportunity to talk to you before your trip to Europe. My name is Fritz Pleitgen. I'm with German Television. May I introduce to you my colleagues.

The Congress urge you not to go. The veterans urge you not to go. And the Holocaust victims urge you not to go. And the majority of the American people are against this visit. Mr. President, how does this turmoil of emotions affect you personally and politically and has the final word been spoken on Bitburg?

Now, I can understand how some of the people feel, because very frankly I don't believe that many of your American colleagues -- in that sense, I mean in the press -- have been quite fair about this. I think they've gotten a hold of something, and, like a dog worrying a bone, they're going to keep on chewing on it. But this all came about out of a very sincere desire of Chancellor Kohl and myself to recognize this 40th anniversary of the war's end -- and incidentally it's the 30th anniversary of our relationship as allies at NATO -- that shouldn't we look at this and recognize that the unusual thing that has happened -- that in these 40 years since the end of that war, the end of that tragedy of the Holocaust, we have become the friends that we are, and use this occasion to make it plain that never again must we find ourselves enemy, and never again must there be anything like the Holocaust.

The President. Well, I'm not sure that I agree about mistakes. There have been mistakes with regard to information that was given on the various locales. Let me just point out one place in which I think the whole distortion started. And it started with me, perhaps in answering, incompletely, a question.

This is a time to recognize that after years and years, centuries, indeed, of wars being settled in such a way that they planted the seeds of the next war and left hatreds that grew and grew until there would be another war, that the miracle that has happened, that has brought 40 years of peace and 40 years of alliance, that those countries that were of the Axis and the countries of the allies -- we're sitting down together in the summit -- and do this every year -- and we're friends and allies, that this was the thing that we were seeking to do.

But the distortion came when I received what seemed to be a private invitation to go to one of the concentration camps, and I didn't see any way that I, as a guest of the state and of the Government of Germany, could take off on my own and go, and that might then look as if I was trying to do something different than the purpose that we had in mind. And I received a cable from Chancellor Kohl that no, such a visit to -- and it will be Bergen-Belsen -- was included in the trip, and I immediately accepted. I thought it was appropriate in that way.

The thing I thought was inappropriate, when it seemed that someone else was asking me to simply step away from the plans that were being made for me as a guest and go off on my own, and other than that mistake, I think that what has been planned is all in the spirit of recognizing what has been achieved. Your country now has the most democratic government it has ever had in its existence. You are, and have been for 30 years, one of the principal allies in the NATO defense for Western Europe and of the United States. And this is what we're seeking to recognize.

But at the same time, I think I'm free to say, just as your own people have said, and that is that we all must never forget what did take place and be pledged to the fact it must never take place again.

Q. Mr. President, sorry to insist on that, but the news report published in the New York Times says that some SS buried in Bitburg maybe participated in a massacre in Oradour. Oradour is a village in the south of France. And there were altogether 642 victims. Did you know that? How would you comment on that?

The President. Yes, I know all the bad things that happened in that war. I was in uniform for 4 years myself. And again, all of those -- you're asking with reference to people who are in the cemetery, who are buried there. Well, I've said to some of my friends about that, all of those in that cemetery have long since met the supreme judge of right and wrong. And whatever punishment or justice was needed has been rendered by one who is above us all.

And it isn't going there to honor anyone. It's going there simply to, in that surrounding, more visibly bring to the people an awareness of the great reconciliation that has taken place and, as I've said before -- too many times, I guess -- the need to remember in the sense of being pledged to never letting it happen again.

First of all, let us be perfectly aware that the Soviet Union has, over a longer period of time, has already embarked on that kind of research. And what would be the plight of all of us if the Soviet Union, which has the most and greatest nuclear weapons arsenal in the world, also had with it a defense against nuclear weapons and the rest of the world didn't?

Now, what I think President Mitterrand needs to know is that all we're embarking on is research to see if there is the potential for a defensive weapon. And if there is, before any deployment took place, we would join with our allies -- you, the countries that are represented here -- with regard to any deployment and what our strategy regarding the use of that weapon should be.

But as it stands now, the world is faced with a threat in which our only deterrent against nuclear attack is to threaten retaliation so that in a sense we're saying if you wipe out millions of our people, we'll wipe out millions of yours. And it seems to me that if there is the possibility of having a deterrent that is more based on defensive weapons, which don't kill people but only kill weapons, that then we should be moving in that direction at the same time that we continue our effort to get the reduction between us of nuclear weapons.

May I also say I know that President Mitterrand as well as Prime Minister Thatcher have problems in their own countries with regard to the support for your own nuclear arsenals. And because we're just going into a research and we don't know how long this is going to take, I am in full support of England and France continuing to go forward with their own programs of nuclear defense, nuclear deterrent.

Q. Mr. President, you suggested that this was a good moment to explain to anyone who wasn't certain -- to President Mitterrand and others -- the benefits of SDI. Yet wouldn't it perhaps have been a better idea to explain all this and talk it out with the allies before you announced it? Isn't there a sense in this, perhaps mirroring our first issue which was that of how to celebrate 40 years of peace, isn't there a sense in which you have announced moves and only afterwards had to get the allies agreement?

The President. Well, I can't remember the exact context of how an announcement was made or whether it was simply contained in our request going to our own legislature for the funding of such research. But as quickly as we could, we did go -- and at the military level and at a higher level -- we sent representatives over to brief all of the heads of your seven states as well as deal with your own military and our military leadership on this.

Q. Your aides say that you're very upbeat as you move towards this summit. Yet it's not been a good week for the person we've come to know as the Great Communicator. Is there any sense, particularly thinking of the contra vote and the confusion about Bitburg, is there any sense in which you feel something's happened to the Great Communicator in the last 10 days or so?

The President. No. I've had 4 years of fighting with the recognition that one House of our legislature is of the opposing party, as a majority of the opposing party. And your parliamentary systems -- you don't have such things; the party and the individual are the same. But then, I had the experience of 7 out of 8 years as Governor of California having a hostile legislature, and yet we managed to accomplish a great many things. I have not given up on contra. Our position and the problem in Nicaragua, the vote up there and the debate, whether they admitted it or not, is simply: Do they want another totalitarian Marxist-Leninist government, like Cuba's, now on the mainland of the Americas, or do they want the people of Nicaragua to have the democracy that they're willing to fight for and that they did fight for in overthrowing the Somoza dictatorship?

And whatever way they may want to frame it, the opponents in the Congress of ours, who have opposed our trying to continue helping those people, they really are voting to have a totalitarian Marxist-Leninist government here in the Americas, and there's no way for them to disguise it. So, we're not going to give up.

Q. Mr. President, let me change the subject. You have indicated your intention beginning a new round of trade talks. Given that some European countries may need some encouragement or some incentives to start talking early 1986, what would you do at the summit to try to encourage them?

The President. Well, I think that this is one of the subjects -- it always has been -- at the summits that we talk about, is the opposing of the forces in each of our countries who want increased protectionism in trade. Protectionism has never been successful, and it usually ends up creating great economic problems for everyone.

Nakasone. We've made great progress there in ridding ourselves of obstructions to back-and-forth trade, and so with our allies. We're all somewhat guilty, even though we profess we want free trade, and we all really know down in our hearts that it is the best way to go, there still are elements of protectionism that all of us practice.

The President. Well, we'll try to see that no one gangs up on anyone else because, as I said, everyone is guilty. They've all got some elements of protectionism. And we need to get it all out on the table and see how, together, we can end those things that do bring about, well, trade measures that are unfair.

Q. Mr. President, your attitude after the nomination of Mr. Gorbachev at the Kremlin has been welcomed in Europe, your idea of having a meeting with him. I think that Mr. Gorbachev has taken a hard line, and do you still want to meet him, and what kind of meeting do you want?

The President. Well, yes I'd like to meet him. I've always believed that you only get in trouble when you're talking about each other instead of when you're talking to each other. And some people in my own country -- again, some of your colleagues -- have taken the tone that my expressing a desire to meet with him somehow is soft or not looking at reality. No, I think it's looking at reality.

And I think that until we sit down and face each other, look each other in the eyes as you and I are now, and try to eliminate some of the mutual suspicions and express our own objections to some of the practices that have been going on, such as the recent, terribly tragic case of the murder of our Major Nicholson there -- the only way to settle this is not standing here several thousand miles apart saying things about each other. It's to express ourselves to each other and express ourselves as to what is needed if we're going to ever end these hostilities or at least reduce them. And so, yes, I look forward to a meeting.

The President. I've never considered it. What we have in Nicaragua is a revolution that was fought -- and literally with our approval. The United States -- I wasn't here then during the fighting of that revolution, but the United States stayed back. And anytime there's a revolution there are various factions, all of whom were opposed to the government that they're rebelling against, and they joined together.

American countries -- they promised that their goal was a democratic government, with free elections, pluralism, free labor unions, human rights observed, freedom of speech and religion, and so forth.

When the revolution was over, this country, under the previous administration, im- mediately went with aid -- more financial aid to the new government of Nicaragua than had been given in 40 years to the previous government of Nicaragua -- but then saw them do exactly what Castro did in Cuba after his people won the revolution. The one faction, the Sandinistas -- that faction eliminated all the other participants in the revolution.

Some were exiled; some had to flee the country; many were jailed. And they drove them out, and then they made it plain, as Castro did in 1959, that they intended a Marxist-Leninist state. And they violated every promise they'd made to the Organization of American States.

Now, the people that are so-called contras, that are fighting against this, are veterans of the revolution. They are not remnants of the previous government trying to get a dictatorship back in power. These are the people, many of them were imprisoned themselves by the previous dictator.

But the plan that we've asked the Congress to adopt is one in which those contras, themselves, have volunteered to lay down their weapons and ask them to be allowed to negotiate with their former companions in the revolution, the Sandinista government -- negotiate how to restore the democratic goals. And they've asked that it be mediated by the church.

Well, we have advanced that plan here and have said to the Congress that we will use whatever money is appropriated for food and medicines and so forth, not for military weapons. And we have the support of their allies -- I mean, of their neighbors, Honduras and Costa Rica and Guatemala and El Salvador. The President of El Salvador has said that this is the right idea at the right time. And this is what we've asked of our own Congress, and it's what we want.

We're not even seeking an overthrow of the present government. As a matter of fact, our plan says that while these negotiations go on, the present government stays in power. But it is simply for them to adopt the principles for which they said they were fighting in the first place.

Q. Mr. President, we've been talking about free trade or freer trade. At Quebec City in March, you and Prime Minister Mulroney pledged yourself to trying to eliminate trade barriers between our two countries. But we in Canada feel that there is a rise of protectionism in the United States, and certainly in the U.S. Congress. Now, I know you say there's a bit of protectionism in all of us; and there is.

Now, there's also a report coming out in September. But I know, because I remember your campaign in 1980, when you talked about a North American common market, given the fact that you've been President now for 4 years, what sort of trade relationship would you envisage? What sort of new trade relationship would you envisage between Canada and the United States?

The President. Well, as free as possible. And of course, Canada and the United States, we are each other's largest trading partner. These two countries here and that several-thousand-mile border without so much as one fortification or one armed sentry along that border, we're very unique. We have everything in common, including our heritage and background and language and all. And it is true that here and there, there have come about those specific trade barriers or restraints. And what we've authorized on both sides is for our people at the ministerial level to get together and do the best we can to eliminate those barriers.

And we, too, have made great progress, as I said earlier, with another country, with Japan. We've made great progress and some of the things that we celebrated there on this recent visit, the signing of some very basic agreements. So, I'm quite optimistic about what's going to take place and how we can free up our border and rid it on both sides of these restrictions.

Q. You know, sir, in many ways, we in Canada feel like we're caught between a rock and a hard place. On the one hand, the Canadian dollar has gone down vis-a-vis the U.S. dollar. And all sorts of American producers are complaining that the competition in lumber, let's say, is unfair. On the other hand, in trying to seek new markets, we're up against the fact that the Canadian dollar is perhaps overvalued vis-a-vis overseas currencies.

Prime Minister Mulroney and Prime Minister Nakasone and the others -- is to tell them that pressure is coming from elements in Congress who, for whatever their own reasons are, are trying to pass. And that's why it's beholden on us to make progress in eliminating these barriers before they try to have their way.

Now, I'm opposed to those protectionist proposals in the Congress. And of course, I ultimately do have some power, that of veto, for measures that might be passed. But we have to recognize it, just as I think that the Prime Minister in your country, just as Prime Minister Nakasone in his, I think are being pressed from the bureaucracy of their governments and from the legislatures as to restricting in how far they can go. So, between us, we just have to carry on the fight. And if we make enough progress in getting equal agreements between us, we take away the ammunition of those who are trying to force protectionism on us.

Q. Unfortunately the time is running out. We have just 3 minutes to go. A question -- Soviet leader Gorbachev has just offered deep strategic arms cuts. Do you think it's a good proposal, or do you feel that he just wants to put you on the defensive?

Now, I recognize that that would probably have to be brought about by various stages of reductions in numbers of weapons; and we're very willing; and we have faced them there with proposals that make that evident, that we will join in real reductions of offensive nuclear weapons.

The President. Well, I don't know how far I should go in attempting to or appearing to be interfering in a problem that involves purely the European countries. I am gratified, and I think the world should be pleased, to see how the unity of Western Europe has -- as far as it has come now.

Nation, urged them not to get involved in European affairs because of the rivalries and the enmities that existed between them. And here today that's no longer true. Here today we are all allied, and there is this spirit of unity, so I just would hesitate to voice an opinion as to how far they would go with a union of Europe. That, I think -- I don't want the United States to sound as if we're interfering.

Section 1. General Requirements. To ensure the effective and economical use of America's real property and public land assets, establish a focal point for the enunciation of clear and consistent Federal policies regarding the acquisition, management, and disposal of properties, and assure management accountability for implementing Federal real property management reforms, all Executive departments and agencies shall take immediate action to recognize the importance of such resources through increased management attention, establishment of clear goals and objectives, improved policies and levels of accountability, and other appropriate actions.

Sec. 2. Real Property. The Administrator of General Services shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide government-wide policy oversight and guidance for Federal real property management; manage selected properties for agencies; conduct surveys; delegate operational responsibility to agencies where feasible and economical; and provide leadership in the development and maintenance of needed property management information systems.

Sec. 3. Public Lands. In order to ensure that Federally owned lands, other than the real property covered by Section 2 of this Order, are managed in the most effective and economic manner, the Departments of Agriculture and the Interior shall take such steps as are appropriate to improve their management of public lands and National Forest System lands and shall develop appropriate legislative proposals necessary to facilitate that result.

United States NATO enjoys the strong support of both our political parties. And the concept of collective security, which NATO so ably represents, is a belief that also transcends the lines of nearly all political parties in Europe.

Q. Is the announced referendum to decide on Spanish membership in NATO a point of concern in the relations between the two countries, and during your visit to Madrid will you try to get assurances from the Spanish Government about the permanence of Spain in the Atlantic alliance?

States welcomes Spain as a NATO member and sees benefits to Spain, Europe, and the world from its membership in this peaceful alliance. But as I said in my previous answer, NATO is a free alliance. It is clearly up to Spain to decide whether it wishes to remain a member.

The U.S. and Spain work together closely in the military field in accordance with the 1982 agreement on friendship, defense, and cooperation; we will continue to do so. The only plans we have are to do our best to carry out all our obligations under the terms of that agreement.

United States had contingency plans to store nuclear warheads in Spanish territory. May your government guarantee that in the future nuclear weapons won't be deployed or stored in Spain without the consent of the Spanish people and that our country is not a part of the actual American contingency plans?

The President. The 1982 agreement on friendship, defense, and cooperation between our two countries specifically states that no nuclear weapons can be stored or installed in Spain without the agreement of the Spanish Government. The United States honors its obligations under that agreement fully and completely and will continue to do so.

Q. As you know, the crisis in Central America is perceived in a quite different way in Europe and in the U.S. This perception is even more different in Spain. You have just announced a new proposal for peace in Nicaragua. Will you ask for the support of Mr. Gonzalez for your plan, and do you think that Spain may help in some practical way to find a political solution to the crisis in the region?

The President. Sometimes people tend to overemphasize areas where there may be different points of view and overlook the much broader areas of agreement. In Central America, the U.S. and Spain both would like to see personal liberty, democratic governments, economic progress, and regional peace and stability.

One of the most important contributions Spain makes in fostering democracy is the example it has set over the past decade. Let me note, by the way, that when I took office 4 years ago only one of the five countries in Central America was a democracy. Now there are three democracies and one country well on the way back to democratic government.

In Nicaragua, we want to facilitate an internal dialog between the Communist Sandinistas and the democratic opposition. This would be an important adjunct to the efforts of the Contadora countries to find a regional solution, which we support.

Q. The most recent polls show that a majority of Spaniards are against the continued membership of Spain in NATO. If Spain withdrew from NATO or refused to join the military structure of the alliance, what could be, in your opinion, the implications and consequences for the United States, the European allies, Spain itself, and the future of U.S.-Spanish military cooperation? What incentives, if any, would you be willing to give Spain so as to facilitate its full membership in the alliance?

The President. Well, let's not start by getting into hypothetical questions of what might or might not happen. The main point I want to make is that NATO is the real peace movement. A strong Western alliance is the single surest guarantee of peace in Europe.

We believe that Spain's membership and eventual full participation in NATO strengthens NATO and strengthens Spain. But NATO is a free alliance of free peoples. We respect the right of the Spanish people to decide what they want to do.

Q. In the light of the moderate and pro-Western policies of the Spanish Socialist Government, have there been any changes in your initial attitude with regard to Socialist regimes in Western Europe? How would you characterize the state of U.S.-Spanish relations now, and what do you expect from your official visit to Madrid and talks with Spanish leaders?

The President. For me, the most important factor about a government is whether it believes in individual freedom and acts on that belief. The people of any democratic country render the final judgment on their government.

I think relations between the U.S. and Spain are very positive. Our two governments have an excellent working relationship in a range of areas, including security. In addition, we have developed close ties in trade, culture, and education.

During the visit, Secretary of State Shultz and Foreign Minister Moran will preside over a meeting of the U.S.-Spain Joint Council, the principal mechanism for implementing our 1982 agreement on friendship, defense, and cooperation. I will have important meetings with Spain's leaders. I expect that all aspects of this visit will further strengthen the ties between our peoples.

The President. Trade is, of course, of major interest to both our countries. First, let's look at a few of the facts. Spanish exports to the United States have tripled over the last decade. They did so well in 1984 -- they went up by 60 percent -- that the U.S. trade surplus with Spain was 10 times smaller that year than the year before. So, even though trade is not in perfect balance, it is heading in that direction.

In part, this shows how the sustained U.S. economic recovery is benefiting all our trading partners. I expect this trend to continue. What we all have to do now is act to ensure noninflationary growth and to keep our markets open to each other. I am committed to both goals.

I think it's a bit too early to predict all the economic pluses and minuses that will arise from Spain and Portugal joining the European Community. Let me just say that the United States has consistently supported their joining the Community and is pleased that negotiations on entry terms have been successfully concluded.

Q. The Sandinistas have rejected your proposal for talks with the Nicaraguan rebels. Which options are you considering to keep the pressure on Nicaragua? Do they include the breakup of diplomatic relations, economic sanctions or a blockade, a collective military action through the Organization of American States or even a direct military action by the United States?

The President. Well, we are reviewing our relationship with the Communist Sandinista government, and we are not taking the Sandinistas' response to their democratic resistance forces as a legitimate one. We urge them to consider very carefully the proposal from their own people who are in opposition to them. It represents an opportunity to achieve the national reconciliation which is indispensable for peace in Nicaragua and in Central America. I know that many other governments, especially in Latin America and Europe, are urging the Sandinistas to reconsider their initial response. But the evidence of the last 5 years is that the Sandinistas only show flexibility when incentives are maintained.

We believe a peaceful solution through the Contadora process and through reconciliation between the Sandinistas and their opposition within Nicaragua is still possible. That is what we are working toward. The problem in Nicaragua is the Communist Sandinistas; they are the ones who are depriving their own people of the freedom they seek.

The President. Our interests in Chile and Paraguay are the same as elsewhere in Latin America -- to promote personal liberty, democracy, peace, and economic development. In Chile we are working to promote national reconciliation and dialog; through these efforts we hope to see an early return to democracy there.

United States economic growth has already contributed greatly to the recovery of Latin American economies by providing an expanding market for their exports. Latin American and Caribbean exports to the U.S. rose 15 percent in 1984.

I should stress, though, that sound economic policies by the debtor nations themselves are also essential. Together, all these efforts should lead to improved conditions for growth and private investment, so that the Latin American nations can achieve sustainable economic growth. We favor continued dialog on debt-related issues and problems, both bilaterally and in appropriate multilateral fora. However, like the major debtor countries themselves, we do not think that a debt moratorium would advance the long-term interests of the countries involved.

The countries of Central and South America and our neighbor to the north, Canada, are vitally important to the United States. We seek a Western Hemisphere that lives in peace, democracy, freedom, and prosperity. And I have to say I believe we are making great strides in those directions.

Q. The American press recently published a report on U.S. plans to deploy nuclear weapons in various strategic points in Europe, including the Azores, in case of an emergency. The Portuguese Government claims never to have been contacted on the subject. Does this plan exist? Has the U.S. considered such a possibility?

Paris agreement. There it was agreed that deployments of nuclear warheads and missiles would take place only by agreement of the NATO states directly involved. We stand by that agreement fully and completely.

The President. Lajes has been important to Western defense ever since World War II. At that time it played a significant role in protecting the Atlantic sealanes. Lajes continues to play that role today. The core of Atlantic security remains the defense of the territorial integrity of the NATO member states. In that respect Lajes' role as part of the air bridge between the U.S. and Europe is also an important element of collective security.

States in defense matters. We are working to assist Portugal's military modernization effort so that Portugal can fulfill its desire to play a more active role in the defense of the West through NATO. While we have no new negotiations ongoing at present, our defense cooperation was recently strengthened by the agreements in December 1983 and March 1984 regarding our continued access to the Portuguese base at Lajes and the installation of a satellite tracking station in southern Portugal. There are, however, ongoing discussions implementing the agreement on the satellite tracking station.

Q. Given the political differences between President Eanes and Prime Minister Mario Soares -- a phenomenon of Portuguese internal politics generally called a ``conflict between organs of sovereignty'' -- has this, in your view, caused difficulties in the bilateral relations between the U.S. and Portugal?

The President. The premise of your question concerns Portuguese internal politics and that is not a matter for me to discuss. The point to be remembered is that relations between the United States and Portugal are excellent. Areas of cooperation have expanded substantially over the past 10 years as our two countries have found, in a common commitment to democracy, a broader and firmer basis for our traditional friendship as peoples and allies. Defense cooperation is certainly an important and constructive part of our relationship.

But it would be a mistake to overlook the many other ways in which our two countries and peoples are linked together. There are rich human ties between Portugal and the many Americans who are Portuguese by birth or descent. The flow of our peoples back and forth across the Atlantic is growing, particularly as more and more Americans discover the beauties of your country and visit Portugal as tourists. The United States has sought to assist Portugal's development and infrastructure in a number of ways, both through technical and financial assistance and in the construction of schools, health centers, and other facilities.

Trade between our two countries is substantial and the U.S. represents a good market -- which is largely untapped, but rapidly expanding -- for Portuguese exports. In 1984 U.S. merchandise imports rose over 25 percent, helping Portugal's overall exports to the U.S. increase by 70 percent. United States firms are increasingly looking at investment opportunities as Portugal takes steps to improve the climate for foreign investment, particularly in the private sector. In addition, Portugal's creation of the Luso-American Foundation will provide an important new vehicle for cooperation between us in a number of economic, technical, and other areas.

The President. The sustained recovery and growth of the U.S. economy has had beneficial effects on the international economy. About one-quarter of our economic growth has spilled over to other countries, helping to promote recovery abroad, both by our OECD trading partners, such as Portugal, and elsewhere. Furthermore, the strong U.S. dollar has given a competitive advantage to foreign producers, including those of Portugal. So, in 1984 alone, Portugal's overall exports to the U.S. increased by 70 percent.

The best thing we can do at this point is to keep our markets open to ensure that growth continues and strengthens. I am committed to doing that and to fighting protectionism. The best thing the developing countries can do for themselves, it seems to me, is to maintain market-related economic policies that will assure that they share in the benefits of worldwide economic growth.

All our trading partners, both the developed and developing countries, should work together to resolve specific trade problems as they occur and to obtain agreement to the commencement of a new round of trade negotiations early next year.

The President. Our relations with Mozambique have developed rapidly in the recent past, and I would not characterize them as being anything other than normal today. We maintain accredited Ambassadors in each other's capitals. We and the Mozambican Government are working together to implement programs of U.S. economic development assistance. The U.S. also has made major contributions of food to relieve the serious shortages created by drought conditions in Mozambique.

We also have been in frequent direct contact with the Angolan Government in an effort to facilitate a negotiated solution to the conflict between South Africa and Angola and to secure the implementation of United Nations Resolution 435, calling for the independence of Namibia. It has been the policy of the last three administrations, however, that formal diplomatic relations with Angola could not be considered until the issue of Cuban troops there has been resolved.

With regard to Portugal's role, we value its experience and knowledge of Africa. Portugal has played a constructive role in the process leading to the recent expansion of relations between Mozambique and the West, including specifically the United States. We have and will continue to consult closely with your government as we address the issues of the region, including those involving Mozambique and Angola.

Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe. This meeting is mandated to deal with questions concerning the record of all 35 CSCE states in protecting human rights and fundamental freedoms, in all their aspects, as embodied in the Final Act. This is the first CSCE meeting that has ever been devoted exclusively to human rights issues. It visibly manifests the success of joint U.S.-West European efforts to utilize CSCE as a major forum for discussions on human rights.

Accords of 1975 and in the Madrid Concluding Document of 1983. These documents set forth a clear code of conduct, not only for relations among sovereign states, but also for relations between states and their citizens. They hold out a beacon of hope for those in the East who seek a freer, more just, and more secure life. We and the other Atlantic democracies will not waver in our efforts to see that these commitments are someday fully honored in all of Europe.

Let us as Americans look once again to our commitment to implement fully the human rights and humanitarian provisions of the Helsinki Accords, because these freedoms are fundamental to our way of life. Let us pledge ourselves once again to do everything in our power so that all men and women may enjoy them in peace. In doing so, we call on all 35 CSCE states to dedicate themselves to upholding these humane principles.

In accordance with Section 1525 of the Department of Defense Authorization Act of 1985, I am submitting the attached report detailing actions taken by the United States Government in pursuit of our national goal of returning any servicemen who may still be held captive in Southeast Asia; the fullest possible accounting of those still missing; and the repatriation of all recoverable remains of those who died serving our Nation.

In doing so, I would like to reemphasize my personal dedication to this great national effort and my confidence that the actions of those involved throughout the Executive branch of Government in the resolution of this issue reflect this same dedication. In this effort, there can be no partisan or parochial views or any special interests, but only the interest of the entire American people to see to it that all of us do our duty toward those who served this Nation so well in time of war and their families who look to us to help secure the answers they so rightfully seek and deserve.

We face challenges in science, engineering, and technology, but I am confident about our ability to meet those challenges. The National Science Foundation has been and will remain a key part of the national effort to keep vital our great capabilities in research and productivity and to stay ahead of world competition through innovation and new discoveries.

These negotiations are among the most complicated and difficult ever undertaken, and it is clear that they will take time. But we find ourselves in the best position to achieve meaningful arms limitations that has existed in a generation. With patience, strength, and Western solidarity, we will succeed.

My administration is committed to achieving verifiable and equitable agreements substantially reducing U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals. This is one of the most important and urgent tasks facing the international community, and we will not waver in our determination to achieve this goal. With our skilled and dedicated negotiating team we are doing our part, and, as long as the Soviet Union is similarly committed, there are grounds for optimism that agreement can be reached.

I am leaving later today for Europe, where I will take part in the economic summit in Bonn and meet with some of our allied leaders both there and in bilateral visits to Germany, Spain, and Portugal. In addition to the major economic issues which are on the summit agenda, my private discussions with these allied leaders will also cover security issues, including developments in Geneva. Our commitment, and that of our friends and allies, to our twin goals of peace and prosperity remains steadfast.

A short time ago the Senate took an important step toward putting our nation's fiscal house in order. The vote today on the $300 billion taxpayers' protection plan demonstrated foresight and responsible leadership. Majority Leader Dole and his colleagues are to be commended.

This step, though crucial, was just the first on a long and difficult road. To carry the taxpayers' protection plan through to final passage, the Senators who voted for the plan today will have to stand fast against a long list of amendments -- amendments that would weaken the package, split the coalition of Senators who support the package, and ultimately do grave damage to our economy. I am confident, however, that if a majority of the Senate remains true to the spirit of unity and determination so apparent today, then the taxpayers' protection plan will become law, and the American economy will continue to expand with vigor.

We leave tonight for a Europe that is rebuilt from the disaster of war and morally restored from the despair of 1945. The strong, confident alliance of free people who've done this can take satisfaction in their achievements and look to the future with confidence. So, we leave on this journey infused with pride and hope. We are proud of our Atlantic partnership that anchors the freedom and democracy which our nations have created from the rubble of 40 years ago.

Our hopes for the future are high. Despite the hectic pace of change in today's world, we know that by allowing the freest expression of individual human aspirations, we can surmount our challenges and build a more secure and peaceful future. We know this because of a simple truth which makes our societies strong: Freedom works.

Republic of Germany to Japan, providing the clearest possible symbol of our modern economic interdependence. At this year's summit, we will strive for agreement to meet the challenge of greater growth on which our good fortunes depend. In doing so we will work to ensure cooperation among our economies. We approach this challenge with vigor, vision, and optimism.

We visit Europe determined to carry forward the spirit of peace and reconciliation among old adversaries and the power of our democratic ideals. The friendship between the American and German peoples -- a great blessing that has grown rich and strong over our three centuries of shared national experience -- is dramatic proof of how former enemies can be brought together again.

What better example of the success of democracy could we find than the strong new democratic systems in Spain and Portugal? We're pleased to salute the accomplishments of these countries, whose contribution to the New World was so great. The partnerships that we've built in Europe, the Atlantic community, and across the Pacific are the underlying foundation for the freedom that protects peace and security and strengthens the prosperity for hundreds of millions of people across this planet.

So, we leave tonight, eager to see again our European and Japanese friends and confident that, together, we can meet the challenge of expanding freedom and of preserving the blessings of the peace that we share.

The administration supports a market-oriented policy on world oil prices. There has been no change in administration policy or viewpoint on the declining oil prices. We believe that the way to achieve price stability is to let the free market work. While we're concerned with the effects of falling prices on oil-producing sectors of the U.S. economy, the net effect for American consumers and the American economy will be positive.

When the Vice President meets with King Fahd in Saudi Arabia this Sunday, he will emphasize the U.S. viewpoint that market forces should establish world oil price levels. As the Vice President said yesterday, we're not going there on a price-setting mission when we ourselves favor market forces.

The President has signed a directive to implement virtually all of the recommendations presented to him in the interim report of the Blue Ribbon Commission on Defense Management. The Presidential directive and separate instructions issued by Secretary of Defense Weinberger include all of the Commission's recommendations that can be implemented by executive action.

The President takes pride and satisfaction with the many reforms already started by Secretary Weinberger and stresses that the Commission recommendations should provide the basis for structural reform which would permit the Department of Defense to build upon and go beyond what has already been accomplished. The President appreciates the Commission's statement that many of their recommendations have already been started by Secretary Weinberger. This was one of the factors that encouraged the Commission and gave them confidence that their proposals would be implemented.

The President also is indebted to David Packard, the Commission's Chairman, and the Commission for their excellent work. The recommendations of the Commission are among the most extensive reforms of the Defense Establishment since World War II. The Packard commission will continue to advise the President and Secretary Weinberger during the process of implementing the report. The President expects the Commission to elaborate on its interim recommendations by issuing additional reports prior to its final report this summer.

In signing the necessary directives to implement the Commission's recommendations, the President noted that he will send a formal message to the Congress asking for Congress to join him in implementing the Commission's recommendations. He will call on the Congress to help in the implementation of executive branch reform and also to make the important congressional reforms outlined by the Commission. The President is pleased that the Congress has begun to take the first steps in this process.

The President condemns the attack on innocent air travelers aboard TWA flight 840 as a barbaric action of wanton international terrorism. He has directed all appropriate resources of the United States Government to assist in finding those responsible. Neither the United States or the world community can cease our efforts to bring to justice those who perpetrate and support such actions.

On the basis of the information now available to this government, this appears to be the act of a terrorist who placed an explosive device aboard the TWA flight. Four innocent air travelers, all U.S. citizens, were killed. A number of others were injured. Although a group calling itself the Arab Revolutionary Cell has claimed responsibility for placing the bomb aboard the aircraft, we have not ruled out any terrorist group, organization, movement, or individual as a potential perpetrator. Until all the facts are determined, we will not speculate on who may be responsible.

I will soon send a message to the Congress asking your Senators and Representatives to join me in reforming the Defense Establishment. That includes my office, the Defense Department, the Congress, and industry. The changes our administration will request are based upon the recommendations made in February by the Packard commission, a bipartisan group that spent months studying ways to give our nation stronger defenses more economically.

Earlier this week I ordered implementation of those recommendations that can be made without congressional action. Now, with congressional support, we'll be able to put into effect perhaps the most thoroughgoing reform of our Defense Establishment since 1958. This new effort takes place against a background of national defenses that have already grown much stronger. When we first took office, we inherited a navy that had shrunk from nearly 1,000 ships to less than 500 and planes that couldn't fly for want of spare parts. My predecessor had called attention to this and had proposed a 5-year expansion of the defense budget. Well, now our rebuilding program has added ships to the fleet, put planes back in the air, and, perhaps most important, boosted the morale of our men and women in uniform by giving them the training and pay they deserve. Much still needs to be done, but today the United States has substantially reestablished the strength and self-confidence it needs to perform its role as the leader of the free world.

As we rebuild our strength, we've made strides in marshaling the defense resources of the Nation with increased efficiency. Before we came into office, the costs of major systems had been escalating at an annual rate of 14 percent. With lower inflation, Defense Secretary Weinberger got that crazy spiral under control. Indeed, for the last 2 years cost increases have fallen to less than 1 percent. That's lower than the rate of inflation. This one achievement alone has saved billions of dollars. Yet, despite these successes, Secretary Weinberger and I knew at the beginning of our second term that still more needed to be done.

So, last summer I appointed a bipartisan commission to study the management of our defenses. To chair the commission I chose Dave Packard, an entrepreneur who started a company that had become one of our country's leaders in high technology, famous the world over for its management techniques and efficiency. He was joined by 16 outstanding Americans, Republicans and Democrats, who represent the best of the business, defense, and academic communities. In February the Packard commission submitted its recommendations. Now the time has come to put them into effect. Some recommendations can be acted upon without congressional approval, and under Secretary Weinberger's leadership this is taking place.

This week I signed a directive that will enhance coordination between the two sides of the Pentagon budget process: the one that says what we need and the one that says what we can afford. In addition, the Pentagon is streamlining its large procurement structure, and it will begin to give experienced managers more leeway for using their own good judgment in the purchasing process. But certain steps that would make the Department of Defense even more shipshape can take place only with congressional approval. You know, it's as if the Pentagon can swab the decks on its own, but only the Congress can grant permission to polish the brasswork. Well, it's to get this permission that I'm sending my message to Capitol Hill.

The Packard commission report urges the Congress to make a number of improvements in the way it deals with defense. The commission suggests, for example, that the Congress move from a 1-year to a 2-year budget cycle. It also urges the Congress to better focus its consideration of defense matters. Today there are some 40 congressional committees and subcommittees, each of which has some jurisdiction over defense. And the Packard commission points out that many of these committees duplicate each other's efforts.

And friends, we can all agree with the Packard commission: There must be a better, more efficient way. Other recommendations that Congress must approve include moving from year-to-year to multiyear procurements of weapon systems in order to make the acquisition process more stable; the rewriting of procurement laws to eliminate redtape; and the budgeting of major programs according to milestones within the programs themselves, not the dictates of the calendar year. In the coming weeks the Congress will have before it proposals that would both strengthen our defenses and make the Department of Defense, itself, more completely the servant of the American people. The Packard commission has made its recommendations; now it's time for the administration and the Congress to act upon them.

First of all, the President is deeply concerned about the increasing number of terrorist incidents that are affecting Americans in Europe and worldwide. He has instructed his top administration officials to stay on top of it, to provide him with an early assessment of the latest outbreak this week and to -- I think that's about all we ought to say. Certainly the President expresses his condolences to the families, and he wants to see that we do everything possible first to apprehend and prosecute those who are responsible specifically and those who perpetrate these types of incidents.

The second thing he wants to do is to take every measure in concert with the allies in order to prevent terrorist incidents. He believes that it is a worldwide problem and that every nation has a stake in this and every nation must do its part to prevent terrorism and to isolate those, condemn them, and to bring an end to these individuals, groups, or nations, in some cases, who sponsor terrorism.

The theme for World Health Day 1986, ``Healthy Living: Everyone a Winner,'' emphasizes the positive steps that individuals and communities can take to protect and promote health. In furtherance of the global goal of Health for All by the Year 2000, the World Health Organization and its member governments are stressing the benefits that come from healthful patterns of living, with particular attention to exercise, nutrition, and the avoidance of such destructive habits as smoking and the abuse of alcohol and drugs.

In recent years, health leaders and private physicians in the United States have emphasized how much each person can do to maintain good health by a regimen of good diet, proper exercise, and the avoidance of substance abuse. This campaign is beginning to bear fruit, and the United States is experiencing encouraging reductions in the incidence of heart disease and stroke.

It is appropriate that as all member governments commemorate World Health Day, we should join other members of the World Health Organization in promoting healthful living and physical fitness and in pledging our continued support to improving the health of all the people who inhabit this planet.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventh day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

This Nation's investment in basic cancer research has led us to an unprecedented understanding of the cancer cell. With this new knowledge, we are undertaking major efforts to prevent cancer; to reverse the process once it starts; to find ways to activate the body's own immune system; and to treat the disease and its symptoms more effectively.

Much evidence suggests that diets high in fiber and low in fat may reduce cancer risk. We can adopt a daily diet high in fiber by choosing plenty of fresh fruits, vegetables, and whole-grain breads and cereals. We can reduce animal fat intake by choosing low-fat and lean foods, and by using low-fat cooking methods.

Smoking-related cancers are the most preventable. This past year, new data showed that the incidence of lung cancer in white men decreased significantly for the first time in at least half a century. This decrease comes 20 years after men began to stop smoking in substantial numbers. This proves that individuals can successfully reduce their cancer risk by not smoking.

This message is especially important for women, whose rates of lung cancer show no signs of leveling off or decreasing. In fact, lung cancer is expected to surpass breast cancer this year as the leading cause of cancer deaths among women. Rates of lung cancer are also high for black men.

The growing popularity of smokeless tobacco products among our youth, particularly teenage boys, is of great concern. Early this year, medical experts concluded that there is strong evidence that such forms of tobacco cause cancer of the mouth.

Some promising findings this year give new hope to cancer patients. Scientists reported a totally new approach to cancer treatment, an approach that activates the immune system to destroy cancer cells in some patients. Extensive studies are underway to refine and perfect the treatment so that it can become widely available as soon as possible.

Today, many Americans are working, attending school, caring for families, or resuming normal life in their communities after receiving a transplanted organ or other tissue. But many others still wait for such transplants in order to improve or even save their lives.

The need for donors far surpasses the supply. Current medical technology enables the transplantation of organs and tissues including kidney, heart, heart-lung, lung, liver, pancreas, skin, cornea, bone, and bone marrow. But the greatest obstacle to making these life-sustaining and life-saving transplants possible is the shortage of donors.

All Americans must know what they can do to consent to become organ and tissue donors. By completing a uniform donor card and carrying it at all times, anyone can give the gift of life to people in desperate need of organs and tissues for transplantation. It is especially important for would-be donors to make their intentions known to family members, so that appropriate action can be taken promptly when the time comes.

Americans are a caring and giving people, so it is fitting that we as a Nation should encourage organ and tissue donation and increase public awareness of the possibilities and the need. I ask every American to consider organ and tissue donation, and I ask the media to assist in informing the public of the great need that exists. Together, we can make organ and tissue donation another expression of American generosity.

We made note of Nicaragua's intransigence there in negotiations. It is regrettable that Nicaragua has not engaged in serious negotiations in Panama City with the Contadora countries. It is clear that other Central American countries were prepared to have serious discussions. The Nicaraguans refused to take part in constructive talks. We note that the communique gives Nicaragua another week to reconsider its position. It is also interesting to note that the behind-the-scenes role of Cubans in advising the Nicaraguan delegation has come to light.

The President. I am delighted to have this opportunity to be with all of you today. I know the purpose of this get-together is some back-and-forth between us, so I'll try to keep my remarks short. But this is a very influential group, and what politician worth his salt would give up the chance to make a few points to you this morning?

I didn't want this opportunity to go by without pointing to some of the enormous changes that we've seen in American politics during this decade. I don't have to remind those of you who report and edit the news of the scope of this change, but I do think it's a good idea now and then to take a moment and reflect on the meaning of that change and gain some perspective on a decade that is now more than half over. I'm sure you all remember that when we took office in 1981, we faced appalling economic conditions, and that's not to mention the crisis of confidence in America's military strength and her international prestige. Our program for economic recovery was much criticized, and getting it through the Congress was the first of many tough struggles to come. We also faced opposition to our efforts to restore America's military strength and carry out a foreign policy that pursued peace while it also sought to halt Soviet expansionism and expand the borders of freedom.

Much of this opposition was understandable. A number of the people in policy and opinionmaking circles had trouble dealing with the new ideas that we brought to Washington. As Bill Buckley once put it: ``Though liberals do a great deal of talking about hearing other points of view, it sometimes shocks them to learn that there are other points of view.'' But despite the parochialism of some of our critics, our programs, with the support of the American people, gain passage. I think the results achieved thus far with the revitalization of the economy, our military strength, and the restoration of our international prestige bear out the merit of our conservative ideas.

A few years back, our simple efforts to get some aid to El Salvador so a democratic government could be firmly established there met with fierce opposition. But thanks in no small part to the Salvadoran people who braved guerrilla threats and gunfire to march to the polls, we prevailed; and so did the dream of democracy. My favorite story is of an elderly woman standing in line waiting hours to vote in the hot sunshine in that first El Salvador election. And she had been hurt by the guerrillas because of her determination to vote, and they had told her that they would kill her and her friends if she went on and voted. And she said, ``You may kill me, and you may kill my family, my friends; you can't kill us all.'' And so she went in defiance of them and stood and voted. I can't help but mention the Grenada operation also in connection with these things. It was hardly under way when some of our critics took to the airwaves to denounce our efforts there as ``rampant militarism.'' But just as the people of El Salvador spoke out in their own way, so, too, our medical students and the people of Grenada provided all the eloquent rebuttals that were needed.

In a curious way, though, being wrong about the issues, whether it's the economy or Central America, doesn't seem to discourage our critics. I'd hardly gotten through my televised address asking support for the freedom fighters in Nicaragua, when some voices were questioning some of the charges I made against the Sandinista regime. For example, that the Sandinistas engaged in vicious acts of anti-Semitism, and that they'd been deeply involved in the illicit drug trade. Well, again, fortunately, some of the doubters were quickly rebutted. The Anti-Defamation League of B'nai B'rith quickly issued a strong statement confirming the truth of what we said about the persecution of Jews in Nicaragua. And on the illicit drug-trafficking charge, I was grateful to a number of publications for editorially outlining the depth and extent of the evidence against the Sandinistas. A massive report by the President's Commission on Organized Crime on the international drug trade, for example, discussed the Sandinistas' participation in the drug trade.

Extremely persuasive testimony has also come from Alvaro Baldizon, the former chief investigator of the special investigations commission of the ministry of interior in Nicaragua. And by the way, besides his descriptions of what he learned about the Sandinistas' involvement in the drug trade, Senor Baldizon's testimony called ``Inside the Sandinista Regime: A Special Investigator's Perspective.'' This is a richly detailed, harrowing look at the Sandinista regime. It's been published by the State Department, and I recommend it to you. I think your readers would be intrigued by his revelations, especially his portrait of Sandinista leaders like Interior Minister Tomas Borge and that gentleman's often successful attempts to mislead visiting dignitaries.

The American people are just now getting the facts about the Sandinista regime: its atrocities against groups like the Miskito Indians; its persecution of Jews and Christians; the verbal attacks on Cardinal Obando, whom we intend to prevent from becoming the Cardinal Mindszenty of this hemisphere. And the list goes on. The savageness and inhumanity of this regime is a story that is waiting to be told.

We know now that the Cubans knew and approved of Sandinista plans for their recent incursion into Honduras and that each day's delay in assisting the freedom fighters increases the chances of a permanent Soviet beachhead of aggression on the North American mainland. The Sandinistas, the Cubans, and the Soviets want a military, not a political, solution to the problem of Central America. And that's why it's imperative for the House of Representatives to approve the legislation recently passed by the Senate, legislation that provides the freedom fighters with our full aid package, especially the defensive weapons they need to protect themselves.

Mr. Clark. Thank you very much, Mr. President. We will have questions from the floor. Let me remind you that members only will ask questions, and please state clearly your name and your newspaper affiliation so that not only the others in the hall but the President can understand who you are.

The President. I think that my friend, Mr. Marcos, has been misinformed by some. As a matter of fact, I had a personal representative that was meeting with him quite consistently. Our only practice, or what we did during that entire time, was to try and see that the Philippines, which historically the Filipino people have been our close friends -- that this did not degenerate into civil war. And when he himself publicly announced his refusal to order the army to fight, we were very pleased with that, and I thought it was very worthy of him that he did that. And this was all, that we just wanted to see that there would be no civil war. And we respect him for his willingness to leave the island. But as far as we knew, he was aware that his destination when he left the palace was Clark Field.

Q. Heath Merriwether, with the Miami Herald. Mr. President, diplomatically you've said you supported the Contadora peace initiative in Central America. Yet those nations of the Contadora pact have said that they don't think that aid to the contras will help their efforts. How do you resolve the contradiction between support of the Contadora initiative and your own push for aid to the contras?

The President. Well, we may disagree on whether it is necessary now to give this, of course -- and we do believe it is necessary, and I'm wondering if their view would not be the same about help to the contras in view of what just happened in the last meeting. Because once again -- and we have subscribed to their goals that they have put down as to what it is they're trying to achieve. And they know that we fully subscribe to them. But in its last meeting, it was Nicaragua, once again, the Sandinista government, that refused the proposals of Contadora and walked out. So, maybe now they'll join us in believing that there's going to have to be some pressure put on the Sandinista government to make it return to the goals of the revolution against the Somoza regime.

They announced publicly goals and informed the Organization of American States what their revolutionary goals were; and they were democracy, a pluralistic society, freedom of press, religion, freedom of speech, observance of human rights, and the right of the people to choose their own government. And that's what is at issue. The Sandinistas were only part of that revolution. And they ousted their revolutionary companions, who are mainly now the contras. Once the revolution succeeded, they took over and have established a totalitarian Communist state. And we think they're not going to -- when have we ever seen a Communist government that has achieved that totalitarian statehood -- when have we ever seen them voluntarily and without some pressure or force give up their power? So, we believe that arming the contras is necessary. And I hope maybe now the Contadora will agree with us.

Q. Don James, Wichita Falls Times and Record News. Mr. President, the free-fall in oil prices is concerning a lot of people, particularly with respect to what it will do for exploration. Do you have any concerns about the long-term effect of a virtual halt in exploration for oil on the national security?

The President. Well, yes, and we hope that this whole thing will stabilize very quickly. We're concerned lest some major producers in other parts of the world might start playing games with this, as if in an effort to eliminate competition. And if they have such ideas -- I don't know that they do -- but if anyone does and has such an idea, of course, they would be looking forward to a time when they could then skyrocket the prices on a kind of monopoly basis. But we still believe in the free market. We know that it now is a hardship for the oil-producing regions and industry here in America.

Q. Bill Ketter, from the Patriot Ledger in Quincy, Massachusetts. Mr. President, as you know, the members of ASNE and the press in general were concerned when the press was excluded from the Grenada invasion some time ago. After that we worked out this situation with the Defense Department where we had these practice pools where reporters would be able to go with the military in these exercises. And recently in the Libyan encounter in the Gulf of Sidra there were six journalists that were on the U.S.S. Saratoga as part of a press pool, but when the military encounter began they were removed from the ship and flown back to Rome and were not even made aware of the fact that there was a military encounter going on in the Gulf of Sidra. I'd like to know if you can give us an explanation as to why the reporters were removed from the ship and if you could restate your attitude on reporters covering military encounters involving the United States?

The President. Well, with the Grenada situation we had found out how leaky Washington is in a number of things. We realized that for the safety of our men that that operation had to be top secret. It came about with a direct request to us from the other Caribbean island nations -- that they didn't have the power and asked us. As a matter of fact, at about 3 o'clock in the morning it was relayed to me. If George Shultz ever asks you for a quiet weekend of golf at Augusta, don't take him up on it. [Laughter] That's where I was awakened. And I knew that we had to accede to their request. And we only had 48 hours to put this operation together, and we feared very definitely that any leak would result in higher casualties for our forces. We immediately -- that we had landed -- as you know, then did provide the transportation and make possible the bringing in of the press.

On this latest one that you are asking about, I was not aware of those six being taken off. Once there were hostilities, we started trying to round up the press in Italy. But this -- in response to the reports that we deliberately went in there as a provocation -- that was the seventh such maneuver, war games, you may want to call them, that we have conducted in that same area. And we knew that we were risking it -- knowing the nature of Qadhafi -- that there might possibly be something. And I've always had one order any place we ever sent our personnel. I declared to the Navy that it was my policy that if hostilities were launched against them -- we'll never send American military personnel without the right to fight back and fire back if they're fired upon. So, that was the only rule that was in there. But we went in on what had been planned for months and months. And there will probably be another such maneuver next year.

And then, when the hostilities -- when they did launch the attack against us, why, it was my understanding that then, following that, and when it did become an operation, that we tried to round up the press and so inform them and make available to them the news.

The President. Yes, and we have had such a policy. But I think also that you must understand where we believe that there is an operation where secrecy is so all-important that you give us the right to protect ourselves against a leak of information. And that leak does not necessarily come from you. We've found that the White House is the leakiest place I've ever been in. [Laughter] So, you'd be surprised how few people knew that we were planning that operation. Not even our Press Secretary knew. Not that he's the leaker; we just kept it that close -- [laughter].

Q. Mr. President, Randy Hatch, from Ogden, Utah, the Ogden Standard Examiner. After increasing terrorism and incidents of terrorism and reviewing all of the options available, do you have a specific plan of dealing with terrorism in the future now?

The President. Well, we're taking very serious -- as I've said, we're not going to just sit here and hold still. We're trying to work with our allies, and we've been successful in part with regard to cooperation in intelligence matters. Last year, thanks to that cooperation between our countries, we were able to abort 126 planned terrorist attacks throughout the world. And we're continuing to try and get more support now for action that would be appropriate in view of the greater threats that are being uttered of terrorist activities. And right now, with the most recent activities, I can't get specific with you, because I can only tell you that we are investigating and trying to gather all of the information we can so that we can actually, with solid evidence, point a finger at who is responsible.

The President. Well, now, my quoting of Bill Buckley and his line -- is that what you're referring to as being harsh? I don't often quote him because he uses too big words. [Laughter] But I didn't think that was harsh. There's no question but that I am tagged throughout the world as being an archconservative, and I've always thought that I was kind of defending myself when I answered back. Back in the beginning of our economic program that started this recovery, I was aware that my critics had named the plan Reaganomics, and I knew it was a success when they stopped calling it that. [Laughter] But where have I been so -- I don't think I've been all that harsh.

The President. Well, I'm sorry you took that yourself. I was very careful to say critics and stop there. And there's a good share of the 535 on Capitol Hill -- and they aren't connected to press -- that are critics. And so, in front of this audience, I wasn't going to actually tag my critics as being of the press. [Laughter] No, I recognize the right, and I go along with Thomas Jefferson. I will protect and believe in a free press. I could say there is a section of the press that takes me on regularly, but it's a controlled press: Pravda and TASS. And I don't defend them at all.

Q. Mr. President, Mike Davies, The Hartford Courant. It has been said that publicity in a sense is the lifeblood of terrorism. Perhaps without so much publicity, terrorist acts might diminish in scope and in number. Would you care to comment, please, on how well or how poorly you think the American media have covered terrorist acts up to this point?

The President. I know this talk about publicity and so forth, and I know that they strive for it. On the other hand, just trying to pretend that it doesn't happen and keeping quiet about it isn't going to end it. I think we all -- and I mean by all, I mean that we, in our country, plus our friends and allies throughout the free world -- have got to set down standards and make it plain that there will be retaliation and that terrorism cannot succeed, and thus part of our policy is that we will never pay off terrorists because that only encourages more of it.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Mary Kate Bush to be United States Alternate Executive Director of the International Monetary Fund for a term of 2 years. This is a reappointment.

This Compact of Free Association is the result of more than sixteen years of continuous and comprehensive negotiations, spanning the administrations of four Presidents. The transmission of the proposed Joint Resolution today, and congressional enactment of it, marks the last step in the process for approval of the Compact.

The defense and land use provisions of the Compact with Palau, and the right of the United States to foreclose access to the area for military purposes of third countries, are of great importance to our strategic position in the Pacific and enable us to continue preserving regional security and peace. Under the Palau Compact, the minimum term of United States defense authority and responsibility will be fifty years; otherwise, the Palau Compact is very similar to the Compact that the Congress approved for the Marshall Islands and the Federated States of Micronesia.

For almost four decades, the Trust Territory has been administered under a Trusteeship Agreement with the United Nations Security Council, which the United States entered into pursuant to the Joint Resolution of July 18, 1947. This Compact of Free Association with the government of Palau fulfills our commitment under that Agreement to bring about self-government in accordance with the freely expressed wishes of the Palauan people. Termination of the Trusteeship Agreement and the formal assumption of freely chosen political status arrangements by all parts of the present Trust Territory are important foreign policy objectives of the United States.

Enactment of this draft Joint Resolution approving the Compact of Free Association for Palau will complete the enterprise of self-government we began with the peoples of the Trust Territory many years ago. It is the final step preceding full termination of the Trusteeship Agreement. Therefore, I urge the Congress to approve the Compact of Free Association for Palau.

First, the deadline for Americans paying their taxes, April 15th, will be upon us in less than a week. April 15th is also the date that the Congress is required to complete work on a budget resolution. Tens of millions of Americans will meet their deadline; they'll pay their taxes even if they have to spend the entire weekend figuring out how much they owe. But will Congress meet its deadline for the budget resolution? We hear the same tattered old argument that the American people are undertaxed. Well, the American people are not undertaxed, but their patience is overtaxed. Today, taxes take the same share of the gross national product as during the seventies, but government spending as a share of gross national product has soared up and up. So, I urge the Congress to forget about raising taxes and concentrate instead on controlling spending and putting government's financial house in order. And that'll help our economy and continue the best economic expansion this country's seen in a quarter of a century.

Second issue is aid to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. Two events in recent weeks have underscored the urgency of our aid request to the democratic resistance. First, the Nicaraguan Communists sent troops into Honduras on a search-and-destroy mission to kill off the freedom fighters. Second, the Sandinista Communists torpedoed the Contadora talks, talks conducted with 12 other Latin countries who seek peace in the region. And these events demonstrate that the Nicaraguan Communists will never make peace with their neighbors or with their own people unless the pressure on them increases. The Communists must realize that they cannot crush their opponents, and our assistance can ensure that the freedom fighters are not crushed. That assistance will give Nicaraguans a choice, and it will give diplomacy a chance.

Four out of five Central American countries now have democratic governments; democracies that our bipartisan policies helped to bring about. We must stick to this bipartisan strategy. And this coming week, the House of Representatives will be called upon to maintain that tradition. Action now is essential, and we cannot afford further delay. This proposal must not be held hostage to any other legislation. Through its vote next week, the House can show the world that the United States is determined to defend freedom in Central America. The Soviet Union, Fidel Castro, and the Sandinistas are determined to make the region a Communist enclave. Well, we must not and we will not permit that to happen.

Q. Mr. President, do you have any solid evidence that Qadhafi is responsible for the recent acts of terrorism? And if you are contemplating major retaliation, won't you be killing a lot of innocent people? I'd like to follow up.

The President. Helen, we have considerable evidence, over quite a long period of time, that Qadhafi has been quite outspoken about his participation in urging on and supporting terrorist acts -- a kind of warfare, as he has called it. Right now, however, I can't answer you specifically on this other, because we're continuing with our intelligence work and gathering evidence on these most recent attacks, and we're not ready yet to speak on that. And any action that we might take would be dependent on what we learn. And so, I can't go further.

The President. Well, we know that this mad dog of the Middle East has a goal of a world revolution, Moslem fundamentalist revolution, which is targeted on many of his own Arab compatriots. And where we figure in that, I don't know. Maybe we're just the enemy because -- it's a little like climbing Mount Everest -- because we're here. But there's no question but that he has singled us out more and more for attack, and we're aware of that. As I say, we're gathering evidence as fast as we can.

Q. Mr. President, Colonel Qadhafi threatened today to escalate the violence against American civilians and military targets throughout the world if his country is attacked. Does he have the ability to strike here on American soil?

The President. Well, we know that there are a number of his countrymen in this country. He has even suggested that he could call upon people to do that. And we certainly do not overlook that possibility. We're going to be on the alert and on guard for anything he might do. He has threatened repeatedly, and recently, that he will bring that kind of warfare to our shores, directly here. Of course, it's kind of hard to keep up with him, because just a short time after this recent TWA explosion, he went on the air to state that this was an attack on innocent civilians and pure terrorism, and he wouldn't have anything to do with that. That's the same man that referred to the slaughter of the innocents in Rome and Vienna airports as a noble act. So, I don't know whether you count on what he says for your real information. I think you just ignore that and go looking for facts.

The President. Well, we're doing everything that we can, and I think all of the law enforcement agencies of America are alerted of this fact. And we're not entirely helpless because, as I pointed out, I believe sometime recently -- or the last time we were here -- that in the last year we have aborted through our intelligence gathering in cooperation with our allies, we have aborted 126 planned terrorist attacks that never took place because of our having the information in advance.

Q. Mr. President, you have said that the Gulf of Sidra maneuvers were designed to protect U.S. maritime rights. As Commander in Chief, can you tell us what was so strategically important about the Gulf of Sidra in particular, or the concept of freedom of navigation in general, that you would risk the lives of American soldiers?

The President. When we first came here, there had been a couple of years -- that area of the Mediterranean, maybe because of its width and openness, has long been the place that has been chosen by our 6th Fleet there for the practice maneuvers that it must continue to take. And those maneuvers are very often very similar because you have new recruits and new crews and so forth, and you have to keep in practice. And he then, before we were here -- he drew that line and said that the waters behind that line were his. The rest of the world denied that and said those are international waters. But, for whatever reason, our Navy did not perform those maneuvers for a couple of years. And when we came here it was presented to us that if we did not just resume our normal practice, we could then give credence to his claim and just by our not ignoring that line establish the fact that it was his private preserve. And this was presented to me, and after full deliberation and consultation, I ruled that those who said this were right and that we should resume what had been a matter of practice with the 6th Fleet before. And so we did. And in 1981 we returned to having a maneuver.

Now, it doesn't mean that you sail in with a whole fleet just to thumb your nose at him across that line. You conduct the maneuvers out in the Mediterranean -- but it does mean that there are some ships on the flank, some planes, that in the exercise will cross that line. So, it isn't, as I say, a nose-to-nose confrontation that you make just to show off. And this was true in '81, but if you were to recall in '81, two planes he sent out fired upon planes of ours. And we shot down those two planes, because I had ruled that any time there is going to be a possibility of hostility against our forces, they're going to be allowed to defend themselves. Now, we did that. Now, this maneuver was the seventh such maneuver that we have had in that area. So, it wasn't an unusual thing that we set out to do. And he did open hostilities, and we closed them.

Q. Mr. President, if I may, there is a wide perception, however, that the administration was hoping to provoke Qadhafi and was prepared to escalate the military confrontation in the Gulf of Sidra. And I was just wondering whether you had given thought to the number of American lives that might have perished there.

The President. I have to tell you that there's no decision that anyone in this office has to make that is harder to make than placing these young men and women of ours in uniform in a place where their lives are endangered. It is the most difficult thing to do. But it was not a deliberate provocation, and not sitting back saying, ``Oh, goody, he's going to show his hand, and we'll clobber him.'' Not at all.

But even the Soviet Union recognizes those as international waters. And, again, just by usage or nonusage there of that area, what had been a normal practice for us for a number of years, would, as I say, lend credence to his claim and one day you'd just find that the world had accepted this. So, I think we've done this before in other waters and other parts of the world and other nations have also -- to make sure that international waters are recognized as such. And so, there are times when -- yes, when people have to be endangered, but not idly and not just for a provocation.

Q. Mr. President, the U.S. is once again asking the Western allies to join with you and isolate Qadhafi. So far they have expelled some Libyan diplomats in Paris and in Bonn, but they've taken no economic sanctions in the wake of these most recent attacks. How much of a disappointment is it to you that the Europeans have not followed suit, and what do you plan to do about it?

The President. Well, we're continuing to communicate with them and talk with them, and we're encouraged by what we've seen -- these two countries who have taken some action along this line. And I'm quite sure that this will be a subject we'll be talking about at the forthcoming summit with our allies.

Q. Sir, if I could follow up on that. You've used some very tough rhetoric about Qadhafi. Tonight you called him the mad dog of the Middle East. Do you ever worry that perhaps you're giving him exactly what he wants -- the recognition of the highest office in this land?

The President. Bill, I am waiting right now -- we've touched upon this and are discussing it, and I'm waiting for further reports on the actual violations of the Soviets. I know that I set a policy some time ago that we would continue to observe the restraints of the SALT II treaty, but in keeping with whether the other signator to the treaty did so also. Now, we know there have been violations, and we still have not come down hard on what balances what and what we should do. But we are willing to observe those restraints if they are willing also. And I'm waiting for -- we've had a lot of other things on our plate, so we just haven't made a decision on this.

The President. I have noticed all of that, and I've been very distressed by it. Sam, I have to tell you that I have the utmost faith in the integrity of Mike Deaver, and I've known him probably longer than anyone else in the administration back here. And I also have to tell you that Mike has never put the arm on me or sought anything or any influence from me since he has been out of government. So, I think maybe the criticism is just because he's being darned successful, and deservedly so.

Q. Well, sir, not just to beat up on Mike Deaver, there are others who have peddled their influence, either real or perceived. And some of them are doing it for governments with which you have a quarrel. Angola comes to mind. What do you think about Washington PR firms trying to put the best foot forward for governments that we have a quarrel with?

The President. Well, again, it's private enterprise, I guess, in our country. They don't become my favorite person if they do that. And I wonder sometimes what their motives are, or whether they fully appreciate the nature of their client. But there's no way that I think that we should suddenly raise their taxes or something.

Q.  You are going to also have to decide in the next few days whether to fund a fourth shuttle orbiter to replace the Challenger. Do you have a sense now whether you might agree to do that? And, if so, how you can fund it given the restraints of Gramm-Rudman?

The President. I'm going to wait until I see what the proposal is and what comes to me. I've heard rumors and talk of this. I would hope that we can continue this. This was the request from every one of the families of those people who lost their lives on the Challenger -- that we continue this program. And I said to them that that's what I wanted to do and would hope that we could do.

Q. If I could have a follow, sir, the White House has been requested by Senator Hollings to turn over the telephone logs of conversations between NASA officials and White House officials before the Challenger launch to determine whether there was undue pressure put on NASA to launch the Challenger. Do you agree that those logs ought to be given to the Senator?

The President. I don't know. I'll look into that. But I can tell you this -- that all of this attempt to focus on it, that somehow they were pressured to go off -- beginning with myself -- no such thing has ever taken place. We don't know enough about that kind of thing to know whether we should advise them to take off or not.

Q. Mr. President, if I can bring you back to Mr. Qadhafi and the Middle East. There have been some reports today that say that you have already made a determination to retaliate. And yet your remarks earlier -- you said any action that we might take would be dependent on what we learned. Do I take that to mean that you have not made any decision on retaliation yet?

The President. This is a question that, as I say, is like talking about battle plans or something. It's not a question that I feel that I could answer, except that you all know that you've heard me on record for several years now -- that if and when we could specifically identify someone responsible for one of these acts, we would respond. And so, this is what we're trying to do, is to find out who's responsible for a fine sergeant in our military dead and 50 young Americans lying in a hospital wounded because of that dastardly attack in West Berlin. And if there's identification enough to respond, then I think we respond. And I've said that over and over again.

Q. If I may follow up, sir. But there has, at the same time, been a lot of evidence or a lot of finger-pointing toward Syria. But in recent months we have not heard anything that specifically targets the Syrians as also being perpetrators of terrorism. Is there a reason for that? Is it, possibly, because we think Mr. Assad [President of Syria] can help get the Americans out of Lebanon?

Q. I'd like to switch subjects on you now, Mr. President. In view of your belief that a summit should be well prepared and produce substantive results, do you feel it's realistic to think that you can still meet your preferred June or July date?

The President. Well, it's getting pretty certain from our own standpoint that June is just about out now, although we will be having some meetings at the ministerial level here that were arranged with Dobrynin. We'll have them here this month [next month]. It still could be possible, however, for July. But if not then, later. But I have made one thing plain. The fall months of our election are not going to be months that I will agree to a summit, and I will stick with that.

Q. Mr. President, this has been asked in several forms, let me try another. The reported electronic intercept of congratulations from Qadhafi to the People's Bureau in Berlin, is that not sufficient evidence to tie Libya to the bombing of the disco?

The President. I'm not going to comment on anything that can reveal where we're getting information, or whether we're getting information in that way or not. And I'm certainly not going to say -- answer anything that might endanger some possible sources for that. So, I can't answer your question.

Q. Mr. President, thank you. There's a theory that Arab oil producers now are driving down the price of oil in order to hurt their competitors, including American oil producers. Do you think there's such a thing as oil that's too cheap?

The President. Well, I have to say that while we have said we believe that this whole thing with the oil prices should be settled on the basis of the free market, the market in oil is not completely free. There are some major producers of oil who are governments, not private corporations or business people. And it's possible that what you'd want to keep your eyes open for, when we talk about hoping that this will be -- that this whole thing will destabilize the price of oil is, you can't ignore the possibility -- well, maybe somebody would think of driving it down to the point that they get rid of a lot of competition. And then they would do what comes naturally to a monopolist, and the price would start going up again, as it once did when others had a very dominant voice and hold on the oil market. So, when I say free market -- and I really mean that -- I, at the same time, think that we must keep our eyes open to see that no one starts playing tricks for some kind of illicit future gain.

The President. Now, I don't know whether we are or not -- near that point. And as I say, this is just -- this is really hypothetical. This is something you say, well, this could happen and so we mustn't just go blindly and pretend that not a thing like that could ever take place. But then we would have to see what our options were.

Q. Mr. President, I've got a question that's nonhypothetical. Vice President Bush has seemed to be talking lately about the need for low oil prices. Is he off the reservation? Do you disagree with what he's been saying?

The President. No, in his own way, and more specifically, he's been saying pretty much what I've just been trying to say here, now. That the free marketplace is the one -- the answer to this. But he has also been saying, talking about this same thing, that if someone is going to destabilize the whole petroleum industry by trying to take advantage of this present situation that we should be alert to that. And what he had in mind was that, obviously, here the United States has vastly reduced the amount of oil that we have to import. And now, if we suddenly, however, have made it uneconomic to produce oil in our own country to the point that we have to go back to further imports, we have, among other things, endangered our own national security. This is all that he's talking about. But we're saying the same thing.

The President. Well, I think some people must be reading things into this, or maybe it loses something in the transmission from as far away as he is. But, actually, I have made it a point to get exactly and specifically what he said. And I can't find myself quarreling with any of the remarks he's made.

Q. Mr. President, do you have any concerns that the escalation of tensions with Libya and in that region may further endanger the American hostages still being held in Lebanon? And, also, do you have any news about their well-being that you might share with us?

The President. No. We have constantly been, contrary to what some people think, working on that very problem. Those hostages, they've never been out of our mind for a minute, and our efforts have gone in every direction where there seemed to be an opening. The best that I can say to you is that with all the information we have, it indicates that they are well. But I would hesitate to think that anything that we might do in retaliation for terrorist acts now, these most recent acts, would actually affect them and their well-being. But, again, we have to deal with this terrorist problem. We cannot allow terrorists to believe that they can do this to the world.

The President. Well, let me say that they would be a very great consideration, always. And it would have to be a situation, depending on what all we learned, that would lessen the importance of any American in view of the major target and the more people that might be threatened. What we're talking about now is not just hit or miss -- is there going to be terrorism out there? We're talking about the accumulation of evidence of specific acts that are threatened, and that then we can take action in advance. As I said, we did last year, 126 times, to abort those efforts. And this continues to go on. So, we're still hopeful that we're going to get those hostages back.

Q. Mr. President, critics say that your policy toward Libya has been too confrontational. President Carter described Colonel Qadhafi as a polecat and said you don't poke a polecat. Now, what do you say to critics who say that military retaliation only begets more violence?

The President. Well, I could answer the other thing, that there's another side to that; that if somebody does this and gets away with it and nothing happens to them, that encourages them to try even harder and do more. And everyone is entitled to call him whatever animal they want, but I think he's more than a bad smell.

The President. No. If he wanted to invent that as a provocation aimed at him, I've explained what that was -- a practice that's been going on for several years, a number of years before I came here -- long before -- those maneuvers held there, and seven times since I've been here. And so, he just had to invent that to get on the air.

The President. Not on his side, he's declared it. We just haven't recognized the declaration yet, nor will we. No, it's, as I say, we're going to defend ourselves, and we're certainly going to take action in the face of specific terrorist threats.

Q. Mr. President, Mikhail Gorbachev really blasted you on Soviet television yesterday, accusing you of provoking another cold war and criticizing you for refusing to negotiate on the test ban treaty, for cutting the size of the U.N. delegation here. Is that the spirit of Geneva, and what does it bode for the next summit?

The President. I evidently wasn't aware of that, that he said all those things about me there. He must have been reading Pravda and TASS too much. Why don't we send him some American newspapers? No, I think that his communication directly to me has certainly been in the spirit of Geneva, and my responses to him have been. So, maybe he was speaking to a different audience at that time. But we're trying to go forward and, as I say, we're planning for a summit here. I know that they were upset about the action with regard to the U.N., but that has been under consideration for a long time by us. The Soviet Union's delegation was bigger than the next two top delegations in the U.N. put together, which includes ours. And there had been enough defectors that we were aware that they weren't all delegates to the United Nations. They had extracurricular activities that were not for our benefit.

The President. No. We're very much aware of wanting to keep these going. And many of these things are things we debated and discussed in the first summit meeting at Geneva, in those private meetings. And we'll be taking them up again in the next meeting, trying to make some sizable and realistic gains in lessening the tensions. It all comes under the head of -- what I told him when we first met. And that is that, the quote that I used was that countries don't mistrust each other because they're armed; they're armed because they mistrust each other. And that's what he and I had to do, was find deeds, not words, that we could perform that would lessen that mistrust to the point that we could reduce these massive armaments.

Q. Mr. President, you obviously condone the use of violence for the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. Why, then, do you condemn the use of violence for people your State Department claims are freedom fighters inside South Africa?

The President. We don't condemn. We're trying every way we can to try and bring about meetings of the leaders on both sides. We know that there are two factions in South Africa, in the Government of South Africa. One of them stubbornly is holding to continuation of the past practices. The other, and this includes President Botha, wants change and has taken a number of steps -- as many as he can get away with. But it's just like me dealing with the Hill up here. Sometimes he can't get all that he seeks. But we are continuing to urge, and have made it plain -- and I can tell you that he has agreed with us that he finds the past system repugnant and is trying to get changes as quickly as possible. And we're going to try.

Q. Sir, on the question of freedom fighters again, it's been reported that the freedom fighters in Angola are being given American Stinger missiles. Are you at all concerned that such high-technology American weapons might fall into the hands of terrorists not friendly to the United States?

The President. I don't answer the questions on the nature of the armaments that we provide in cases like this. First of all, because I think if we feel that it is worthwhile for us to help militarily a force of that kind, then there's no reason why we should help their enemies know what weapons they have or what weapons are being denied them. So, I'm not going to answer that as to whether we are or aren't, on those.

Q. Mr. President, as you said in your opening statement, it's budget season in Congress. And some Senate Republican leaders are warning that the tax reform that you badly want may die if the budget process doesn't get started moving soon, and it's going to take leadership from you to get the budget process moving. I'd like to know what are your plans for pushing the budget process?

The President. I started pushing at about 9:30 or 9:45 this morning with the Republican leadership of both the House and Senate. And we're going to keep on pushing. With tax reform in this present time, how many of you have made out your own tax forms yet -- already?

The President. Well, I'm a little annoyed by the fact that not too long ago the Congress of the United States agreed, and we agreed, to a compromise of a sizable cut that would leave us with zero growth, and then 3 percent and 3 percent for the next 2 years following. Now, they approved that. We gave a compromise, but every time we make a compromise on defense spending the Congress says, well, that's the point we start new bargaining from. And we have, so far, given up or reduced the budget by $294 billion over the next 5 years. And in the world, the way it is today, and with the questions you've been asking me about Gorbachev and summit meetings, and so forth, I just think it is foolhardy to continue down that policy that the only place we can get savings.

In my budget, I asked for the elimination of 44 programs that I and the Cabinet and the people who run those programs believe we could well do without. And the only budget consideration now that is being given is to, I think, maybe, tentatively, eliminate 3 instead of the 44. But the problem with our situation -- the deficit spending and all -- is government spending too high. It has gone way beyond the growth of our economy. It had grown beyond the growth of the personal earnings of the people, even though last month they increased by $19\1/2\ billion. And we just have to face it. And unfortunately there are some people up there that for 50 years have been living in a world of running up debt, and they can't get out of the habit.

Q. Mr. President, may I tell you something that will make your heart glow? One hundred and twenty-seven countries passed a resolution to honor you about your leadership. And this was done by Mr. Ben Weider, who is the chairman and president of the International Bodybuilders of 127 countries. And I was asked to give you this message, and I've been trying to tell it to you forever.

Q. But I want to ask you, will you accept the resolution because Mr. Ben Weider's offices, headquarters in Montreal -- the reason he called on me is because I'm of Canadian birth, being born in Toronto. And he wanted me to handle the details to have a great big party for all of us, and he will pay all the expenses.

There are reports in the paper this morning that the leadership of the House is planning a parliamentary maneuver to put the President's contra aid package into a large supplemental which contains many features that have been added to it in the House that we don't like and will be a prime candidate for a veto. We hope these reports are not so. It would be unfortunate if this were the decision of the leadership in the House. We find it hard to believe that they would use a parliamentary maneuver in order to delay a vote on contra aid.

We believe this is an important proposal that should be submitted to a vote in the House without delay. More delay would only delay an opportunity for a straight up-or-down vote. Whether or not the Members of the House agree or do not agree on this subject, we believe that the American people are entitled to have these issues voted up or down. They should not hold this legislation, important foreign policy initiative, hostage to a parliamentary maneuver. We just look at the other side of the coin to the contras and find out they have no parliamentary maneuver in their hands that they can use to keep from being attacked by Sandinista forces.

I support fully the principle of tripartite consultations among government, employers, and workers on matters relating to the International Labor Organization. This principle is fundamental to the existing structure of both the ILO and of the consultative mechanisms that have been established within the United States with respect to ILO matters. Ratification of Convention No. 144 therefore would require no change in the way the United States has organized to deal with the ILO.

Because the United States is party to so few ILO conventions, we are vulnerable to criticism when we seek to take others to task for failing to adhere to instruments we ourselves have not ratified. Ratification of Convention No. 144 would reduce this vulnerability. I therefore recommend that the Senate give its advice and consent to the ratification of ILO Convention No. 144.

With a view to receiving the advice and consent of the Senate to ratification of the Convention (No. 147) Concerning Minimum Standards in Merchant Ships, adopted by the 62nd session of the International Labor Conference, at Geneva, on October 13, 1976, I transmit herewith a certified copy of that Convention. I transmit also for the Senate's information a certified copy of the recommendation (No. 155) concerning the improvement of standards in merchant ships, adopted by the International Labor Conference at the same time as the Convention. No action is called for on the recommendation.

The report of the Department of State, with a letter from the Secretary of Labor, concerning the Convention is enclosed. The Department's report also contains the texts of five proposed understandings. It is proposed that these understandings be included in the United States instrument of ratification, should the Senate give its advice and consent.

Adoption of the Convention and the recommendation was the culmination of a long negotiating process in which the United States participated actively and vigorously supported the drafting of a comprehensive and effective instrument to achieve minimum standards in merchant ships. I believe that the United States ratification of this Convention is in the national interest and in the interest of the world community as a whole, and I, therefore, recommend that the Senate give its advice and consent to ratification, subject to the understandings mentioned above.

In 1885 the world's first successful vehicle powered by a gasoline-fueled internal combustion engine made its appearance in Germany. Shortly thereafter, in January 1886, the United States Patent Office issued its first patent for a motor vehicle powered by such an engine -- the forerunner of today's automobile. This year marks the centennial of that patent, an anniversary that well deserves to be recognized.

In the 100 years since that historic patent was issued, the automobile has been the cause or catalyst of an enormous transformation of the American landscape, economy, and society. It has given rise to a vast network of roads and highways that gives access to every region of our land and helps to bind our Nation and its people ever more closely together. The building and improvement of this network has created thousands of jobs, sparked new industries, and provided opportunities for innumerable roadside businesses, large and small.

The invention of the internal combustion engine created the principal market for the oil industry, which was also in its infancy a century ago. One hundred years later, thanks largely to vehicular consumption, the oil industry has become one of the largest and most important in our Nation and in the world. Today, according to industry estimates, more than three-fourths of refined petroleum products are sold to power internal combustion engines, accounting for more than half the revenues of the major producers.

Many of our major industries, such as steel, glass, rubber, and textiles, rely on the auto industry to buy a significant percentage of their output. It is estimated that at least one in five jobs in the United States depends, directly or indirectly, on the automobile industry.

Although challenged in recent decades by strong foreign competition, the American automobile industry has made a dramatic comeback, improving quality and variety as it adjusts to the changing demands of the marketplace.

Except for a brief setback during World War II, the American automobile market has never ceased to expand. Fifty years ago there were only 28.5 million cars on America's roads. Twenty years ago that number was approaching 95 million. Today it is about 175 million -- more than one vehicle for every two Americans.

The automobile has given Americans unprecedented mobility -- linking farms, towns, cities in a way that was unthinkable before its advent. Indeed, the effects of the automotive age, which began a century ago, have so pervaded every aspect of our lives as to make the automobile a central symbol of twentieth-century civilization in America.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Q. First question is about the U.S.-Japan relation, and I think the U.S.-Japan relation becoming even more important today in the context of their respective roles in the maintenance of peace and prosperity. At the outset of this press interview, would you give us your thought about the state of unison of the two countries, as we stand today, and also its future?

The President. Well, I believe that the relationship between our two countries is strong, vital, and healthy. And I think the warmth of the friendship is epitomized in the affection and respect that Prime Minister Nakasone and I have for each other. I consider him a very close, personal friend. But the other thing about our two countries, too, is that we are both nations on the Pacific rim, and I happen to believe that the world's future further development lies in the Pacific Basin. And we are, and do happen to be, the two greatest economic powers on the rim of the Pacific Basin, and therefore I think we share a great responsibility in the future of the whole Pacific Basin there. So I think all of our people are very pleased about the relationship that we have, and I'm sure it will continue.

Q. May I move to the second question? As you know, our Prime Minister Nakasone is visiting here in Washington this weekend, and he'll have very important talks with you. And the Tokyo summit meeting -- [inaudible] -- so what do you think will be focused [on] in the bilateral and Tokyo summit meetings?

The President. I think some of the things will be a discussion of the relationship of our nations here in the free world with the Soviet Union and what progress we can all make together with regard to reducing, particularly, the nuclear weapons that now hang over the world as a threat. That will be certainly one very important subject of discussion. I think also the economic situation of the summit nations will be very important. Some of them were slower in coming out of the recession that the world was in a few years ago, but now all seem to be progressing better. I think we will be discussing trade matters between all our nations, and I know definitely the Prime Minister and I will be discussing our own bilateral trade situation. We've made great progress; and it's essential, too, that the leading trading nations of the world, such as those that make up the summit economic conference, that all of us continue our recovery and our expansion, our economic recovery and making economic progress, provide more employment. And we really are all sort of bound together in that. It's going to be very difficult for any one nation to be prosperous if all aren't doing well. So, I think we'll have a full plate.

The President. Yes, I'm glad you mentioned that. Yes. Terrorism must definitely be discussed by all of us, because only by working together can we wipe out this very cowardly but very cruel and damaging practice. So, I'm sure that we'll be talking about that. We have an example last year of what can be done with cooperation between us. So far we've been improving our relationship in exchanging intelligence information about terrorist threats. And last year -- it's little known -- but last year we were able to abort and cut off, prevent from happening, 126 terrorist operations. So, yes, that will very definitely be a subject for discussion.

Q. We are very much impressed when you discussed for the first time about a concept of aerospace plane called Orient Express in your State of Union Message. Would you elaborate more on that project as to why it is so important and what specific steps are being contemplated at your government to carry on your proposal? Also, is it feasible to call on Japanese cooperation in this area, because it is common interest to Japan as well as your country?

The President. In January I announced that we are going forward with research on a new Orient Express, a new generation of aircraft that will fly at many times the speed of sound. If our studies show that an aerospace plane is feasible, it would mean a major advance in air transportation and space exploration. We are still at a preliminary stage of technology assessment. But following this assessment, we could decide to go on to development within 2 or 3 years. We will certainly consider the possibility of cooperation with other nations once the initial assessment is complete.

Q. As one of the new Japanese roles in the world, she is expected to expand economic and strategic assistance to developing countries. To which countries and areas would you like to see Japan increase strategic assistance? Concerning debt problems, a new American initiative by Treasury Secretary called Baker's plan has been proposed. In this regard, what role would you expect to be played by Japan?

The President. First, I want to commend Japan for strengthening its overseas development assistance (ODA) programs over the past 10 years, to the point where today Japan is second as a worldwide ODA donor. Japan's new commitment to double once again its annual ODA spending in the next 7 years is a worthy goal. I am pleased at the prospect that Japan will continue to increase its overall assistance levels, improve the quality of its aid, and seek to assist those nations in most urgent need of support. Although Japanese economic assistance has been made and will remain very important to other countries in Asia, I hope Japan will continue to take a more global view in expanding its assistance programs to other vital regions.

We appreciate the support we have received from the Japanese Government and from private Japanese banks for Treasury Secretary Baker's plan for increased private and multilateral financing for important debtor nations. Such financing would be related to the pursuit of sound economic policies in the borrowing countries. As we move forward in concert with the World Bank and the IMF [International Monetary Fund], Japan's support will be critical to the success of this program for sustained growth.

Q. Under the new circumstances of declining U.S. dollar and oil price, what initiatives are you thinking of for world economic relations? What importance would you place on an international conference for monetary reform and removal of unfair trade practices, or the New Round, you referred to in your State of Union Message?

The President. The recent strengthening of major currencies vis-a-vis the American dollar and the decline in oil prices are welcome developments. So is the remarkable decline in inflation throughout the industrial world. We must be determined in our efforts to bring about sustained, noninflationary growth on a global basis. And these efforts start at home -- in every country. Internationally, we seek to strengthen the system of free and fair trade and the free movement of capital in order to increase global economic efficiency and raise the standard of living for people in all countries.

Better economic performance and more consistent policies among the major market economies are the keys to the smooth functioning of exchange rates. As you know, in January I asked Treasury Secretary Baker to determine whether a conference on exchange rates would be appropriate. Secretary Baker is studying this question in light of developments in international trade and finance, including discussions this month of the IMF Interim Committee and at the OECD [Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development] Ministerial meeting.

We have high hopes for the new round of multilateral trade negotiations under the auspices of the GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade]. We seek to strengthen GATT and extend GATT discipline to agriculture, services, investment, and intellectual property. We all recognize free trade must also be fair trade, and we must work diligently, both bilaterally and multilaterally, to remove barriers to trade. When we identify such barriers, we try to eliminate them through negotiations with our trading partners. Where these negotiations fail, we are compelled to act to ensure that American businesses and American farmers are not injured by these practices. The open trading system requires that all participants in the world economy play on a level field, free from arbitrary and discriminatory barriers to the movement of goods, services, and capital. I look forward to discussing these crucial global economic issues with Prime Minister Nakasone and our colleagues from Germany, France, the United Kingdom, Italy, Canada, and the European Community at the summit in Tokyo.

Q. For Japanese part, in addition to her opening market policy, Japan has been strongly urged at home and abroad to change substantially her economic structure from the export oriented to the domestic consumption, in such areas as fiscal monetary policy, tax system, and so forth. How would you assess Japanese effort in that regard guided by the Prime Minister's advisory group?

The President. The report prepared by Mr. Maekawa and the other members of the advisory group contains important recommendations for the future of Japan's economy. I look forward to hearing more about the recommendations and their implementation from Prime Minister Nakasone when I meet with him at Camp David this weekend. I understand that the Japanese Government has taken some steps to increase domestic-led growth to stimulate imports. We applaud these efforts and hope that the Maekawa commission report will lead to further progress. An increased role for imports, especially for manufactured and other value-added goods, in Japan's economy will be an important step in promoting greater harmony between Japan and its trading partners.

Q. We are hopeful of improvement of U.S.-Japan trade imbalance to some extent by recent readjustment of U.S. dollar and Japanese yen exchange rate. What is your assessment of 1 dollar-180 yen rate? Other than readjustment of foreign exchange rate, do you have any new idea to solve trade frictions, such as U.S.-Japan free trade agreement privately proposed by Ambassador Mike Mansfield?

The President. It is not for me to say what is the proper exchange rate. This determination must be left to free market forces, although I note that the recent shift in the dollar-yen relationship should help to make U.S. exports more competitive in Japan. Current U.S. policy deals with several problem areas: economic structural factors, including the yen-dollar relationship, and trade liberalization, among others. There are no quick or easy fixes. In the area of trade liberalization, the sectoral trade negotiations under the Market Oriented Sector Specific discussions (MOSS) have been a valuable tool for resolving problems in a cooperative, trade-expanding manner. The United States and Japan have agreed to continue this effort, to follow up on what has been accomplished thus far, and to start work on new sectors as well. Prime Minister Nakasone has also been very energetic in internationalizing Japan's economy, though Japan recognizes more needs to be done. The action program Japan announced last July pledged that Japan's economy will be free in principle, with restrictions the exception. The upcoming multilateral trade negotiations should also play an important role here.

Q. Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI) is approaching a developing stage. Now that the U.K. and West Germany have decided to join the program, how do you think of importance of Japanese participation in SDI program, and what role Japan can play in it? Would you expect the issue to be raised in your talks with Prime Minister Nakasone and Tokyo summit meeting?

The President. The United States welcomes the widest possible Japanese participation in the SDI research program. We believe such participation would be beneficial both to Japan and to the program itself. That decision, of course, is one for the Government of Japan to make.

The President. The effort to improve Western conventional capabilities, the NATO Conventional Defense Initiative (CDI), is hardly new and has my full support. We are looking for more progress toward improving NATO's conventional defense. I would note, in particular, the decision by NATO Defense Ministers in December 1984 to double infrastructure funding and their agreement to work toward increasing necessary munitions stockpiles. In May 1985 NATO Defense Ministers reaffirmed the 3-percent defense spending increase goal. We look forward to the fulfillment of this pledge and even more substantial improvements by NATO nations in response to the NATO force goals to be adopted this spring. We will work hard to advance this process, and the United States will continue to lead by example.

Q. What would you think of Japanese security role in the context of U.S.-Japanese cooperation vis-a-vis Soviet Union, who has begun to show a smile diplomacy toward Japan? Would you like Japan to expand any military role beyond the 1,000-mile sealane defense which Japan is about to undertake?

The President. The United States views Japan as a cornerstone of our mutual security. The facilities made available to U.S. forces in Japan and U.S. access to those facilities are vital to the defense of our common interests in the Far East. Japan's self-defense roles and missions, as described by former Prime Minister Suzuki in 1981, are to protect its territory, seas and skies, and its sealanes out to 1,000 nautical miles. The United States endorses these Japanese undertakings and hopes that Japan will attain the capability of fulfilling these roles and missions as soon as possible. Neither the United States nor, we believe, Japan seeks a broader military role beyond that of self-defense.

Q. We are very much interested in the development of U.S.-Soviet relations. What is the prospect for this year's U.S.-Soviet summit under the situation in which the Soviets seem to link the summit to the nuclear test ban and the progress of the arms control talks? Would you accept September or even December as a timing for the summit if the Soviets insist on holding the second meeting this year in the United States? And how would you assess ongoing U.S.-Soviet arms control talks?

The President. We agreed at the Geneva summit to meet in the United States this year and again in the Soviet Union in 1987. We are encouraged by the fact that Secretary [of State] Shultz and Foreign Minister Shevardnadze will be meeting in May to discuss preparations. The arms control negotiations have, unfortunately, not moved forward the way we had hoped. The Soviets have still not responded concretely to the proposals we made in November. In regard to the one area in the Soviet announcement of January 15 which offered some hope for progress, INF, the U.S. has already tabled in Geneva a concrete new proposal to eliminate such weapons by the end of the decade. Here, too, the lack of a concrete Soviet response has been disappointing. Our negotiators are ready for serious bargaining, and if the Soviets show similar flexibility progress can be made.

Q. On the occasion of your visit to Indonesia and meeting with ASEAN [Association for South East Asian Nations] leaders in advance of Tokyo summit, what policies would you state for stability and economic development of Asian countries, such as increased economic and military assistance to Aquino government of the Philippines after the change of the leadership in which the U.S. played an important role?

The President. Under President Soeharto's leadership, Indonesia has made impressive strides in economic development and become an increasingly active player on the world stage. ASEAN is the central pillar of U.S. policy in Southeast Asia and an impressive example of cohesion and common purpose. We support ASEAN's strategy for bringing about a Vietnamese withdrawal from Cambodia and the restoration of Cambodian independence. The U.S. shares with ASEAN a commitment to a free market system. We want to work together to strengthen that system and to resist protectionism.

We have discussed Philippine assistance needs and priorities with President Aquino's government and with other major bilateral and multilateral donors. We want to help the new Philippine Government meet pressing financial needs and bolster the efforts of democratic forces in that country to address the serious economic and security challenges facing them, including the threat posed by the Communist insurgency.

The President. The future of the Korean Peninsula, of course, is a matter primarily for the Korean people to decide. That is why the north-south dialog is so important. In our view, it is key to reducing tensions on the Korean Peninsula. Therefore, we support that dialog and hope that North Korea will resume it as soon as possible.

Other initiatives designed to reduce tensions include the confidence-building measures we have proposed in the Military Armistice Commission at Panmunjom. These measures include proposals such as restoring the integrity of the Demilitarized Zone. We hope North Korea will address this problem in good faith.

During 1985, science and technology played a prominent role in our diplomacy. The United States is increasingly seen as the world leader in this field. National leaders and the general public see science and technology as a key to the solution of a wide variety of national and international problems. Such views are neither narrowly partisan nor without foundation. Indeed, it is significant to note that regardless of political ideologies or stage of development, many countries are not only anxious to engage in government-to-government cooperation with us, but also genuinely appreciative of cooperative scientific programs.

International science and technology cooperation, for the United States, takes place primarily in the private sector and outside the purview of government-to-government agreements. This cooperation can take the form of scholarly exchanges or research funded by private business and corporations. The Executive branch funds research where long lead time, large amounts of resources, and difficulty of capturing results make such efforts appropriate for government activities. It also funds research in essential areas not covered by the private sector, such as national defense and major parts of the space program. The international components of federally funded programs in the domestic agencies provide opportunities for unique collaboration or cost-sharing to extend the limited resources available. All are supportive of our domestic programs and priorities.

The international science and technology activities of agencies should demonstrate comparable technical merit, and return for the resources expended, to activities that take place within the United States. In this way, the United States is assured that the resources committed provide solid, technical returns. It is also the best way of ensuring that international cooperation is positive and more likely to produce foreign policy benefits. Experience has shown that international science and technology cooperation, where it is proposed primarily for foreign policy reasons, and with little inherent scientific or technical benefit, is not productive and does not sustain support in the agencies and the Congress. Foreign policy benefits are best assured if international activities are soundly grounded in technical benefits for the missions and programs of the agencies that fund them.

Programs in science and technology have become an increasingly valuable tool in the conduct of our relations with both developed and developing nations and, during 1985, they continued to play a meaningful role in the diplomacy of the United States. Through our cooperation with developed nations, we benefit from intellectual collaboration with other highly trained scientists and technical experts, and cost-sharing of expensive experimental facilities in advanced scientific areas. Our partners also gain from the collaboration and access to new technologies that have the potential to fuel economic growth. In 1985, our cooperation with developing nations also emphasized the contributions of science and technology to economic growth; however, the technologies emphasized were those appropriate to solving the problems of developing societies. We believe that bilateral arrangements with developing countries are one of the most effective ways of obtaining foreign policy benefit for the United States.

Major focuses for our cooperative programs in 1985, particularly with developed countries, were in areas of high mutual scientific interest. The space program is one such example. In addition to international participation in the space shuttle programs, 1985 also saw the signing of a Memorandum of Understanding on the Space Station Project with Canada, Japan, and the European Space Agency, establishing a basis for cooperation over the next two years. As we enter the twenty-first century, we should note that U.S. leadership in space is fostered by international cooperation which has enhanced the standing of the United States in the world community.

Among the developing nations, our major, high visibility programs continue to be in the People's Republic of China and India. Our maturing science and technology cooperation with China, a cornerstone in our expanding relationship, is now in its eighth year and is our largest government-to-government program. Not a part of our foreign assistance program, science and technology cooperation is based upon mutual benefit as are our other international exchanges. The Chinese have also added additional activities more attuned to their own interests on a reimbursable basis. We credit the doors opened by our successful science and technology program with contributing positively to the recent reforms made by the Chinese.

Our science and technology program with India functions on two levels -- one is the continuation of our long-term cooperation in many fields, the other is the more focused Presidential Initiative, which because of its success was extended for an additional 3 years in 1985.

Our bilateral science and technology relationship with the Soviet Union saw some positive movement during 1985. At the Geneva Summit Meeting, we and the Soviets issued a joint statement encouraging further U.S.-Soviet collaboration in science and technology. In addition, we began a careful evaluation of how science and technology can and should be used to improve bilateral relations with the Soviets.

Our international science and technology activities continued as an integral and important part of our foreign policy during 1985 in many forms and on many levels as described in detail in the report I am transmitting. We have looked for ways to pool resources for high-cost projects. We have emphasized collaboration as the means for finding solutions to problems that are international in scope. Our efforts sought to assist the developing countries in their quest for a better life and to strengthen our alliances. Finally, our international science efforts underscored our commitment to maintaining the United States as a world leader in scientific and technological excellence for peaceful purposes and for the benefit of mankind.

Designation will entitle Aruba to continue to enjoy in its separate capacity the same duty-free treatment for nonexcluded products that Aruba enjoyed when it was part of the Netherlands Antilles. As a CBERA beneficiary, Aruba will continue to have the opportunity to become eligible for the convention expense tax deduction under Section 274(h) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, by entering into an exchange of information agreement with the United States on tax matters.

This Administration looks forward to working closely with the Aruban government and with the private sectors of the United States and Aruba to ensure that the wide-ranging opportunities opened by the CBERA are fully utilized.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 11th day of April in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Robert Brendon Keating to be United States Executive Director of the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development for a term of 2 years. He would succeed James B. Burnham.

Congressman Addabbo was a strong voice for policies which he believed would make this a more peaceful world. He rose to prominence in the early 1970's and, by the end of that decade, was recognized as one of the leading players in the development of American military policy. As chairman of the House Appropriations Subcommittee on Defense, his strong convictions and unrelenting opposition to what he considered ineffective defense spending made him a powerful force on Capitol Hill. Congressman Addabbo was widely respected for his knowledge of defense issues even by those who disagreed with him. His genial style was in keeping with the best traditions of American politics. He will be missed by those he represented in New York's Sixth District and by all who worked with him.

I'd like to speak this afternoon about our nation's budget and your own. By April 15th, the same date by which you and I must file our Federal income tax returns, the Congress is required by law to pass a budget resolution. This resolution must tell in outline form how much the Congress intends to spend in 1987 and how it intends to raise this money from you, the American people. As the Congress puts this budget outline together, there is good news and bad news.

The good news is that, in large part, as a result of our policies of low taxes and limited government, our economy is breaking records. Inflation is at its lowest level in nearly a decade and a half. Interest rates have toppled. The prime rate, which was running at more than 21 percent when we took office 5 years ago, has fallen to just 9 percent, the lowest point in nearly 8 years. And as interest rates continue to fall, mortgage rates are coming down, making it much easier to buy homes.

One piece of good news deserves special mention: the dramatic drop in oil prices. When our administration took office, we at once decontrolled the price of oil. Some predicted this would send gas prices at the pump through the roof; not so. The production of oil and other fuels increased, putting pressure on the OPEC oil cartel. Today the OPEC cartel has been dramatically undercut, and oil prices have collapsed from about $34 per barrel in 1982 to about $13. Some are having to make a difficult adjustment to these new, lower prices. But overall, less expensive oil represents a tremendous boon to our economy. Already, you're beginning to pay less for petroleum products of all kinds, including heating oil and gasoline. Isn't it good to be able to put a gallon of gas in the car for less than a dollar again?

The good news, in the largest sense, is that our nation now has the chance to continue building sustained and vigorous economic growth, the likes of which we haven't seen since the 1950's and 1960's -- a lasting era of good times and prosperity. We need only bring marginal tax rates down lower and get government spending under control, cutting the Federal budget, not the family budget.

Now for the bad news: As the April 15th deadline approaches -- the deadline American taxpayers must meet whether we want to or not -- the budget resolution the Congress must put together is nowhere near completion. In the meantime, the leadership of the House of Representatives is resisting all attempts to control spending. Indeed, a supplemental appropriations bill now under House consideration would include provisions which could increase Federal expenditures over $30 billion over the next 3 years and take away my authority to defer needless spending. And in the Senate recently the Budget Committee voted in favor of a plan that over 3 years would raise your taxes by nearly $50 billion.

Part of the problem here is misguided thinking. Many don't understand that the real trouble isn't just the Federal deficit itself, but government overspending. You see, the more the Government spends, the more resources it takes from the private sector, the greater the upward pressure on interest rates, and the lower the rate of economic growth. Whether the Government obtains its funds through taxation or borrowing, the root problem remains the same -- government use of spending to take over more and more of the economic life of our nation. This smothers the private sector incentives that keep our economy vibrant. A tax hike now would only encourage the Congress to spend more. All that we've worked so hard to achieve, all the good economic news, could be harmed. That's why I want to say to you again today: My veto pen is inked up and ready to go. Sometimes a President just has to spell relief, V-E-T-O.

We submitted a budget to the Congress last February that meets the deficit-shrinking requirements set by the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings act, and does so while avoiding a tax hike. At the same time, our budget keeps America's defenses strong. We also urge the Congress to pass a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution and a proposal to give each President a line-item veto -- two measures that would make certain, once and for all, that government spends no more than government takes in. My friends, that's all it would take -- just the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment, a strong defense, a responsible budget, and a commitment to lower marginal tax rates further -- to turn all the good economic news of recent days into the beginnings of a new and lasting prosperity. Isn't it time the Congress got government out of the way and let the good times roll?

The President. Prime Minister Nakasone and I have just completed 2 days of discussions on bilateral and global issues. And I'm happy to report that the relationship between our two countries remains strong and vital. Our meeting has reaffirmed my conviction that the close relationship between us is of immense importance for our two peoples and for the rest of the world. The friendship between our two nations is mirrored in the personal respect and affection that the Prime Minister and I have for each other, an affection that is held also by the Japanese and American peoples.

Yesterday at Camp David and this morning here at the White House we had, as always, much to talk about. In discussing relations between the United States and the Soviet Union, including arms control, the Prime Minister expressed his support for efforts towards the convening of a summit meeting with the Soviet Union. We agreed on the need for the democratic nations to remain united. We also reviewed our defense relationship and reaffirmed that the U.S.-Japan treaty of mutual cooperation and security is the foundation of peace and stability in the Far East and the defense of Japan.

As you can imagine, the state of U.S.-Japan trade relations was a major topic during our meeting. But I told the Prime Minister that this issue is one of vital concern to all Americans, as reflected in the strong views of many in Congress. We agreed on the necessity to continue to intensify efforts to expand trade through better market access. The Prime Minister informed me that he is dedicated to fulfilling Japan's responsibility as the free world's second largest economic power to strengthen the international trading system. He and his government are committed to a national goal of reducing Japan's trade surpluses. The Prime Minister also informed me of an important, recent report which outlines some very significant changes that Japan intends to make. He is determined to implement fundamental policy changes, and I applauded the Prime Minister's commitment to leading his nation toward an economic future more in harmony with the needs of global economy.

The Prime Minister and I agreed on the vital importance that this plan involve a strategic increase -- or, pardon me, a significant increase in Japanese imports, particularly of manufactured and other high, value-added goods. In a similar spirit, I committed my administration to launch a strengthened program to promote exports to Japan. The trade imbalance between the United States and Japan results from complex factors that will take time, vigorous efforts, and patience to correct. There are no quick or easy fixes, but we do know protectionism is not the answer. We've already made substantial progress and are convinced that working together, with urgency and commitment, we'll find ways to solve our problems through a trading relationship that is both balanced and extraordinary.

As part of this common effort, I've asked Secretaries Shultz and Baker, and the Prime Minister is instructing his relevant ministers, to pull together a broad group of high-level officials to discuss structural economic issues of mutual concern. We will continue work on better market access. We discussed the Tokyo summit. Its preparations are going well, and the Prime Minister and I are looking forward to continuing our discussion next month in Tokyo with the expectation that the summit will register a message of bright hope for the future. We discussed a number of other regional topics, focusing on Asia, and shared in particular our thoughts on the progress being made by the new government in the Philippines and on the importance of assisting that government in dealing with its national problems.

I note that Japan has become the second largest donor of economic assistance worldwide. Our governments will continue close consultations to increase the effectiveness of our individual contributions. The Prime Minister and I agree that we both have complex problems and immense opportunities before us. The key to realizing the full potential of this unique bilateral relationship is mutual understanding and close cooperation. Together, there is nothing we cannot accomplish, and I might add that that was the spirit of our discussion during these past 2 days.

The Prime Minister. President Reagan and I met in a relaxed atmosphere over the weekend. The President and I share the views that we should work together to send throughout the Tokyo summit a message of a bright prospect for and confidence in the future to the peoples of the world -- the developed and developing alike. We reaffirmed the importance of promoting world peace and disarmament, and of the U.S.-Soviet summit in this regard, and the necessity of promoting the new round of multilateral trade negotiations for the furtherance of the free trading system. The President and I had a frank exchange of views on economic issues between our two countries.

Upon hearing once again the President's strong determination to continue his resolute fight against protectionism, I expressed my firm support to him. I also discussed with him the role to be played by Japan to the same end. Japan upholds the principle of free trade. I talked with the President about these steps we have taken to improve Japan's market access in the past years and told him that Japan will continue its efforts to this end. The President and I share the recognition that a change which has taken place in the yen-dollar exchange rates will contribute to the adjustment of the trade relations between Japan and the United States. I told the President that Japan is determined to work at its national policy goal toward steadily reducing the current account imbalance to one consistent with international harmony. To this end, I believe that Japan must tackle the epoch-making task of structural adjustment and transform its economic structure into one dependent on domestic demand, rather than exports leading to a significant increase in imports, particularly of manufactured products. Recently, my private advisory group produced a report containing many variable recommendations in this regard. In order to translate the recommendations into policies, the Government will set up a promotion headquarters which will formulate a work schedule very shortly.

Structural adjustment is no easy task in any country. But Japan must effect an historic turn, and I am determined to accept that challenge. The President wholeheartedly welcomed this approach. At the same time, I hope that other countries will also deal with their own difficult problems through structural adjustment. Better convergence on policies among the nations concerned will be a key to revitalization of the world economy. The President and I welcomed the agreement reached yesterday to hold the bilateral dialog of higher shelves on structural problems.

I pay my respect to the President for his strong determination to work towards more stable East-West relations and substantial reduction of nuclear weapons and strongly hope that the momentum for U.S.-Soviet dialog spurred by a summit meeting between the two leaders last November will move forward steadily. The President and I reaffirm the importance of maintaining close communication and coordination among the countries of the free world. In this connection, I told the President that I highly value his efforts toward the total elimination of INF on a global basis with adequate consideration to the Asian region.

In our discussions on regional issues, the President and I reaffirmed the need for Japan and the United States to further cooperate for the development and stability of the Philippines and their President Aquino, and for us each to contribute to the stability of Central America and other countries, and to the improvement of economic situations and easing of the debt burden of the European countries. I expressed to the President my appreciation for the fact that the defense relationship between Japan and the United States is now better than ever before and told him that Japan intends to proceed further with its efforts on its own initiative to improve its defense capabilities, together with further strengthening the credibility of the Japan-U.S. security arrangements.

Mr. President, I am very happy to have been able at your kind invitation to come to meet you in spring green of Camp David, to reaffirm my unshakable friendship with you. Today the cooperative relationship between Japan and the United States is expanding its truly global dimensions and is ever growing in importance. I am convinced that we can overcome whatever obstacles may stand in our way and make great contributions to peace and prosperity of all the peoples of the world if our two peoples trust each other and make the best possible use of the vigor of each.

Since my last report, the United Nations Secretary General has taken a further important step in his initiative to achieve a Cyprus settlement. This initiative was launched in August 1984 and since that time has involved extensive discussions between UN officials and negotiators for the two Cypriot communities. On March 29, the Secretary General provided to Greek and Turkish Cypriot representatives in New York a draft agreement incorporating a framework for a future Federal Republic of Cyprus and establishing a negotiating process for working toward an overall settlement. If accepted by the parties, the agreement would lead to direct negotiations on such fundamental issues as troop withdrawals, international guarantees, and freedom of movement, freedom of settlement, and right to property; and to further elaboration of constitutional and territorial arrangements essential to a fair and final settlement.

Under the agreement's terms, the Secretary General would convene periodic summit meetings between the leaders of the two Cypriot communities and, under their guidance, working groups would address the issues in detail.

While the Secretary General's document would commit the two Cypriot sides to a process aimed at achieving an overall settlement within an accepted framework, it is our understanding that, under his ``integrated-whole'' approach, the positions taken by the parties at any stage in the course of negotiations would not be final until all issues were resolved, to their mutual satisfaction.

During his recent trip to Turkey and Greece, Secretary Shultz expressed the strong support of the United States for the current effort of the UN Secretary General and encouraged those governments to do the same.

The Secretary General's initiative presents the leaders of the two Cypriot communities with a historic opportunity to begin a process toward peace and reconciliation. The United States hopes the parties will embark on this path and that their leaders will work with the Secretary General in this effort to achieve a just and lasting Cyprus settlement.

I am not seeking legislation to rescind any authority of the Bank. Estimates of demand for Export-Import Bank financing can change quickly. Continued growth in the U.S. economy and global recovery could create unexpected demand. Therefore, I have concluded that the statutory fiscal year 1986 limit for Eximbank authority should be retained unchanged.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Warren Zimmermann for the rank of Ambassador in his capacity as Chief of the United States delegation to the Vienna Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe followup meeting.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Trudy McDonald to be a member of the National Commission for Employment Policy for a term expiring March 19, 1989. This is a reappointment. Upon her appointment, the President intends to redesignate her Chairman.

But I guess I should say that it's hard to believe it has been 5 years since we first met here in Washington. But you probably didn't know that I count my years now in blocks of five so it doesn't seem quite so long to me. [Laughter] It's always good to see you, and I want to give a special hello to your newly elected president, Richard Hall. A lot has happened since that first meeting, much of it thanks to your loyal and timely support. I remember asking for your support back in 1981 for our economic recovery program. And because you and millions of hard-working Americans stepped forward, Congress followed your lead and we left those shadows of economic disaster behind. We're rolling on an open highway to a new era of full employment with opportunity for all, and nothing should stop us now.

With oil prices lower, mortgage rates dropping, inflation becoming a memory, 1986 should be a banner year for all who build America. And that begins with the Associated General Contractors. Just as in your industry, we've got to make sure our economic foundation remains strong and secure so we can build on our 40 months of expansion for the years to come. Keeping our economy strong and secure means government keeping its priorities straight. Unfortunately, just as robins return in the spring and swallows come back to Capistrano, some Members of Congress are back again singing their same song of tax and tax and spend and spend. Well, it's not up to the people to fork over more and more, it's up to Congress to stop overspending and leave the peoples' earnings alone.

I understand that you'll soon be on your way up to the Hill, where many need to hear that message. But right now, there's another message that I'd like to send Congress on an all-important vote -- on our resolution to provide aid to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. The House Democratic leadership plans to place that resolution on to an additional spending bill. And if this happens, the bill could be lost for months in a forest of legislative delays. In other words, even if a majority of House Members vote for aid to the freedom fighters we still wouldn't be able to get the aid to them, and certainly not in time. And we can depend on the Sandinistas to try and destroy them before we got around to it.

Thank you very much. And let's make sure that this government acts worthy of the American people. That's the message I'd like to send to Congress; so would all those who are putting their lives -- so would all those, I should say, that are putting their lives on the line so that they, like we, may be able to feel free someday. I know that I've done a lot of talking about this, and I know that there've been people who've taken me on for my speech on television and indicated that some of the things I said weren't true. The Sandinista government has, as is typical of Communist-bloc nations, a great disinformation network, highly financed, very effective. And, while every criticism of what I said about the Sandinista government was widely heralded throughout the country and the world, very little attention was given to the repudiation of those critics by authorities in Nicaragua who rode to the rescue and said that what I had told them about the Sandinistas was absolutely true.

And we have an uphill fight trying to get the people of America to realize that what we're seeing down there is not the overthrow of a legitimate government; the Sandinistas took power at the point of a gun in the revolution to overthrow Somoza. But they were only a part of the revolutionaries. And then, as happens with Communist organizations, they managed to get rid of their other revolutionary allies by execution, by jailing, by exiling them out of the country. The contras are made up of many of those other revolutionaries. And all they're asking is a chance for the people of Nicaragua to have what the revolutionaries promised when they were fighting the Somoza national guard, and that was the chance for the Nicaraguan people by their vote to decide the kind of government they want and who should be in office in their country. And any distortion of that does a great injustice to some people who are risking everything they have to try just for that promise that has never been fulfilled. And, as I say, the Sandinista government is not a duly elected, chosen government; it's a gang that took over by force. So, we think that maybe force on them will cause them, perhaps, to be willing to listen to the will of the people of Nicaragua.

So, God bless you all, and I thank you. I feel a little guilty asking you for anything else. You've done so many things when we've asked for your help. And you've been most effective. And that's why I keep asking you for your help -- [laughter] -- on other things. So, God bless you, and thank you all.

U.S. military forces this evening have executed a series of carefully planned air strikes against terrorist-related targets in Libya. These strikes have been completed and our aircraft are returning. Libya bears direct responsibility for the bombing in West Berlin on April 5 that resulted in the death of Army Sergeant Kenneth Ford and injury to a number of American servicemen and others. In light of this reprehensible act of violence and clear evidence that Libya is planning future attacks, the United States has chosen to exercise its right of self-defense. It is our hope this action will preempt and discourage Libyan attacks against innocent civilians in the future.

U.S. forces struck targets that were part of Qadhafi's terrorist infrastructure: the command and control systems, intelligence, communications, logistics, and training facilities. These are sites which allow Qadhafi to perpetrate terrorist acts. In addition to the strikes at terrorist centers, the President also authorized limited defense suppression missions in order to defend our own forces engaged in this mission. Every effort was made to avoid civilian casualties and limit collateral damage and to avoid casualties to those American servicemen who are participating. The President will address the Nation from the Oval Office at 9 p.m., eastern standard time.

At 7 o'clock this evening eastern time air and naval forces of the United States launched a series of strikes against the headquarters, terrorist facilities, and military assets that support Mu`ammar Qadhafi's subversive activities. The attacks were concentrated and carefully targeted to minimize casualties among the Libyan people with whom we have no quarrel. From initial reports, our forces have succeeded in their mission.

Several weeks ago in New Orleans, I warned Colonel Qadhafi we would hold his regime accountable for any new terrorist attacks launched against American citizens. More recently I made it clear we would respond as soon as we determined conclusively who was responsible for such attacks. On April 5th in West Berlin a terrorist bomb exploded in a nightclub frequented by American servicemen. Sergeant Kenneth Ford and a young Turkish woman were killed and 230 others were wounded, among them some 50 American military personnel. This monstrous brutality is but the latest act in Colonel Qadhafi's reign of terror. The evidence is now conclusive that the terrorist bombing of La Belle discotheque was planned and executed under the direct orders of the Libyan regime. On March 25th, more than a week before the attack, orders were sent from Tripoli to the Libyan People's Bureau in East Berlin to conduct a terrorist attack against Americans to cause maximum and indiscriminate casualties. Libya's agents then planted the bomb. On April 4th the People's Bureau alerted Tripoli that the attack would be carried out the following morning. The next day they reported back to Tripoli on the great success of their mission.

Our evidence is direct; it is precise; it is irrefutable. We have solid evidence about other attacks Qadhafi has planned against the United States installations and diplomats and even American tourists. Thanks to close cooperation with our friends, some of these have been prevented. With the help of French authorities, we recently aborted one such attack: a planned massacre, using grenades and small arms, of civilians waiting in line for visas at an American Embassy.

Colonel Qadhafi is not only an enemy of the United States. His record of subversion and aggression against the neighboring States in Africa is well documented and well known. He has ordered the murder of fellow Libyans in countless countries. He has sanctioned acts of terror in Africa, Europe, and the Middle East, as well as the Western Hemisphere. Today we have done what we had to do. If necessary, we shall do it again. It gives me no pleasure to say that, and I wish it were otherwise. Before Qadhafi seized power in 1969, the people of Libya had been friends of the United States. And I'm sure that today most Libyans are ashamed and disgusted that this man has made their country a synonym for barbarism around the world. The Libyan people are a decent people caught in the grip of a tyrant.

To our friends and allies in Europe who cooperated in today's mission, I would only say you have the permanent gratitude of the American people. Europeans who remember history understand better than most that there is no security, no safety, in the appeasement of evil. It must be the core of Western policy that there be no sanctuary for terror. And to sustain such a policy, free men and free nations must unite and work together. Sometimes it is said that by imposing sanctions against Colonel Qadhafi or by striking at his terrorist installations we only magnify the man's importance, that the proper way to deal with him is to ignore him. I do not agree.

Long before I came into this office, Colonel Qadhafi had engaged in acts of international terror, acts that put him outside the company of civilized men. For years, however, he suffered no economic or political or military sanction; and the atrocities mounted in number, as did the innocent dead and wounded. And for us to ignore by inaction the slaughter of American civilians and American soldiers, whether in nightclubs or airline terminals, is simply not in the American tradition. When our citizens are abused or attacked anywhere in the world on the direct orders of a hostile regime, we will respond so long as I'm in this Oval Office. Self-defense is not only our right, it is our duty. It is the purpose behind the mission undertaken tonight, a mission fully consistent with Article 51 of the United Nations Charter.

We believe that this preemptive action against his terrorist installations will not only diminish Colonel Qadhafi's capacity to export terror, it will provide him with incentives and reasons to alter his criminal behavior. I have no illusion that tonight's action will ring down the curtain on Qadhafi's reign of terror. But this mission, violent though it was, can bring closer a safer and more secure world for decent men and women. We will persevere. This afternoon we consulted with the leaders of Congress regarding what we were about to do and why. Tonight I salute the skill and professionalism of the men and women of our Armed Forces who carried out this mission. It's an honor to be your Commander in Chief.

We Americans are slow to anger. We always seek peaceful avenues before resorting to the use of force -- and we did. We tried quiet diplomacy, public condemnation, economic sanctions, and demonstrations of military force. None succeeded. Despite our repeated warnings, Qadhafi continued his reckless policy of intimidation, his relentless pursuit of terror. He counted on America to be passive. He counted wrong. I warned that there should be no place on Earth where terrorists can rest and train and practice their deadly skills. I meant it. I said that we would act with others, if possible, and alone if necessary to ensure that terrorists have no sanctuary anywhere. Tonight, we have.

The Organization of American States is the embodiment of that common commitment to these basic principles through its Charter and the Rio Treaty. As one of the oldest international organizations in existence, the OAS has worked vigorously to broaden peaceful exchanges between the peoples it represents and the world community; to reduce the tensions and conflicts arising within the Hemisphere; and to stoutly resist aggressive threats from outside. The record of the OAS in the peaceful settlement of disputes, the promotion of democratic values, and the protection of human rights has earned worldwide respect and admiration.

The Charter of the OAS clearly expresses the belief of the peoples of the region in the effective exercise of representative democracy. There are currently more democratic states in this Hemisphere than at any other time in history, an eloquent witness to the solid progress in this area.

Recently, the OAS began an effort to revitalize the inter-American system, to enhance its peacekeeping role, to strengthen its dedication to human rights, and to increase its effectiveness in improving living conditions for all who dwell in this Hemisphere.

On this Pan American Day of 1986, the people of the United States extend a warm and friendly greeting to all our neighbors in the Americas. We reaffirm our active support for the Organization of American States and the goal of Hemispheric amity and solidarity. We renew our solemn commitment to those principles to which the members of the OAS wholeheartedly pledged themselves at the December 1985 General Assembly in Cartagena.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourteenth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

As of this morning, 16 of the 18 F - 111 fighter bombers have returned to their base in Mildenhall, England. One plane, which developed mechanical problems en route, has landed in Spain. One F - 111 remains unaccounted for. A naval and air search operation is currently underway to locate this aircraft. All carrier-based aircraft have returned safely to the carriers without incident.

In our assessment of the situation, we believe that we have struck a blow against terrorism. We have sent a message to Qadhafi. Our objective was to inflict damage to Qadhafi's capability to direct and control the export of international terrorism.

The United States, and for that matter all freedom-loving peoples of the world, cannot tolerate terrorism. When we can clearly identify those responsible for terrorist acts, we will hold them accountable. The goal, therefore, was to strike targets in a way that would damage Qadhafi's ability to perpetrate terrorist acts. We wanted to show that such attacks are a consequence of undertaking terrorist actions, that terrorism cannot be supported without incurring a heavy price. We have successfully accomplished both objectives. We hope this action will deter future terrorist attacks. It was to send a clear message that we will no longer tolerate death of innocent Americans and others. We are confident this message was heard and understood.

Before discussing the topic at hand, let me talk to you briefly about the events that took place last night. Yesterday, as you know, pilots of the air and naval forces of the United States spoke to the outlaw Libyan regime in the only language that Colonel Qadhafi seems to understand. They performed courageously. Two of our airmen are missing. But let us be clear: Yesterday the United States won but a single engagement in the long battle against terrorism. We will not end that struggle until the free and decent people of this planet unite to eradicate the scourge of terror from the modern world.

Terrorism is the preferred weapon of weak and evil men. And as Edmund Burke reminded us: In order for evil to succeed, it's only necessary that good men do nothing. Yesterday we demonstrated once again that doing nothing is not America's policy; it's not America's way. America's policy has been and remains to use only force as a last result -- or resort, I should say. We would prefer not to have to repeat the events of last night. What is required is for Libya to end its pursuit of terror for political goals. The choice is theirs.

Yet let us not underestimate the reach of Qadhafi's terror. He's tried to subvert half a dozen countries on his own continent of Africa and has had Libyan students and dissidents murdered in faraway capitals. And I would remind the House voting this week that this archterrorist has sent $400 million and an arsenal of weapons and advisers into Nicaragua to bring his war home to the United States. He has bragged that he is helping the Nicaraguans because they fight America on its own ground. We do not underestimate the brutality of this evil man, but Colonel Qadhafi ought not to underestimate either the capacity or legitimate anger of a free people.

Now on to other subjects. It's great to be together again with old friends and allies. And special greetings to Arthur Levitt and Jack Albertine. I know that this is Jack's last year with the ABC. And, Jack, you have my very personal thanks for all of the support that you've given this administration and our pro-opportunity policies. And I bet everyone here and in the White House joins me in saying congratulations for a job well done.

You know, it was last year before this group that I told the tax hikers in Congress that if they wanted to send me a tax increase, well, go ahead, make my day. [Laughter] I got that line from Clint Eastwood -- [laughter]. Although now that the voters of Carmel, California, elected him mayor, I suppose I should say, Mayor Eastwood. [Laughter] I have to confess that I'm amazed that a Hollywood actor who costarred with a monkey could ever make it in politics. [Laughter] Of course, the American Business Conference has helped make our year a -- well, you've helped make more than my day -- make it a banner year of entrepreneurship and innovation, laying the foundation for what I'm convinced can become a decade of vibrant economic growth.

But we're not going to let them, are we? Because our tax-cutting, limited-government policies are working. Whatever you want to call it, supply-side economics or incentive economics -- by the way, have you noticed they don't call it Reaganomics anymore? Whatever you call it, it's launching the American economy into a new era of growth and opportunity. And we're going to keep up the big ``Mo'' -- the winning momentum -- with tax reform that cuts rates still further. Our basic ingredients for a tax package haven't changed: tax rate reductions, thresholds high enough so hard-working Americans aren't pushed relentlessly into higher brackets, some long-overdue tax relief for America's families, and investment incentives for American business. And one thing tax reform cannot be is a tax hike in disguise.

Today, of course, is April 15th, a day that's loaded with significance. This is the deadline for Americans across the country to send in their tax returns and pay their taxes. And in a bit of poetic justice, it's also the deadline set under the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings law for Congress to come up with a budget on how it's going to spend those taxes. But while millions of Americans will be meeting their obligation to their government, it appears that once again Congress is not going to meet its obligation to the American people. Congress is committed under law to a balanced budget by 1991. And there's only one real way to do that, and that's cut unnecessary spending.

Those in the Congress who think they can go about business as usual, overspending the American people's money and then raising taxes or making crippling cuts in our national defense to pay their way, would do nothing but repeal all the progress we have made in the last 5 years. We submitted a budget that met the legal requirements without slashing defense or raising taxes. Now it's time for Congress to meet its legal requirements and pass a budget resolution. We don't need more government. We need more growth, strong, vibrant growth that will bring all Americans into the economic mainstream, light the forgotten streets of our inner cities with hope, and reach out to every corner of the world with opportunity.

The American Bar Association has designated this year's Law Day theme to be ``Foundations of Freedom,'' building up to next year's celebration of the bicentennial of the Constitution. Almost 200 years later I think we can say there's some pretty solid masonry beneath that great document. Our forefathers wrote the Constitution in order to, in their words, ``secure the blessings of liberty to ourselves and our posterity.'' Well, the endurance of our Constitution and the liberty it secures is a tribute not only to the wisdom of our Founding Fathers but to all the citizens, who in the courts and legislatures, in the political process, and in their daily lives have fought to uphold its basic guarantees.

Sometimes, as we saw recently, the fight to preserve freedom and the rule of law must be carried to the field of battle. We can be thankful that this country of ours has never wanted for the kind of bravery and dedication displayed by our fighting men just a short time ago over the coast of Libya. We lost one plane in that engagement, and I think we all pray for the two airmen who are lost. They are the heroes of our hearts, and each of us today owes a piece of our freedom to their noble effort.

The United States is slow to anger, and we use force only as a last resort. We tried quiet diplomacy. We tried public condemnation. We tried economic sanctions. And, yes, we tried a show of military might. But Qadhafi intensified his terrorist war, sending his agents around the world to murder and maim innocents. He mistook our love of peace for passivity, and restraint for lack of resolve. He mistook our traditional respect for law and for the human rights that are safeguarded by law for a lack of will to defend against lawlessness. We hope Mr. Qadhafi will not mistake us again. Our allies who cooperated with us in this action, especially those who share our common law heritage, can be proud that they stood for freedom and right, that as free people they haven't let themselves be cowed by threats and violence. They have earned the lasting respect and friendship of the American people.

And while I'm on the subject of human rights under law, we cannot forget the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. Those brave men are fighting to establish respect for human rights, for democracy, and for the rule of law within their own country. Today the House of Representatives will cast an historic vote on aid to the freedom fighters. And unfortunately, if that aid is approved, it'll be tied to a pork-barrel appropriations bill, a bill so brimming with waste and excess that aid to the freedom fighters may never see the light of day. If we win a fair up-or-down vote only to see it canceled by the House leadership through a backdoor parliamentary maneuver, then the cause of democracy in Nicaragua and the rule of law will be the greatest casualties. I sincerely hope the obstructionists in Congress will reconsider, because America is watching. I appeal to the sense of fairplay of our elected officials in the House. On an issue of such magnitude, let the majority work its will. Let freedom be given a chance in Nicaragua.

As I sign the proclamation for this Law Day, May 1st, 1986, let us give thanks that we live in a land of liberty safeguarded by our constitutional rights and protected by the rule of law. The foundations of freedom have never been firmer. Now I'm going to sign that proclamation.

I hesitate as a layman to say to all of you something that I've said to a number of students when I've had opportunity to speak to our young people. And I've read a lot of constitutions of other countries. I've read the Soviet Constitution -- was surprised to find it contains some of the same provisions of our own as regard to freedoms of the people. Of course they don't observe them, but they're there in the Constitution. But I've always gotten a thrill out of saying to these young people that all those other constitutions and our own, there is one little difference between them -- looks little, but it is so great it explains the total success of our nation. All those other constitutions are based on privileges that governments give to their people, and ours says, ``We, the people will allow the Government the following rights.'' And as long as it stays that way, we're on solid ground.

Our written Constitution has been in existence for 200 years, longer than that of any other nation in the world. Although our Nation has grown from 13 isolated agricultural States to an industrialized society of 240 million people, the text of the Constitution provides today, as it did in 1787, a blueprint for a functioning republic with well-considered and workable guidelines for democratic self-government. Its endurance is a tribute not only to the wisdom of the authors of that great document, but to all the citizens who, in our courts and legislatures, have fought to uphold its vital guarantees. It is also a testament to a two-hundred-year-old tradition of freedom through voluntary adherence to the rule of law. Because of the vigilance of the American people, we continue to be a country governed by law, rather than by force or the whim of a few self-proclaimed leaders.

Law Day U.S.A. is an important opportunity for all Americans to examine the historical precedents that led to the establishment of the rule of law in America through the United States Constitution, and consequently to improve our understanding and appreciation of the important contribution these sources made to the creation of our free society. As we observe Law Day, I urge everyone to join me in renewing our dedication to the foundations of our freedom, principles that ensure that, in this Nation, all men and women will continue to be free, enjoying the full and equal protection of the law.

Yesterday the Stockholm Conference on Confidence and Security Building Measures and Disarmament in Europe, the CDE, began its most critical session to date. If substantial progress is made, there will be a good chance of achieving a concluding document that will increase openness and make the military situation in Europe more stable and predictable. But much remains to be done if we are to reach an agreed document that will reduce the risk of military confrontation in Europe. If the East remains reluctant to move ahead with drafting such a document, time will run out on the CDE, which adjourns on September 19.

The President has instructed the head of the U.S. delegation, Ambassador Robert L. Barry, to work with our NATO allies, the neutral and nonaligned States, and the East, to find solutions consistent with the Conference mandate and our security requirements. The Conference must agree on the level and types of military activity that will be covered in the concluding document. We place high priority on agreeing on a threshold for notification of ground force and combined arms activities which can be verified and which will result in equitable treatment for all 35 participating States. This can be accomplished by identifying structural and numerical parameters that would cover activities at a level significantly below those covered by the Helsinki Final Act.

In order to discourage the use of military forces for political intimidation, the U.S. delegation has been instructed to explore possibilities for elaborating the details of the measure requiring that major military activities be forecast. The U.S. Government has repeatedly stressed our concern over compliance with international agreements and accords. All participating States must have the opportunity to verify the measures adopted in Stockholm. This can only be a accomplished by inspection.

As we make progress on the content of confidence and security building measures, we will continue drafting on a statement reaffirming our common commitment under international law to refrain from the threat or use of force.

Sec. 2. Interagency Consultation. In performing the function delegated by this Order, the Secretary of Defense shall consult with the Secretary of State and the United States Postal Service, and with the heads of other Executive agencies as appropriate. The Secretary of Defense shall provide timely notice to the United States Postal Service of any designations or terminations of designations made under this Order.

These strikes were conducted in the exercise of our right of self-defense under Article 51 of the United Nations Charter. This necessary and appropriate action was a preemptive strike, directed against the Libyan terrorist infrastructure and designed to deter acts of terrorism by Libya, such as the Libyan-ordered bombing of a discotheque in West Berlin on April 5. Libya's cowardly and murderous act resulted in the death of two innocent people -- an American soldier and a young Turkish woman -- and the wounding of 50 United States Armed Forces personnel and 180 other innocent persons. This was the latest in a long series of terrorist attacks against United States installations, diplomats and citizens carried out or attempted with the support and direction of Muammar Qadhafi.

Should Libyan-sponsored terrorist attacks against United States citizens not cease, we will take appropriate measures necessary to protect United States citizens in the exercise of our right of self-defense.

In accordance with my desire that Congress be informed on this matter, and consistent with the War Powers Resolution, I am providing this report on the employment of the United States Armed Forces. These self-defense measures were undertaken pursuant to my authority under the Constitution, including my authority as Commander in Chief of United States Armed Forces.

In recent days the President has urged the House of Representatives to vote in favor of the Senate-passed bill to assist the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. But he also expressed his dismay that a backdoor parliamentary maneuver -- attaching our bill to a huge and wasteful pork-barrel appropriations bill -- would prevent the necessary aid from ever reaching the freedom fighters. This is, nevertheless, just what the House Democratic leadership chose to do. But today, 177 Republican Members of the House served notice together that they would not abide by this unfair tactic. The President fully understands the reasons for this strategy by the House Republicans and hopes that the House will act without having to overcome further obstacles. The President continues to believe that this is an urgent measure vital to our national security and calls on the House to act as soon as possible.

The President. Well, I happen to believe in it enough to believe that there would be a lot of benefits for the whole world, because what we're trying to get is a weapon -- or a defensive system, not a weapon -- that would render obsolete nuclear strategic weapons.

The President. I'm pleased to meet with Prime Minister Bob Hawke today, although I was somewhat disappointed he didn't bring the America's Cup with him. Prime Minister Hawke is a personal friend and a valued counselor, and I can't overstate the value America attaches to its relationship with Australia, especially as that nation now approaches a very special year. We look forward to participating in the festivities of Australia's 1988 bicentennial.

Our countries share many historical experiences: our love of democracy, our frontier heritage, and our common defense of freedom from the First and Second World Wars through Korea and Vietnam. All this has nurtured the bonds of friendship between our two peoples. Today the United States and Australia, as much as ever, rely on each other. Australia is a responsible ANZUS [an alliance between Australia, New Zealand, and the United States] ally, an important trading partner, and a trusted friend.

Our discussions in the White House today covered a variety of issues. In the area of trade, the United States will be responsive to the extent we can to Australian interests. In international agriculture, we have a common goal: We'll continue to work together to keep open international trade and export markets. International agricultural trade problems should be given attention in upcoming international economic meetings, including the next round of multilateral trade negotiations. We seek a truly free international agricultural market. Necessary interim measures to counter unfair subsidization, like our own Export Enhancement Program [EEP], should take account of the interest of friends like Australia. Prime Minister Hawke has been assured of this, and we will, of course, continue our dialog on this important subject.

On other matters, we reaffirmed the importance of security cooperation among Pacific States. The stabilizing role that ANZUS plays has been essential to the phenomenal growth that the Pacific region has enjoyed during the last decade. It's hoped that New Zealand will soon return to its traditional role as a responsible ANZUS member. We would greatly regret it if this valued partner declined to take the actions that would permit restoration of our normal collaboration and preservation of our special relationship as allies. Whatever New Zealand's decision, however, I have told Prime Minister Hawke that our commitment to Australia under ANZUS is firm. Our discussions today also focused on regional issues and arms control. Australians share with the American people a deep concern about world peace and a desire to reduce the number of nuclear weapons threatening mankind.

This is my third meeting with Prime Minister Hawke. Our personal relations and the relations of our countries remain on a very high level. Bob, smooth sailing on the rest of your trip and on the journey home.

The Prime Minister. Thank you, Mr. President. The warmth of your welcome and the sentiments that you've expressed in your statement are very much appreciated by me. They reflect not only the personal friendship to which you refer and which I greatly value; they reflect also the close, longstanding association between the governments and the peoples of our two countries. Mr. President, as you are aware, the main purpose of my visit has been and remains to talk with you, your colleagues, and Members of Congress about agricultural matters.

Nevertheless, let me say this at the outset. We are at one in our determination to see an end to the scourge of international terrorism and, therefore, condemn unequivocally Libya's role in directing, exporting, and supporting such activities. The Australian Government does not accept that violence, in particular, terrorism, is a solution to the complex problems of the world we share. We referred in the United Nations Security Council to a number of possible courses open to the international community to bring about a peaceful resolution of the current situation in the Mediterranean region.

Mr. President, we meet at a time when the rural sectors of both of our countries face serious difficulties. For us the corruption of international markets is a matter of very grave concern. Australia is an efficient, nonsubsidizing agricultural exporter. It exports 80 percent of its rural production. The severe difficulties that face Australian and U.S. farming communities as a result of depressed agricultural prices and our frustrations with a market loss that has been brought about by huge European Community agricultural export subsidies are of critical concern to both our countries. I have conveyed Australia's appreciation of the cooperation we have received so far from the United States on those aspects of the Farm Act impacting on Australia's agricultural interests. Australia particularly welcomed, Mr. President, the recent amendments to the Farm Act which halved mandated spending under the Export Enhancement Program and reduced the funds allocated under the Targeted Export Assistance Program.

Bearing in mind the importance to Australia of its wheat markets, I was encouraged to have your reassurance, Mr. President, that the EEP will continue on a targeted basis, aimed essentially at markets of subsidizing exporters, and that you will continue to encourage EEP recipients to maintain their normal level of imports from traditional, nonsubsidizing suppliers. We also welcomed your assurances that the implementation of the Farm Act, with regard to export of beef and dairy products, would be handled in a way which seeks to minimize disruption in markets served by Australia. We also expect continued access for our beef to the United States market, at least at the levels consistent with the operation of the existing meat import law. In relation to sugar imports to the United States, we are assured that Australia's traditional market share is being maintained. I appreciate that you have noted our concerns on the operation of the current cotton and rice programs.

Australia has appreciated the opportunities we have had to consult on the administration of the Farm Act and of the EEP. We welcome your agreement that these opportunities to discuss with you will be extended to include Australia's concerns in the implementation of the United States export subsidy and surplus stock disposal programs. Periodic meetings between our respective trade and agricultural ministers will be central to that continuing process. Mr. President, we both share the commitment to an effective September launch of the new [Multilateral Trade Negotiations] MTN. We agree on the need to have agriculture accepted as a key issue for the new MTN round. We also agree that the negotiation of more effective [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] GATT rules for agricultural subsidies should be a specific objective of the MTN round. The forthcoming Tokyo summit will be important in carrying these matters forward.

Mr. President, the closeness of the relations which Australia and the United States enjoys is based on common values and shared prospectives. Our history of cooperation in peace and in war, our shared commitment to democratic values, and the fundamental importance of our security relationship under the ANZUS alliance have all served to strengthen and broaden our bilateral relationship. The close friendship between our countries does not require identical views on every international issue. A mature relationship involves mutual respect for each other's right to determine independent policies towards various problems, having regard to each other's concerns.

Our alliance under the ANZUS treaty is fundamental to Australia's foreign and defense policies. It also has important implications for the security and the stability of our region. I am pleased that in our discussions today we reaffirmed the importance of our arrangements under ANZUS. We accept that, like other alliances, the ANZUS treaty entails obligations and responsibilities as well as mutual benefits. My government is convinced that international security is enhanced not only by appropriate security arrangements which contribute to stable deterrence but also a commitment to pursue balanced and verifiable arms control agreements. We value very much indeed, Mr. President, the consultations and exchanges of views that take place at the highest level between our governments on a range of international issues, including arms control and disarmament. My discussions today with you, Mr. President, covered the prospects for progress towards effective arms control and specific initiatives that have been undertaken in Australia's own region, including the South Pacific Nuclear Free Zone Treaty.

Our discussions today also covered the tragic situation in South Africa. The efforts of the Commonwealth Eminent Persons Group to encourage dialog between the Government and the various racial groups with a view to the peaceful establishment of a nonracial, democratic, and representative government in South Africa are currently an important contribution to the search for a solution.

As our bicentenary in 1988 approaches, we are planning a range of celebrations, which we hope will involve active participation by many countries, including, of course, the United States. A visit to Australia around that time by you would be most appropriate and most welcome, and I sincerely hope that you will be able to take up that invitation which I have extended to you.

Since the time of its beginnings in Egypt and Mesopotamia some 5,000 years ago, progress in mathematical understanding has been a key ingredient of progress in science, commerce, and the arts. We have made astounding strides since from the theorems of Pythagoras to the set theory of Georg Cantor. In the era of the computer, more than ever before, mathematical knowledge and reasoning are essential to our increasingly technological world.

Despite the increasing importance of mathematics to the progress of our economy and society, enrollment in mathematics programs has been declining at all levels of the American educational system. Yet the application of mathematics is indispensable in such diverse fields as medicine, computer sciences, space exploration, the skilled trades, business, defense, and government. To help encourage the study and utilization of mathematics, it is appropriate that all Americans be reminded of the importance of this basic branch of science to our daily lives.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Well, before we steal away, I will be serious for a moment. We might have a tendency, you and I, to be a bit disputatious now and then. That's all part and parcel of our trade. But during a time like this -- during a hectic and historic week, I'm especially grateful for all your efforts to provide a vigorous, probing, and unbiased free press. I saluted the courage of our Air Force and Navy pilots after they carried out their difficult and dangerous mission this week, but another group also performed courageously and well, working endless hours, putting themselves in harm's way, trying to give the American people the best and most accurate account possible of one of the most important stories of this decade. ``Courage,'' Churchill said, ``is the one quality which guarantees all others.'' This was a week for courage and for superior performance in your profession as well. And I'm delighted to salute you and all of your colleagues overseas.

We've had a fine time here tonight, and I've been especially thankful to feel laughter and patriotism warm our hearts, to know that liberty binds us as one. May it always be so. And thank you for including Nancy and me in these wonderful festivities, and God bless you all.

You know the fact is, it's as tough for the Democrats to find an opponent for Al as it is for batters to find a Dwight Gooden fastball. Actually, there's a similarity between the two. Dwight is ``Dr. K,'' and as far as I'm concerned Al D'Amato is Senator ``A-OK.'' And I'm hoping that you'll help send him back to the Senate for another 6 years. We need him there, and I need him there. One reason is obvious: We need more Democrats in the Senate like Custer needed more arrows. [Laughter] Nothing against my friends and colleagues in the other party, but at this time in our history it is the Republican Party that is the party of ideas, the party of the entrepreneur and the small businessman and businesswoman, the party of the poor and those who are struggling for a chance, and the party of a great and once almost forgotten part of America -- the great middle class of this country.

Al D'Amato has fought a sometimes lonely fight for adequate and realistic defense spending. And I must say that in this fight, he has managed in his own inimitable way to serve the national interest while enhancing economic prospects on the local level. Al has shown an impressive knowledge of and concern about the readiness and the size of our naval forces, for instance. In the past few years, he's worked closely with the Secretary of the Navy to make sure that our ships have sufficient and widely dispersed home porting, the better to defend a large continent. He did this out of patriotism and an eagerness to protect his country.

But -- and very seriously -- there are two areas where Al D'Amato's leadership and total -- that is total -- commitment have made a major and immediate impact. And everyone in Washington would agree with me on this, especially the First Lady. I'm referring to the problems of drugs and crime. It's no exaggeration to say that Al D'Amato came to the Senate absolutely livid about what the peaceful, decent, law-abiding citizens of his State had to put up with in terms of crime. He and I have discussed this a number of times, and it's clearly an issue he feels very passionately about. And he hasn't just talked; he's done something.

He cosponsored the Comprehensive Crime Control Act, which put tougher penalties on drug trafficking and provides pretrial detention for dangerous criminals. He wrote a provision of the act which strengthens the Government's ability to seize the assets of drug dealers. And this provision, by the way, is now being used by U.S. attorneys throughout the United States. He successfully fought for hundreds more drug enforcement agents and customs agents to help fight in the battle against drugs. Al agrees, as my wife Nancy does, that a big part of the war against drugs is teaching children to resist the pressures of their friends and the neighborhood and teach them how to say no. He's joined with the law enforcement community to bring drug prevention to the classrooms and neighborhoods of New York.

And I want to mention a special program that Al has begun. It's called ``Coaches, Kids, and Chemicals.'' In February, 180 sports coaches and parents and teachers made their way through the snow out to Long Island to meet and see if they couldn't fight the drug problem together. And I know that Carl Eller is a part of that program. I know also that he's here in this room today. And, Carl, would you stand up and take a bow? [Applause] I've always thought there's nothing that can't be done if the people, the American people want to do it. Al thinks there's nothing that can't be done if the great and good people of the Empire State want to do it. So, I'd say the street thugs and the drug dealers had better beware while Al D'Amato and friends are on the case.

Inevitably, Al D'Amato and I haven't agreed on everything. There are issues in which he hasn't seen things as we did. But we've also always agreed on a great deal. And we're Republicans; we share the same party and the same heritage, and there's nothing more that -- or there's, I should say, there is more that unites us than could ever divide us. We share to a certain extent a worldview.

Our nation faces some great challenges over the next few years. And I think the historians of the future are going to look back on the eighties as a watershed era, a time when America faced a lot of tough issues -- and partly because it had no choice. This is the decade that reminds me of Lincoln's ``Fellow citizens, we cannot escape history.'' We face the question of the national economy: Should we keep it expanding and creating jobs, or do we want to go back to the depressing limits of the past? Al D'Amato and I agree; the answer is go for growth. We face the central diplomatic challenge of our time: how to deal with Soviet expansionism, with imperialism, and terrorism. Al D'Amato and I agree: To preserve the peace we need a strong and unsurpassed Armed Forces.

We face a direct and explicit military and political challenge in Central America, a challenge involving communism and its ambitions. Al D'Amato and I agree that to protect the peace you have to protect democracy, and that means protecting those who fight for democracy. And I want to thank you, Al, for proving once again the other day when you voted for aid for the Nicaraguan freedom fighters that you can face the hard choices and make the hard votes. I know it isn't easy. But it's better than easy; it's right.

Gardening is a wholesome avocation that encourages appreciation for nature and concern for the preservation and enhancement of our environment. It prompts a genuine respect for those who work in agriculture today. Gardening, above all, provides a special source of fulfillment when foresight, patience, and collaboration with soil and sunlight finally are repaid by lovely flowers and luscious harvests.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The U.S. Embassy in Beirut this morning was contacted by officials of the American University in Beirut concerning the identity of the third victim of the brutal murders discovered on April 17 in Beirut. They told the Embassy that this victim had been identified as Peter Kilburn, the librarian at the American University, by three of his colleagues. We do not have positive forensic identification. Steps are being taken to obtain this information. We have been in touch with all the families of the American hostages and provided them with all the information we have. Mr. Kilburn was last seen on November 30, 1984, and was confirmed missing on December 3, 1984.

With summer coming, a lot of Americans will be driving more than ever, going on ``See America First'' vacations and driving everywhere from New Jersey to California in everything from vans to buses to motorbikes. This is a good time for it because gas prices continue to fall. In fact, they are falling as never before. The oil price decline of the 1980's has been a triumph not of government, but of the free market; and not of political leaders, but of freedom itself.

When I first came into office in January of 1981, the price of gas was just about $1.25 a gallon. The price of a barrel of oil had reached $36. Americans were understandably frustrated and angry as they cast about for answers. Some people advocated more governmental intervention. Demands for divestitures of oil companies filled the air. Other people demanded gas rationing. Well, we said no. I didn't want to force more limits on people through rationing. I wanted to ease the situation by letting freedom solve the problem through the magic of the marketplace.

One week after I took office, we decontrolled the price of domestic oil, and we stopped the Government from putting ceilings on its pricing and production. Our action wasn't exactly greeted by rave reviews. Those opposed said decontrol would drive up the price of oil, increase gas prices, and cause terrible inflation. One Member of Congress, a Democrat from Massachusetts, said decontrol would impose impossible economic burdens on those least able to pay. Well, 5 years later, Massachusetts is enjoying an unprecedented economic comeback; and the reason is lower taxes -- something else we contributed to -- and the lowered energy prices that followed the decontrol of domestic oil.

Despite all the scare tactics and dire warnings, decontrol was a success. The price of oil has fallen from the $36 a barrel of 1981 to about $12 a barrel today. The price of gas has also plummeted from an average of $1.25 a gallon when I took office to about 82 cents today. In fact, the price of gas is now cheaper in real terms, meaning accounting for inflation, than it's been at any point since the 1950's. My mother used to tell me, ``It's not nice to crow,'' but maybe this once I can't help it. We've also been able to close down the costly Synfuels Corporation, a quasi-governmental agency that ate up billions of taxpayer dollars while it didn't solve the energy crisis. Government didn't perform any of these miracles; freedom did, the marketplace did, the entrepreneurs and businessmen and women of America did. Those of us back in Washington just sort of lifted the artificial restraints, sat back, and watched the gushers blow.

But the oil harvest of the eighties is not just an economic story; it also has implications for our national security. When I came into office the United States was consuming about 17 million barrels of oil a day -- 6 million imported. A big part of that oil came from the Middle East. Today we consume less than 16 million barrels of oil a day, and only 4 million are imported. But what may prove to be even more significant is that we've changed who we buy our imported oil from. Back in 1981 most of it came from the OPEC countries, but now most of it comes from Canada, Mexico, the Caribbean, and Great Britain. As Vice President Bush pointed out recently, we've assured that our supplies won't be as vulnerable to international politics as they've been in the past. We need a strong U.S. energy industry to keep it that way.

I wish the entire energy picture were nothing but good news, but that, unfortunately, isn't so. While the energy-dependent States of the Nation are enjoying increased economic well-being, the economies of our oil States have cooled. Producers, large and small, have suffered a dramatic loss of income. Many small companies face bankruptcy. While our belief in the free market remains firm, that belief is not inconsistent with the sense of compassion and concern for the individuals who bear its economic consequences.

But the answer to these problems is not an import fee on imported oil. That would be a step backward. What we have to do now is go forward with actions that will further improve our energy production, freeing up all remaining energy prices. That means doing to domestic gas what we did to domestic oil -- decontrolling it. Last week Energy Secretary John Herrington sent to Congress a bill to lift all remaining controls on natural gas prices. The result will once again be a boom for consumers, with the average residential customer saving up to $45 on his or her gas bill on the first full year of decontrol alone. I think it's time we seized the moment and decided to finish the work we began in 1981. It's time to go for lower prices, go for more freedom, and go for the growth that will follow. We'll be going for it in the Congress soon, and we hope to win as we did in '81 -- with your support.

From earliest colonial days, Americans have always known that education is the golden key that opens the door to achievement and progress. This Administration has placed renewed emphasis on excellence in education, and already the results are encouraging. By setting high standards we challenge the young to stretch their mental muscles and strive to achieve the best that is in them. Such an education succeeds because it makes learning an adventure.

Education is like a diamond with many facets: it includes the basic mastery of numbers and letters that give us access to the treasury of human knowledge, accumulated and refined through the ages; it includes technical and vocational training as well as instruction in science, higher mathematics, and humane letters. But no true education can leave out the moral and spiritual dimensions of human life and human striving. Only education that addresses this dimension can lead to that blend of compassion, humility, and understanding that is summed up in one word: wisdom.

The Congress has sought to call attention to these durable values by adopting resolutions that pay tribute to the example of Rabbi Menachem Mendel Schneerson, a man who has dedicated his life to the search for wisdom and to guiding others along its pathways. He exemplifies the rich tradition of the Seven Noahide Laws, which have been the lodestar of the Lubavitch movement from its inception.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this nineteenth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

With regard to the question of interim restraint, the President has started consultations with the Congress and key allied leaders on his tentative thinking. The substance of these consultations are confidential. No final decision has yet been taken and will not be until the consultations are complete. We will not comment on the substance of the consultations at this time.

SALT II is an unratified treaty that would have expired on December 31, 1985. The United States is currently following the policy announced by the President on June 10, 1985. At that time, the President committed to go the extra mile. He did so, dismantling a Poseidon submarine, not to comply or abide by an unratified, expired treaty, but rather to give the Soviet Union adequate time to take the steps necessary to join us in establishing an interim framework of truly mutual restraint.

The issue is not one of complying or not complying with SALT II, rather of what actions to take now under the President's policy announced last June. What we do in the future depends on our national security needs and our commitments to our allies, in meeting the threat that we face, which in turn depends on what the Soviets do.

During Secretaries Week I am pleased to call on all Americans to join me in recognizing the vital role of secretaries in our society and economy. Skilled, professional secretaries are essential to the smooth, efficient functioning of business, government, and the professions.

One of the most important functions of any enterprise is communication, and secretaries -- whether by scheduling, preparing correspondence, or working directly with the public -- are among any organization's most important communicators. The efficiency and reputation of an organization are largely attributable to the skill, tact, dedication, and understanding of its secretaries.

Recent advances in technology present new challenges for secretaries, yet with each challenge comes a new opportunity. As America's secretaries master the new technologies, office efficiency will increase and secretaries will be freed from some tedious tasks to take on exciting and rewarding challenges. We should all keep in mind that much of the technological revolution that will keep our nation growing into the Twenty-first Century will be implemented by our nation's secretaries.

Volunteers founded this nation. They did it at risk to their fortunes and their very lives. Even if we are not called on to take such risks, we are summoned by our history and our proudest traditions to give ourselves to the service of our neighbors and our nation. That is the summons of voluntarism.

I am proud to say that Americans are responding to this summons with great generosity and in great numbers. Every year almost a hundred million citizens lend that helping hand without seeking any reward save that pearl of great price, a good conscience. These wonderful citizens build up the economy of love, which is every bit as important to our national life as the economy of money. Voluntarism, the economy of love, and caring is the necessary complement of our free enterprise system. Both depend on the same kind of initiative and imagination.

Throughout my presidency I have encouraged the spirit of voluntarism, and fostered our sense of the stake we all have in the great enterprise called society. I have striven to give to individuals, families, and private organizations broader scope for their voluntary contributions to the common wealth. The American people have responded with the generosity for which they are famous. Every day we receive new reports of highly successful Private Sector Initiatives which creatively use the resources we have as a nation and make America a still better place to live.

National Volunteer Week is a time when we recognize the generosity of our volunteers, and the incalculable contribution they make to American life. It is a time to urge volunteers to keep up their work, and to urge all Americans to become an active part of American tradition.

The accumulation of information, the acquisition of knowledge, and the application of that knowledge to solve problems or enhance life are principal functions of American education. At every level, school libraries offer a great range of resource materials that greatly enrich education and increase the knowledge and understanding of all Americans.

Young people often develop a lifelong love of reading because of their exposure to books in school libraries. Furthermore, researchers are often motivated by the vast resources of university and special libraries as they dedicate themselves to studying the problems of society. School libraries and their dedicated staffs make an incalculable contribution to our educational system.

Americans who have come from Asian and Pacific countries have made notable contributions to our Nation in a wide range of fields, including science, the arts, medicine, law, literature, agriculture, industry, commerce, and government. Through the rich and varied traditions and heritages of their homelands, they have greatly enhanced America's culture and the lives of all Americans.

This Nation fittingly honors its citizens of Asian and Pacific descent. They have brought to our country an industriousness that boosts our economy and a passion for freedom that rejuvenates American ideals. We are grateful to Asian and Pacific Americans for their unwavering support for the unalienable rights to life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness that form the core of the American ethos. Through their bravery and perseverance, they have provided us with a moving testament to the universality of the human thirst for political freedom.

By tradition, the second Sunday in May is designated as Mother's Day, one of America's best-loved holidays. It gives us all a special occasion to honor our own, and to praise the unique dignity of motherhood, one of life's highest callings.

The role of the mother has changed constantly in our society, but its fundamental meaning abides: love and caring. The modern mother is conquering new worlds. She continues to be the heart of the family and the hearth of the home. Where mothers are honored and loved, the family is strong. And where the family is strong the nation is strong.

Today fatherhood is sometimes drily described as a craft or an occupation, something which competes with career or outside pursuits for time and attention. Contemporary books and articles offer reams of advice to mothers and fathers on how to improve as parents and better manage their time at home and with their children. In this era of new demands and stresses on families, we frequently forget just what it is that is special about fatherhood, what makes it not a part of life, but a path in life that has, in every generation, the power to create and renew.

Fatherhood, after all, is about childhood. Fatherhood is walking the floor at midnight with a sick baby that cannot sleep; fatherhood is an arm around the shoulders of a child crying because a balloon is lost; fatherhood is repairing a bicycle wheel for the umpteenth time knowing that it won't last more than the afternoon. Fatherhood is guiding a youth through the wilderness of adolescence toward the vast expanse of adulthood; fatherhood is holding tight when all else seems to be falling apart; and fatherhood is letting go when it is time to part. Fatherhood is long hours at the blast furnace or in the fields, behind the wheel or in front of a computer screen, working a twelve-hour shift or doing a six-month tour of duty. In short, fatherhood is giving one's all, from a child's first day of life on, from the break of day to its end -- on the job, in the household, but, most of all, in the heart.

From the vantage point of his love and responsibility, a father sees the future and dedicates himself to doing whatever is necessary to bring his family safely through. No father performs any of these tasks with thought of thanks or reward. The things that gratify him most are those that represent success in what he has labored to impart to his children: strength of character and conviction, love of family and country, a sense of right and wrong, and, above all, a spirit of thanksgiving for the generous gift of life itself.

Because human nature often keeps us from recognizing how great another's sacrifice is until we assume similar burdens, many of us realize for the first time how dearly we were prized only when we ourselves become parents. On this day for fathers, all of us have a special opportunity to say thanks to America's dads for their selflessness and devotion. We also have a chance to say a prayer for fathers everywhere -- for their health and strength if they are with us, or for their blessing if this day finds them smiling down from heaven's bright corridors. Truly, for the labor and legacy of our families and our freedoms, we cannot thank them enough.

The emergency situation created by the Nicaraguan Government's aggressive activities in Central America has not eased since the declaration of the Nicaraguan emergency on May 1, 1985, nor has the Government of Nicaragua responded to my call for actions appropriate to achieving peace in Central America as contained in my message to the Congress accompanying that declaration. In these circumstances, I have determined that it is necessary to continue in effect the national emergency with respect to Nicaragua after May 1, 1986, in order to deal with this unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States.

Today the President called for reforms in several key elements of the Nation's energy policy. He called for repeal of the crude oil windfall profit tax, which was enacted in 1980 to capture for the Federal Treasury part of the difference between the world price of crude oil and then prevailing federally established price controlled levels. This tax is currently scheduled to be phased out beginning January 1, 1991. Due to the decontrol and ensuing drop in world oil prices, however, there is no significant revenue accruing to the U.S. Treasury under this provision.

In addition, the President reaffirmed the importance of deregulating natural gas. Legislation to achieve this goal was recently sent to the Congress by Secretary of Energy Herrington. In connection with the deregulation of natural gas, the President also reiterated his support for repealing several provisions of the Power Plant and Industrial Fuel Use Act which inhibit the free choice of energy sources by utilities and consumers.

The President also pledged his willingness to review measures designed to preserve the viability of marginal production wells, sometimes referred to as stripper wells, as a national energy asset. As part of this review last week, Interior Secretary Hodel announced suspension of production requirements on these types of wells located in areas managed by the Bureau of Land Management.

The President also reconfirmed his support for the current law tax treatment of the depletion allowance and intangible drilling costs contained in the Senate Finance Committee version of the tax reform bill. While the President remains concerned about our energy security, he reaffirmed his belief that lower energy prices are of great overall benefit to the American economy.

But I do want to thank Clare Luce for that wonderful introduction. I can't say enough about Clare, and I certainly can't say anything more than I used to in all those telegrams I sent her years ago when she was a successful playwright and I was an actor looking for work. [Laughter] But to be serious, I quoted Clare Luce in a recent address to the Nation, and I suspect I won't be the last President to do that. Clare, it's no exaggeration to say that you've more than made your mark in American history. Tonight I thank you, Heritage thanks you, and so does the conservative movement.

But I can't help reflecting tonight on the fact that ``Heritage 10'' actually exceeded its fundraising goal by $2 million. Ed Feulner says he's thinking of using the extra money to set up a first-aid station for Washington liberals -- [laughter] -- which just goes to show the conservative movement has come of age: We've gone from hope to charity. [Laughter] Tonight is special for Heritage. It marks the culmination of an extraordinary project. What boldness it took to suggest that Heritage, whose operating budget only a few years ago was $3 million, could raise 10 times that amount in just 2 years. But you've done it and then some.

Yet it isn't really the money, nor even the tremendously valuable work that will be done with it, that needs to be talked about tonight. After all, I could stand here most of the evening and recite all the newspaper accounts of Heritage's success, with the adjectives ranging from ``stunning'' to ``amazing.'' But on this point, the record speaks for itself. So, I think the time is better spent explaining the causes of Heritage's success, causes that lie deeper than a good many people realize, causes that teach us something about the nature of historical change itself.

One of the most valuable lessons that history has to teach us is that after the most terrible frustration and discouragement sometimes change can come so quickly and so unexpectedly, it surprises even those who have made it happen. This is particularly true in Washington. One Cabinet member in a former administration put it very well: ``The toughest job in Washington,'' he said, ``is being able to tell the difference between the tides, the waves, and the ripples.'' Well, actually that's been the problem with the perceptions of many of the experts and the pundits; they concentrate so much on the ripples, they can't see the waves and the tides.

An analogy that I've used before on this point has to do with March of 1943. In that terrible month it became clear that the allies were losing the battle of the Atlantic. It was the only development, Churchill said, that ever really frightened him during the war. More than 500,000 tons of allied shipping went down; thousands of merchant seamen lost their lives. England was left with only a 2-month supply of food and material, and the experts in the British Admiralty seriously doubted that England's lifeline across the Atlantic could be kept open. But then suddenly -- only a month later -- it all changed. Innovations in the convoy system, escort training, radio and radar use, long-range aircraft had a sudden cumulative weight. Suddenly the U-boat wolfpacks sustained enormous losses. Hitler's admirals were conceding the defeat in the Atlantic, and by June it had all turned around. The experts were confounded. In a little over 60 days, the looming catastrophe had turned to decisive victory. Allied convoys crossed the ocean without the loss of a single ship.

I first used that analogy back in 1982, when the same people who said the oil shortage would last for decades were talking gloom and doom about America's economy. They claimed that huge, new tax increases were the only way to get the economy moving again. Back then, they used the term ``Reaganomics.'' And maybe you haven't noticed -- they're not using that anymore. [Laughter] But the larger point is this: Being too close to the data can sometimes mean missing its significance and the chance to change it for the better.

But as one American intellectual and religious leader of the last century, William Channing, said: ``There are seasons, in human affairs, of inward and outward revolution, when new depths seem to be broken up in the soul, when new wants are unfolded in multitudes, and a new and undefined good is thirsted for. There are periods when in truth to dare is the highest wisdom.'' And that's the story of Heritage's success. Joe and Holly Coors and a young man named Ed Feulner wouldn't listen to the experts. They knew the experts lacked vision, that they were too close to the data, that they only saw the ripples. And they knew, too, that the best way to ride the wave of history is to make a few waves of your own.

Joe and Holly, I won't even mention the personal debt that I owe each of you. Let me just say that no one has been more important to Heritage's success and that of the conservative movement than the two of you. So, let me also say, as President, on behalf of the present generation of Americans and many more to come, your devotion to country, your selflessness and patriotism, put all of us in your permanent debt.

I think we should keep in mind the example of people like Joe, Holly, and Ed when we try to grasp the significance of what's happening in the world today. Heritage -- with its quiet promotion of ideas, its seminars, its research papers, its conferences, and, yes, occasionally its buttonholing of Congressmen -- for informational purposes only, of course -- [laughter] -- is a reflection, as well as a cause, of the revolution in ideas occurring throughout the world, a revolution whose significance may only be appreciated long after it has brought about startling, unexpected change.

Recently I've asked a few conservative audiences to reflect on that change, to think back to 1980 and ask themselves: Who would have thought that in a few short years even our political opposition would be calling for an end to deficit spending and voting for a de facto balanced budget amendment, known as Gramm-Rudman? Or who could have predicted that a House of Representatives supposedly under liberal leadership would spontaneously repeal the Clark amendment, the amendment which prevented us from helping the freedom fighters in Angola?

But these changes in American domestic politics reflect a wider international trend. Since our first days in office, our administration has tried to defend our way of life not just by increasing the defense budget, but by pointing to the world of ideas and the revolution now going on there. We've talked about the decadence of Marxist-Leninist ideology. Early in 1981 I mentioned to Mrs. Thatcher [Prime Minister of the United Kingdom] that totalitarian ideology had lost its force and energy and perhaps the time had come for the democracies to plan for a world where that ideology was no longer a dominent force. A little later at Notre Dame, we called communism a spent force, a sad, bizarre chapter in human history whose last pages even now are being written. And in Westminster, I noted that statism had lost the intellectuals. Our call was for a forward strategy for freedom, a crusade to promote and foster democratic values throughout the world.

Much of this at the time was viewed skeptically. But here we are a few years later; democracy is prospering in many nations where it's never before been seen. In Latin America and the Caribbean alone more than 50 -- or 90 percent of the people live in nations that are democracies or headed in that direction. What a change from a few years ago. And we've seen the insurgencies in Afghanistan, Cambodia, Nicaragua, Angola, and elsewhere, vivid evidence that the romance of revolution is no longer on the side of the totalitarians. It's telling proof that the eighties is a break with the past, that the eighties is truly the decade of the freedom fighters.

So, let me make a prediction. I think there's a growing recognition that the idea of self-government and the commitment to democratic rights is on the march everywhere in the world, and especially in Central America. Those who've been naive about the dangers of communism in the past, those who've been wrong about the nature of Communist regimes in Vietnam, Cambodia, Grenada, and El Salvador are uneasy now with their views on the Sandinistas and the freedom fighters. So, here is my prophecy: We're going to get the freedom fighters the help they need, and we're going to get it to them soon. But it's going to happen because I know you and I are going to redouble our efforts over the next few weeks.

And let me make one other prediction: We must never forget that totalitarian regimes are as fragile as they are powerful. Time magazine recently did a story on scholar Robert Leiken, who went to Nicaragua and, much to the distress of some of his liberal colleagues, concluded that opposition to the Sandinistas is very deep and very strong in that nation. So, let's remember this, too: The vast majority of the people in Nicaragua want nothing to do with communism or the militarism it engenders. The day is coming when the democratic promises of the revolution of 1979 will be fulfilled and Nicaragua will be free.

The only point I'm making here is this: We've been talking about the idea of freedom, about expanding its frontiers, since the beginning of this administration. So no one should be surprised that our policies and programs have followed suit. Freedom is on the march; we pledge solidarity to those who seek to make it their own.

In much the same way, no nation -- friend or foe, ally or adversary -- should be surprised by the events of last week and the United States Government's determination to protect American lives and the world from terrorism. I could recite here a long list of speeches and statements by myself and Cabinet officers outlining the terrorist danger, presenting the evidence of collaboration among certain terrorist States and making clear to those States that we would not tolerate what amounts to acts of war against the American people. Only last summer, in an address to the American Bar Association, I outlined the terrorist network, citing evidence the United States Government had accumulated as well as private scholars in the field such as Dr. Avigdor Haselkorn. I carefully outlined the interconnection among those terrorist States and issued the most solemn warnings to their leaders.

And by the way, these two issues we've discussed here this evening -- the march of freedom, especially in Central America, and the fight against terrorism -- are directly related. In that American Bar Association address, I pointed out the strong ties of the Sandinistas to the international terror network. The Sandinistas have provided refuge for all sorts of international terrorists. Members of the Italian Government have openly charged that Nicaragua is harboring some of Italy's worst terrorists. And we have evidence that in addition to Italy's Red Brigades, other elements of the world's most vicious terrorists groups -- West Germany's Baader-Meinhof gang, the Basque ETA, the PLO, and the Tupamaros -- have found a haven in Nicaragua. They have actively supported the Salvadoran rebels and have frequently used terror, including the killing of four of our marines in a cafe last summer. And these are the same rebels who celebrated the Challenger explosion and said our astronauts were war criminals and deserved what they got.

That picture making the rounds showing Daniel Ortega standing with Mu`ammar Qadhafi and raising his fist in a gesture of solidarity is very much to the point. I hope every Member of Congress will reflect on the fact that the Sandinistas have been training, supporting, and directing, as well as sheltering terrorists; and in this sense, they're trying to build a Libya on our doorstep. And it's the contras, the freedom fighters, who are stopping them. So, you see it goes back to what Richard Weaver has said and what Heritage is all about: Ideas do have consequences, rhetoric is policy, and words are action.

And just in case the meaning of last week's events are still unclear to those who would terrorize and murder Americans, let me explain once more, and, believe me, far from being belligerent or warlike -- clearing up misunderstanding on this point is precisely the way to avoid conflict, not cause it.

So, tonight I speak for a united people. Let me say simply to those who wish us ill: We are Americans. We love our country, we love what she stands for, we will always defend her. We live for freedom -- our own and our children's -- and we stand ready always to protect our birthright and guard our patrimony, as our fathers did before us.

I understand your Committee will soon vote on ratification of the US-UK Supplementary Extradition Treaty. I am writing to emphasize the vital importance of this Treaty, both to our efforts to control terrorism and to U.S.-British cooperation in those efforts.

As Great Britain demonstrated once again last week, she is our staunchest Ally in the battle against international terrorism. Rejection of the Treaty would be viewed by the British -- and the world at large -- as a weakening of U.S. resolve. This must not happen. Indeed, we see Senate ratification of this Supplementary Treaty as a key element of our wider efforts to promote greater international cooperation.

I am hopeful that the Senate will reject efforts to weaken the Treaty in ways that would create new legal loopholes for terrorists. In this regard, I understand some have suggested that the Treaty be modified to extradite only persons charged with offenses against civilians. I frankly do not understand such an approach. Our own recent unpleasant experiences with terrorism clearly demonstrate that American servicemen are a primary target. We should not do anything that suggests in any form that it is permissible to attack soldiers or policemen.

As you know, the recently concluded Anglo-Irish Treaty has sent a signal of hope to all the people of Ireland. This sign of hope makes it all the more important, in my view, that the United States support political dialogue and condemn the bombing and wreckage imposed by terrorism.

I urge that you and your Senate colleagues ratify the US-UK Supplementary Extradition Treaty. I hope that you will share my comments with your colleagues. We need to stand tall with our British Allies at this important moment.

Q. Well, maybe I can start, Mr. President. You're going to Tokyo at a time when there's been some signs of division and strain in the Western alliance, I think over Libya and, certainly, over trade and other foreign policy issues. And I was wondering if you see that there will be a need at Tokyo to make some sort of fence-mending with your European allies to keep the alliance in good shape.

The President. Well, I'm confident -- after having gone to several of these summits and having now a long, relatively long relationship with the people involved, I am not concerned that we have any serious differences between us or anything that we can't work out. That's really the purpose of the summits, is to see that we meet regularly and are able to talk out any problems that arise. And I don't think the differences between us are all that great. So, I'm optimistic that when we get there we're going to talk about, as we have before, the things that we believe can be mutually beneficial -- better understandings. I know that some of the things that'll be discussed is the need for another GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] round of talks to see how we can improve that tariff arrangement. And I think very definitely we will be talking about terrorism and how we can, cooperatively, work closer together to rid the world of this menace, this plague.

The President. Well, I agree. And I've noticed -- if he's been quoted correctly -- I'll be looking forward to talking to him there about this. He has made it plain that if Italy is the victim of such terrorism, Italy will respond. So, we seem to have something in common there.

Q. Mr. President, we Japanese people are very, very honored and we look forward to welcoming you and other leaders to Tokyo for the summit. But actually, we are very much interested in your visiting Indonesia and meeting the ASEAN [Association of South East Asian Nations] leaders before coming to Tokyo. And we feel that it's going to be somewhat of a historic summit in the sense that you and Mr. Nakasone had talked about this summit quite recently. And Mr. Nakasone has said that he and you share the view that you two work together to send the message of bright future for the 21st century in the coming summit.

The President. Yes, I do, and will, because he and I have discussed this, and it is true. I think that the new frontier, the next frontier in the world is the Pacific Basin. And having been a Governor of a State that for 1,500 miles borders on that Pacific, I have long been interested in the development there. And now the ASEAN nations are, as far as our country is concerned, our fifth greatest trading partner. And they have made more gains in development than any of us. They're coming along faster in their economic growth than any other part of the world. So, I think it's most important that all of us should be looking there for how we can cooperate with them and be of help in their further development and so forth.

Q. Mr. President, for France, as you know, there would be President Mitterrand and the Prime Minister, Jacques Chirac. Will you consider the Prime Minister as an equal, as someone you can talk with, or will you just as before -- the other summit -- will you talk and speak with and negotiate with Mr. Mitterrand?

The President. I think that that is something to be decided by the French Government, that the manner in which they come and how they have arranged their own place in government will be accepted by the rest of us; and certainly we will cooperate with however they have chosen to do this. If it is separately or together or however, that is, we'll respect France's right to determine that.

Q. Mr. President, I think you expect me to talk about free trade today with this in front of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee. It looked this morning as though the Canada-U.S. free trade agreement was going to be defeated. And it's been postponed, I gather, until tomorrow morning, but still chancy. Some of us think this is historic, an example for the world in terms of trade and liberalizing trade. But I think many people have the impression that the White House has not been very -- it's not been a high priority for the White House. So, I'd like to ask, you know, how important is it to you? What are you willing to do, and what if this is defeated tomorrow?

The President. It is extremely important, and we have been -- I have been on that telephone a great deal. You know our governmental situation and our legislature and all. And I'll be very frank with you and tell you that I am concerned that the possibility -- well, that some of the negative votes are not aimed at Canada but are based on certain political differences here within our own country and our government. And I have been urging and will continue to do everything I can. This delay of the vote was a part of our struggle to see if we can't be successful. But do everything I can to see that we work this out, because here we are -- we are the greatest trading partners of each other in the world. And I think that this is all-important and that we should continue this and go forward with these negotiations that the Prime Minister and I have talked of. And I regret very much that there are some in-house differences that are threatening this arrangement.

The President. Again, as I say, I hate to dwell on one thing or another. We know that this is going to be discussed, and I want to see what we can all come together on. But there's no question about the seriousness of this, and there's no question about serious, open dedication to the use of terrorism. As a matter of fact, they have called it a war. And, granted, that they have aimed the war, according to Qadhafi's words, more specifically at us. But right now -- and one of the things that we knew before we took our action against them was that we have definite information on at least 35 planned terrorist actions. And they are particularly aimed at Americans, but they take place in all of the other countries. And, therefore, the violence is not going to be confined to just a target.

For example, we know that in France the expulsion of those Libyan diplomats was because we knew of an action that had been planned and even the weapons distributed. And what that was going to mean was that when people -- the only place where America was the target was the locale -- our Embassy. But outside the Embassy where the people line up to come in to get visas -- now, those won't be Americans, they don't need visas to come to America; so those would be citizens of France and other countries that would be there. And that action was simply to mow down with grenades and small arms fire these people -- men, women, and children that would be lined up there seeking visas. So, there isn't any one of us that is free from the threat. In the Rome and Vienna airport slaughters, which I think Mr. Qadhafi called a ``noble deed,'' well, there was only a minority of Americans there. They happened to be in front of American Airline ticket offices, but -- or ticket counters, but these were people of several other countries.

Q. Mr. President, concerning economic policy, the main issue of the Tokyo summit should be, perhaps -- the German economy grew faster than the American last year and is expected to be the fastest growing among the big industrial countries this year. So, do you have still any complaints about German economic policy?

The President. No. We're delighted to see this. We're pleased about our currencies coming more into line with each other. I think it is fair to say, and true to say, that in the economic recovery, which all of us were suffering -- or the economic decline, we seemed to take off first, and we were the first in bringing about the recovery and the expansion that we've had. But you really can't be prosperous unless all your trading partners are, too. And so, we're delighted to see now that the recovery has spread around to the other nations in the world and to our other trading partners. And I think it's all to the good. We're delighted.

The President. I don't think anyone can predict where it will come to, but I know the same thing has happened with the yen in comparison to our dollar. It, I believe, now is at the highest point it has ever been. But this makes for better trade for all of us.

The President. Well, I don't think I should be commenting on what someone might have said confidentially or not. But we're good friends. And, as I say, I think that we probably will find in Tokyo that we all are in more agreement than some of the impressions that have been given.

Q. Mr. President, we have produced a huge problem, the so-called Japan Problem, in a form of nearly $50 billion current account surplus, balance-of-payment surplus. And maybe there are some disagreements even among the Western allies -- I mean, between the United States and Europe about the efficacy of the policy, new policy which is now being propagated by Mr. Nakasone and his Cabinet. And what would you expect the Tokyo summit -- deal with this huge current balance-of-payment surplus problem, so-called Japan problem?

The President. I think we're all better off if we go forward with helping the lesser developed nations, and they're the debtor nations now. But the manner in which they should be able to pay their debts is to have, again, an increase in their economy and have them become more self-sustaining, self-sufficient. And I think that your Prime Minister and I are agreed on the need for the nations like those in the summit to help -- and not help just in the old way of hand-outs but to help them develop their economies so they can be more self-sufficient. And I think we're very much agreed on that. Now, the other part of your question, if I understood correctly, were you talking about the plan for Japan to become more an importing nation?

The President. Well, Japan has been in the forefront as a nation in, say, such help. And I think all our nations have tried to do this. And to the other problem about more of an importing nation, yes, I think this makes for, actually, better economics for your country as well to do this. Because as it is now, and probably as a result of some of your taxing policies, the incentive is more to saving than it is to consuming. Well, as the standard of living goes up and there is more consumption and more need to consume, then there's more industry both ways. And you have to remember that if that means Japan buying from outside and importing, but then that makes those they import from better able to buy in turn, and we all benefit.

Q. On this trade issues, you know, U.S.A. has started, since 2 or 3 months now, a kind of war against EC countries on trade issue. And I really wonder how you can be really optimistic on the trade issue in the Tokyo summit with this background between European Community and U.S.A.

The President. Well, the thing that we believe in and were trying to sell worldwide is the need for free trade and open markets. And free trade must be fair trade. If you're trading with a trading partner who has protective tariffs or limits and quotas and so forth -- that isn't free trade, because it isn't fair trade. And we had an experience -- the world did, as a matter of fact, due to us. Back in the thirties, the 1930's, in the Great Depression -- and some in our country here thought that a great protective tariff was the answer to our Depression. So, a thing called -- for the two authors of it -- the Smoot-Hawley tariff was put into effect. And it spread the Depression worldwide. And we never want to make that mistake again.

I'm opposed to protectionism. Now, it is true the European Community does practice some; for example, by Spain and Portugal's entry into the European Community. What happened there was under their rules. Their rules violate the GATT agreement, because those rules say that now Spain and Portugal must buy the agricultural products they have been buying from the United States, they must buy them from other members of the Community. Well, this is like taking $1 billion in trade away from our American farmers. And we feel there's got to be some compensation for this so that we can -- and the best way would be for us to all review, and that's what we keep trying to do at the economic summit -- to all review where we're restricting trade; at the same time that we want to sell, we don't want to buy.

And much of this -- we've made a number of bilateral agreements, we're working bilaterally with Japan on this. But I think -- I just -- my own feeling is that every bit of economic history shows that free and open commerce is beneficial to all. And when you get in trying to adjust it and restrict it with various agreements, that's when you get in trouble, because protectionism is a two-way street.

You may say, well, like I vetoed a bill that our Congress passed. And it was a bill that would have had some protectionism here in our country for two or three different products. And they were trying to say that, ``Well, this would mean more jobs in those industries for Americans.'' But nobody counts the jobs over here in the other industries that you lose when the other country retaliates. So, that's why I vetoed the bill; and they didn't override my veto. But this is what we need to talk about with the European Community, and we are going to be discussing with them.

Q. What do you hope to accomplish in Tokyo? And specifically, if you can't get a free trade agreement with Canada, how can you hope to have this kind of liberalization that you've just been talking about?

Q. Mr. President, by supporting you on the attack on Libya, Mrs. Thatcher has got herself into quite a lot of domestic political problems. In fact, one of the opposition has accused her of turning the British bulldog into a Reagan poodle. And I was wondering what you would have to say to her if you can help her in any way on that in Tokyo -- for example, by discussing the future, possible use of American bases in Britain?

The President. Oh, yes, you bet I'll be discussing it. But you know something? I have to tell you that I have never known of a time when the English bulldog is safer than it is with Margaret Thatcher where she is. And she is not allowing anyone -- anything in England to become an American poodle. I remember one of your countrymen said something and I have come to agree with it above all, and that was on my last trip there, when he very enthusiastically hit his fist in his hand and said to me, ``Margaret Thatcher is the greatest man in England.'' [Laughter] I don't mean that to offend the ladies. I think he was trying to be complimentary. But, no, I have the greatest respect for her. And I'm sorry that her very courageous action caused her the problems that it did. But at the same time that she has my sympathy, she also has my conviction that she is well able to take care of herself and her country.

Q. Mr. President, this morning's Wall Street Journal reported that you would like to encourage kind of a Marshall fund for the Middle East in Tokyo. Is that correct, and who should come up with the money in your opinion?

I don't know that we actually call it that, but in all the efforts to bring about peace in the Middle East, this idea that [Israeli] Prime Minister Peres broached to us of why don't we enlarge the circle. And why don't we bring in all the countries of the Middle East -- all the moderate Arab States themselves -- and look at the underlying problems there, economic and otherwise. And then say, wait a minute, instead of just sitting here in one room trying to bring a few countries together on a peace treaty, why don't we see how all together -- and they and with whatever outside help is needed from all the rest of us in Europe and here in the Western World and Japan -- how can we maybe bring about this same kind of thing we've been talking here about other parts of the world, of economic improvement, elimination of things that cause differences between various States, and enhancing the security of all, not just one or two. And I told our people -- I said this -- let us look at this and let us start talking to our friends and allies about what we can see together that might solve this. Because for too long a time the Middle East has been the touchpoint that could set off world conflicts.

Mr. Speakes.We've got a group of Congressmen that are cooling their heels out in the lobby. I hate to cut some of you short, but I don't think we've got an alternative but to go ahead and get your Congressmen in here. I'm sorry.

I understand we've got some students with us today. One of the joys of my Presidency has been getting to meet and know the young men and women who, in the not-too-distant future, will be America's champions of freedom and enterprise. And I don't have to tell you this new crop of young people filling the ranks of our businesses and corporations are as talented and diligent as any we've ever had. Today's young Americans will come into their own with freedom, know-how, and resources far beyond anything the world has ever known. Henry David Thoreau once wrote of free people: ``This world is but canvas to our imaginations.'' Those words were never more true than they are now. We've got every reason to look to the future with unbounding optimism. Today a refreshing breeze can be felt across the face of mankind. Winds of freedom are blowing, clearing the air, opening the view of a new and wondrous horizon.

In a few days, Nancy and I, as you've been told, will be heading west, embarking on a journey which will culminate in Tokyo with a summit of the major democracies. And as we liftoff aboard Air Force One, circling half the globe, the winds of freedom will be propelling my mission. Those winds are blowing in Latin America where, in recent years, we've witnessed one of the greatest expansions of democracy in history. Today 90 percent of the population of this hemisphere lives in democratic countries or countries in transition to democracy. In Europe the new, vigorous democracies in Spain and Portugal and the revitalized democratic process in Turkey have proven the pessimists wrong. The democratic workers' movement in Poland -- Solidarity -- those suffering repression still persists. In Nicaragua, Angola, Afghanistan, and Cambodia freedom fighters struggling for liberty and independence inspire the West with their courage in the face of a powerful enemy. As I fly westward over our majestic land, I go knowing that we're witnessing an awakening to those self-evident truths to which our forefathers pledged their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honor.

In future years, I think we may look back on the period we're going through as the vernal equinox of the human spirit -- that moment in history when the light finally exceeded the darkness. In the 1970's, the Western democracies suffered economic and political reversals which sapped their confidence and gutted the resilience of their social systems. The maladies to which I'm referring were the logical result of wrong ideas and flawed policies. The innovators, entrepreneurs, and profit-seeking risk-takers, who had always been on the cutting edge of change, were gradually being pushed out or phased out. The resources and decisionmaking of the West were being channeled into the hands of central planners, government officials, and bureaucratic managers.

In our country, government spending tripled in the 1970's and the Federal tax take doubled between 1976 and 1981. By 1980 we suffered double-digit inflation, economic stagnation, sky-high interest rates, and unprecedented national uncertainty. Nothing could be done, we were told, to escape this quagmire. Our citizens would have to lower their expectations. The American people never believed that guff, and I didn't either. Looking out over the United States today, I'm confident that our country's best days lie ahead. The winds of freedom are indeed blowing and, if America puts its mind to it, there's nothing we can't accomplish.

By bringing the growth of government under control, by easing the regulatory burden, by reducing the tax rates, giving people incentives and rewards to work, invest, and build, we've set America on a new upward course. Astounding the so-called experts, our economic engines have powered us forward with 40 straight months of growth. A record 669,000 businesses were incorporated last year alone. Interest rates are down; inflation has remained low. Over the last 3 months it has been minus 1.9 percent, the lowest in more than 30 years; and for the last 12 months it has been 2.3 percent. Almost 10 million new jobs have been created here in the last 3 years, while Europe has seen a net loss of jobs in the last decade.

The developing world has been told that it's necessary to give up freedom in order to achieve progress. Nothing could be further from the truth. Freedom and economic advance go hand in hand; they are two sides of the same coin. The mainspring of human progress is found not in controlling and harnessing human energy but in setting it free. The most valuable resource is not oil or precious metals or even territory; it's the infinite richness of human potential. The creative genius and diligence unleashed when people are free and working to improve their lot and that of their families is the greatest force for good on this planet.

The winds of freedom are nowhere more evident than on the Pacific rim, which of course includes my home State of California. Seriously though, after the Second World War, Japan was in ruins and devastation was heavy throughout the region. It is becoming difficult to think of the Pacific as being undeveloped, but only a generation ago that was a fair characterization. Pacific nations with almost no territory and few natural resources have become dynamic centers of commerce and production almost beyond imagination. Over the last 15 years, annual growth in the region has averaged about 6 percent. This was accomplished despite rising oil prices and at a time when some countries short on land to begin with were forced to absorb influxes of refugees.

The energy and enterprise on the Pacific rim is changing the economic center of gravity. The United States and our northern neighbor, Canada, now exchange more goods with Asia and the Pacific than with Europe. Almost one-third of total U.S. trade now flows west. Our trade enriches the quality of life on both sides of the Pacific, and while much attention has been focused on our imports from the region, we must not overlook our exports. Today we export $54 billion worth of American products annually to east Asia and the Pacific compared to $20 billion just 10 years ago. Again, the relationship between freedom and prosperity, between democratic government and economic progress, is clear.

We recently witnessed an upheaval in the Philippines. A major cause for discontent in the Philippines was that much of the country's business and trade was not open to all citizens. As a result, the Philippines lagged behind its Pacific neighbors. Today the Philippine people have new opportunities, economic and political. As their friends, we wish them the very best and will help where we can.

Of course, those countries forced to endure centralized Communist planning face the prospects of continued stagnation -- this while much of the Pacific marches into an exciting new age of enterprise and commerce. Vietnam, isolated from the dynamism of its Pacific neighbors by its continued occupation of Cambodia, is perhaps the best example of what I'm talking about.

On my upcoming trip, I'll stop in Indonesia, and there I will be discussing Cambodia, as well as other economic and security issues, with President Soeharto and with representatives of six nations which make up ASEAN, the Association of South East Asian Nations. Most important, through my trip I'll be reconfirming that the United States considers itself a Pacific rim country, and we will continue to be an important part of the economic and political forces that shape the future of this vital area of the world. If the next century is the Pacific century, as some have suggested, America will be leading the way.

From Indonesia, I will head to Japan, the site of the 12th economic summit. That this meeting is in Tokyo reminds us again of an emerging Japan. Over these last few decades, this former enemy has become a trusted friend, a major political and economic partner, and a strategic ally -- the pillar of our Pacific policy. Prime Minister Nakasone of Japan is moving his country toward a new and expanded international role. Together our countries exercise enormous political and economic influence on the world. I think that all our peoples can be proud that we're using our power for benevolent ends: to secure democracy, to foster economic progress, and to maintain peace in a dangerous world.

Japan's is a dramatic story of democracy's success. That it has been built into the world's second largest market economy and is now taking on greater international responsibilities bodes well for the future. The winds of freedom blow both east and west. Man's desire to improve his lot, his longing for freedom, and his yearning to live in dignity and peace are never limited by geography. These universals tie all free peoples, and those who would be free, together.

Our annual economic summit stands in glorious defiance of the totalitarian theory that sovereign, democratic societies are too independent, too bogged down by shortsighted self-interest to be able to cooperate on matters of significance, especially matters concerning money and finances. Well, the issues may vary, but if there are two watchwords of our economic summits, those words are ``freedom'' and ``cooperation.'' Each year's gathering is an opportunity to renew acquaintances, to take stock of economic prospects, and to discuss frankly and openly issues of common interest. And this year there is much to discuss.

The continuing upward momentum of the American economy has been a major impetus to growth in the rest of the world, in both summit and nonsummit countries. Now, we urge others to join us in tackling those domestic policies and structural problems that inhibit growth and serve only as roadblocks to progress. High tax rates, overregulation, are like a ball and chain holding too many nations back. The substantial decline in world oil prices offers the industrial democracies, as well as the developing world, a dramatic opportunity. We hope our summit partners will translate the benefits of lower oil prices into stronger growth and higher employment. Now is the time to accelerate the pace of structural change and pave the way for higher sustained growth in future years. These economic summits, with the denouement of the shock waves that went through the world economy after the oil price hikes of the early 1970's -- an oil cartel artificially jacked the price of petroleum far beyond its true market value. Today's implosion of that cartel is evidence that, in the long run, the market works.

As the United States has demonstrated, strong, growing economies in the major industrial countries will do much to help those in the developing world. Succinctly put: Our policies toward the Third World should be aimed at establishing partners in trade, not recipients of aid. Our approach should be to keep open our markets, not to empty our Treasury.

Last October, Secretary [of the Treasury] Baker proposed, as I'm sure he will further explain in his remarks, a program for sustained growth intended as a declaration of independence for debtor nations. Its purpose is to move them toward self-sufficiency, to assist them in developing free market, progrowth policies and to help them climb out of the pit of indebtedness and up to the level plateau of competitive enterprise and productivity. Well, the debt initiative that's proposed by Secretary Baker, which we'll discuss in Tokyo, is focused not just on postponing a day of reckoning but on solving a problem. It has the strong support of the international community. Our legacy must not be to engender dependence among debtor countries, but provide the incentives, the tools, and the opportunity for them to work, produce, and grow their way to self-sufficiency.

We want all people in every country to live healthier, more productive, opportunity-filled lives. Free and unfettered trade between nations is a vital part of the formula for achieving this goal. We're ready and willing to work with those with whom we have commerce to maximize the benefits of a worldwide, open trading system. Keeping trade fair and open will be a major topic of discussion in Tokyo. Our summit partners have already helped start up the preparatory process for a new round of multilateral trade negotiations. And we hope they'll continue their efforts to ensure that those negotiations are launched this September.

As an economics major, I was taught the law of comparative advantage. And it ought to govern the exchange of goods and services across the national boundaries. If our farmers in California can grow larger and cheaper oranges than their counterparts in Japan, the housewife in Osaka ought to be able to buy those oranges without additional cost. At home, our citizens should have the same right. Protectionist moves basically profit special interests at the expense of the consumer and at the risk of retaliation -- costing Americans their jobs.

Now, admittedly, the strong dollar has been a legitimate concern of those of you trying to sell overseas. The value of the dollar is in the process of adjusting as the economies in other nations improve. And now is not the time to surrender to trade-killing protectionism. The trade imbalance should be solved through multilateral negotiation that open markets, not unilateral legislation that closes them. The right answer is not decreasing imports but increasing our exports. I'll resist any attempt to restrict or close our markets. It would cost Americans jobs. It's bad for the consumer, bad for business, and it's bad for America. I'm old enough to remember the Smoot-Hawley Tariff Act, which helped spread the Depression worldwide, and I'm not about to let that happen. And on the other hand, I can assure you I'm not about to let this good and great country be taken advantage of. Our trading partners have been sent the message, and I'll reinforce it in Tokyo, that the United States is moving forward aggressively and vigorously to keep the markets of the world open and to see to it that American interests are treated fairly.

In Tokyo we'll primarily be discussing issues of economic importance. Yet all of us meeting there are fully aware of how totally dependent economic progress is on maintaining a peaceful and stable world. Those who will gather in Tokyo represent countries which, by working together, have given the world 41 years of peace in Europe -- ushering in the greatest strides in science and industry in the history of mankind.

The United States, in pursuit of peace, is working in close consultation with its partners, seeking a more stable and constructive relationship with the Soviet Union. In Tokyo we'll discuss arms reduction and other initiatives connected with my meetings with General Secretary Gorbachev last November. During those meetings General Secretary Gorbachev and I talked together about the differences between our systems. I challenged him to compete with us -- not in the manufacture of bombs and weapons, but in the arena of ideas. We can and should have peaceful competition between our systems. We should let the world decide, based not on the size of our arsenals, but on the attractiveness of our ways of life. Let us be measured by our results, not our rhetoric; our deeds, not our words. Now, whether the General Secretary takes me up on my challenge remains to be determined. In the meantime, preserving peace is not just the business of the United States or of the United States and the Soviet Union. Our summit partners each share this responsibility.

One area of exemplary cooperation has been our mutual efforts to combat international drug trafficking, which undermines the respect for law and attacks the fundamental health of our nations. The threat is particularly grave to our youth. Nancy has taken on the war against drugs as a personal mission, and she's made me very proud. While I'm in Tokyo she will be carrying her message to Malaysia and Thailand, where she'll join in a comprehensive review of the antidrug efforts of those two important nations.

Coming to grips with threats posed by such evils as drugs will require all free people to work together. The democratic nations decided long ago they would stand shoulder to shoulder in such fights. Nowhere is this more imperative than in the battle against terrorism. These vicious, cowardly acts will, if we let them, erect a wall of fear around nations and neighborhoods. It will dampen the joy of travel, the flow of trade, the exchange of ideas. In short, terrorism undeterred will deflect the winds of freedom.

And let no one mistake this for a conflict between the Western democracies and the Arab world. Those who condone making war by cowardly attacks on unarmed third parties, including women and children, are but a tiny minority. Arab nations themselves have been forced to endure savage terrorist attacks from this minority. We hope and pray the Arab world will join with us to eliminate this scourge on civilization. I might add that Colonel Qadhafi's expectation of unquestioned support from the Islamic world strikes me as hypocritical. Nowhere is the slaughter of Moslem people greater than in Afghanistan, and yet Colonel Qadhafi allies himself with those perpetrating this crime on Islam and all of mankind.

Decent people can no longer tolerate cowardly terrorist attacks. Government-sponsored terrorism, in particular, cannot continue without gravely threatening the social fabric of all free societies. Unilateral response is not enough; it must be dealt with forcefully and collectively. And this, undoubtedly, will be a topic of discussion in Tokyo.

James Russell Lowell, in a poem entitled ``The Present Crisis,'' and later made into a familiar hymn, wrote: ``Once to every man and nation comes the moment to decide, in the strife of Truth with Falsehood, for the good or evil side.'' Well, over the past few months, we've had to make some tough decisions. But in the end, the decision was made for us, when a despot -- despite our political, economic, and diplomatic attempts to change his ways -- continued his murderous attacks on our fellow citizens. Well, America will never watch passively as our innocent citizens are murdered by those who would do our country harm. We're slow to wrath and hesitant to use the military power available to us. By nature we prefer to solve problems peacefully. But as we proved last week, no one can kill Americans and brag about it -- no one. We bear the people of Libya no ill will, but if their government continues its campaign of terror against Americans, we will act again.

Well, all of us stand united, hand in hand, with the Klug family and the others who've suffered. We're all part of the same family. As your President, I promise you that we as a people will have the courage and the honor to do what is right. This is and will remain the land of the free and the home of the brave. The winds of freedom will be preserved, not just for our citizens but for all mankind.

And in Tokyo, I'll remind our allies of the truth of what Edmund Burke said long ago: ``When bad men combine, the good must associate; else they will fall, one by one.'' Well, together the free people of this world will ensure that liberty not only survives but triumphs and that our sons and daughters, too, will know the blessings of the winds of freedom.

The President today announced his intention to appoint the following to be Representatives of the United States of America on the Joint Commission on the Environment established by the Panama Canal Treaty of 1977. These are reappointments.

Have your health and have everything. That saying has special meaning for the elderly. Good health and fitness allow all of us, no matter what our age, the freedom and independence to choose how and where we live and to stay involved with our families and friends. Health and fitness enable us to take an active part in community life and to pursue our goals, whether they involve a career, hobbies, volunteer activities, travel, creative pursuits, or home life.

Good health is good common sense, but it is not enough to know this, we have to act accordingly. How we live can make all the difference. Proper diet, regular exercise, moderation in drinking, and avoidance of drugs and tobacco become even more important as we grow older. And life spans can be made longer and more pleasant by regular medical check-ups, sufficient rest, and continuing involvement in satisfying personal relationships and wholesome pursuits that keep the mind active.

Besides what the individual can do for himself, some older Americans still need the help of others to remain independent and in their own homes. Some need assistance with personal and housekeeping activities; others need attention, love, and encouragement. Families, friends, community groups, and the whole range of private and government providers of special services can do so much to help those older people who truly need assistance.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The President announced today a major program of economic and military support for the Philippines. This program is based on an assessment of Philippine economic and military needs by a U.S. assistance team headed by the Agency for International Development Administrator M. Peter McPherson and including senior Treasury, State, and Defense Department officials, which has recently concluded a visit to the Philippines. During their stay in Manila, the delegation members met with President Aquino and conducted extensive discussions with senior economic and military officials of the Aquino government. The purpose of these discussions was to assess how the U.S. Government might be helpful in supporting the new government in its efforts to address Philippine economic and military problems.

The Philippine economy faces a number of severe problems which, if they are to be resolved, will require a sustained effort by the Philippine people and government and the support of the international financial community. This effort will involve both people-to-people programs designed to meet the immediate needs of the poorest segments of the population and policy changes that will lay the basis for lasting job creation and growth. With respect to policy changes, the Philippine economic officials outlined the sound, market-oriented economic policies, both macroeconomic and structural, which the government intends to pursue in order to restore sustainable, job-creating, and noninflationary growth in the Philippine economy. The U.S. team welcomed these policy directions and noted that in recent weeks confidence in the financial community regarding Philippine economic policies and prospects had increased. The U.S. team shared that increased confidence.

In response to this new and promising economic situation, the U.S. Government intends to support the efforts of the Philippine Government to meet its pressing financial needs through bilateral assistance programs, trade and investment policies, and participation in the multilateral financial institutions.

This funding, which totals about $500 million, will all be on a grant basis except the P.L. 480, title I, which is on a highly concessionary loan basis. Thus our assistance will provide economic support without adding appreciably to the large external debt burden inherited by the Aquino government.

In addition the United States is developing, on an urgent basis, a substantial increase in people-to-people assistance, such as school and child feeding, food for work, and health programs to reduce infant and child mortality. These programs are generally administered by private voluntary and church organizations. We also expect to work closely with the Peace Corps program in the Philippines. One target for this expanded effort is the severely depressed sugar-producing region on Negros Island. The increased funding for these programs will come from P.L. 480, title II, and section 416, and will approximately double the currently programmed level of $7.7 million.

Finally, the U.S. assistance program will seek, to the extent feasible, to give direct support to private sector development, utilizing various funding sources including new authorities for the P.L. 480 title program contained in provision 1111 of the Food Security Act of 1985.

Textiles -- Philippine textiles exports totaled $431 million in 1985 under the existing bilateral agreement that expires at the end of this year. We will approach the forthcoming negotiations for a new agreement with a view to assuring continuing reasonable growth of textile exports during the critical period of Philippine economic recovery ahead.

Eximbank -- All Eximbank programs are available to support Philippine imports from U.S. suppliers. Short-term financing for recent shipments amounts to $90 million. Support for $230 million remains available, and this is expected to meet current Philippine needs.

OPIC -- The Overseas Private Investment Corporation is prepared to expand its insurance and guarantee programs in the Philippines as new investment projects develop. It also has available direct-lending resources, particularly for joint ventures engaged in by small- and medium-size companies. We will be discussing with the Philippine Government and the U.S. private sector the possibility of an OPIC investment mission before the end of the year.

Department Of Commerce -- The U.S. Department of Commerce is in touch with the Philippine Government regarding resumption of trade and investment missions to the Philippines and a series of Philippine trade/investment seminars to be held in the U.S.

The Philippine Government has expressed strong interest in exploring the possibilities of taking advantage of the Program for Sustained Growth, the initiative taken last fall by Secretary of the Treasury Baker to strengthen the international debt strategy and support sustained growth in middleincome debtor countries.

The U.S. economic team welcomed the Philippine Government's interest in the Baker plan and expressed the view that the broad policy directions of the Philippine authorities should position it well to take advantage of the opportunities provided in the Baker plan to achieve sustained economic growth.

The Philippine Government has also expressed its interest in an early meeting with other bilateral, as well as multilateral, donors in order to mobilize their support for Philippine economic recovery. The U.S. agrees to participate in such a meeting and will work actively to assist the Government of the Philippines in arranging an early meeting.

The Aquino government has clearly demonstrated the intention to carry out needed economic and military reforms. President Aquino has also promised that a constitutional commission will draft a new constitution to be submitted to the people for ratification and that there will be elections for local officials and members of the legislature under the new constitution. The economic and military assistance contained in their package will serve as an important manifestation of support from the American people to the Philippine people as they face the very difficult challenges ahead.

On February 26, I spoke to the American people of my highest duty as President -- to preserve peace and defend the United States. I outlined the objectives on which our defense program has rested. We have been firmly committed to rebuilding America's strength, to meeting new challenges to our security, and to reducing the danger of nuclear war. We have also been dedicated to pursuing and implementing defense reforms wherever necessary for greater efficiency or military effectiveness.

Extensive study by the Armed Services Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives has produced numerous proposals for far-reaching changes in the structure of the Department of Defense, including the organization of our senior military leadership. These proposals, sponsored by members with wide knowledge and experience in defense matters, are now pending before the Congress.

In addition, a few weeks ago I endorsed the recommendations of the bipartisan President's Blue Ribbon Commission on Defense Management, chaired by David Packard, for improving overall defense management including the crucial areas of national security planning, organization, and command.

For more effective direction of our national security establishment and better coordination of our armed forces, I consider some of these proposals to be highly desirable, and I have recently taken the administrative steps necessary to implement these improvements. In this message, I wish to focus on the essential legislative steps that the Congress must take for these improvements to be fully implemented.

Together, the work of the Packard Commission and the Congress represents certainly the most comprehensive review of the Department of Defense in over a generation. Their work has been the focus of an historic effort to help chart the course we should follow now and into a new century. While we will continue to refine and improve our defense establishment in the future, it will be many years before changes of this scope are again considered. Given these unique circumstances, I concluded that my views as President and Commander in Chief should be laid before the Congress prior to the completion of legislative action.

In forwarding this message, I am cognizant of the important role of the Congress in providing for our national defense. We must work together in this endeavor. However, any changes in statute must not infringe on the constitutionally protected responsibilities of the President as Commander in Chief. Any legislation in which the issues of Legislative and Executive responsibilities are confused would be constitutionally suspect and would not meet with my approval.

My views concerning legislation on defense reorganization now pending in the House and Senate reflect a reasoned and open-minded approach to the issues, while maintaining a close watch on the constitutional responsibilities and prerogatives of the Presidency. While I had considered forwarding a separate bill to the Congress, I concluded that this was not necessary since many of the legislative recommendations of the Packard Commission are already pending in one or more bills. However, additional changes in law are also proposed in those other bills, and such changes must be carefully weighed.

Certain changes in the law are necessary to accomplish the objectives we seek. Among these are the designation of the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff as the principal military adviser to the President, the Secretary of Defense, and the National Security Council, and the Chairman's exclusive control over the Joint Staff; the creation of a new Vice Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff; and the creation of a new Level II position of Under Secretary of Defense for Acquisition.

Other proposed changes in law are, in my judgment, not required. It is not necessary to place in law those aspects of defense organization that can be accomplished through executive action. Nevertheless, if such changes are recommended by the Congress, I will carefully consider them, provided they are consistent with current policy and practice and do not infringe upon the authority or reduce the flexibility of the President or the Secretary of Defense.

The organization of our present-day defense establishment reflects a series of important reforms following World War II. These reforms were based upon the harsh lessons of global war and were hastened by the new military responsibilities and threats facing our Nation. They culminated in 1958 with the reorganization of the Department of Defense under President Eisenhower.

President Eisenhower's experience of high military command has few parallels among Presidents since George Washington. The basic structure for defense that he laid down in 1958 has served the Nation well for over 25 years. The principles that governed his reorganization proposals are few but fundamental. They are of undiminished importance today.

As civilian head of the Department, the Secretary of Defense must have the necessary latitude to shape operational commands, to establish clear command channels, to organize his Office and Department of Defense agencies, and to oversee the administrative, training, logistics, and other functions of the military departments.

Unified effort is not only a prerequisite for successful command of military operations during wartime, today, it is also indispensable for strategic planning and for the effective direction of our defense program in peacetime. The organization of our senior military leadership must facilitate this unified effort. The highest quality military advice must be available to the President and the Secretary of Defense on a continuing basis. This must include a clear, single, integrated military point of view. Yet, at the same time, it must not exclude well-reasoned alternatives.

President Eisenhower observed a revolution taking place in the techniques of warfare. Advancing technology, and the need to maintain a vital deterrent, continually test our ability to introduce new weapons into our armed forces efficiently and economically. It is increasingly critical that our forces be able to respond in a timely way to a wide variety of potential situations. These range across a spectrum from full mobilization and deployment in case of general war, to the discriminating use of force in special operations. To respond successfully to these changing circumstances and requirements, our defense organization must be highly adaptable.

Where the roles and responsibilities of each component of our defense establishment are necessarily placed in law, they must be clear and unambiguous, but not so constrained or detailed as to impair operational flexibility or the common sense of those in positions of responsibility. Laws must not be written in response to the strengths and weaknesses of individuals who now serve. Instead, they should establish sound, fundamental relationships among and between civilian and military authorities, relationships that reflect the proper balance between our traditions and heritage and the practical considerations unique to military matters.

I noted earlier that President Eisenhower brought to his Presidency a unique perspective and unprecedented military experience. Few Presidents have come into this office as well prepared as he to assume the responsibilities of Commander in Chief. This fact places a heavy burden on our defense establishment and requires the continued development of key institutions and relationships that constitute the framework of our current organization.

It has been my experience that within this framework there is a special relationship between the President, the Secretary of Defense, and the Combatant Commanders. In providing for the timely and effective use of the armed forces in support of our foreign policy, our entire defense establishment is focused on supporting this special relationship and making it as effective as possible. All other aspects of our defense organization must be subordinate to this purpose.

The Secretary of Defense. In particular, the law places broad authority and heavy responsibilities on the Secretary of Defense. The Secretary, in his responsibility as head of the defense establishment and in executing the directives of the Commander in Chief, embodies the concept of civilian control. No one but the President of the United States and the Secretary of Defense is empowered with command authority over the armed forces. In managing the Department of Defense the Secretary must retain the authority and flexibility necessary to fulfill these broad responsibilities.

The Combatant Commanders. The Unified and Specified Commanders are the individuals in whom the American people and our defense establishment place warfighting responsibilities. The Secretary and I consult the Combatant Commanders for their joint and operational points of view in determining how our military forces should be used and in determining our military requirements for important geographic and functional areas. Their successes in any future conflict would depend in large measure on how well we plan for their needs in today's defense budgets.

With this in mind, the Secretary initiated regular meetings with the Combatant Commanders and has provided them greater access to the Department's internal budget process. In addition, I am implementing the recommendations of the Packard Commission to improve the channel of communications between the President, the Secretary, and the Combatant Commanders; to provide broader authority to those Commanders to structure their subordinate commands; to provide options in the organizational structure of Combatant Commands for the shortest possible chains of command consistent with proper supervision and support; and to provide for flexibility where issues or situations overlap the current geographical boundaries of the Combatant Commands.

The Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. In the relationship between the President, the Secretary of Defense, and the Combatant Commanders, there is a special role for the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. The Chairman ranks above all other officers and devotes all of his time to joint issues. I deal with him or his representative on a regular basis and he serves as the primary contact for the Secretary and me on operational military matters. As a matter of practice, the Chairman also functions within the chain of command by transmitting to the Combatant Commanders those orders I give to the Secretary. Under the directive I recently signed to implement the recommendations of the Packard Commission, this practice will be broadened and strengthened.

While recognizing and providing for the special role of the Chairman in the law, the basic structure of the Joint Chiefs of Staff should be retained. The advantages and disadvantages of the current system, in which the Chiefs of the Services provide advice concerning both their military Service and joint issues, have been debated for many years and are well known. I believe that certain disadvantages will be remedied by a stronger Chairman without sacrificing the advantages of the current system. I find that the Chiefs of the Services are highly knowledgeable regarding particular military capabilities. And, just as important, joint military perspectives on both resource allocation and operations, developed under the Chairman's leadership, must be upheld and supported at the highest levels of the Military Departments.

In our efforts to strengthen the ability of the Chairman and the Joint Chiefs of Staff to be responsive to the civilian leadership, we must also make certain that the military establishment does not become embroiled in political matters. The role of the Chairman and other members of the Joint Chiefs of Staff is strictly advisory in nature and, with the armed forces as a whole, they serve the American people with great fidelity and dedication. In my view, changes in the tenure of the Chairman or other senior officers that are tied to the civilian electoral process would endanger this heritage. I oppose any bill whose provisions would have the effect of politicizing the military establishment.

The Packard Commission has pointed out what we all know to be true: that our historic ups and downs in defense spending have cost us dearly over the long term. For many years there has been chronic instability in both top-line funding and individual programs. This has eliminated key economies of scale, stretched out programs, and discouraged defense contractors from making long-term investments required to improve productivity. To end this costly cycle we must find ways to provide the stability that will allow the genius of American ingenuity and productivity to flourish.

We also know that Federal law governing procurement has become overwhelmingly complex. Each new statute adopted by the Congress has spawned more administrative regulation. As laws and regulations have proliferated, defense acquisition has become ever more bureaucratic and encumbered by overstaffed and unproductive layers of management. We must both add and subtract from the body of law that governs Federal procurement, cutting through red tape and replacing it with sound business practices, innovation, and plain common sense.

The procurement reforms I have begun within the Executive branch cannot reach their full potential without the support of the Congress. We must work together in this critical period, where so many agree that our approach to defense procurement in both the Executive and Legislative branches is in need of repair. However, in moving forward to implement needed reforms, I urge the Congress to show restraint in the use of more legislation as a solution to our current problems.

The Commission identified the need for a full-time defense acquisition executive with a solid industrial background. This executive would set overall policy for procurement and research and development, supervise the performance of the entire acquisition system, and establish policy for the oversight of defense contractors. I concur with this recommendation.

If citizens from the private sector who participate in the conduct of government are unfairly prohibited from returning to their livelihood, it will not be just their willingness to serve that will suffer. The Nation will suffer as well. I will later report to the Congress on steps I am taking or that I propose the Congress take in these areas. And I will also review and report on the accountability of the defense industry to the Department of Defense, and to the American people. This review will address the ethics of the industry, the Department of Defense's oversight responsibility, and the role of the Department's Inspector General. I urge the Congress not to act in these important areas until it has had an opportunity to review my report.

While the Department of Defense and Executive branch are focused on implementing the details of these reforms, I urge the Congress to focus its attention on the structural and procedural reforms that are also essential for the stability we seek.

Two-year defense budgets are an essential step toward stability. I urge the Congress to develop internal procedures for the authorization and appropriation of defense budgets on a biennial basis, beginning with the FY 1988 budget. My FY 1988 defense budget will be structured with this in mind.

The Congress should encourage the use of multiyear procurement where appropriate on a significantly broader scale. Multiyear procurement is a strong force for stability and efficiency. We have already saved billions of dollars through multiyear procurement and have never broken a contract or suffered a single loss to date. We want to continue and expand our efforts in this important area.

Milestone funding of research and development programs is also a form of multiyear contracting. I will work with the Congress to select appropriate programs to be base-lined in cost over a multiyear period so that these programs can be funded in an orderly and stable fashion. If we know what we want to accomplish, we can set a proper ceiling on costs and manage our program within those costs. I urge the Congress to support milestone funding and the base-lining concept of placing a ceiling on research and development costs.

Finally, there are some forty different committees or subcommittees that claim jurisdiction over some aspect of the defense program. This fragmented oversight process is a source of confusion, and it impedes the cooperation between the Congress and the Executive branch so necessary to effective defense management. I urge the Congress to return to a more orderly process involving only a few key committees to oversee the defense program. Only with such reform can we achieve the full benefits of those changes now underway within the Department of Defense.

The Packard Commission has charted a three-part course for improving our Nation's defense establishment. I have already directed implementation of its recommendations where that can be accomplished through Executive action. In this message, I ask that the Congress enact certain changes in law that will further improve the organization and operation of the Department of Defense. Now, the remaining requirement for reform lies within the Congress itself.

I began this message by emphasizing the important role of Congress in our defense establishment. In the organizational changes we now address, the Congress should be commended for fulfilling its broad responsibility to make laws to organize and govern the armed forces. However, with respect to the changes we must consider in the areas of budget, resource allocation, and procurement, the future is much less certain. To establish the stability essential for the successful and efficient management of our defense program, the Congress must be more firmly committed to its constitutional obligations to raise and support the armed forces.

Within the limits of my authority as President, I will continue to improve and refine the national security apparatus within the Executive branch. And I will support any further changes in procedures, regulations, or statutes that would improve the long-term stability, effectiveness, and efficiency of our defense effort.

In having fully committed ourselves to implementing the Packard Commission's recommendations, this Administration has overcome the difficult bureaucratic terrain that has stood in the path of previous efforts. Now, we face a broad ocean of necessary congressional reforms in which the currents of politics and jurisdiction are equally treacherous. We must not stop at the water's edge.

Only meaningful congressional reform can complete our efforts to strengthen the defense establishment and develop a rational and stable budget process -- a process that provides effectively and efficiently for America's security over the long haul.

The pleasure that comes from reading is usually the magnet that draws people to practice and improve their reading skills. And the wide distribution of these skills not only enriches those who possess them but is a pillar of strength for a self-governing Nation. Yet many of America's 66 million people under the age of 18 need encouragement and direction to improve their reading skills to the point where they can become functionally literate and properly informed adults. Illiteracy and limited literacy cause much pain, frustration, and humiliation. And because their victims cannot reach their full productive potential, the economy is billions of dollars the poorer.

Traditionally, Americans have recognized problems in society and worked at applying practical solutions. Over the past two decades, dedicated volunteer efforts have enabled millions of children to discover the joy of reading. Through a variety of imaginative programs, thousands of children have been given the motivation and the practical help they need to unlock the treasure house of the printed page. Doors have been opened to richer lives. Currently, more than 100,000 volunteers are giving of their time and talents to open these doors of opportunity to young people who long to experience the joy of reading. But there is a need for still more volunteers who wish to help others and experience the deep satisfaction of knowing they have transformed the lives of others and set them on the path to discovery, understanding, and delight. Yes, for those who can read, reading is fun.

Q. What do you think will be the impact of the Aquino revolution in the Philippines on the other countries in Asia? Do you think it will have a democratizing effect on the other Asian countries? If so, are you going to seize the opportunity to speed up the process of democracy in some of these countries?

The President. The U.S. has a fundamental commitment to the preservation of a stable environment conducive to continuing economic, political, and social progress in east Asia. We support the evolution of political processes that bolster popular participation and representative government, but we believe that Asian nations are the masters of their own fate. They must work out solutions to problems on their own according to their own particular, and often unique, circumstances. That is what happened in the Philippines.

Q. With the collapse of oil prices, Indonesia is facing a difficult economic situation. Exports to the United States, its second largest trade partner, are expected to decline this year, so will U.S. direct investment, especially in the oil sector. The Gramm-Rudman-Hollings act will further cut U.S. aid and concessional loans. Meanwhile, Indonesia's effort to increase its non-oil exports to the United States have met with increasing protectionist measures. Are you not worried that increasing economic difficulties might stir the revival of radical nationalism within Indonesia?

The President. United States trade with Indonesia last year amounted to $5.7 billion. As Indonesia's second largest trading partner, the U.S. accounts for 20 percent of its total exports. Indonesia enjoyed a trade surplus with the United States of over $4 billion last year. Petroleum products dominate our bilateral trade, with the U.S. importing $3 billion worth. Because of the high profile of oil exports in the trade between our two countries, the drop in oil prices will likely have a large impact over the short term on our bilateral trade. Indonesia's non-oil exports to the U.S. include rubber, coffee, plywood, textiles, and other products. Textiles represent Indonesia's largest and most rapidly growing manufactured export. The Government of Indonesia has compiled an admirable record of managing well unforeseen economic challenges over the past several years. Economic growth has been high. Indonesia has become self-sufficient in rice production. Despite the current difficulties, I am confident that Indonesian policymakers will handle the present economic challenge as well as they have handled past ones. We believe that the medium and longer term outlook for the Indonesian economy remains very favorable.

The President. Indonesia has requested a small number of F - 16 aircraft in order to remain current with present technology in the field of air defense, a basic requirement for a country with a territory as large as Indonesia's. Indonesian military leaders have said they want their pilots to acquire the technological skills needed for an effective air force through the end of the century. Singapore and Thailand are also acquiring the F - 16. While there will be a financial burden associated with acquiring these few advanced aircraft, the Government of Indonesia has stated that the cost is necessary for its basic defense requirements and to maintain skills associated with a modern air force.

Q. Is the United States considering a Caribbean Basin Initiative-type policy to foster economic and trade development in the ASEAN-South Pacific region? Specifically, are you going to promote a multilateral or bilateral development aid package for the Philippines?

The President. Generally speaking, the nations of ASEAN are blessed with more prosperous and broadly based economies than those in the Caribbean Basin. The Caribbean Basin Initiative, or CBI, was intended to address the specific and severe economic problems which affect that region, including inadequate flows of private investment capital and the vulnerability that comes with reliance on the export of a single commodity. In contrast, the ASEAN countries, taken together, already constitute our fifth largest trading partner. And U.S. investors have a stake in the region exceeding $10 billion. We are trying to support the economic development of this region by working with the ASEAN governments to maintain a free and fair international trading system for the benefit of all trading nations. The cornerstone of this work is our effort to begin a new round of multilateral trade negotiations in the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT). We are also continuing our efforts to discourage the enactment of protectionist legislation by our own Congress and to persuade the Japanese and other nations to open their markets to our goods and those of other exporting countries.

Resolving the severe economic problems of the Philippines will require a sustained effort by the Philippine Government and people, supported by the international financial community, both public and private. We note that in recent weeks the financial community's confidence in the Philippine economy has increased, and we share that increased confidence. We have been discussing Philippine assistance needs and priorities with President Aquino's government and with major bilateral and multilateral donors. Based on these discussions, we are proposing a significant assistance program for the Philippines which would help to meet the country's immediate financial needs, support economic reforms, encourage private investment, and respond to the urgent requirements of the Philippine Armed Forces. However, we agree with President Aquino's advisers that a multilateral framework is necessary to support Philippine economic recovery. In this connection, we have agreed to participate in a World Bank-sponsored meeting which will help to coordinate donor efforts for the Philippines and will focus on Philippine economic problems and prospects for recovery.

The President. Some observers have advocated a return to the gold standard in order to bring ``discipline'' to nations monetary policies and, thereby stability to exchange rates. Prior to the adoption of the Bretton Woods regime after World War II, the major nations of the world were intermittently on the gold standard. The discipline required by adherence to the gold standard resulted in alternating and unpredictable periods of severe inflation and deflation. It was to avoid such episodes that most countries abandoned the gold standard in just those times when it would have disciplined their policies. Within the International Monetary Fund, we are working on ways to improve the functioning of the international financial system. Also, I have asked Secretary of the Treasury James A. Baker III to report back to me on whether the nations of the world would convene to discuss the role and relationships of our currencies.

The President. Preparations for the launching of a new round of trade negotiations in the GATT have been the focus of our efforts since last November and will continue to be one of our primary concerns on our trade agenda for some time to come. We are also engaged in discussions with Canada on the possibility of a free trade area. However, my administration is committed to a continuing dialog with the ASEAN countries on economic and trade issues and to strengthening trade with ASEAN.

Q. There is some grumbling in the ASEAN States that, although you and your administration often talk of how important ASEAN is, you don't always back up those words. For instance, Mr. Lee Kuan Yew recently accused the U.S. of overlooking ASEAN's economic interests, citing these examples: U.S. releases from its own tin stockpile; its threatening to withdraw tariff preferences from some countries; its insistence on renegotiating international textile agreements on terms that are tougher for ASEAN countries; and its withholding of support for an international program for maintaining rubber prices. Would you agree that the U.S. does overlook ASEAN's interests? And how would you respond to them when you meet the ASEAN foreign ministers in Bali?

The President. In fact, support for and cooperation with ASEAN remains the foundation of U.S. policy in Southeast Asia. Our relations with the ASEAN nations are based on our common dedication to the basic principles of freedom and independence and our shared recognition of the importance of free markets. My visit to Indonesia is intended to reaffirm the importance the United States places on our cooperation with ASEAN. I believe this is particularly important at a time when the ASEAN economies, and particularly that of Singapore, are experiencing slower growth or even contraction.

On balance, my efforts over the past few years to maintain a free and open international trading system have served the interests of both the United States and ASEAN well, despite the pressure of different and competing interests. The ASEAN countries, together, have become our fifth largest trading partner, and one with which we experienced a total trade deficit of over $7.7 billion last year, up from $2.3 billion in 1982. My administration remains committed to resist protectionist trade measures and to pursue efforts to liberalize further the international trading system, to benefit all trading nations. Our efforts in this regard are concentrated at the moment on the need to begin a new round of multilateral trade negotiations in the GATT. We have assured the ASEAN governments that we believe the new GATT round should address their key issues, as well as the new issues we have raised in Geneva, such as trade in services.

We have gone to some lengths to ensure that the release of tin from our strategic stockpile was managed so as to avoid disruption to the world tin market. In fact, the U.S. General Services Administration suspended its release of tin last October at the onset of the latest tin market crisis, to avoid exacerbating the situation. The tin producers in ASEAN appear generally satisfied with the way in which we have managed tin disposals during the collapse of the international tin market.

With respect to tariff preferences, the executive branch is obliged to carry out the legal provisions of our Generalized System of Preferences as enacted in the 1984 Trade Act. This will require that Brunei, which has not utilized the GSP, be graduated from the program by 1988 because its per capita GNP is well above the $8,500 limit contained in the statute. We recognize that there is concern on the part of Singapore that it may also face graduation on this basis before the authority for the GSP system expires in 1993. This mandatory provision was opposed by the executive branch but was in the end included in extension of the GSP program.

Many in the Congress believe that the multifiber arrangement (MFA) has failed to give our domestic industry sufficient relief. Quota bills have been introduced which would violate existing agreements. In the face of this situation, our policy has been to seek to ensure that it is the small producers and poor countries that benefit, relatively, within the parameters of our textile program.

Q. It is often the lament of Malaysia that the U.S. does not take into consideration Malaysian interests when it comes to drawing up quotas and tariffs on commodities and manufactured goods. Is Malaysia being unrealistic or unreasonable in its expectations?

The President. U.S. trade policy over the past few years has been generally favorable toward Malaysia's interests. Malaysia's exports to the United States did drop in 1985 by about $426 million, although we still experienced a deficit in our merchandise trade with Malaysia of more than $934 million -- in itself an increase of some 277 percent since 1982. Much of last year's fall in Malaysia's U.S.-bound exports was attributable to cyclical problems in our consumer electronics industry, for which Malaysian factories have become major suppliers of integrated circuits and semiconductors. The expansion of Malaysia's trade in such advanced manufactured goods was fostered, in no small part, by the tariff preferences available under our Generalized System of Preferences (GSP), as I mentioned earlier.

We should explore areas where U.S.-Malaysian ties can be strengthened. Our two sides have been negotiating a bilateral investment treaty, which still remains to be concluded. Investment links between companies of our two countries would serve our trade interests well. On a more general level, the U.S. remains committed to starting a new round of trade negotiations in the GATT this year as the best means of rolling back protectionism and preserving an open but fair international trading system, which benefits both our countries. We are continuing to consult closely with Malaysia and the other ASEAN countries regarding the new round and have reassured the Government of Malaysia that we believe the negotiations should address the key concerns of all the contracting parties. We are not seeking to limit the agenda to those areas, like trade in services and intellectual property rights, which are of particular interest to us.

Q. Given the Soviet military buildup in the Pacific and the U.S. decision to help China modernize its armed forces, the chances seem great for Southeast Asia to become a theater for greater superpower rivalry. Under these circumstances, how do you think ASEAN can act as a stabilizing influence in the region?

The President. The long-term, global Soviet military buildup, especially in the Pacific, is continuing unabated. It is of concern for all of us, including our friends and allies in Southeast Asia. The unilateral Soviet buildup is not a response to U.S. actions, but is designed to project Soviet power and influence throughout the region. However, U.S. Forces remain committed to promoting regional security by deterring Soviet expansionism. Our intention is to provide China with the capability to defend itself more effectively against the common threat to the region. The U.S.-P.R.C. military relationship helps develop and maintain China as a force for peace and stability in the region and the world, while not posing a threat to other U.S. friends and allies in the region. ASEAN provides a stabilizing role in many ways. It has taken a leadership role in opposing Vietnamese occupation of Cambodia and by establishing the principles upon which a political solution could be based. This is a goal we support. ASEAN's free market orientation and remarkable economic growth have led to the conditions of prosperity and stability, which will continue to benefit the region.

Q. The 1986 continuing resolution on foreign assistance which you signed in December 1985 includes a provision calling for the end of all U.S. assistance to any country whose duly elected government is deposed by a military coup or decree. If a coup took place in Thailand or another ASEAN country, would U.S. assistance be cut automatically? If not, why not?

The President. We prefer not to deal in hypothetical situations. The statute makes clear the intent of Congress; that is, no bilateral assistance will be provided to countries whose duly elected head of government is overthrown by military coup or decree. We would have to interpret the law against the changing political situation in an allied or friendly country on a case-by-case basis as the situation dictated. I do want to stress, however, the United States' firm support for democracy and constitutional processes.

Q. Thailand has expressed disappointment over the rice provision of the U.S. farm act, which is adversely affecting a vital sector of our economy and has caused a feeling here that the U.S. is not a reliable friend. What assurances can you give that our economy, and consequently our national security, will not be similarly affected by future U.S. trade laws?

The President. Thailand remains our close friend and ally. We are deeply committed to the continuing health and vitality of the Thai economy, just as we are committed to Thai national security. The Food Security Act of 1985 was designed to assist American farmers, some of whom are experiencing the worst farm crisis in 50 years. There are aspects of the legislation which my administration disagrees; but overall, the act should assist American farmers. The rice provisions were designed to make U.S. rice more competitive in overseas markets, but we do not intend to disrupt those markets by engaging in predatory pricing policies. In administering this new law, we will be sensitive to the concerns of Thailand and other rice exporters. My administration will continue to work to ensure that future U.S. trade laws promote our mutual interests in free and fair trade. Protectionism will benefit neither of us. The maintenance of an open international trading system is the responsibility of both our countries, as well as of the rest of the world.

The President. We certainly hope not. We believe the nations of ASEAN share our repugnance for terrorism, regardless of the quarter from which it comes. As we made clear at the time, action taken against Libya was specifically related to direct evidence linking Qadhafi to the Berlin disco bombing and plans for a wave of terrorist actions targeted against Americans and American installations. Our preemptive missions against terrorist-related targets was an act of self-defense, fully consistent with Article 51 of the United Nations Charter. It was designed to disrupt Libya's ability to carry out terrorist acts and to deter future terrorist acts by Libya. It was both a necessary and proportionate response to an ongoing pattern of attacks by the Government of Libya.

We have explained the reasons for our actions to the ASEAN governments. While there have been critical popular reactions in several of the ASEAN countries, we believe the governments understand the legal and moral basis of our actions. We do not anticipate that any critical reaction these governments may have will harm our relations, and we appreciate additional security protection they have provided to American diplomatic and other official facilities since April 15.

The President. No. The issue of U.S. bases has not arisen in our dialog with the Government of Negara Brunei Darussalam. Our military bases agreement with the Philippines remains in effect until 1991, after which either side may terminate it with 1 year's notice. In other words, the agreement continues indefinitely unless one party decides to end it.

At this point, it is not possible to predict the attitude of the Philippine Government closer to 1991. However, President Aquino has pledged to abide by the current agreement and to keep her options open. We believe we can work with the new Philippine Government to achieve resolution of any issues which arise in connection with the bases agreement. As is prudent for a world power, we regularly review our basing strategy worldwide and develop contingency plans. There are other possible locations for our facilities in the Philippines, but these locations would be much more costly and much less effective than our installations at Subic Bay and Clark Air Base.

Good morning. Today we depart Washington en route to the Far East. As I'm sure you know, it's a journey we are very excited about. We have looked forward to this trip for a long time. We will travel first to Indonesia for talks with President Soeharto and also meet with the Foreign Ministers of the Association of South East Asian Nations. From Indonesia, we will leave for Tokyo and the 12th annual economic summit of the free industrialized nations of Asia, Europe, and North America.

America's partnership with the nations of Asia grows stronger every year. In the days ahead we will once again work together to reaffirm and renew our economic, strategic, and political ties. It will also be good to reaffirm and renew our personal ties.

As for the Tokyo summit, our agenda is full. There will be long and rather detailed economic meetings, and we will also discuss other areas of political and strategic concern. It will be good to see the summit members and to renew our friendship. This summit comes at an interesting time. There is no denying that the winds of freedom are blowing, east and west. They are brisk and bracing winds, sweeping out the old and, I believe, ushering in a new era of freedom, an era in which democracy is once again recognized as the new idea. So, this is an exciting time, and I expect the Tokyo summit to reflect the dynamism of the day.

Nancy, who I'll be joining in Los Angeles later today, is going into a very heavy schedule on this trip. In Thailand and Malaysia she'll be working very hard on events and issues that are related to her work against drug abuse. So, it looks like we'll both have a lot to report when we return. And for now, sayonara. You see, I've been practicing.

I hereby transmit for the consideration of the Congress proposed legislation, entitled ``Philippines Assistance Act of 1986,'' which authorizes supplemental economic and military assistance for the Philippines.

The bill authorizes a total of $150 million in supplemental assistance for the Philippines, of which $100 million is to be used for Economic Support Fund activities and $50 million is to be used for the Military Assistance Program. A supplemental appropriation request for fiscal year 1986 is concurrently being transmitted to the Congress.

Through the inauguration of President Aquino, the Philippines has been offered an historic opportunity to effect significant structural and institutional reforms that will bring the benefits of peace and prosperity to all of its citizens. The special relationship that the people of the United States share with the people of the Philippines strongly warrants our renewed commitment in support of these efforts. I urge the Congress to act without delay on this legislation.

Today Nancy and I are heading west across the wide Pacific on one of the longest overseas journeys of my Presidency. The first leg of the trip will take me to Indonesia, where I'll be meeting with the leader of that country, President Soeharto, a long-time friend of the United States.

President Soeharto and I first met when I traveled to his country in December of 1973. At the time I was Governor of California. Later, in 1982, President Soeharto paid us the honor of a state visit to the White House. President Soeharto has been a most responsible influence in world affairs and a force for the economic progress of his people at home. He and his government have guided Indonesia to self-sufficiency in rice production and to a respected level of financial creditworthiness. Indonesia is a richly diverse nation with over 160 million people on islands stretching over 3,000 miles. The people there have made significant economic strides over the last decade. I'm grateful to have this opportunity to meet and discuss with President Soeharto the many areas of mutual concern to the United States and Indonesia.

The ASEAN nations are not only our trading partners but also our good and trusted friends. During my trip, I'll be emphasizing to our ASEAN friends and to the others with whom I'll meet that the United States is a Pacific power. We expect to continue playing a constructive role in shaping the future of this vibrant and vital part of the world. My discussions with the foreign ministers of ASEAN will cover a wide range of economic and security issues. One item on the agenda is Cambodia. ASEAN has demonstrated exemplary responsibility and leadership concerning the Vietnamese invasion and continuing occupation of this country. America, along with our ASEAN friends, believes that Vietnam should withdraw its forces from Cambodia and permit the Cambodian people to determine their own destiny. Vietnam has spurned any and all reasonable ASEAN requests for a negotiated settlement of the problem. The United States has made it clear that it's ready to participate constructively in an overall settlement. The Communist government of Vietnam, however, to the detriment of their own national interest, remains intransigent. What we and our ASEAN friends are seeking is a stable, free, and prosperous Pacific Basin. We want to build an environment in which people can work, produce, and trade together, enriching everyone's life in the process.

One of the initiatives associated with our trip concerns a threat to the well-being of every nation, an evil undermining the family and tearing at the fabric of this society. I am, of course, talking about the scourge of drug abuse. Nancy has made the fight against drug abuse her own. She'll be traveling with me to Indonesia, but from there, while I move on to the Tokyo Economic Summit, Nancy will go to Malaysia and Thailand, where she will meet with people involved in drug abuse prevention and rehabilitation programs. These countries share our commitment to end the pain and suffering inflicted by drug addiction. I'm very proud of the work that Nancy's doing to this end. All caring people in every country should unite to fight this menace.

While Nancy is in Malaysia and Thailand, I will meet in Tokyo with the leaders of seven industrialized democratic nations. There is a variety of subjects, areas of mutual interest and concern to discuss. Our catch words will be ``freedom'' and ``cooperation.'' Today the prospects for the Western World are brighter than in many years. As I fly across the expanses of the Pacific in Air Force One, I go knowing that the winds of freedom are blowing. Totalitarian nations, with their centralized planning and bureaucratic controls, are going nowhere. The free world, as is especially evident on the Pacific rim, is moving at an accelerated pace into a new era of opportunity and progress. These are exciting times to be alive, to be free, and to be an American.

As you of the Pacific Command know, our journey -- first to Indonesia to meet President Soeharto and the foreign ministers of the Association of South East Asian Nations, then to the Tokyo summit -- will prove to be of immense importance to our nation and the vast Pacific world that makes up your field of operations. The foreign ministers that we'll meet in Bali represent nations that have each in large part embraced human liberty, both political and economic. In our talks with these ministers, we'll reaffirm America's commitment to a Pacific community of nations marked by prosperity and peace.

And then after our stay in Indonesia, Nancy will travel on her own to Malaysia and Thailand, where she will meet leaders working to combat drug abuse. I have a feeling she will want to tell them about the Just Say No kids that are here today. And the rest of us will fly directly to Tokyo, where we'll participate in the 12th annual summit meeting of leaders from the industrialized democracies of Asia, Europe, and North America. And again, we'll stress our commitment to peace and to the prosperity that can only be achieved in freedom. As the site for this meeting, Tokyo itself will make a powerful statement about the growing role of Pacific nations upon the world stage.

But while we have this moment together here in Hawaii, permit me to say a few words about you, the men and women of the Pacific Command. As your Commander in Chief, I know that you're charged with one of the most difficult missions in all our Armed Forces -- the defense of our nation and world peace across more than 100 million square miles, about 50 percent of the Earth's surface. This demands sacrifice. Indeed, many of you are thousands of miles from your own homes. And beautiful as the Pacific world is, I know there are men and women among you who miss the streets of Brooklyn, the fields of Iowa, or the mountains of Colorado. Many of you left your families behind on the mainland. Even those of you fortunate enough to have your families with you here in Hawaii must wish that you could give them more time. Yet you are willing to make these sacrifices, willing because you know that in the name of freedom itself, America and her people must be defended. And today I bring you the thanks you deserve, the thanks of a grateful nation.

Today America is standing tall. We're rebuilding our defenses, setting in place innovative weapons programs and giving you the pay and equipment that you need. We're reminding the globe that America still stands for liberty. Indeed, since 1980 not 1 inch of territory has fallen to communism, and Grenada has been set free. And, yes, we're showing the world's dictators and terrorists that when they perpetrate their cowardly acts upon citizens of the United States, they had best be prepared for the consequences.

The world today is a dangerous place; even in some regions, a savage place. The noble profession of arms, the profession so vital to the maintenance of justice and peace, has never been more demanding. And I want you to know that, since becoming President, nothing has moved me more deeply or given me more hope for America's future than seeing the way in which you, our men and women in uniform, perform your often difficult duties. Ladies and gentlemen of the Pacific Command, you do your nation proud.

My friends, your island represents one of the distinctive characteristics of the United States -- its ``Pacificness,'' the way in which America looks to the west and is bound up with the waters of this huge and peaceful ocean. From the first, it's been one of the chief goals of our administration to make our nation's policy look to the west -- just as surely as do our people -- to strengthen, in short, our ties with the nations of the Pacific. It's therefore fitting that this journey -- first to Indonesia, to meet with President Soeharto and the foreign ministers of the Association of South East Asian Nations, then to the Tokyo summit -- should be punctuated by a moment of rest on Guam. It's said that it's here on Guam each morning that the Sun first casts its rays upon the Stars and Stripes. Well, my friends, I can't think of a more beautiful way for America's day to begin.

Guam, America's flagship in the western Pacific, possesses an importance out of all proportion to its size. A vital hub of transportation, Guam lies within easy range of virtually every city in east Asia. And your practice of free enterprise is setting an important example for the entire Pacific Basin. I commend you, and your neighbors in the Northern Marianas, for the economic growth and low unemployment that you've achieved. Perhaps most important, in this crucial region of the world, Guam shines forth as a beacon of democracy. Indeed, the large number of Guamanians serving in the United States Armed Forces represents a tribute to the patriotism of this island, 9,000 miles from our Nation's Capital. My friends, distant from the mainland though you may be, you have kept the faith -- the faith in freedom that unites us all and gives our nation purpose.

In the days ahead, we'll be bearing this message of freedom. The foreign ministers that I will meet with in Indonesia represent nations that have each in large part embraced human liberty, both political and economic. And in recent years, the people of these nations have produced a remarkable record of economic growth. In meeting their foreign ministers, we'll reaffirm America's commitment to free markets and free trade. And we'll reassert our belief that in liberty we can work together to bring still greater prosperity to the Pacific, prosperity in which the people of the Asian nations and Guam, itself, should share. After our stay in Indonesia, Nancy will travel on her own to Malaysia and Thailand, where she will meet leaders working to combat drug abuse. The rest of us will fly directly to Tokyo, where we will participate in the 12th annual summit meeting of leaders from the industrialized democracies of Asia, Europe, and North America. Again, we will stress the connection, the necessary connection between freedom and economic growth; and we'll lay plans to expand world trade still further. As the site for this meeting, Tokyo itself will make a powerful statement about the expanding role of Pacific nations in the economy of the entire world.

And a word to you, our men and women in uniform, those of you laboring here on Guam to keep our nation free and at peace. Many of you are thousands of miles from your own homes. And beautiful as Guam is, I know you must miss familiar sights and sounds and, above all, your families and friends. Yet you're willing to make that sacrifice, willing because you understand, or understood all along, what recent events have once again made clear. In the name of freedom, in the name of decency, we have no choice but to defend American values and the American people themselves -- and to do so unflinchingly. To use a phrase made famous by the Seabees, who have toiled so long here on Guam, we respond to this challenge with two words which say it all: ``Can do!'' As your Commander in Chief, I extend to you men and women in uniform the thanks of a grateful nation. I have to tell you that there are many things in this job I now have which you can be proud. But none of them makes me more proud than you, the men and women in the uniform of our military -- what you stand for and the way you stand for it.

Well, it's been wonderful to have this chance to talk with you, and I want you all to know how very much the warmth of your reception has meant to Nancy and me and our entire party here. And now it's time for me to go someplace and sit down while they put some more juice in the plane out there. [Laughter] But first, let me try out a fitting word of greeting in your beautiful language, Chamorro. I can't promise to get it just right, but I'll give it my best. And to all the people of Guam, hafa adai. Thank you all, and God bless you all.

The group met yesterday, last evening, in Washington and will be meeting on a regular basis for the foreseeable future. The group is charged with providing continuous monitoring of any health and environmental implications resulting from the accident. EPA will provide daily press briefings based on information gathered by this task force in order to keep the public informed.

Based on the latest data that has been gathered since we learned of the accident, it appears that the radioactive air mass from the Chernobyl nuclear reactor accident in the Soviet Union is currently moving over the Soviet Union. During the next few days, it is expected that the air mass will be dispersed by normal atmospheric activity. It is too early to determine whether any portion of the radioactive air mass will reach the continental United States. However, from the latest information we now have, should any radiation reach the United States, it is highly unlikely that it would be a level that would pose any threat to public health. This is because of the dispersion which would take place in the atmosphere. The Environmental Protection Agency, which maintains the Nation's radiation monitoring network, has increased its sampling frequency to a daily basis for airborne radioactivity.

Information available to us indicates that the Soviet reactor accident occurred in the fourth and newest reactor at the Chernobyl Power Station. This reactor is a graphite-moderated, pressure-tube reactor of a type called RBMK by the Soviets. The reactor suffered a major accident which included a fire at the graphite core. Given the amount and extent of the radiation released, the fire has destroyed most of the reactor's core. The reactor core contains approximately 200 tons of uranium interspersed with 1,700 tons of graphite. If the fire is not extinguished, it would probably continue to burn for days or weeks. The fire will continue to spread radiation from the core as long as it burns, although the Soviets have indicated that the rate of release is decreasing. Fighting the fire will be very difficult due to the extremely high levels of radiation near the reactor. The Soviets have asked some Western European countries for assistance in fighting the graphite fire, although no one in the world has experience in dealing with a situation like this. The British had a graphite fire in their reactor in the 1950's, but the radioactive contamination was much less.

On the diplomatic front, this morning Assistant Secretary of State for European and Canadian Affairs [Rozanne L. Ridgway] met the Soviet Charge Sokolov -- that took place yesterday, eastern time. She expressed, on behalf of the President, the United States deep regret over the accident. We hope that the casualties and material damage will be minimal. The United States is prepared to make available to the Soviet Union humanitarian and technical assistance dealing with this accident. We are seeking additional information on the accident and request the closest possible coordinated effort among all concerned countries. To minimize the danger, we hope the Soviet Union will fulfill its international obligations to provide information on the accident in a timely manner. In order to state publicly the United States position and understanding of the situation, a briefing will be held in Washington on Wednesday at 11 a.m. at the State Department. Those briefers will include the Environmental Protection Agency, State Department, and Energy Department, as well as the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

The State Department has told us that we do not have a count of all Americans in the Kiev area, since tourists are not under an obligation to inform the Department or the U.S. Embassy of their whereabouts. Embassy officers in the U.S.S.R. are in contact with Intourist and other Soviet authorities, but in order to trace an individual they need the Intourist group number or name or location and phone number, if possible, of the hotel in which the American citizen is thought to be staying.

Embassy Moscow has no reports of Americans affected by the accident. There have been no requests for medical assistance, evacuation, or other assistance by Americans. We have been informed that there are several American students who are traveling in the Soviet Union and are now in Kiev. The Soviet Government, of course, is responsible for ensuring that they are safely evacuated should it be required. Unfortunately, the Soviet Union has not told us what precautions that they are offering to protect our citizens that may be in the Soviet Union.

In this eighteenth year since the passage of the Fair Housing Act, Americans should continue to work together to uphold the Fair Housing Act and the principle of equal opportunity on which it is based.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirtieth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Thomas C. Griscom as Assistant to the President for Communications and Planning, effective April 2, 1987. Mr. Griscom will direct all White House communication activities and will be responsible for overall planning. Working with him will be the Office of Presidential Appointments and Scheduling, Presidential Advance, Office of Political and Intergovernmental Affairs, Presidential Speechwriting, and the Communications Offices.

Q. Mr. President, your Education Secretary disagrees with the Surgeon General. The Surgeon General says that there should be specific sex education for children -- condoms, prevention, and specific information to really do something.

The President. Well, I think that what the Secretary was saying is something I myself have said. I think that that particular subject should be taught in connection with values, not simply taught as a physical, mechanical process.

The President. I said, ``that if that education was accompanied by values,'' but one of the things that's been wrong with too much of our education is that no kind of values of right and wrong are being taught in the educational process. And I think that young people expect to hear from adults ideas of what is right or wrong.

But I've seen the lifesaving power of modern medicine, and I know that we have here in America a medical community that's the best in the world. Not only is medical care here the best, it's also more widely available than anywhere else in the world. As we prepare for the 21st century, our goal is to make sure that in the year 2000 that is still the case.

This is why I've come here today. I'm ready to listen and learn what are the challenges ahead for keeping America healthy, for developing the science and the art of medicine, for making sure that good health care remains available to all our people.

Well, if I could just say: I find myself in great agreement with everything that I have heard here today, and being married to a nurse's aide, that includes your statement about their importance. I made great use of that a few weeks ago. But, yes, in these last statements it seems to me that we have a great deal still to do in education in the sense of informing our people of some things. As Governor of California -- and several widely publicized catastrophic family cases came to view there -- we set out and worked out a plan with the private insurance companies in which, if we would agree to be compulsory, to compel everyone who worked in California to take out catastrophic health insurance at that time, they could have provided that insurance, limitless as to cost, for $35 a year.

And when I say, speaking of education, there's something about this. The frequency of that is not sufficient. You know, that everybody thinks it won't happen to them. We couldn't even get a postcard -- we were going to make this available to the people to decide. We just couldn't get any attention at all about it, and it just died aborning. No one ever thought it would happen to them. And I think here maybe this is a field for us to work harder than we have.

This year throughout America our eyes are turned to Philadelphia as Americans everywhere remember that here 200 years ago a small group of men fashioned the greatest experiment in self-government in the history of man: the Constitution of the United States. The founders represented the people of the Nation, and they submitted their work to the Nation for ratification, which marked a turning point in history. Yes, that's what I told Ben Franklin at the time. [Laughter] Never before had an entire people joined together so peacefully and so effectively to govern themselves.

The Constitution called for a limited government, and in the two centuries since then, many around the world have asked: How is it possible that self-government and limited government work so well in America? Well, the answer is simple, and you're a part of it. As the Frenchman de Tocqueville found, when we Americans want to do something, we don't wait for government. We join together, and do it ourselves. And there's no better example of Americans joining together for a common good than the founding, almost 200 years ago, also in this city, of one of America's first academies for the discussion of medical issues, the College of Physicians.

Yes, it was in January 1787, under the guidance of Dr. Benjamin Rush, 24 physicians joined together ``to advance the science of medicine and lessen human misery.'' And for 200 years the college has done just that. Its leadership in public health began with efforts to combat the Philadelphia yellow fever epidemic of 1793, and it continues to this day. And as a leader in medical studies, the college boasts one of the world's finest and most used medical libraries, one of the best medical history libraries in the world, one of the few medical museums in America, and a skull collection that would make Hamlet delirious. [Laughter] For two centuries the College of Physicians has made a living reality of its motto -- ``Not for oneself, but for all'' -- and in the process has helped make all of American medicine what it is today: the best in the world.

But in this bicentennial year, as we look back, I believe we must also look forward. We must ask ourselves: How will we prepare America for the journey ahead? How will we prepare America for the 21st century? What kind of country will we pass on to our children? And will our children be ready for the jobs and opportunities of America's future? This challenge, preparing America for the 21st century, includes finding ways to make the best use of our science and technology. It includes building a fair, open, and growing world economy, which will be the source of many of the jobs of our future. It includes making use -- or, sure that American education is the best in the world, investing in our human and intellectual capital, so our children are ready for those jobs.

It includes improving the climate for entrepreneurship and growth here at home, so that the only limits on what our children can achieve are the limits of their dreams. The key here is lower tax rates and fewer needless regulations. We've made great progress in both those areas, but the job won't be done until we get control of Federal spending so that tax rates won't go up again. And that's why it's time for Congress to cut the Federal budget and leave the family budget alone.

And finally, and the reason why I'm here today, the challenge includes preparing American medicine for the 21st century. I said that American medicine is the best in the world, and on that we need no second opinions, because there are no other opinions. Our competitive system has produced the finest health care in history. And with each year that passes, it saves more lives, finds cures to more diseases, makes life better for more people than ever before.

Yes, the pulse of American medicine is strong. And as a result, life expectancy has been rising. Once-common diseases like tuberculosis, diphtheria, and polio are distant memories. Infant mortality is falling. The rate of Americans who die from heart problems drops each year. More cases of cancer are found quickly and treated with total success each year, and I have reason to be grateful for that. Operations like cataract surgery, which once were difficult and required long recoveries, have become simple office procedures. And for those who do go to the hospital, average hospital stays have fallen dramatically in the past two decades. A stock scene in the movies has a father rushing his gravely injured child to a hospital. But now when he gets there, he finds doctors are more ready for him than ever before. Intensive care units have become not the exception but the rule, as have trauma centers staffed around the clock with surgeons. This is an important reason auto crash deaths have fallen over the last 10 years. Crash victims have a much better chance of living if they're treated within that first critical hour, and more are.

Almost every disease we know can be rapidly diagnosed and treated. The most obvious and disturbing exception is AIDS. And yet here, too, medicine is vaulting ahead. Six years ago the world had never heard of AIDS. Since then the AIDS virus has been isolated and identified. A test has been developed that is helping to ensure that transfusions are free of contamination. One drug, AZT, has been developed that may help treat AIDS patients, and it received FDA approval just 2 weeks ago. Other medicines are on the way, and American researchers will soon begin testing vaccines. This is unprecedented progress against a major virus. It took 40 years of study to learn as much about polio. It took 19 years to develop a vaccine against hepatitis B. But then our battle against AIDS has been like an emergency room operation: We've thrown everything we have into it.

We've declared AIDS public health enemy number one. And this fiscal year we plan to spend $416 million on AIDS research and education and $766 million overall. Next year we want to spend 28 percent more on research and education and a total of $1 billion. That compares to $8 million just 5 years ago. Spending on AIDS has been one of the fastest growing areas of the budget. And that's not all. Recently, Prime Minister Chirac and I announced an agreement that opens the way for cooperation between researchers in France and the United States. We are also unlocking the chains of regulation and making it easier to move from the pharmaceutical laboratory to the market with AIDS drugs. AZT received FDA approval in just 4 months, and that is one-fifth the average time for reviewing drugs. No, the limit on AIDS research today is not money or will but the physical limits of research facilities and the number of people trained in the necessary techniques.

But all the vaccines and medications in the world won't change one basic truth: that prevention is better than cure. And that's particularly true of AIDS, for which right now there is no cure. This is where education comes in. The Public Health Service has issued an information and education plan for the control of AIDS. The Federal role must be to give educators accurate information about the disease. Now, how that information is used must be up to schools and parents, not government. But let's be honest with ourselves. AIDS information cannot be what some call ``value neutral.'' After all, when it comes to preventing AIDS, don't medicine and morality teach the same lessons?

Some time ago I heard the story of a man who received what turned out to be a transfusion of blood contaminated with the AIDS virus. He was infected, and in turn his wife was infected. And within 2 years, they both had died. Well, I'm determined that we'll find a cure for AIDS. When the Carthaginian general Hannibal was preparing to cross the Alps and was told there was no way across, he said: ``We'll find a way, or make one.'' And that's the kind of determination we all have about curing AIDS. We'll find a way, or make one.

American medicine is making miracles commonplace, and that's good news as America prepares for the 21st century. But while our quality is the highest in the world, so are our prices. Last year medical costs climbed seven times faster than the rate of inflation. It's getting to where many patients feel that the recovery room should be next to the cashier's office. Doctors, patients, insurers -- everyone feels sick about the rising cost of getting well. As a nation, we spend up to twice the proportion of gross national product on health care as such major trading partners as Japan, Britain, and Canada. One of our greatest challenges in preparing for the competitive world of the 21st century is to get this medical cost crisis under control. Worst hurt are the uninsured and the elderly citizens on Medicare who face a catastrophic illness. Our catastrophic illness proposal will help those on Medicare. And as part of the package, we will also encourage the States to use their authority to require catastrophic coverage in insurance available through employers. The aim here is to make sure the guy who pumps gas or works in the corner store can get coverage, too.

But as we protect those who are most vulnerable, we must also do something to hold costs down. And let's face it, government has played a large role in the inflation of medical costs. As the head of one suburban hospital told a reporter not long ago: ``The incentives used to be to keep people in the hospital, to perform more tests and procedures, to increase costs.'' When we came into office, Medicare was facing bankruptcy, and when it came to the public assigning liability, doctors were hurt, too. Stories of soaring costs and excessive bills tarnished the profession's reputation. Four years ago we changed the Medicare hospital payment system. We also allowed health maintenance organizations and competitive medical plans to contract to give care, and the results were astonishing. Health care inflation was cut in half. Efficiency rose. Service did, too. And the Medicare trust fund was pulled back from the brink. And still, to ensure that the fund remains strong through the year 2000, we must do more. And that's why I've sent a new package of proposals to Congress.

A lot is wrapped up in that package: more choices for Medicare beneficiaries, more incentives for doctors to improve efficiency, more incentives for States to give more choices to those on Medicaid. But let me tell you one thing that will not be in that or any future package from my administration: a mandatory cost containment system. I know some want to go that route, but a mandatory system would discourage innovation, restrict services, and be a step toward government control of the entire medical profession. American medicine is the world's best because it is private, and it must stay that way.

I've talked today about some of the challenges facing American medicine as we prepare for the 21st century. Sometimes it's easy, particularly on the cost issues, to turn to government for the answers. Yes, government has a role, but in the end, physicians are in charge of this operation. And just as a surgeon must decide when to call for the scalpel, clamps, and thread during an operation, you must decide when to call for the tools that will help you remove enlarged costs from the body of medicine. I heard from a panel in the college library today about bringing down costs by making better use of nurses and other health professionals.

Well, you must decide how and when to do this. A few negligent doctors can raise the health care and liability insurance costs for everyone. You must decide if medical societies will get tough on those guilty of negligence or of failing to conform to the ethical standards of medicine. As patients expect more from medicine, and as they pay more, they also want to know more about their choices. And you must decide how to get the information to them. As less expensive, simpler procedures come available, you must decide when to use them. In your hands is American medicine's great tradition of healing all in need regardless of their wealth.

And let me add one other thing that is vital to our nation's future that in many ways is in your hands as well: the war on drug abuse. You can teach your patients about the health risk of drugs. You can show them, particularly your young patients, why it's important to them, their families, and their communities to just say no to drugs.

Yes, your hands will fashion the future of American medicine. But I believe that's just saying that American medicine is in the best hands in the world. Compare your healing powers to the doctors of any other country. Take, for example, the Soviet Union, which talks so much about the superior quality of its medicine, but where sanitation is so poor that, as recently as 2 years ago, a third of all operations there left patients with postoperative infections, where a third of all hospitals do not have adequate facilities for blood transfusions, and where, partly as a result of poor medicine, life expectancy has been falling and infant mortality climbing. There's no contest there or anyplace else. You are the best.

I say that with confidence, because I know the quality and commitment of America's physicians, not only firsthand but through my family as well. My father-in-law was a physician. My brother-in-law is. I saw their dedication to medicine. I saw my father-in-law's devotion to his patients and to his students. I saw his enormous dignity. And I saw his dedication to excellence, how he constantly searched for better ways to diagnose and cure. Yes, I saw how he helped people, whether or not they could pay, and treated all patients with the same courtesy and respect.

But on a serious note, join me, if you will, in considering three moments in the history of this square. First, it is December 1790. Sixty-five Representatives and twenty-six Senators have gathered here in Congress Hall. Outside there is the distracting, constant clop of horse hooves and the rumble of coaches, and the men inside here in this room are worried. Many risked property and life itself in the Revolution just a few years before. Now they faced a sobering question: Had they and their countrymen overreached? Can this raw new Republic survive, or will it be torn apart by disputes between the States, lack of finance, pressure from the great powers of Europe? In this House Chamber and in the Senate Chamber above, the Members of the Congress of the United States faced these challenges and surmounted them, bringing into being a sound system of finance, providing for the defense of the Nation, and learning through it all to make this fledgling democracy work.

Well, the final moment I'd like you to join me in considering requires no imagining. It is now, the present. Like the men of 1790, like Lincoln in 1861, indeed, like every generation of Americans throughout our history, we, too, face the question: Will this nation, founded upon freedom, continue to flourish? Will it continue to extend the hope of liberty to all the world? It's my belief that in the last 6 years we've done much to restore our nation, restore our economy and defenses, restore our basic values, even restore a sense of our own fundamental goodness as a people.

Yes, I feel certain that, despite all the challenges that beset us, this nation of freedom will flourish. But if we're to succeed in the future, we must first learn our own past. We must learn to go to a building like this and hear the echoes and sense the greatness and draw strength. For to study American history is, in a sense, to study free will. It is to see that all our greatness has been built up by specific acts of choice and determination. And it is to see how very fragile our nation is, how very quickly so much that we cherish could be lost.

All this is really a more elaborate way of repeating what I said at the beginning: that by doing so much to bring American history to life, each of you is making a weighty gift to the Nation, and especially to our young people. And so, let me repeat, too, the other remark I made a moment ago: My friends, I thank you. And God bless you all.

The President. Well, good morning, everyone. Lord Carrington and I have just had a brief but useful discussion about the vitality of the NATO alliance. And this endeavor is helping to improve NATO's conventional defense as we move forward in our negotiations on equitable, stabilizing, and verifiable reduction of nuclear weapons. Also, it will have positive impact when we begin negotiations with the Warsaw Pact for more stable conventional forces from the Atlantic to the Urals.

Congress' support of codevelopment at an initial funding level of $200 million has opened up new opportunities of benefit to everyone. And as a result of the amendment by Senators Nunn and Roth and Warner, there may this year be as many as a dozen cooperative ventures undertaken with alliance nations. This is a historic first in the alliance and will have a profound impact on NATO's conventional defense as well as a better return on both U.S. and European taxpayers' defense investment in all alliance nations. Senators Nunn and Warner and other Members have been leaders in promoting this important legislation in the Congress. This partnership approach is the best antidote to trends toward defense protectionism on both sides of the Atlantic as well as troop withdrawal amendments.

The international political framework NATO has set up for stimulating progress in this partnership venture has been remarkable. The newly created, reinforced North Atlantic Council meetings of Deputy Defense Ministers includes the French and the first such use of the Council since 1950. And this is a very constructive way to encourage closer French cooperation on defense issues. And I'm grateful that Lord Carrington has taken personal leadership in this matter at NATO. And I deeply appreciate the wisdom and energy of all the parties who've made this work, many of whom are gathered here today.

Lord Carrington. --  -- I think the alliance over the years has had a number of successes, not least that in 38 years we haven't had the third world war. I'm not at all sure that we can congratulate ourselves quite so warmly in the matter of arms cooperation over the last 38 years. We've had some successes, but it would be an exaggeration to say that we have been all that successful.

And I am deeply encouraged that you, Mr. President, personally have come to this meeting today to give this a boost. And the fact that Senator Nunn and Senator Roth and Senator Warner and others have made these proposals and have made it possible for there to be greater cooperation between the Europeans and the Americans is exceedingly important. And I know the energy with which Secretary [of Defense] Weinberger and Deputy Secretary [of Defense] Taft are carrying this out.

We, alas, don't have all the resources that we need for defense. When we waste them by duplication and by competing against each other, we do the alliance a great disservice. And so I can assure you that I will do everything I can to see that this is successful. And I, once again, am deeply grateful to you for having spoken in the way that you have.

The President. Well, thank you. And incidentally, while we have given some cast recognition here to the Senators present, we fortunately have some members of our House of Representatives, too -- Representative Hyde and others who are here at the table.

But I -- well, I do know what this victory meant to all of you and especially to coach Pat Summitt. Pat, after 12 years of tremendous effort, your coaching and the heart and skill of these terrific young ladies gave you the victory that you've so long deserved. Now, I heard that you were up until 3 o'clock in the morning devising that defensive strategy. Well, obviously it was sleep well lost, because it worked masterfully out on the court. So, it's wonderful to see someone as deserving as you lead this team to victory. And we all support you.

But again, Pat and ladies, each of you has done something very special this year: You've made your friends and neighbors and supporters very proud. And your victory is something to enjoy now, and to remember all your years. When I was playing college football, our coach used to tell us, in an effort to inspire us, that the things we would really remember the longest were the games we lost, and we'd be the rest of our lives thinking about, well, if we'd done this or done that. I have a hunch that you'll remember this game for a long time, and well you should. So, thank you all, and God bless you all.

Coach Summitt. President Reagan, I knew if there was anyone in America that could appreciate that defense it would be you. Thank you. I think you also can appreciate, as we appreciate, ``Just Say No'' to drugs and the campaign that Nancy Reagan has done such a great job with. For this team, ``Just Say Yes'' has been something that we've been proud of. First of all, for our program, academically, our 100-percent graduation rate that we are very proud of, and athletically, we've made eight trips to the Final Four in the past 11 years. I can tell you that winning the national championship was indeed the greatest honor that this team could bring to our university. And, today when we got up, I said, the team was as anxious, as excited, and as nervous coming here to have this opportunity as they were playing for a national championship. The honor is just as sweet as the victory. Thank you.

Ms. Sexton. Mr. President, on behalf of all us from Tennessee, we thank you for inviting us to be here today; we are very honored. We have a few gifts that we would like to present to you. [Laughter] First of all, we have your Converse Weapons. [Laughter] Now maybe you can play one-on-one for a day in our shoes. [Laughter] And these also are for Nancy Reagan, Mrs. Reagan.

Ms. Sexton. We thank you. Next, we have a basketball from the 1987 women's basketball championship team with our autographs on the basketball -- and coaches -- and we present that to you. And Cheryl has the championship T-shirts we'd like for you to have also.

The President. Thank you very much. I am most grateful for all of these. And I have a hunch that in a couple of years this will be on display in a Presidential library, and I'll be very proud to have it there and proud for all of you. And my golly -- [laughter] -- I'm ready to go.

After your four years of service in the White House and more than two years' service as the Deputy Secretary of the Treasury, I can understand your decision to return to the private sector. I appreciate particularly your sense of your obligations to your family. Were it not for such considerations I would urge you to reconsider.

You have been at the center of much that we have done since the days of transition in late 1980. You have contributed invaluably to some of the most important accomplishments of my Administration: among them, the tax and budget acts of 1981; the Social Security compromise of 1983; the reorientation of international economic policy in 1985; and, in 1986, the enactment of the most comprehensive tax reform in America's history.

Your career in government -- spanning four administrations -- has been marked with distinction. Throughout, your commitment to the public interest has been clear, consistent, and unfailing. You can take justifiable pride in your contributions and achievements.

In November 1980, it was a privilege for me to be able to join the White House transition team. It was a greater privilege to be sworn in, in the East Room, on the morning of your first full day in office, as a member of the White House staff. And ever since, it has seemed to me a very special privilege to have had the opportunity to continue to serve as a member of your administration.

It is with mixed feelings, therefore, that I respectfully inform you of my conclusion that the time has come for me to resign. In the public sector, I have been fortunate to have had the chance to contribute to much that seems to me to have been of positive value. But, at this particular stage of my life, after more than six straight years in government, I conclude: I have family obligations that might better be met if I were in the private sector; there are interesting opportunities for me to serve in the private sector in ways that can combine challenge, reward, and socially valuable contribution; and I would welcome such new challenges.

Please accept my very best wishes for continued success -- along with my very deepest thanks for all that you have done for me personally and, most importantly, for all that you have done for our country.

I knew in advance that the battle would be tough and the odds were long. But we cannot retreat from our commitment to a responsible budget. My efforts to control spending are not diminished, and I remain firm in my pledge to the American taxpayers to speak out against such budgetary excesses.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Jack Edwards to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority for a term of 6 years. This is a new position.

Secretary Dole. Mr. President, thanks to your commitment, thanks to your leadership in privatization, Conrail, our government-owned freight railroad, is no longer a ward of the state. Last week, in the largest initial industrial stock offering that we've had in the history of the United States, Conrail was sold.

And we were very pleased that we were able to maximize the price and also minimize the cost to the Government, because in this instance we had the lowest gross spread of any comparable public offering, the lowest fees to the underwriters. We also had for the first time a special bracket for minorities and women-owned investment firms. And this gave them an opportunity to participate fully in all aspects of management of the public offering and gave them a lot of visibility and a lot of experience in the process.

The President. And I also want due credit for having appointed a remarkable and wonderful Secretary of Transportation. Elizabeth and those of you who are here today are to be congratulated for the crowning achievement in our privatization efforts: the hugely successful sale of Conrail to the public. The American people will receive, as you've just heard, over a $1\1/2\ billion from that sale, reducing the Federal deficit by that same amount and this, in addition, as Elizabeth told us, the over $300 million paid to the Federal Government by Conrail in the last few months.

Conrail is the flagship of privatization and the first of what we hope will be many government functions returned to their rightful place in the private sector. I think this Conrail sale is further evidence that the administration is doing its bit to reduce the deficit.

And let me say something about yesterday's vote. It was a battle well worth waging, and there will be more. Our pledge to the American people to reverse the trend toward more Federal spending remains strong, and it's time for the Congress to stand by the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets and not retreat. And I will continue to press forward for a sound, responsible Federal spending plan.

I am not seeking any additional legislation to rescind any authority of the Bank. Estimates of demand for Export-Import Bank guarantees and insurance can change quickly. Continued growth in the U.S. economy and global recovery could create unexpected demand for guarantees and insurance. Therefore, I have concluded that the statutory fiscal year 1987 limit for Eximbank loan guarantee commitments should not be changed.

This has been a very special week for you all as players and for your coach, the shy and retiring Bobby Knight -- [laughter] -- and for the people of Indiana. I grew up just one State west of the Wabash River, and I know a little something about Hoosier hysteria.

In Indiana, babies aren't born with silver spoons in their mouths; they come equipped with basketballs and high-top sneakers. [Laughter] I don't know how mothers there manage. Basketball is a way of life in Indiana that many people will never understand. But a movie out these days -- you know, the one with the funny name, ``Hoosiers'' -- along with your example will help to explain this phenomenon.

One measure of Indiana basketball is -- much like politics and government -- is statistics. Indiana was the cochampion this year in a tough Big Ten Conference, and they won 30 games, including a rather important 7-game run here at the end of the season. This is the fifth NCAA basketball title for Indiana, but the numbers don't match the thrill you provided to millions of basketball fans here in America.

You won tough victories from some extraordinary teams: LSU; the University of Nevada, Las Vegas; and of course, a one-point, come-from-behind victory against Syracuse right before the buzzer. This was no series for the faint of heart -- players or spectators. It wasn't for one spectator sitting upstairs in front of the TV set.

Let me also say that there were no losers last Monday. I think you'll all agree that Syracuse gave you the game of your lives. To the players and fans from Syracuse, I offer my congratulations, too. You're all winners.

But let's talk about some individual winners with us today. Seniors Todd Meier and Daryl Thomas have played with heart, talent, and determination for Indiana for 4 years and came through when called for Monday night. Ricky Calloway, Dean Garrett, Steve Eyl, Joe Hillman, each provided us with clutch performances and moments of brilliance. So much for the front court. I also want to talk about a couple of guards. You know, the short guys on the squad.

And then there's Steve Alford, one of those basketball babies I referred to a moment ago -- Indiana's Mr. Basketball as a high schooler, an Olympic gold medalist, two-time All-American, the leading scorer in Indiana history, and Indiana's team leader. And that's just on court. Off the court, Steve is a conscientious student and a model citizen, whose values are as important as his field goal percentage. He's my kind of basketball player, and he's America's kind of student athlete.

Finally, I'd be remiss if I didn't offer a few words of comment about coach Bobby Knight. Heck, everybody gets to take a shot at Bobby, why not the President of the United States. [Laughter] Actually, I'll leave Bobby's critics to their own devices. Critics aside, one thing is certain: Bobby cares deeply about his players on and off the court. He seeks to produce the best in his players through hard work, excellence in execution, and selfless team play. Now, when all is said and done, Bobby is my kind of coach. And, Bobby, if you've got time one of these days, I'd like a few pointers on fly fishing. [Laughter] But you know the stats as well as I do. Bobby Knight is the winningest coach in Big Ten history. He's won eight Big Ten titles. He's won American gold medals in the Pan American games and the 1984 Olympic games. And he's coached three Indiana teams to national titles, joining Adolph Rupp and John Wooden in the elite Three and Over fraternity.

Hard work makes for winners on the court, and dedication in the classroom makes for winners throughout life. These two elements are certainly at the core of this Indiana team. And I congratulate you all for living this example and, again, for winning the 1987 NCAA basketball championship. And now I understand that Doc Bowen has planned a little reception for you at his place, so I'll close with what I understand to be a popular Indiana benediction: ``If I don't see you in the future, I'll see you in the pasture.'' [Laughter] Thank you all, and God bless you.

Coach Knight. Mr. President, thank you very much for taking the time and allowing us to bring this group of young men here to visit with you this afternoon. I have here on behalf of the team -- really not just the team, but from the State of Indiana, where I think you well know you have a tremendous amount of supporters -- a jacket that represents both the State of Indiana and Indiana University. And basketball being a big thing in our State, I also thought I'd make in red -- our colors -- when we brought it to you. So, I'd like to give you this jacket on behalf of really the State of Indiana. I think you'll find it's your size.

Coach Knight. I think as a basketball team we took a lot of pride in the fact that we were a pretty tough team. We came from behind the lot in some critical situations. And I think we talked about what we'd like to say that would be most appropriate to you. And on behalf of our players and coaches, it would be this: Mr. President, I think you have shown all of us across America what it's like to be tough in critical situations, and we have a great appreciation for your mental toughness and your competitiveness in the situations in which you've been involved. And I think all of us in this country appreciate that more than anything else. And I would hope our basketball team reflects those same ideals as you have during the time you've been here in the Presidency. Thank you very much for giving us that.

For the past 100 years, the Interstate Commerce Commission, the first independent administrative agency, has been responsible for regulatory oversight of our surface transportation system. For a century, the Commission has carried out its missions with dedication and with commitment to a national surface transportation system second to none. The Commission's role in regulating transportation has changed constantly and is changing even now; regulation by government is giving way to regulation by market competition, and both the transportation industry and the consumer are better off as a result.

President John F. Kennedy once said of Canada and the United States that: ``Geography has made us neighbors. History has made us friends. Economics has made us partners. And necessity has made us allies.'' Well, tomorrow I'll be headed north to visit the people of Canada and to hold 2 days of meetings with Prime Minister Brian Mulroney. As neighbors, allies, partners, and friends, we've got much to discuss.

As nearby neighbors, the environment has always been a high priority for both our countries. Since the 1909 Boundary Waters treaty, Canada and the United States have worked together to protect border lakes, rivers, and streams. We can be proud of what we've accomplished on this account, especially in protecting the Great Lakes, and this year we'll determine if more needs to be done. Air pollution, another major environmental concern, has diminished in North America since the U.S. passed the pioneering Clean Air Act of 1970.

However, Canada and the United States continue to worry about the consequences of acid rain. In March 1986 Prime Minister Mulroney and I endorsed the report of our special envoys on this problem, and last month I directed our administration to undertake three major steps to carry out the envoys' proposals.

The first is to seek the full government funding recommended by the envoys -- $2.5 billion over 5 years -- for demonstration of innovative pollution control technology. Industry will be encouraged to invest at least as much during the same period. Second, the Secretary of Energy is in the process of establishing a panel -- with participation by the Environmental Protection Agency, the State governments, the private sector, and the Government of Canada -- to advise him on pollution control projects. Third, I've also asked the Vice President to have the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief examine local, State, and Federal regulations that might inhibit the deployment of new emission control technologies and other innovative emission reduction measures. We can be grateful that on these cross-border environmental questions our two countries are working with each other, rather than against each other.

The same is certainly true when it comes to peace and security. As allies, the United States and Canadian Armed Forces are partners in NATO and in NORAD, the North American Aerospace Defense Command, as well as in peacekeeping operations around the world. The Western alliance has kept the peace these last 40 years, but it isn't without cost. The Mulroney government has pledged higher defense spending to make certain Canada is carrying its part of the load, a move which NATO and the United States Government welcome. We've also been able to count on the Mulroney government to support our efforts to reach agreements with the Soviet Union to reduce the number of nuclear weapons threatening mankind. Our consultations with Canada on this subject are thorough and frequent. Similarly, our cooperation and coordination in the fight against international terrorism stand as examples to the rest of the world.

Our record on the economic front is similarly impressive. Canada and the United States, emphasizing deregulation and invigoration of our private sectors, have recorded two of the best rates of economic growth and job creation among industrialized nations during this expansion. When it comes to economics and trade, Canada and the United States speak as partners. A full one-fifth of our foreign trade is with Canada. We are each other's largest trading partners. In fact, we have more trade with the Canadian Province of Ontario than with any other foreign nation.

Our economic relationship may already be the largest and most dynamic in the world, and we're working to make it even better. Our goal is a free trade agreement that will remove tariffs and nontariff barriers between us. Spurring U.S.-Canadian trade and investment will improve our economies and strengthen our competitive ability in world markets. Although much hard bargaining lies ahead, we are optimistic that a comprehensive plan, mutually beneficial and advantageous to both sides, can be hammered out this year.

Canada and the United States, as you see, share much more than a common border; we share a democratic tradition, and we share the hopes, dreams, and aspirations of free people. When I arrive in Canada tomorrow, I will take the best wishes of the people of the United States to our good friends the people of Canada.

Your Excellency, Nancy and I are delighted to be in Canada again. It was our privilege in the winter of 1981 to make our first foreign visit as President and First Lady to our neighbors in this proud and lovely capital city. And we still fondly remember the warm and friendly welcome we received in Quebec 2 years ago. As before, and I hope as always, we come as friends and partners, sharing similar dreams and goals for our people: peace, freedom, and prosperity. And working together, we have gone far toward making those dreams a reality.

Well, we have significant matters to discuss during our stay here. This is an important prelude to the upcoming economic summit in Venice. But I would like to emphasize, Your Excellency, that our economic relationship -- call it the business of being neighbors -- is only a small part of the future that we share. Speaking for all Americans on our side of the border, the best part for us is simply our good fortune to share this beautiful continent with the people of your great country. With that thought and with deep appreciation for your kind words of welcome, let me say: Nous sommes tres heureux d'etre ici parmi des amis [We are very happy to be here among friends].

The President. I know that that's been a problem for several years in the building that's been going on there, and I know that steps are constantly being taken by our people. So, I can't tell you what the situation is right now, but obviously, if there is no way to change that around, we obviously wouldn't move in, would we.

The Prime Minister. I said that's ours -- lock, stock, and iceberg. [Laughter] I think that's a question of sovereignty, and that's our position. I've discussed it with the President before, and that position will be unchanged at any time.

It's commonplace at gatherings such as this to reflect on our similarities, of all that we share together. Surely one such experience is that of a sense of great adventure, of opening a new land, of beginning anew and for the good of us all. Your Excellency, as pioneers of this great continent, the citizens of our two countries have shared, and continue to share, a faith in progress, a belief in cooperation and hard work, and a vision of a future free of war and want. Ours are optimistic people, ingrained with the confidence that no problem is insoluble. Together, we faced the ultimate challenge to peace and freedom during the two great world conflicts of this century. Today, in NATO and in NORAD and in our consultation at the economic summit, the G - 7, the United Nations, and a host of other cooperative endeavors, we continue to stand together for freedom and democracy and for the economic advancement of mankind.

Just as the frontier once stretched before the trappers and frontiersmen who surveyed and opened the North American Continent, today we face challenges that require courage, commitment, good sense, and intellect. As we hurtle toward the 21st century, we're confident that the future is on the side of the free and that, with God's grace, the greatest days of Canada and the United States are still ahead. Economic challenges are, of course, always present. Prosperity, economic advancement, improving the lot of large numbers of people is no easy task. Critical choices will determine if our children and grandchildren are to live well and possess the same opportunity we've enjoyed. It comes down to this: How can Canada and the United States, mature industrial powers, best meet the competition and remain the business, commercial, and industrial leaders of the 21st century?

Mr. Prime Minister, your proposal that we cooperate, that we combine and draw upon the collective energy of two economies, was bold and farsighted. It has opened an historic prospect. Setting the goals, however, is easier than achieving them. Our intense negotiations to bring a comprehensive free trade agreement into being certainly suggest this. There is still much hard bargaining ahead, yet let us not lose sight of the grandeur of what we seek. We remain hopeful that we can conclude an agreement this year. And if we do, it will be an agreement that will promote the economic prosperity of both countries -- fair, equitable, and mutually beneficial.

This trade agreement will send a number of messages. First and foremost, it is a resounding ``no'' to those who would stand pat, to the naysayers, and to the fearful who advocate protectionist barriers. It is a resounding vote of confidence in our own abilities to meet world competition with an unleashed ingenuity, which is prized on both sides of the 49th parallel. It's an exciting idea, and it's a real possibility within our reach. It can reinforce the already impressive strength of our economic relationship. The free flow of goods, services, and investment will be an impetus to sustained economic growth, a trump card in resolving the economic difficulties of today. So, let's look forward to the day when our California wines, toasted the world over, are available throughout Canada without hindrance for your dining delight -- [laughter] -- just as Molson's Ale is available to every American table. The children of today will enjoy the fruits of our labor in many ways, not the least of which is strengthening the enduring ties between our peoples.

As two proud and independent peoples, there is much that distinguishes us one from the other, but there is also much that we share: a vast continent, with its common hardships and uncommon duties; generations of mutual respect and support; and an abiding friendship that grows ever stronger. We are two nations, each built by immigrant refugees from tyranny and want, pioneers of a new land of liberty. The first settlers of this New World, alone before the majesty of nature, alone before God, must have been thrown back on first principles, must have realized that it was only in their most basic values that they would find the wisdom to endure and the strength to triumph. And so, a dedication was formed, as hard as the granite of the Rockies, a dedication to freedom, a commitment to those unalienable human rights and their only possible guarantee: the institutions of democratic government.

A shared history, yes, but more than that, a shared purpose. It must have seemed to Churchill, besieged and isolated as he was in the one corner of Europe still clinging to freedom, that this American Continent and his two great friends and onetime colonies had been placed here by a wise and prescient God, protected between two vast oceans, to keep freedom safe. In the crisis of the moment, Churchill said it was not then time to ``speak of the hopes of the future, or the broader world which lies beyond our struggles and our victory.'' ``We must first,'' he said, ``win that world for our children.'' In a very real sense, that is still our imperative today: to win the world for our children, to win it for freedom. Today our task is not merely the survival of liberty but to keep the peace while we extend liberty to a world desperately in need. Today we still contend against war, against a foreign expansionism, and I will speak to that in a moment.

But I wish first to talk about a second struggle, one that must occupy an equal place in our attentions: the struggle against the plagues of poverty and underdevelopment that still ravage so much of mankind. Our two nations have committed many resources to that struggle, but we have it within our power at this moment to take an historic step toward a growing world economy and an expanding cycle of prosperity that reaches beyond the industrialized powers even to the developing nations. We can lead, first, by our powerful example, specifically by the example of Prime Minister Mulroney's farsighted proposal to establish a free trade agreement that would eliminate most remaining trade barriers between Canada and the United States.

After the allied victory over the Axis powers, America and Canada combined their efforts to help restore Europe to economic health. Those were golden years of international economic cooperation that saw the creation of GATT, which knocked down the tariff barriers that had so damaged the world economy; the International Monetary Fund; and 30 years ago last month, the creation of the Common Market. The theme that ran through it all was free and fair trade. Free and fair trade was the lifeblood of a reinvigorated Europe, a revitalized free world that saw a generation of growth unparalleled in history.

We must keep these principles fixed in our minds as we move forward on Prime Minister Mulroney's free trade proposal, a proposal that I'm convinced will prove no less historic. Already our two nations generate the world's largest volume of trade. The United States trades more with the province of Ontario alone than with Japan. United States citizens are by far the principal foreign investors in Canada, and Canadians on a per-capita basis are even greater investors in our country. This two-way traffic in trade and investment has helped to create new jobs by the millions, expand opportunity for both our peoples, and augment the prosperity of both our nations.

Prime Minister Mulroney's proposal would establish the largest free trade area in the world, benefiting not only our two countries but setting an example of cooperation to all nations that now wrestle against the siren temptation of protectionism. To those who would hunker down behind barriers to fight a destructive and self-defeating round of trade battles, Canada and the United States will show the positive way. We will overcome the impulse of economic isolationism with a brotherly embrace, an embrace, it is not too much to hope, that may someday extend throughout the Americas and ultimately encompass all free nations. We can look forward to the day when the free flow of trade, from the southern reaches of Tierra del Fuego to the northern outposts of the Arctic Circle, unites the people of the Western Hemisphere in a bond of mutually beneficial exchange, when all borders become what the U.S.-Canadian border so long has been: a meeting place, rather than a dividing line.

We recognize that the issues facing us are many and difficult. And just as this proud Parliament is watching our negotiations, so, too, is the United States Congress. A comprehensive, balanced agreement that provides open trade and investment on a comprehensive basis, an agreement in which both sides are winners -- that is our goal. Augmenting the spirit of the Uruguay trade negotiations, prelude to our economic summit in Venice this June, our free trade discussions here will be a model of cooperation to the world. Mr. Prime Minister, this will be a pioneering agreement worthy of a pioneering people, a visionary strategy worthy of the elected head of one of the world's greatest democracies. Mr. Prime Minister, we salute you, and I pledge to you now that, for our part, we shall commit ourselves and the resources of our administration to good faith negotiations that will make this visionary proposal a reality. And on this, the Canadian people and the Members of Parliament have my word.

Freedom works. The democratic freedoms that secure the God-given rights of man, and the economic freedoms that open the door to prosperity -- they are the hope and, we trust, the destiny of mankind. If free trade is the lifeblood, free enterprise is the heart of prosperity. Jobs, rising incomes, opportunity -- they must be created, day to day, through the enterprise of free men and women. We've had to learn and relearn this lesson in this century. In my own country, we have witnessed an expansion and strengthening of many of our civil liberties, but too often we have seen our economic liberties neglected, even abused. We have protected the freedom of expression of the author, as we should; but what of the freedom of expression of the entrepreneur, whose pen and paper are capital and whose profits and whose literature is the heroic epic of free enterprise, a tale of creativity and invention that not only delights the mind but has improved the condition of man, feeding the poor with new grains, bringing hope to the ailing with new cures, vanquishing ignorance with wondrous new information technologies.

In the United States we have found a new consensus among members of both parties in a reformed tax structure that lowers tax rates and frees the spirit of enterprise of our people. Today that consensus is broadening as your great free-market nation seeks to back the first principles of economic growth through rate-reducing tax reform. We've seen movements in Germany and Japan, as well, to cut tax rates. But this must be only the beginning, for what is simply beneficial to us is a matter of the most dire necessity to the nations and peoples of the developing world. And this is the second great example that, together, we offer to the nations of the world in desperate economic need. For the poorer, the more desperate their condition, the more urgently they need the growth that only economic freedom can bring.

We have seen time and again the healing, invigorating effects of economic freedom. Tax rate cuts lifted both Germany and Japan out of postwar stagnation and into the forefront of the world economy. Low tax rates catapulted the nations of the Pacific Basin out of the Third World, making them major economic partners today. A recent study prepared for our government found a direct relationship between the high tax rates and other statist policies of many underdeveloped countries and a cycle of deepening poverty and despair. On the other hand, the study found that countries with low tax rates and free market policies are among the fastest growing in the world, providing improved living standards and increased opportunity for all their people.

We apply the principles of economic freedom at home; we should not export central planning and statist economics abroad. When the Holy Father came to this country, he spoke of the moral obligation of the wealthier nations to share with those less fortunate. Well, it's time to take up that challenge. Both our countries have been generous donors of foreign aid, and that's important. But our own experience, the experience of this century, has shown that the only effective way to share prosperity is to share the conditions that generate prosperity. History has proven beyond a shadow of a doubt that statism spreads poverty; it is only freedom that begets wealth. And free markets, low tax rates, free trade -- this is the most valuable foreign aid we can give to the developing nations of the Third World. These are the weapons of peace we must deploy in the struggle to win a future of liberty for mankind. So many have come to Canada and the United States in hope; let us now give that hope to the world.

Throughout our history, our two nations have keenly felt our international responsibilities. Instrumental in founding and maintaining the NATO alliance, through cooperative efforts in NORAD [North American Aerospace Defense Command], Canada has taken a leading role in defense of the free world. And meanwhile, we have cooperated in extending every effort to lessen the dangers of a nuclear-armed world. Over the past 6 years, the United States, working closely with Canada and our other allies, has sought to achieve deep reductions in Soviet and American nuclear arms. Thanks to the firmness shown by the alliance, we are moving toward a breakthrough agreement that would dramatically reduce an entire class of weapons: American and Soviet longer range, intermediate-range, INF missiles in Europe and Asia.

We've traveled far to get here, from past treaties that only codified the nuclear buildup, to the point where we may soon see the dismantling of thousands of these agents of annihilation. We're hopeful, we're expectant, but we face many difficulties still. As our negotiators continue to work toward a sound agreement, we are not going to abandon our basic principles or our allies' interests for the sake of a quick fix, an inadequate accord. We will work for truly verifiable reductions that strengthen the security of our friends and allies in both Europe and Asia, and that cannot be circumvented by any imbalance in shorter range INF systems. In short, America will stand where she has always stood: with her allies in defense of freedom and the cause of peace.

The President.  --  -- offering a more stable and secure environment as we pursue our goal of deep reductions in nuclear weapons. We must move away from a situation of mutual assured destruction -- so aptly called MAD, the MAD policy. We need defensive systems that threaten no one, that would save human lives instead of targeting them. We must remember that the Soviet Union has spent 15 times as much on strategic defenses as we have over the last 10 years, while their record of compliance with existing arms treaties continues to be a cause for concern. Most people do not understand that mutual assured destruction has left our populations absolutely defenseless. This is an intolerable situation. The truly moral course is to move forward quickly with a new strategy of peace based not on the ability to threaten lives but on our own confidence that we can save them. Let us choose a defense that truly defends.

As we've pursued better relations with the Soviet Union, we have labored to deal realistically with the basic issues that divide that nation from the free world. Our insistence that the Soviet Union adhere to its Helsinki human rights agreement is not just a moral imperative; we know that no nation can truly be at peace with its neighbors if it is not at peace with its own people. In recent months we have heard hopeful talk of change in Moscow, of a new openness. Some political prisoners have been released. The BBC [British Broadcasting Corporation] is no longer jammed. We welcome these positive signs and hope that they're only the first steps toward a true liberalization of Soviet society.

The surest sign that the Soviet Union truly wants better relations, that it truly wants peace, would be to end its global strategy to impose one-party dictatorships, allow the people of this world to determine their own futures in liberty and in peace. We have known that when people are given the opportunity to choose, they choose freedom. Truly, the future belongs to the free. In our own hemisphere we've seen a freedom tide sweep over South and Central America. Six years ago only 30 percent of the people of Latin America lived in democracies; today over 90 percent do. Around the world resistance movements are rising up to throw off the totalitarian yoke. Even in China, they debate the pace of reform, but acknowledge its necessity.

On the border between Canada and the United States stands a plaque commemorating over a century and a half of friendship. It calls the border, ``a lesson of peace to all nations.'' And that's what it is: a concrete, living lesson that the path to peace is freedom, that the relations of free peoples -- no matter how different, no matter how distinct their national characters -- those relations will be marked by admiration, not hostility. Go stand along the border at the beginning of July. You'll see the Maple Leaf and the Stars and Stripes mixed in a swirling cloud of visitors and celebrants. As a Canadian writer once put it: What's the difference between Dominion Day and July Fourth? About 48 hours. [Laughter] Yes, we have differences, disputes, as any two sovereign nations will; but we're always able to work them out, entre amis [between friends].

One area of particular concern to all Canadians, I know, is the problem of acid rain. When the Prime Minister and I met in Quebec 2 years ago, we appointed two distinguished envoys, Bill Davis and Drew Lewis, to examine the problem. They issued a joint report, which we have endorsed, and we're actively implementing many of their recommendations. The first phase of our clean coal technology program is underway, the beginning of a $6 billion commitment through 1992, and I have asked Congress for the full share of government spending recommended by the envoys, $2\1/2\ billion, for the demonstration of innovative pollution-control technologies over the next 5 years. Literally thousands of firms and millions of jobs will be affected by whatever steps we take on this problem, so there are no quick and easy answers. But working together, we have made an important start, and I am convinced that, as in the past, our disputes will bring us closer as we find a mutual accord, our differences will become only another occasion for cooperation. Let me assure you that your concerns are my concerns.

I was struck recently by the words of a Canadian -- a Hungarian-Canadian you might call him -- who came to this country, as so many before him, to escape oppression. ``I wanted to stretch,'' he said. ``I needed a place where I could move mountains or carry larger stones than Sisyphus, and here was the place for it -- nobody telling me what I'm supposed to believe as a Canadian -- gave me a kind of freedom for my mind and my spirit and my creative energies that I had never experienced before in life. And I found that for me anyhow, anything could be possible here.'' This is your Canada, and our continent. This is the chosen place in history our two nations occupy: a land where the mind and heart of man is free, a land of peace, a land where indeed anything is possible.

Let me add a word, if I can, about our discussions today on two issues of critical interest to our two countries. The Prime Minister and I agreed to consider the Prime Minister's proposal for a bilateral accord on acid rain, building on the tradition of agreements to control pollution of our shared international waters. The Prime Minister and I also had a full discussion of the Arctic waters issue, and he and I agreed to inject new impetus to the discussions already underway. We are determined to find a solution based on mutual respect for sovereignty and our common security and other interests.

Heart disease and heart attacks are the primary cause of death among Americans. Scientific research has clearly established elevated blood cholesterol as one of the three major modifiable risk factors for coronary heart disease. Research has also demonstrated the encouraging news that people can reduce their risk of heart disease by lowering high blood cholesterol.

Having blood cholesterol checked is the only way to know whether we are at high risk or not. The testing of cholesterol level is the first step toward identifying and controlling a serious condition that is a major contributor to America's number one killer.

More than 20 medical, public health, and voluntary health organizations have joined with the National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute to form the National Cholesterol Education Program. These and other organizations have endorsed ``Know Your Cholesterol'' as an educational theme of this national effort.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Jack R. Lousma to be a member of the General Advisory Committee of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency. He would succeed William Robert Graham.

The President. I just wanted to come in here to tell you that I am deeply concerned over the breach of security in our Moscow Embassy, and while all the facts are not known, it is clear that security implications are widespread and that additional quick action is required to prevent further damage to our national security. Two weeks ago, when the severity of the situation became clear, I convened a meeting of my national security advisers and ordered Frank Carlucci to immediately begin an internal assessment of the damage.

And today I want to announce some additional actions. The United States will not occupy our new embassy building in Moscow unless and until I can be assured that it is safe to move into a secure embassy environment. Likewise, the Soviet Union will not be allowed to occupy their new facility in Washington until a simultaneous move by both countries is possible.

I've instructed the Secretary of State to make embassy security a major agenda item during his upcoming talks in Moscow, and I have asked Former Defense Secretary Mel Laird to chair an assessment review panel under the general authority of the Secretary of State. In addition, I've instructed the Chairman of my Foreign Intelligence Advisory Board [PFIAB], Ambassador Anne Armstrong, to examine the procedures and practices used in our embassies worldwide to protect American facilities. I've requested that both reports from the Secretary of State and PFIAB be transmitted to me within 90 days. Specifically, both the Secretary of State and PFIAB have been tasked to evaluate the condition of our new building and ascertain whether it will ever be secure or whether it may be necessary to destroy and rebuild it.

Finally, I have instructed the Secretaries of State and Defense to recommend to me the future management of security personnel at the U.S. Embassy in the U.S.S.R. and elsewhere with respect to length of assignment, selection of personnel, and their supervision. These reports will be coordinated by the National Security Council, which shall in turn make comprehensive recommendations to me on counterintelligence and security policies, procedures, and accountability.

Q. Mr. President, Henry Kissinger said that it is humiliating for George Shultz to go to Moscow right now, that he should be meeting instead in Helsinki, perhaps, because we should not be going under these circumstances without having secure communications.

Q. Mr. President, how can you ask the Secretary of State to do business with the Soviets on arms control when they have apparently compromised the U.S. position in Moscow so badly? How can you deal with them under these circumstances?

The President. Well, I think the whole business of espionage worldwide is something that we have to recognize takes place, and counterespionage is employed by everyone. But at the same time, you don't stop doing business.

Q. Well, is this a new problem, Mr. President? Hasn't this been going on a long time, and haven't you had reports? I mean, how long have we had Soviet employees in our embassy? And we understand that you have received reports since '85.

Q. Mr. President, can I follow specifically on that? Because there was a report in '85 by your own Foreign Intelligence Advisory Board that you're calling on now for another report, and they told you that the Embassy was vulnerable and specifically called on you in '85, the spring of '85, to get rid of Soviet personnel. Yet you did nothing about it, and one of the members, H. Ross Perot, quit.

More than 80,000 Americans living today are former prisoners of war. Many of these courageous men and women were subjected for months and years to brutal and inhumane treatment by their captors, in violation of international codes and customs for the treatment of prisoners of war. Many prisoners died or were disabled; all suffered prolonged and extraordinary hardships. The members of their families also endured torment, the agony of prolonged separation or of having no word of their loved ones.

The great courage and sacrifices of American prisoners of war and their families will live in the memory of our countrymen forever. These patriots -- who served and suffered and prevailed for love of our country -- deserve every tribute from a Nation proud and solemnly grateful for their faith and their valor.

An essential part of our heritage as Americans is our free enterprise system. America's millions of small business men and women exemplify the freedoms we all have -- the freedoms to produce and create wealth as we choose, to earn and save and invest, to make opportunities for ourselves and others. Our rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness include and presuppose these rights, and our system of limited constitutional government enshrines them and protects them equally for all. We should be extremely grateful to all entrepreneurs for reminding us in their daily lives of the blessings and importance of economic freedom.

We can also be grateful for small business men and women's tremendous contributions to our economy, our competitiveness, and our entire way of life. They create wealth. They develop new products and services, enhance existing ones, offer jobs and opportunities to millions of other Americans, and help fuel our economic expansion for the benefit of all. Their innovation, initiative, and example prompt hundreds of thousands of Americans, including young people, to join their ranks and start their own small businesses each year. In just this way, through the years, have America's communities been born, our people employed, our towns and cities grown.

The creativity, confidence, and skills of small business men and women help ensure that America will continue to grow and prosper in freedom and opportunity. That is a source of great pride to every American.

The President. Well, Clayton and Ed, I want to welcome you and all the members of my Advisory Committee on Trade Negotiations to the White House today. And I know, as you've been told, I was in Canada Sunday and Monday, and I'm glad to have this opportunity to maybe give you a personal word, although I understand you had a report on our trip there.

You could tell by the reception that we got in the Canadian Parliament that a free trade agreement between Canada and the United States is an idea whose time has come. They were most enthusiastic about it. And I pledged to Prime Minister Mulroney and the people in Canada that we're going all out to make this visionary proposal a reality, not just for the prosperity and jobs it would create in both our countries but as an example to all the world that free and fair trade is the way to go, and not protectionism.

I believe in an America that can meet the challenge of the 21st century, and this means better educating our young people, better training our workers, protecting our intellectual property, reforming our antitrust laws and trade laws when necessary, and pursuing multilateral trade negotiations -- and, yes, taking tough actions to open foreign markets that are closed to American exports. We have a comprehensive plan to deal with these issues, and we believe we can achieve them. In fact, much has already been done, as Clayton knows and has been seeing that it gets done. And you've proved to be invaluable advisers to Clayton and to me on the development and execution of our trade policy.

We're here today to honor one of the great figures in American medicine and a pioneer in the field of surgery. Harvey Cushing is rightly known as the father of American neurosurgery. He was an extraordinary doctor who served on the faculties of several medical schools, such as Yale and Harvard, and was responsible for many breakthroughs in neurological surgery. Today his work is continued by the association that bore his name when it was founded: the American Association of Neurological Surgeons, a gathering of North American neurosurgeons who carry on the high professional and scientific standards that characterized his life and work.

Like the others who've been honored by the issuance of a stamp in this series, Harvey Cushing is an American who made a difference in his chosen field, a man whose professional dedication and personal genius advanced the cause of science and medicine and made a difference in the lives of countless people. And now, with the help of Postmaster General Tisch, we will unveil the stamp. And after that, Nancy and I look forward to meeting each of you shortly on the State Floor in the White House.

An agreement satisfactory to all parties has been reached with the Independent Counsel and congressional investigating committees to review the President's notes concerning the Iran-Nicaragua affair. Counsel to the President will review the President's notes from January 1, 1984 (the beginning date of the Independent Counsel's mandate) through December 19, 1986 (the date the Independent Counsel was appointed by the court). Counsel will excerpt relevant material for review by the Independent Counsel and the chairman of the House and Senate Select Committees or their designated staff. The reviewers will have full access to the typewritten excerpts and may take notes, but no copies will be allowed.

Parents and educators recognize a sacred trust to help children learn about the world in which we live, about all that has gone before, and about all that can be. This trust includes teaching our children about the whole of civilization and humanity's quest for truth, so that they will learn the great lesson that wisdom, love, decency, moral courage, and compassion, as well as technical knowledge and sharpened skills, must be part of everyone's education and everyone's lifework.

American history teaches this lesson well, and American culture, both its weaknesses and its strengths, testifies to its importance. But this lesson needs continual reinforcement. Because education is vital to our children and to the future of all Americans, we do well to call attention to the unflagging efforts of the many people who stress excellence and completeness in education. One of them is the leader of the worldwide Lubavitch movement of Hasidic Judaism, Rabbi Menachem Mendel Schneerson, whose 85th birthday falls on April 10. The Lubavitch movement has fostered teaching of the ethical values that make civilization possible and that enrich life for everyone. We can be most grateful for all who seek to endow our children with the precious heritage that others have built and preserved for us.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 9th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President announced his intention to appoint the following to be Deputy Commissioners of the United States of America on the Commission for the Study of Alternatives to the Panama Canal. These are new positions.

Well, a good afternoon, and I thank you all very much. I can't tell you how honored I am that so many of you have come out here to say hello, and let me say you have already made me feel so much at home. Now, as Henry VIII said to each of his six wives, I won't keep you long. [Laughter] No, I'll tell you, they've got a full day for me out there at the university, at Purdue, and I don't want to fall behind schedule. You see, after I leave the university, I'm heading home for California, and Nancy told me not to be late for dinner.

Well, anyway, I would like to say just a few words to you. On the way in today, being a midwesterner myself, I saw those typical midwestern farms and then your neighborhoods and your churches and schools and your city-county building with its dome. And I have to tell you, back there in those puzzle palaces on the Potomac, you can sometimes lose touch with the basic values that we're working so hard to try and defend. But coming here to Greater Lafayette has been -- well, it's kind of reminded me of a town over in Illinois. It's a town where I grew up -- Dixon, Illinois -- and where there's a little bit of my heart still there. I can see with the young people and the children that are here that this is kind of a family day, too. And you know, it was the hopes for our children that brought our forefathers to this land, and it's continued to be the thing that we strive for -- is to make this a better place and a place of freedom and hope for these next and oncoming generations. So, today our families give us strength still.

Well, I know that I have to move on and get out there to the university -- the things that are prepared there, but again, I just thank you from the bottom of my heart. If nothing else good happens on this trip, I'll go home about 3 inches taller because of this welcome out here today. Thank you very much. God bless you.

But today I've seen a great deal of Purdue, joining students in your 2-year and 4-year degree programs as they worked in a high-technology laboratory. And I can tell you, for someone who grew up in the era of slide rules, seeing all those computers and robots was one of the most amazing sights of my life. But all this high-technology equipment was being used to train students for jobs of the future. And it's just this, the need to prepare America for the challenges of the 21st century, that I have in mind in speaking to you this afternoon.

Now, it's only fitting during this National Science and Technology Week that we should begin by considering the dramatic changes that technology is already producing in the American economy. Just think, for example, that in the little town of Essex Junction, Vermont, engineers in a leading computer firm are pioneering the production of an exceptionally fast, four-megabit computer chip -- a dramatic technological advance. Or consider that within recent months historic new breakthroughs have taken place in the conducting of electricity, breakthroughs that could rival the invention of the transistor. The discovery of new superconductors, materials that conduct electricity at much higher temperatures than previously believed possible, could lead to virtual revolutions in fields ranging from communications to microelectronics.

Yes, the American economy is changing dramatically, but one question remains constant, especially among students like yourselves: the question of jobs. So, I thought I'd talk first today about how best to prepare for the jobs of the future, then move on to a point perhaps even more important: how best to promote the economic growth that leads to job creation. In preparing Americans for the jobs of the future, perhaps the first matter that comes to mind is education. There can be no doubt that, as we prepare for the 21st century, American education itself must prepare. Last month in Missouri I devoted an entire address to this issue; today let me simply restate my firm belief that to improve our nation's competitiveness in the world economy, we must strive for new standards of excellence at all levels of American education.

In primary and secondary education, your fine Governor, Bob Orr, is leading the way with his A-plus program, a program that would lengthen the school year by 10 days and increase teachers' compensation and accountability alike. And in higher education, here at Purdue you're setting an example for institutions of higher learning throughout the Nation. I've already mentioned the labs and classrooms I visited today; remarkable as they were, it's perhaps even more impressive that a large part of Purdue's technical education effort takes place off-campus at 13 sites around the State, including manufacturing plants. At an auto assembly plant in Kokomo, for example, some 170 workers are in a Purdue program to bring themselves up to date on automobile technology of decades to come. There are Purdue plant training programs at other large automotive firms as well, and soon Purdue courses will be offered to two Japanese companies that will be building a plant here in Lafayette. You at Purdue have reason to be proud, and I salute you, and I will.

You know, in job training, government, too, can play its part. It was with the jobs of the future in mind that our administration enacted the Jobs Training Partnership Act, or, as we use the initials in Washington, JTPA; the principal congressional author of which was your outstanding Senator, Dan Quayle. That program replaced an outmoded and expensive program with one that combines the efforts of Federal and local governments with those of business to make sure that workers receive practical, useful training and that public money goes to the training itself and not to overhead, to a bloated Federal bureaucracy. Today our administration has before Congress a proposal for a new billion-dollar worker adjustment program that would serve an additional 700,000 dislocated workers each year. And again, this program would spend public money well, providing workers with training early, before they exhausted their unemployment benefits.

Permit me to turn now to the deeper question, the underlying question: How can we best foster the economic growth that leads to the creation of jobs in the first place? Perhaps it would be best to begin by considering high technology and certain fears that high technology sometimes seems to instill. The computers I saw in your classrooms, the robots, and other high-tech devices -- some fear that these innovations will destroy more jobs than they create, that technology is in some way the enemy of job formation; and yet we need only look at our nation's actual experience to see that this is not so. When I was your age, high technology meant that Lindbergh made it across the Atlantic in one piece -- [laughter] -- and some 44 million Americans were employed. Yet between 1930 and 1980, a time when our nation made steady and remarkable technological progress, the American economy employed on average some 11 million more workers every decade. And to take still more recent evidence, during the economic expansion of the past 52 months, a time of technological breakthrough after breakthrough, our nation actually created over 13 million more jobs.

Could I just say something -- I don't recall the figures as of now -- but just interject something here? Back when the modern telephone with dialing and so forth came into being, and you didn't -- and most of you never perhaps knew that there was a time when you picked up the phone and an operator said, ``Number, please,'' and you told her what the number was that you wanted and so forth. And when the new dialing and everything came in, there was a great fear that jobs were going to disappear. Well, at the rate of the use of telephones today, if we were still with the old system, there aren't enough women in the United States to man those operator jobs as they did at that time.

Well, it's true that over the years adjustments have had to be made as older industries sometimes gave way to newer. But these adjustments were made, and today our nation employs some 113 million. No, technology is not the enemy of job creation but its parent, the very source of our economic dynamism and creativity. And this being the case, we must ask ourselves what conditions and policies best foster economic creativity and technological advance and, yes, the creation of jobs. In answering this, permit me first a brief overview of two decades: first, the seventies, and then our own decade of the eighties.

You'll perhaps remember that during the seventies economic policy was dominated by the Keynesian notion that the behavior of individuals operating in the marketplace had to be influenced by the Government on occasion -- in short, that government could manage the economy by raising or lowering the level of demand. In particular, it was thought that government could stimulate economic growth by inducing greater consumption and demand and enjoying Federal deficit spending. Well, all of this may sound technical, and of course there's no reason to expect that everyone here lives and breathes economic policy the way so many back in Washington do -- maybe that's one of the problems with Washington -- yet the central point is simple: Economic policy lost sight of the individual and focused instead on government. And this meant that government regulation of the economy increased. Government spending soared. In the late seventies the tax burden -- that fundamental indicator of the relationship between the Government and the governed -- the tax burden on both corporations and individuals went up.

If the Keynesian view had been correct -- if government really could, in effect, fabricate prosperity -- then, as the decade of the seventies wore on, we all would have noticed our standard of living going up. And instead, of course, just the opposite took place. The Nation that after World War II had the strongest economy in the world saw its economy falter. By 1980 inflation was raging, interest rates had reached the highest levels since the Civil War, and the standard of living was actually in decline. Government had had its chance. There's only one word for what it produced: failure. And then, beginning in 1981, our administration worked to restore the individual to his rightful place at the center of economic policy. Just as the old view meant the expansion of government, so our view meant reducing government, or at least slowing its growth. We cut tax rates. We scaled back Federal regulations -- 30,000 pages of them. We slowed the growth of government spending. And last year we enacted a sweeping tax reform, reducing rates on corporations and cutting the top tax rate for individuals to the lowest level in half a century.

But getting back to the economy -- [laughter] -- in the view of one academic who does understand present-day realities, the noted management expert Peter Drucker, today's economic expansion represents nothing less than ``an incredible achievement.'' So, what the economic policy of the past 6 years has achieved can be stated in one single, sweet word: success. Today the distinction between what we have and what we know, between merely material resources and the ultimate resource, knowledge, is becoming increasingly important.

Our administration is proposing to establish a number of science and technology centers around the Nation, and these will focus on those areas of science that directly contribute to America's economic competitiveness. And they'll help to ensure that when it comes to technological leadership, America in the next century will continue in its role as a world leader. And to give our children basic knowledge of science and technology, our administration is beginning a campaign for scientific literacy. It will include, among many items, internships in Federal labs for promising students and aid to schools on all levels to buy scientific equipment and computers. Isn't it time that we made sure that America's young minds are ready for the 21st century? [Applause] Technology and the 21st century -- as we consider the prospect, we face yet another deep question: What do we want to accomplish with our new technological abilities? Certainly we want to go on creating jobs, and of course we want to continue the partnership between government and the private sector, like the partnership in our Jobs Training Partnership Act. But what else? What might we accomplish if we truly let our minds and hearts soar?

Our administration has attempted to provide one important answer. In the realm of defense, with our Strategic Defense Initiative, or SDI, we're -- [applause] -- well, I sensed a little disagreement there, but let me cover that. We're attempting to replace the situation of mutual assured destruction, called the MAD policy, with a defense that truly defends. Wouldn't it be worth every effort if we could use our technology to free the world from the dread threat of nuclear weapons? [Applause] Just so there is no doubt, that mutual assured destruction policy, that is one in which both sides have agreed that the deterrent to a war is the threat that if either one pushes the button someday the other one will push the button and both sides will get destroyed.

Well, there are other answers, other ways to use our technology to build a better life for ourselves and all mankind. But those answers will have to come from generations other than my own. As you work out your own destiny, those answers will have to come from you. And now in closing, well, I've been thinking back to my own college days ever since I got here, and I wonder whether you'd permit me a moment's journey down memory lane? If you can stretch your imaginations back this far, my own college days happen to fall during the Great Depression. I had to work my way through college. As a matter of fact, I had one of the best jobs I've ever had while I was doing that: washing dishes in the girls dormitory. But seriously, those were days when announcements telling people not to leave home looking for work, because there was none, were made on the radio. Well, when I got my diploma, unemployment was around 25 percent.

Yet here we are just half a century later, and we Americans are enjoying a standard of living undreamed of when I was your age. As for jobs -- well, as I said a moment ago, employment during these past 50 years has increased by some 65 million. The potential employment pool is defined -- and perhaps you don't know this -- is defined as everyone 16 years and up, male and female. That is the potential employment pool. And this year, the highest percentage of that potential pool in history has jobs. Across the Nation, Americans are living longer, healthier lives. I've already lived some two decades longer than my life expectancy when I was born. That's a source of annoyance to a number of people. [Laughter] And look at the technological marvels that we take for granted that didn't even exist back then: computers, space flights, high technology classrooms and laboratories like the ones I saw today.

But I guess what I'm trying to say is this: If our nation has made all these tremendous advances during my lifetime, from the flight of Charles Lindbergh to the flights of Neil Armstrong and Eugene Cernan, then the only limits for your own generation will be the limits of your own imaginations. So, have faith. Place your trust in the enduring values, in the beliefs that have sustained Americans through two centuries and raised our nation to greatness: God, the family, and freedom. And know that in your own minds and hearts, in your own capacity for wonder and imagination, therein lies the true economy. In this land of freedom, my friends, you only have to dream great dreams, then do your best to make them come true.

The President. I have a statement here about the budget. As you know, it's been on the floor of the Congress for the House. There's an old saying: ``If it ain't broke, don't fix it.'' Well, in the case of the congressional budget and appropriations process, it hasn't ever been fixed enough to be broken. Today we've witnessed the efforts by the House Democrats to meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets, but it's just business as usual: cuts in defense that potentially threaten our national security and passing the buck to the American taxpayers to pay for their excesses. It's time for Congress to admit that the process hasn't worked, and it's time for something that's enforceable, credible, and reliable. And I call on the Congress to recognize their process for what it is -- out of control and ready to be fixed -- and that we should work together to meet that goal. But at least one thing: they voted today, we were defeated. They voted on that so-called budget that came out of the committee in the House. But I'm pleased to say that 173 Republican House Members, the total number, plus 19 Democrats, voted against that budget. They lost 230 to 192, but I was pleased with the turnout that we had there.

Q. Mr. President, you have said in the past on the subject of a budget summit that you would wait until you saw what the other side had to offer. You have some indication of that. Just how do you want to work together with the Democrats now?

The President. Well, I heard them in the debate yesterday on the floor, as it was covered by the news, saying that they had submitted a budget but we hadn't. Well, I understand under the procedures that are proper the President presents the budget, which I had done. But they were complaining because the Democratic Members -- or the Republican Members of Congress had not submitted a budget of its own. Well, I would think that this indicates that maybe the Republican Members of the Congress thought that we'd presented a proper budget, and I think we have.

The President. Certainly, it can, yes. And we, I think, have been more right with our prediction of figures and so forth than they have. And we believe the budget we submitted was within the targets, would have met the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings goals, and would have done so without new taxes.

The President. Well, there are some details also around the edge that have never been negotiated at all which have to do, for example: If you're going to eliminate the intermediate-range, what are you going to do about the short missiles which, again, in which they have a great superiority in Europe.

The President. Well, let me just say, because you all have called out so many questions on that subject, let me just give you something I jotted down here. I'm not going to comment on the reports in today's newspapers. For reasons you'll all understand, I cannot and will not comment on United States intelligence activities. Nonetheless, I can say that what the Soviets did to our Embassy in Moscow is outrageous, and we have protested strongly. And we're conducting a full investigation and will take whatever corrective action is necessary, because our diplomatic establishments can and must be secure from Soviet spying.

The nations of the Americas enjoy a rich cultural and historical diversity, yet are bound together by a common dedication to the principles of democracy; to respect for the rights of the individual; and to the opportunity to enjoy creative, productive, and prosperous lives. Pan American Day each year has served to remind us of these mutual goals.

The Organization of American States is the forum in which our governments labor to make these ideals and aspirations a reality in our daily lives. For decades, the Inter-American System has been utilized across a broad range of common concerns: to maintain the peace throughout this Hemisphere; to encourage both political and economic freedom for every citizen; to promote development and provide opportunity for both men and women, of all races and all creeds; and to defend the human rights of all against repression and threats to their dignity.

The Organization has a truly remarkable record as a defender, and a beacon, for all peoples whose rights have been trampled upon and denied, especially for the peoples of this Hemisphere. It has now taken up the challenge against yet another menace -- drug abuse and trafficking -- that threatens the future of our children, the well-being of our peoples, and even the stability of our governments. The newly created Drug Abuse Control Commission offers a common meeting place where all of us can join forces to defeat this latest enemy to freedom and democracy.

On September 2 of this year, the nations of the Americas will celebrate the fortieth anniversary of the signing of the Inter-American Treaty of Reciprocal Assistance, in which they pledged to preserve their security. This Rio Treaty, born of the totalitarian threat to the region before and during World War II, has been strengthened ever since by resolute defense, against repeated attacks, of our common determination that this Hemisphere shall be a land of liberty.

This is a time when the vision of democracy and freedom in all our countries, to which we are committed in the Charter of our Organization, shines forth as never before. So Pan American Day of 1987 is an especially welcome occasion for the people of the United States of America to extend a warm and fraternal hand to our neighbors in the Americas. We renew our commitment to the spirit of hemispheric solidarity, to the purposes of the Inter-American System, and to the Organization of American States as the embodiment of our high aspirations for this Hemisphere.

The President. Thank you, Bill, and thank all of you. It's wonderful to be back here in home territory. Yesterday, on the way here, I stopped at Purdue University and addressed the student body there. One part of the occasion was the fact that it was the hundredth anniversary of the Purdue band, and I had to explain to the young people there, I had not heard the first band when it played. [Laughter] But I'm delighted to be here today to talk with you about the current state of Soviet-American relations. And before I do that, I want to say something about the recent disclosures of Soviet espionage against the United States Embassy in Moscow. There's no excuse for what they did or for the way security was handled in Moscow.

We have adopted a framework for dealing with the Soviets. We have insisted that progress must proceed in four critical areas: first, the pursuit of verifiable and stabilizing arms reduction, with an emphasis on verifiable; second, negotiated solutions to regional conflicts; third, the advance of human rights; and fourth, expanded contacts between our peoples. This agenda represents a consistent, long-term policy reflecting our moral values, our strategic interests, and our commitments to our friends and allies. It's not based on false hopes or wishful thinking about the Soviets; it's based on a candid assessment of Soviet actions and long-term understanding of their intentions.

I can report that in some areas of this four-part agenda, we have seen movement and progress. Take arms reduction. At our two meetings -- our fireside summit in Geneva and our Hofdi House discussions in Reykjavik -- Mr. Gorbachev and I took some significant steps forward. We cleared away obstacles and came closer to historic agreements on reducing strategic nuclear weapons and intermediate-range nuclear missiles. In the months that followed Reykjavik, progress was slower than I had hoped, but in recent weeks the Soviets have shown new seriousness. A breakthrough in the talks on intermediate-range missiles is now a distinct possibility.

Then there is human rights. Here, too, we see some positive developments. Andrei Sakharov has been released from internal exile and allowed to speak his mind. Some political prisoners have been released. Emigration figures for March and April so far are up. There is talk of changes in Soviet laws. There is talk of a less centralized approach to the Soviet economy, giving more scope to individual initiative. We'll see if these talks amount to anything. In the area of bilateral exchanges, we have reached agreement on expanded Soviet-American contacts. Cultural, scientific, and civilian exchange programs have shown a dramatic increase since Geneva.

But to cite all this is not to be unrealistic or to lose the wider context. Serious issues remain. For example, in arms negotiations, verification remains a critical problem because of the poor record of their compliance with previous agreements. Nor have the Soviets abandoned their basic strategy of trying to use these negotiations to divide our allies and friends in Europe and Asia from the United States. Our allies' concerns are central. We cannot permit the benefit of the reduction in longer range INF [intermediate-range nuclear forces] missiles, for example, to be undermined or circumvented by a continuing imbalance in shorter range INF missiles, in which the Soviets have a huge advantage. Let me say again: The United States will continue to consult closely with its allies, and we will not sacrifice their vital interests just to sign an agreement.

Unfortunately, too, the Soviets are still trying to stifle the Strategic Defense Initiative. I've made some very forthcoming proposals about not deploying strategic defenses for a period of time, while we and the Soviets negotiate on a cooperative transition to a new kind of strategic balance, one that deters by protecting human lives instead of threatening them. Mr. Gorbachev himself recently criticized the balance of terror as a strategy for keeping the peace and urged that nuclear doctrines become truly defensive. Well, I agree with him. Peace based on strategic defenses that can absorb and blunt an attack, coupled with radical reductions in offensive missiles -- that is the safest course of all.

As I said after our Geneva summit, meetings between our leaders are not a favor that one side does for the other. But they can be helpful. And in this connection, my invitation to Mr. Gorbachev to come to America still stands. The welcome mat is still out.

Unfortunately, the news on the one missing item on our agenda is not good. I refer to the problem of military conflicts in regions of the developing world, where the facts of Soviet action are brutal, a danger to peace and our future relations. Despite a claimed desire for peaceful settlement of these conflicts, despite announcements of cease-fires and talk of ``national reconciliation,'' Soviet troops continue to wage a terrible war against the people of Afghanistan. The military threat to our friend Pakistan escalates in a way that carries the risk of larger confrontation. In Ethiopia, Angola, and Cambodia, the Soviet Union continues to support brutal wars of Leninist regimes against their own peoples. In Nicaragua we see such a campaign on our own shores, threatening destabilization throughout Central America and denying the Nicaraguan people their right to determine their own future.

The world will no longer accept this policy of global expansionism. In the last few years we've seen a new trend -- the spread of democracy from Latin America to the Philippines along with a worldwide revolution in economic thinking -- a trend toward political and economic freedom as a means of nurturing economic growth and human progress in the developing world. The United States remains pledged to sustaining this movement toward greater personal liberty and national self-determination and to resisting attempts to reverse it.

Recently there've been signs that the Soviet Union may be seeking a diplomatic way out of its war in Afghanistan. The Soviet Union should know the United States seeks no strategic advantage in Afghanistan, but it should also know that no political settlement will work unless it removes Soviet troops promptly and completely and allows the Afghan people genuine self-determination. The role of the resistance alliance is growing, and we shall continue to support it. We'll support any just settlement that leads to a truly independent and neutral Afghanistan and that meets the needs of the free Afghan people. Similarly, Soviet-bloc military and economic assistance to the Sandinista regime in Nicaragua reached an unprecedented billion dollars last year; the quantities and sophistication of weapons deliveries have reached dangerous levels. We have the right -- indeed, the obligation -- to support our friends in this hemisphere against this blatant intervention. Soviet conduct here will be a litmus test of our relationship.

In Angola, too, we see an escalating Soviet and Cuban military commitment in the vain quest for a military victory. We call for a political solution and for the speedy removal of Fidel Castro's 35,000 Cuban mercenaries from Angola. Cambodia is another tragic example of aggression and occupation, imposed by Vietnam and backed by the U.S.S.R. The Cambodian people have suffered enough; it's time for genuine self-determination and peace in Cambodia.

Now, what is our agenda today? Well, let me be very specific: First, the bleeding wound of Afghanistan must be healed. I challenge the U.S.S.R. to set a date this calendar year when it will begin the withdrawal of Soviet troops on a speedy schedule. Second, I challenge the Soviets to join us in moving ahead on an intermediate-range nuclear missile that enhances overall security and military stability. The issues of verification and shorter range INF systems must be resolved in a way that protects allied security interests. And third, I challenge them to join us in a mutual 50-percent cut in our strategic nuclear arsenals in a way that strengthens stability. Our SDI program should not stand in the way of such a cut, any more than the longstanding Soviet strategic defense programs stand in the way. Fourth, I challenge the Soviets to join us in seeking a safer strategic balance by relying less on mutual offensive threats and more on defensive systems that threaten no one. And finally, it's time to resolve the issue of emigration -- decisively. It's time for substantially liberalized emigration policies and broader freedoms for those Jews, Christians, and people of other faiths who choose to stay in the Soviet Union. And if this happens, we'll respond.

When the United States rebuilt its alliances and military strength and stood firm with the Soviets, some found this provocative. When the United States made substantive arms proposals, others said our refusal to instantly forsake them showed intransigence. And when the United States spoke for freedom and the conscience of mankind in the face of totalitarian aggression or human rights abuses, some criticized such affirmations as jeopardizing delicate negotiations. When we made clear our position on SDI and held to it at Reykjavik, there were those who feared the end of arms reduction efforts.

Well, what I think we've been taught by the last 6 years -- what I think we need to remember now -- is that establishing an environment where tensions are lessened demands realism and a willingness to stand by our values and commitments in the face of threats, walkouts, and woeful predictions. We need to remember, too, that voices of panic or accommodation disrupt the careful pursuit of peace when, in their rush to sign an agreement or initial a treaty, they lose sight of justice and world freedom as the goals of American foreign policy.

So, I believe our negotiating progress can be traced to being forthright in our public pronouncements. When I first took office and throughout these 6 years, I have been candid about Soviet ideology and intentions. I did not seek to be unnecessarily antagonistic, only to acknowledge one of history's gravest lessons: that the first object of aggressive powers is to inhibit the will of potential adversaries, to make free nations think that public utterances of the truth or moral protests about aggression are themselves acts of belligerence. And history teaches that when, in the name of peace, free nations acquiesce to such subtle intimidations, the collapse of their own self-respect and freedom follows closely behind. History so often shows that conflict results from miscalculation by aggressive powers who misjudge the will of democratic nations to resist.

Candor and realism about the Soviets have helped the peace process, because it is not only an essential affirmation of our own moral stamina, it's a signal to our Soviet counterparts that any compulsion to exploit Western illusions must be resisted because such illusions no longer exist. Now, ladies and gentlemen, I've often spoken of freedom as the fresh and rising tide of the future. To speak so is not to threaten any people or nation; it is only to renew mankind's most sacred hope and oldest dream: a world where material wants are satisfied, where human freedom is enshrined, and peace and fellowship among nations prevail. Those goals should be celebrated and those truths should be pursued with no apologies to anyone.

I have to close with something I told the young people at Purdue yesterday. It came to me in a letter, and it was a man making the statement that you could go to Japan and live there; you could not become Japanese. You could go to Turkey and live there and not become a Turk; or to Greece and not become a Greek; or France and not become a Frenchman. But anyone from any corner of the world can come to America and become an American. And it's time perhaps we all understood it.

Mr. Haddad. Yes, sir. Thank you, thank you very much for your address today, and thanks for agreeing to our question-and-answer period. Ladies and gentlemen, we've asked also the news media to participate. They have done so by giving us some written questions. But I think most of them will come from the members of the Council. Let's take a first one from the news media because it reflects directly on what you've just told us, sir.

Q. Secretary General Gorbachev today said that the Soviets are willing to negotiate an agreement on the shorter range nuclear weapons at the same time as the INF talks are underway. Does this remove any obstacle in those talks?

The President. Well, I think it states something that we ourselves believe, and that is when he says ``at the same time.'' We have never believed in the linkage of those two weapon systems together, but we have believed that the negotiations should be simultaneous, because they have a preponderant -- I'm pleased to hear him say that -- they have a preponderant advantage in the short-range weapons, much greater than we would have to offer as a deterrent on the other side.

The President. Well, we have been doing some things about that. We have been working -- first of all, it took me 3 years in the economic summit to persuade our trading allies there, those other six nations, to agree to a total review of the GATT system -- that is the general tariff treaty that governs our trade between our countries. And that is going to take place, a meeting on that, very shortly.

We have also -- for the first time, our administration has invoked the 301. Now, the 301 is a thing available to business and industry, that if a company or an industry here believes it is being unfairly treated in competition -- the other side dumping their product here at less than the cost of production or subsidizing them unfairly and so forth or putting obstacles in the way of our trade, our product being received in their country -- heretofore, and before the last 6 years, the businesses themselves had to raise that issue and charge a violation of 301. Well, we haven't been waiting for them. From where our vantage point is in government, where we've seen what we think are violations of 301, we have been bringing the charge against the other country and the other industries.

We don't believe that protectionism is the answer to our problem. Incidentally, the increase in our deficit of trade -- our imbalance of trade and more imports than exports -- has been brought about by the value of our dollar, which now has been redressed quite considerably. But it made our product too expensive and made their products too advantageous price-wise for our consumers to ignore, because our money was worth so much more. But, as I say, that has been partly redressed, but we still have a long way to go. We are still continuing.

But I have lived long enough to know that protectionism of the kind that I have already vetoed once -- and will veto again if the same kind of legislation comes up -- is not the answer. We tried that back in 1930 with a thing called the Smoot-Hawley tariff, and we thus spread worldwide the Great Depression that had involved our nation at that time.

Thank you. The gentleman describes himself as a high school student, and he's afraid of a lot of things he's hearing about today -- afraid of bombs and afraid of the possibility of war and so forth and afraid of not being told the truth. What would you say to a young high school student?

The President. Tell you the truth. We have a system of deterrence right now that is called mutual destruction. And what it is -- the nickname for it is the MAD policy, mutual assured destruction -- that we and the Soviet Union try to keep within range of each other, and this includes our NATO allies, who look to us for that nuclear umbrella -- it's part of the NATO alliance -- and the idea that we both have such horrible weapons of such power that if either one pushes the button, then there is a retaliation, and the retaliation would be so severe and so great that the other side would have no gain out of their assault.

Well, to me, I think that's, first of all, immoral. And I think that we're violating what was a moral principle even in war previously. We used to meet in Geneva -- the countries of the world -- and have rules of warfare in which we protected the noncombatants from being victims of warfare -- that you did not injure or did not attack and endanger noncombatants, the innocent. Now we are assuring our safety with weapons that were designed to wipe out everyone, including the noncombatants. I think it's immoral, and that's why we're promoting SDI. I came up with that idea, and I submitted it to the Joint Chiefs of Staff one afternoon at my office and said: Is it possible that we could research and find a weapon that could destroy those missiles before they reached their target, as they came out of the silos? They said they thought such a thing could be done, and we embarked on that program. We've made great breakthroughs; it shows great promise.

And I have also said, and said to Mr. Gorbachev, that if and when we have established that we have such a defensive weapon, in return for the elimination, ultimately, of all nuclear weapons, we'll share it with them. We'll share it with anyone, so that we all have a defense in case some day there comes a madman like a Hitler. And we all know how to make those weapons, so we can't be sure that some day someone won't try. But if we all have a foolproof defense -- but I think it calls for doing what we're doing right now -- negotiating, even piecemeal, in trying to get a reduction and start on the path leading to ultimate elimination of nuclear weapons.

Q. Mr. President, King Hussein has been getting a favorable response in Western Europe to his proposal for an international peace conference on the Middle East. Such a conference would include the Soviet Union and the Palestinians. Does the U.S. now support such a conference, and will the King be coming to Washington?

The President. We have been working, ourselves -- this idea -- we can't ignore the fact that so far Israel, and with some justice, opposes the idea of the participation of the two countries you named, because both of them still deny the right of Israel to exist as a nation. They say it has no right to even exist. Until they are willing to abide by, well, U.N. rules 242 and 338, as Egypt did, and agree that Israel has a right to exist as a nation, then I think that we would join also. We are not opposed to the idea of an international meeting to try and bring together those warring nations -- the Arab bloc and Israel -- and remove that threat once and for all from the Middle East.

The President. God bless you. [Laughter] I'm glad to have that question. [Laughter] To reduce the national debt, of course, requires balancing the budget and stopping the deficit spending that is going on. We have been trying to do that with the budgets that we've submitted over these last few years. When I hear some of our opponents complaining that I am responsible for the present deficits, I get a little annoyed, because if we had been given the budget that I asked for in 1982, the cumulative deficits through 1986 would be $207 billion less than they turned out to be.

What we have to have is a recognition, first of all, of what a great many States have and what California has in its constitution, and that is a clause in the United States Constitution that says there must be a balanced budget; there can be no deficit spending. So far, that came close. We lost by one vote in the Senate in the last go-around. The House defeated it by a bigger margin, but in the Senate -- to have a constitutional amendment that would bring this about.

The second thing is -- and oh, how I want this, I had it for 8 years here in California as Governor -- forty-three Governors today have the right of line-item veto. And I want to give you a little proof of how it works. I line-item vetoed 943 times in the 8 years I was in Sacramento. I was never overridden once, because in our budgeting process it takes two-thirds of the legislature to approve the budget to begin with and only takes two-thirds to override a veto. Isn't it strange that the same people, by a two-thirds margin, would vote for certain items in the budget where they were just buried in there with everything else, but when you took it out by itself and exposed it and they had to vote for it all on its own, they wouldn't do it. So, this we need. It's one of the greatest things we must have.

Thank you. The gentleman asked a question on the recent espionage -- the Pollard case and the most recent news involving the Marines. What does he attribute this breakdown in patriotism, apparently, among some of our citizens?

The President. Oh. Well, I thought I was going to get a question on that subject some place, and so I just made a little note for myself that if it did come along, what I wanted to answer: that yesterday I characterized the Soviet invasion of our premises as outrageous -- and that stands -- and I can't seriously believe that the Soviets are charging us with immorality in light of what has happened. For obvious reasons I cannot and will not comment on alleged U.S. intelligence activities, although I do note that the timing of the Soviet so-called revelations is curious, coming right after our protest on their activities in Moscow. U.S. intelligence activities are subjected to rigorous oversight. We have laws and Executive orders that regulate them. They're also subject to close scrutiny by the Congress through Select Committees on Intelligence and through the appropriations process. Now, you can't go further in discussing intelligence or counterintelligence than that.

But, again, you were pointing directly to the young men there. I tell you, this has been a severe blow to many of us. We have in our military today the highest percentage of high school graduates ever in our history, and it's a volunteer army. There are three intelligence brackets in the military by which jobs and so forth and assignments are determined. We have the highest number in the top percentage of intelligence that we have ever had. And yet suddenly we can see this violation of orders against fraternization and then what was outright selling -- and so forth -- out our country. And it's hard to explain. I can't believe it's widespread, and yet I'm going to share with you a concern that I have. I've been very concerned, and we've been trying to do something about, value-free education. And I can't help but wonder, are we now seeing the fruit of education that predominantly throughout our country has stopped performing any teaching on the basis of moral principles or what is right or what is wrong.

Mr. Haddad. We have time for just two more questions. One from the press here: Could you comment, sir, on the issue of tariffs on microchips from Japan, and what is being done to preserve the excellent relations between the United States and Japan during this time of severe trade friction?

The President. Well, we are trying to preserve those relations. And very shortly I will have a visitor, Yasu Nakasone, their Prime Minister, who I must tell you has been -- in fact, he has endangered his own political standing in his country because of his willingness to meet with us and try to eliminate some of the barriers to trade that they have erected.

This thing was a violation of an agreement signed 7 months ago in which we found there was a market denied to our microchips in their country at the same time that they were dumping, not only here but in other countries, their microchips in an effort to get the market at a subsidized price that was less than the cost of production. We therefore have -- and, yes, in the nature of protectionism in that particular area -- have issued an ultimatum of certain things -- tariff steps and so forth that we're going to take on just certain specific items having to do with that kind of technology unless they change this order of theirs, and then we will remove the embargo that we're going to put on. We feel that we have to do that.

And I'm looking forward to the meeting with Prime Minister Nakasone. As I say, he has been most helpful. But their whole tradition has been one of the barring of things in their markets; for example, allowing an American product to be sold, only it couldn't be advertised in their language. So, the Japanese would see the ad, but they couldn't read -- [laughter] -- what the print said. And we've gotten corrections of a great many of those things, and they have become a very fine partner of ours in international relations, and an ally at the economic summits. And so, I have to be optimistic about what we can accomplish there. They are our second largest trading partner; Canada is the first.

The President. Well, as I said, it's very difficult to speak openly and publicly about things we do. But let me just say, we aren't ignoring anything in our investigation of the space problem, and we're determined to go ahead with it and continue with our program in the next decade or two of having a space station out there, because of the great good that can come from it.

Incidentally, I call to your attention with regard to that and put in a plug here. You're very shortly, I think, going to be seeing some television spots done by a private foundation -- and maybe some of you are members and supporters of it -- who are going to put spots on the air telling the American people what the space program has meant to all of us in the spinoffs -- the things that we have found even with regard to medicine, to various health devices, to even a uniform for firemen that is more protective and so forth -- that have all been spinoffs, with billions of dollars to the American people, of the shuttle program. So, we're really getting our money's worth there. And these things will be being shown to you very shortly.

In 1912, the Territory of Arizona became the forty-eighth State to join the Union. The formation of the continental United States, ``the lower forty-eight,'' was now complete. At the time, the long trail of American pioneering across the continent seemed complete as well. But in the three-quarters of a century since then, the people of Arizona have shown again and again that they have never lost the tenacity and pioneer spirit that gained them statehood. Our Nation is much the better thereby.

Arizona has always presented challenges and frontiers to those who would settle there -- Indians, missionaries, colonists, and pioneers alike. Today's Arizonans pioneer in high technology, medical research, space programs, astronomy, and many more fields of endeavor, and Americans continue to find opportunity in this beautiful State.

That beauty, from the Grand Canyon in the north to the Saguaro National Monument in the south, will forever epitomize the scenic majesty of the American West. Because the pioneer spirit of the people of Arizona continues to epitomize the American spirit, it is most fitting that every American celebrate the 75th anniversary of Arizona statehood.

Sec. 5. Technology Transfer from the Department of Defense. Within 6 months of the date of this Order, the Secretary of Defense shall identify a list of funded technologies that would be potentially useful to United States industries and universities. The Secretary shall then accelerate efforts to make these technologies more readily available to United States industries and universities.

Sec. 6. Basic Science and Technology Centers. The head of each Executive department and agency shall examine the potential for including the establishment of university research centers in engineering, science, or technology in the strategy and planning for any future research and development programs. Such university centers shall be jointly funded by the Federal Government, the private sector, and, where appropriate, the States and shall focus on areas of fundamental research and technology that are both scientifically promising and have the potential to contribute to the Nation's long-term economic competitiveness.

Sec. 8. Relation to Existing Law. Nothing in this Order shall affect the continued applicability of any existing laws or regulations relating to the transfer of United States technology to other nations. The head of any Executive department or agency may exclude from consideration, under this Order, any technology that would be, if transferred, detrimental to the interests of national security.

I believe a vigorous science and technology enterprise involving the private sector is essential to our economic and national security as we approach the 21st century. Accordingly, I have today issued an Executive order, ``Facilitating Access to Science and Technology.'' It is important not only to ensure that we maintain American preeminence in generating new knowledge and know-how in advanced technologies but also that we encourage the swiftest possible transfer of federally developed science and technology to the private sector. All of the provisions of this Executive order are designed to keep the United States on the leading edge of international competition.

Greetings from California. As you might have heard on the news, yesterday at the World Affairs Council in Los Angeles, I delivered a major foreign policy address concerning our relations with the Soviet Union. As I explained in that speech, I believe there's reason for optimism about the chances for better relations with the Soviets, but we also face some tough, contentious issues that require realism and strength of will on our part.

Secretary Shultz is leaving today for Moscow, where he will meet with Foreign Minister Shevardnadze and other high-echelon Soviet officials. In light of revelations concerning Soviet espionage activities, this meeting will be much weightier than expected. I've instructed Secretary Shultz to make Embassy security a major agenda item during his discussions with his Soviet counterpart. Recent events have made it clear that the Soviets have gone beyond the bounds of reason in their efforts to compromise the security of our current Embassy in Moscow. Unfortunately, no one is suggesting that Soviet espionage is not a fact of life, but what seems to be emerging is the picture of an intense espionage strategy that reflects a callous disregard for the consequences of such actions.

At the site of our new Embassy, sensors and listening devices have been discovered in the materials for the new building. This prompted me to announce this week that our diplomats will not be occupying our new Embassy unless and until I am assured that it is safe and secure. Likewise, the Soviets will not be permitted to move into their new Embassy in Washington, DC, until a simultaneous move can be made by both countries. What the Soviets have done is throw offtrack a bilateral process that has been moving forward since 1969, when an agreement was made, after long negotiations, about new Embassy sites. Over the years, with several of my predecessors, various agreements and understandings were reached, culminating in construction in 1977 of the new Soviet complex and 1979 of the new U.S. complex. Both the spirit and the letter of those understandings and agreements have been violated.

We do not take this lightly. I have asked former Defense Secretary Melvin Laird, under the general authority of the Secretary of State, to chair a top-level panel to investigate security at our Embassy and to give me a frank assessment. Parallel with this, my Foreign Intelligence Advisory Board, under Ambassador Anne Armstrong's leadership, will be examining security and counterintelligence procedures used at our Embassies throughout the world. Both will make reports to me through the National Security Council. The condition of our new Embassy structure in Moscow is being evaluated. A determination will be made whether our new Embassy will ever be secure or whether it's necessary for us to destroy and rebuild it. Secretary Shultz will make certain the Soviets understand that if we're to improve relations such espionage tactics are totally unacceptable.

All this is certainly in stark contrast to the openness and friendship I found on my own diplomatic mission to Canada. Sunday and Monday I visited our northern neighbors and friends. My discussions with Prime Minister Mulroney were warm and, yes, productive. We spoke seriously about the environmental challenge of acid rain, for example, and we're going to do something about it. We also discussed our current efforts to tear down barriers to commerce and establish free trade between our peoples and countries.

The enthusiastic reception I received from the Canadian Parliament suggests that a free trade agreement between Canada and the United States is an idea whose time has come. I pledged to Prime Minister Mulroney and the people in Canada that we're going all out to make this visionary proposal of the Prime Minister a reality. We'll do it for the prosperity and jobs it will create in both our countries; but just as important, it will be an example to all the world that free and fair trade, and not protectionism, is the way to progress and economic advancement. What we seek is a world where all countries treat each other with the same spirit of benevolence and trust as is true between the United States and Canada.

By April 15th millions of Americans will have filed their income tax returns, honestly and carefully fulfilling their duty as citizens. For most of us, tax day has never been what you would call a cause for celebration, but this year is different. This is the last gasp of the old Tax Code. This April 15th is the last time Americans will pay the higher, complicated rates of the old system. Starting this year, tax reform takes over: Now our tax laws are fairer, and personal income tax rates lower for most Americans. Approximately 80 percent of all taxpayers will be paying less in taxes or will be paying no taxes at all. From now on, April 15th will be a lot easier to take.

There are two stages to tax reform, two major tax rate cuts: one that started January 1st of this year, the next scheduled to take place the beginning of 1988. When tax reform is fully in effect, the personal exemption -- the deduction you take for yourself, your spouse, and every dependent in your household -- that exemption will be practically doubled. The standard deduction also increases dramatically. Our present 14-rate structure will be collapsed into only 2 rates: 15 and 28 percent. Millions of Americans with low incomes will be dropped from the Federal income tax rolls altogether. Starting this year, America has the sleekest, most modern, most competitive tax structure of all the major industrialized nations. Our economic expansion, already one of the longest on record, is being given another shot of adrenaline. That means more jobs, more growth, more prosperity for all Americans.

That's the good news. The bad news is that some in the leadership of the Democratic Party are suggesting, in effect, repealing tax reform, delaying next year's tax rate reduction and turning it into a mammoth tax increase on the American people. Some have other mischievous schemes for raising your taxes.

Let me put this in plain English: No way! Congress is proving again this year that it will simply spend every cent it takes away from the people, and then it will spend a little more. We will not break our word to the American people. There will be no tax hike; tax rate cuts will go ahead as scheduled. We're cutting tax rates in 1987 and 1988, and they're going to stay that way.

Secretary Shultz has reported to me that his meetings in Moscow covered all items on our agenda: human rights, regional issues, bilateral affairs, Soviet violations of our Embassy, and arms reductions. I am pleased to report that progress was made in each of these areas, although more clearly remains to be done.

Reaching equitable, effectively verifiable, and stabilizing arms reductions agreements has long been one of the primary objectives of my administration. The exchanges that Secretary Shultz had in this area hold promise for an agreement on intermediate nuclear forces at some point in the not too distant future. Agreements on START and space and defense will be more difficult, but we will continue our efforts in these areas. Consultations with our allies, particularly on the Soviet proposals on short-range intermediate nuclear forces, are especially important. I look forward to meeting with Secretary Shultz tomorrow, at which time I will receive a full report on the details of his Moscow meetings and his briefings with our NATO allies.

The President is pleased to announce a new policy to limit the proliferation of missiles capable of delivering nuclear weapons. The U.S. Government is adopting this policy today in common with the Governments of Canada, France, the Federal Republic of Germany, Italy, Japan, and the United Kingdom. These nations have long been deeply concerned over the dangers of nuclear proliferation. Acting on this concern, these seven governments have formulated guidelines to control the transfer of equipment and technology that could contribute to nuclear-capable missiles.

This initiative was completed only recently, following several years of diplomatic discussions among these governments. The fact that all seven governments have agreed to common guidelines and to a common annex of items to be controlled serves to prevent commercial advantage or disadvantage for any of the countries. Both the guidelines and its annex will be made available to the public.

The President wishes to stress that it is the continuing aim of the United States Government to encourage international cooperation in the peaceful use of modern technology, including in the field of space. The guidelines are not intended to impede this objective. However, such encouragement must be given in ways that are fully consistent with the nonproliferation policies of the U.S. Government. The United States, and its partners in this important initiative, would welcome the adherence of all states to these guidelines in the interest of international peace and security.

The President. I have a statement here. I have just received a full report from Secretary Shultz on his talks in Moscow and his consultations with our allies. And George, as usual, put forward our positions in Moscow with firmness and great skill. It's clear to me that the visit was very useful in advancing the dialog between our countries in a number of areas -- human rights, bilateral relations, regional issues, and arms reductions.

The contacts the Secretary had with divided families, church groups, private individuals, paid public tribute to the courage of those in the Soviet Union struggling for human rights. He made clear to the Soviet leaders that self-determination for Afghanistan and Soviet troop withdrawal were essential to peace. Important progress was made in arms reductions. On intermediate-range nuclear missiles, we've narrowed the gaps a little more. After we consult further with our allies, we may have new ideas to offer. I remain optimistic about an agreement this year. There was movement on nuclear testing talks and on a ban on chemical weapons. On strategic defensive reductions and defense in space, the talks were detailed and useful, and will intensify.

When I return to Washington, I will meet with the bipartisan congressional leadership to review this week's progress. It's my hope that the process now underway continues to move forward and that Mr. Gorbachev and I can complete an historic agreement on East-West relations at a summit meeting. And in that connection, I will consult personally with our NATO allies on further negotiations and plans. And again, I am deeply grateful to the Secretary.

Secretary Shultz. I don't say so at all. I think that we had a very good meeting in Brussels this morning and reviewed the whole process, and I think the opportunities before us -- and we have different alternative ways to go -- are all very positive.

Secretary Shultz. No, it isn't fair to say that. It's fair to say people are considering an important offer that the Soviets put on the table when I was in Moscow. And you don't just react to things like that; you think them over.

The President. I think that it -- I look forward to and am hopeful that we can have a summit. But it must be one that is carefully planned and prepared and that there must be something that we feel we can accomplish.

Secretary Shultz. Well, one was clear when I was there, that the advance teams and the communications people did a terrific job. The old ``can-do'' American spirit came out, and they provided me -- I've been to Moscow quite a few times -- with the best communications setup, the best set of confidential meeting places that I have had the experience of using. So, our guys came through.

I am today releasing the list of Japanese exports to the United States upon which tariffs are being raised, effective today, in response to Japan's inability to enforce our September 1986 agreement on semiconductor trade. I announced my intent to take these actions on March 27 after it became apparent that Japan has not enforced major provisions of the agreement aimed at preventing dumping of semiconductor chips in third-country markets and improving U.S. producers' access to the Japanese market. The health and vitality of the U.S. semiconductor industry are essential to America's future competitiveness. We cannot allow it to be jeopardized by unfair trading practices.

In my March 27 announcement, I said we would impose tariffs on $300 million in Japanese exports to the United States to offset losses suffered by American semiconductor producers as a result of the agreement not being fully implemented. The products upon which the tariffs are being raised were chosen to minimize the impact on American consumers and businesses. All these products are available from domestic or other foreign producers. These actions are being taken to enforce the principles of free and fair trade. I regret that these actions were necessary.

We will eliminate them as soon as we have firm and continuing evidence that the dumping in third-country markets has stopped and that access to the Japanese market has improved. I am encouraged by recent actions taken by the Government of Japan to improve their compliance with the U.S.-Japan semiconductor agreement. I believe the agreement is in the best interests of both Japan and the United States, and I look forward to the day when it is working as effectively as it should.

Pursuant to section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974, as amended (19 U.S.C. 2411), I have determined that the Government of Japan has not implemented or enforced major provisions of the Arrangement concerning Trade in Semiconductor Products (``the Arrangement''), signed on September 2, 1986, and that this is inconsistent with the provisions of, or otherwise denies benefits to the United States under, the Arrangement; and is unjustifiable and unreasonable, and constitutes a burden or restriction on U.S. commerce. I also have determined, pursuant to section 301 of the Act, to proclaim increases in customs duties to a level of 100 percent ad valorem on certain products of Japan in response. The tariff increases I am proclaiming shall be effective with respect to the covered products of Japan which are entered on and after April 17, 1987. I am taking this action to enforce U.S. rights under a trade agreement and to respond to the acts, policies and practices of the Government of Japan with respect to the Arrangement.

In the Arrangement, the Government of Japan joined the Government of the United States in declaring its desire to enhance free trade in semiconductors on the basis of market principles and the competitive positions of the semiconductor industries in the two countries. The Government of Japan committed: (1) to impress upon Japanese semiconductor producers and users the need aggressively to take advantage of increased market access opportunities in Japan for foreign-based semiconductor firms; and (2) to provide further support for expanded sales of foreign-produced semiconductors in Japan through establishment of a sales assistance organization and promotion of stable long-term relationships between Japanese purchasers and foreign-based semiconductor producers. Finally, both Governments agreed that the expected improvement in access to foreign-based semiconductor producers should be gradual and steady over the period of the Arrangement.

Although the Government of Japan has taken some steps toward satisfying these obligations, they have been inadequate; foreign-based semiconductor producers still do not have access in that market equivalent to that enjoyed by Japanese firms.

In the Arrangement, the Government of Japan also committed: (1) to prevent ``dumping'' through monitoring of costs and export prices of semiconductor products exported from Japan; and (2) to encourage Japanese semiconductor producers to conform to antidumping principles. Again, the Government of Japan has taken steps toward satisfying these obligations, but they have been inadequate.

Consultations were held with the Government of Japan on numerous occasions between September 1986 and April 1987 in order to enforce U.S. rights under the Arrangement and to ensure that the Government of Japan undertake concerted efforts to fulfill its obligations under the Arrangement. To date these obligations have not been met.

On March 27, 1987, I announced my intention to raise customs duties to a level of 100 percent ad valorem on as much as $300 million in Japanese exports to the United States in response to the lack of implementation or enforcement by the Government of Japan of major provisions of the Arrangement. I also announced that the products against which retaliatory action would be taken would be selected after a comment period ending April 14, 1987. Finally, I announced that sanctions would remain in effect until there is firm and continuing evidence that indicates that the Government of Japan is fully implementing and enforcing the Arrangement.

This week we commemorate Easter and Passover, annual events of profound religious significance. It's appropriate that during this holy time our Secretary of State journeyed to the Soviet Union on a mission of peace, and I'm pleased that the word from that trip is good. While in Moscow, Secretary Shultz presented a new American proposal and made constructive progress toward reaching an agreement to reduce our respective nuclear arsenals and establishing better relations between our countries. Building a more peaceful world is our goal.

Secretary Shultz reports to me that headway was made in his discussions with his Soviet counterparts on several issues. He made clear, for example, that Americans take human rights seriously, as is evident during this week of religious import. We cannot and will not close our eyes to the suppression of religious freedom, be the victim a Christian, a Jew, or other religious faith. Secretary Shultz demonstrated this when he represented all of us in a Passover dinner, a seder, as it is called, with Soviet Jews in Moscow. Secretary Shultz noted that the favorable resolution of several human rights cases is a good sign. There are many cases of divided families and separated spouses that can be easily resolved, and we'll be watching.

In our contacts with Soviet leaders, we've also pushed for the settlement of regional conflicts that have brought destruction, misery and death to the peoples of Afghanistan, Angola, Cambodia, Nicaragua, and elsewhere. If an overall lessening of tensions is expected between the United States and the Soviet Union, the Soviets and their clients will have to show a readiness to accept peaceful, negotiated solutions instead of prolonging bloodshed.

The issue of embassy security was forcefully raised, as well. Secretary Shultz let it be known that recent Soviet espionage outrages have gone beyond reason. Today the United States and the Soviet Union have an opportunity to take tangible, step-by-step progress toward a more peaceful world. This is in both our interests. Nowhere is that more evident than in our talks about reducing the number of nuclear weapons threatening mankind. An actual reduction in the number of nuclear weapons would be an historic first, an accomplishment both sides could build upon for further progress.

Secretary Shultz reports that his talks in Moscow left him optimistic that an agreement to reduce the number of longer range INF missiles is within reach. Significant issues remain, and our negotiators will intensify their efforts to clear them away when talks resume in Geneva later this month. When Mr. Gorbachev and I met in Reykjavik last year, we reached an understanding on some of the basic tenets of an agreement to reduce intermediate-range missiles. In the intervening months, we've been encouraged by signs of Soviet willingness to remove the roadblocks that have been holding back progress. In Moscow Secretary Shultz sought to clarify the Soviet position. He reaffirmed the basic structure of the Reykjavik formula. And both governments agreed to the principle of on-site verification. Shorter range INF missiles, weapons that are of direct concern to our European allies, were also part of the discussions in Moscow. Both sides of the table agree that a limit should be set on the number of these shorter range missiles and that a global framework will be the basis of discussion and that the principle of equality will govern.

Secretary Shultz has briefed our allies on the details and has given me a full report on their initial reaction. Direct consultations with our allies will continue on further negotiations and plans. We must look at this issue in a calm, careful, and deliberate manner. When I return to Washington, I will meet with the bipartisan congressional leadership to review this week's progress. It's my hope that the process now underway continues to move forward and that Mr. Gorbachev and I can complete an historic agreement on East-West relations at a summit meeting. Finding the pathway to a safer, more peaceful world will take unity among free peoples as well as all the courage, tenacity, and hardnosed bargaining power we Americans can muster. Secretary Shultz was scouting out the way in Moscow. Our message is: We are proceeding.

The President. I want you to know that Nancy and I are very proud and happy to be here. Incidentally, we're neighbors, because just a few miles over the hills there a little ways, why, we have a ranch that's very dear to us. But hearing what Pepper had to say about love, yes, there is so much love here, and we're very proud and happy to be a part of it. And maybe you'd like to know that things like this, people like Pepper and these others here who have made this a reality and this camp out of love, this has been pretty unique and pretty peculiar to the United States. Other countries -- this doesn't happen. The government does things in the other countries, or they don't get done.

But I thought you'd be happy to know that this year we have been doing a little talking to some of our friendly neighbors in the rest of the world. And as a result of that, there has been a meeting held in Paris, France [International Conference on Private Sector Initiatives], of representatives from those countries -- all those countries, our neighbors and trading partners and those other countries -- for them to find out from us how we get things like this done by the people themselves doing it, instead of waiting for a government program. And so, I think we're going to see things like this happening to help people all over the world.

The President. Well, let me tell you, he was just back and came to the ranch Thursday, and we had a nice visit here. He's back. It was a very strenuous trip. Over there they seem to like to hold meetings. He'd be in meetings like 8 hours. But I think there is great reason for hope. For the first time -- I don't think anyone's very much -- this hasn't been said enough -- but it's the first time there has ever been a Russian leader who has actually suggested eliminating, doing away with, some of the weapons. There've been meetings before, but it was always to decide, well, how fast a rate should we agree to build more weapons. And this time they are actually suggesting, as we have been, let's do away with some of those weapons.

And he's come home very optimistic, and we're all looking forward to carrying this through to where we can make some start in eliminating these terrible ballistic missiles. And my ultimate goal is, once we start that, ultimately to get rid of nuclear missiles all over the world forever.

The President. Well, Nancy takes good care of me. She tucks me in at night -- [laughter] -- and tells me to put something warm on if I start to go outdoors without it and so forth. [Laughter] But, no, to tell you the truth -- and this is for all of you, and I know how much this means -- I was always in athletics. I went to summer camps; I liked that very much. And we have a little exercise room there in the White House that we set up. And every day when I come up from the office, why, I go in to the Nautilus machine and start to work on some of the weights and so forth there, and it does very well.

One of the pillars of President Reagan's foreign policy is to support democratic institutions in Latin America. The United States is deeply disturbed by any development which threatens civilian constitutional and democratic rule in Argentina. We strongly urge that these officers desist in their defiant attitude and abide by the law.

The return of Argentina in 1983 to a system of representative government was applauded by democrats everywhere. Since 1983, and throughout the current incident, the Argentine people have repeatedly manifested their firm commitment to democracy through free elections and the full exercise of their constitutional rights. Under the leadership of President Alfonsin, impressive gains have been made in the consolidation of democracy and the economic development of Argentina. We have supported Argentine democracy from its restoration in 1983, and we strongly reaffirm our support of President Alfonsin and the continued rule of law in Argentina.

The month of April, a season of renewal and hope, is a most appropriate time in which to discuss good news about cancer prevention and treatment. Major advances in our understanding of this disease provide encouragement both to patients and to medical and scientific professionals. More Americans are surviving cancer longer than ever before -- more than half of those diagnosed as having cancer live 5 years or longer -- and they are able to lead more active lives than before.

This is good news indeed, but the fight continues. An area of special concern is that high cancer rates continue to exist among members of some minority groups. We must keep on circulating information throughout society, supporting research into reasons for these rates, and making sure that we as individuals and families take the initiative to become informed and to act on everything learned from years of discovery and progress.

Cancer strikes minority groups in many ways. Cancer incidence and mortality are higher for blacks than for whites, while survival rates are lower and diagnosis during the early, localized, most treatable stages of cancer is less frequent. Black men are particularly vulnerable, but black women have high rates of lung and cervical cancer. The incidence of lung, stomach, prostate, and esophageal cancer is higher for blacks than for others. Cancer rates for Hawaiian males and females top those of other Americans. Some forms of cancer, particularly of the stomach, are higher in Hispanics than in other ethnic groups.

The Federal government is supporting research into causes of these situations. Health planners are proposing new prevention programs. The National Cancer Institute (NCI) is training minority professionals to work in cancer prevention and stepping up its efforts to inform and educate members of minority groups about cancer.

We have learned a great deal about causes of cancer. A change of diet to include more fiber and less fat will help reduce the estimated 35 percent of cancer deaths that are related to what we eat. This is because diets low in fiber and high in fats appear to increase the risk of cancers of the colon, prostate, breast, and uterine lining. Other changes can also reduce the risk of cancer. Examples of two areas are cigarette smoking, which causes an estimated 85 percent of all lung cancer, and high alcohol intake, which increases the risk of esophageal cancer.

The more we educate ourselves and others, and the more we continue to support all fronts of the battle against cancer, the more headway we will make for members of minority groups and for all Americans.

During this period U.N. Secretary General Perez de Cuellar continued his efforts to restore momentum to the search for a peaceful Cyprus settlement. On his instructions, U.N. Under Secretary General Goulding visited Cyprus February 4 - 7 to discuss with the Greek and Turkish Cypriot sides procedural ideas that could help move the negotiating process forward. Mr. Goulding proposed the holding of separate, exploratory talks in Nicosia between U.N. officials and representatives of the two sides. These discussions would be informal and nonbinding and were intended to help the Secretary General carry forward his good offices mission.

In mid-March, the two Cypriot sides reviewed the Secretary General's proposals with the Secretary General's Acting Special Representative on Cyprus. The Greek Cypriot side said its general position on the proposal was positive, although this did not imply any change in its view on the necessity for priority discussion of the issues of importance to it, or in its support for the convening of an international conference. The Turkish Cypriot side expressed its concern that the proposed procedure could undercut the Secretary General's March 1986 draft framework agreement, which the Turkish Cypriot side had accepted and the Greek Cypriot side had not. As of this date, U.N. Secretariat officials are continuing their contacts with the two sides on the proposal advanced by Mr. Goulding.

In both public statements and private discussions during this period, Administration officials have stressed our continuing support for the U.N. Secretary General's Cyprus mission. We have also been urging those directly involved with the Cyprus issue to seek every opportunity to improve the atmosphere on the island so as to enhance the prospects for progress toward a negotiated settlement.

The actions and policies of the Government of Nicaragua continue to pose an unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States. If the Nicaraguan emergency were allowed to lapse, the present Nicaraguan trade controls would also lapse, impairing our Government's ability to apply economic pressure on the Sandinista government and reducing the effectiveness of our support for the forces of the democratic opposition in Nicaragua. In these circumstances, I have determined that it is necessary to maintain in force the broad authorities that may be needed in the process of dealing with the situation in Nicaragua.

The U.S.-Spain Agreement is similar in objective to the social security agreements already in force with Belgium, Canada, the Federal Republic of Germany, Italy, Norway, Sweden, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom. Such bilateral agreements provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other.

I also transmit for the information of the Congress a comprehensive report prepared by the Department of Health and Human Services, which explains the provisions of the Agreement and provides data on the number of persons affected by the Agreement and the effect on social security financing as required by the same provision of the Social Security Act.

The President today accorded the personal rank of Ambassador to Holly H. Coors in her capacity as Special Representative to the 1987 National Year of the Americas. Mrs. Coors will provide leadership, under the policy guidance of the Secretary of State, for increasing understanding and awareness of our neighbors on the part of the American people. She will recommend appropriate conferences, workshops, ceremonies, and other activities relating to public and private sector involvement in the Year of the Americas.

The President today announced his appointment of John A. Svahn to be Commissioner of the United States of America on the Commission for the Study of Alternatives to the Panama Canal. He would succeed Arthur H. Davis.

It is sobering to realize that strong, scientific evidence links many forms of cancer to the way we live, especially the foods we eat and the use of tobacco. We know, for example, that smoking causes 30 percent of all cancer deaths. Just as important, though, we know that quitting smoking, even after many years, can reduce the risk of cancer. For two years now, we have seen a decreasing incidence of lung cancer among white males, and it looks as if the rate for white females is moving in the same direction. This encouraging downward trend reflects gradual changes in smoking patterns over the past two decades. Unfortunately, however, black Americans are still experiencing high rates of smoking-related cancers. More needs to be done to educate groups with high incidence of cancer about the dangers of smoking. We also must do everything we can to urge our young people not to start smoking.

The estimate that 35 percent of the cancer deaths in this country are related to diet means that dietary changes can make a big difference. Fortunately, the changes we need to make are simple -- cutting fat consumption down from our current average of nearly 40 percent of total calories to 30 percent or less, and doubling our daily consumption of fiber from fruits, vegetables, and wholegrain products.

Scientists have known for many years that the chances of recovering from cancer are best when the disease is found and treated at an early stage. Everyone should learn the warning signs of cancer and have symptoms checked by a physician without delay. Moreover, some types of cancer can be detected even before they cause symptoms. All adults should ask their doctors about special tests and examinations that can detect early cancer. As examples, women should ask about the value of regular mammography and Pap smears to detect breast and cervical cancers.

Because 24 percent of all cancers affect people under the age of 55, we are encouraged by the declining cancer death rate among Americans in that age group. Another noteworthy trend is the decrease in the death rates from colon cancer, a disease that mainly affects older people.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

For 30 years, as the United States has celebrated the first of May as Law Day, U.S.A., Americans have taken time to reflect on our legal heritage and the greatness it has brought to our Nation. This year, Law Day is of special significance because its theme, ``We the People,'' highlights one of the most important observances of our time -- the Bicentennial of the Constitution, our charter of liberty and justice under law.

Abraham Lincoln characterized our government as being ``of the people, by the people, and for the people.'' The same can be said of the Constitution. It is the framework of our Republic, enshrining liberty for all alike. Two centuries ago, this immortal document was drafted by Americans who had fought a Revolution for the freedom they cherished and who shaped their dreams of freedom into a blueprint for a free Nation -- for a free people whose God-given liberties would never again be subject to the arbitrary dominance of any one individual.

The Preamble of our Constitution begins, ``We the People of the United States, . . . do ordain and establish this Constitution for the United States of America.'' Here is the genius, the hope, and the promise of America forever and for all mankind: ``We the People.'' In our Constitution, we the people tell government what it may do and what it may not; the people are sovereign, not the state. Thanks to our Constitution, the rule of law in the United States means the rule of the people. This is the difference between our Constitution and so many others; this is freedom.

Law Day, U.S.A., is a time to give thanks for our legacy of liberty under law and for the Constitution that preserves this priceless heritage -- and to recall our sacred trust as Americans to protect our Constitution and our country as others have done for us.

Throughout our history, we Americans have always cherished our God-given rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness, and our freedom of opportunity. We have fought wars for them, and we have created a system of limited constitutional government to perpetuate them. We have also voluntarily joined together to enhance life and guarantee opportunity for our neighbors when the need has arisen.

We should bear these truths in mind as the number of older Americans increases -- and we should remember that one day all of us will also become older Americans. Our older citizens have lived lives of achievement and have sacrificed much for our country and for each of us. They possess a wealth of experience, talent, and wisdom and a willingness to share them. Older Americans cherish their freedom and independence and want to remain in their homes and communities as active and contributing citizens. To help senior citizens reach this goal, we can fulfill our responsibilities as family members and friends, and we can also work to create community systems of services for them.

Much has been done already, but much remains to be done. Under the Older Americans Act, local and State agencies on aging were established to plan, develop, and coordinate services to help older people remain in their own homes and communities as long as possible. People in every town, city, neighborhood, and rural community have the challenge and the opportunity to lay the foundation for their own truly responsive community systems for older Americans.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Fred J. Eckert, of Virginia, for the rank of Ambassador during the tenure of his service as United States Representative to the United Nations Agencies for Food and Agriculture in Rome. He would succeed Millicent Fenwick.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Samuel B. Thomsen, of California, a Foreign Service Officer of Class One, as the United States Representative to the Republic of the Marshall Islands. He will be the first accredited American representative to this country.

I'm sure we get exasperated now and then with each other, but that's just the friction of freedom. You know, when I first got to Washington, I tried to establish a relationship with Tip O'Neill. And we were doing pretty well, and then one day I picked up the paper and read something that really prompted me to call him. And I said, ``Tip, I thought we had a good relationship going, and then I read this news story.'' And Tip said, ``Well, old buddy, that's just politics. After 6 o'clock, we're friends.'' I started wearing a watch that was permanently set at 6 p.m. [Laughter] I'll start wearing that watch again if you'll do the same.

You know, in spite of our disagreements, I have a positive opinion of reporters. And I think it all goes back to one of my favorite reporters, Ernie Pyle. During World War II his columns about ``your boys,'' as he called them, were devoured in the homefront. His books were bestsellers. His understanding of ordinary soldiers was clear and heartfelt. He himself was a victim of the war, killed by enemy machinegun fire. He once wrote: ``There is a good deal of gaiety in wartime, humor and exuberance still exist.'' Our soldiers are still as roughly good-humored as they always were, and they laugh easily, although there isn't as much to laugh about as there used to be. Well, if we keep the need for humor to be important parts of our jobs as correspondents and politicians, maybe we can get through the daily battles without losing our spirit or temper or perspective. I think this would be good for both the press and the Presidency.

Nancy, would you like to join me up here for -- please? I know it's getting late, dear, but it's not often that we have so many people who have written about us and -- [laughter] -- broadcast about us all together in one room like this, and I thought you might like to say a few nice words to them. [Laughter] They're all from the press and radio and television. Maybe just a friendly little greeting would do. [Laughter] How about just a word or two -- something friendly -- even one kind word.

The President. Seriously, my friends, as always, we've had our share of laughs tonight at one another's expense, which is as it should be in a city where the issues are important and the passions run so deep. Maybe the fun and good nature of evenings like this is a good place to start.

Throughout our history, the building and improvement of transportation links have been vital to the exploration and settlement of our country and to the development of its commerce. We can all be grateful that these processes have never ceased and that the spirit of enterprise that motivated early American pioneers still thrives today.

During the early decades of our Republic, planners, engineers, and workmen built the Cumberland Road from western Maryland to central Illinois. This road started what was to become a vast, 42,000-mile network of interstate and defense highways across the United States.

Other notable undertakings illustrate the evolution of Americans' mobility. By 1825, the Erie Canal opened the Great Lakes to commerce; its success spurred a huge inland waterway system, including the St. Lawrence Seaway. By 1850, more than a thousand steamboats plied our rivers, and clipper ships came to dominate trade with China. By 1869, the transcontinental railroad was completed. Technological advances of the late 19th and early 20th centuries brought the automobile and the airplane, and further developments resulted in space flight.

Our land, water, and air transportation systems provide us with fast, efficient, and safe personal and commercial travel. They are vital not only to our economy and our personal mobility, but also to the defense of our Nation. Our ability to transport people and materials in time of emergency is a critical aspect of our national security.

March 4, 1988, will be the seventy-fifth anniversary of President William Howard Taft's signing into law an act establishing the United States Department of Labor. In celebrating this milestone, we honor both the mandate of this ninth Executive department and the men and women who have made that mandate a reality through the years.

That campaign bore fruit with President Taft's bill-signing in 1913. The mandate of the Department of Labor was ``to foster, promote, and develop the welfare of the wage earners of the United States, to improve their working conditions and to advance their opportunities for profitable employment.'' That immense task has inspired the Department ever since.

The Department has fulfilled its duties during war and peace, during depression and prosperity. Through the years, the Department of Labor has improved the lives of working people and benefited all Americans through its contributions to the success of our economy.

Among other tasks, the Department helps workers find and train for jobs; monitors changes in employment, prices, and other economic measures; oversees the broad range of working conditions and safeguards working people's rights; assures and strengthens collective bargaining; and ensures freedom from discrimination. Seeking to help business and industry achieve economic growth and stability, the Department also promotes cooperative relationships between labor and management and encourages collaborative efforts with trade unions and employer organizations.

The Department has played a significant international role as well, cultivating understanding among labor organizations throughout the world and fostering free unions and efficient governmental labor institutions in other nations.

Today marks the opening of the next session of negotiations between the United States and the Soviet Union on intermediate-range nuclear forces, one of the three elements of the nuclear and space talks in Geneva. The United States returns to these negotiations determined to build on the progress made during Secretary Shultz' meetings in Moscow last week. Although a number of central issues require resolution and much remains to be negotiated, prospects for an INF agreement have moved forward.

The basic structure of an INF agreement -- the nature and level of LRINF missile reductions -- was agreed upon by General Secretary Gorbachev and myself at Reykjavik and is reflected in the draft treaty text presented by U.S. negotiators last month. This calls for reductions to an interim global ceiling of 100 warheads each on U.S. and Soviet land-based longer range INF missiles, with none in Europe, along with concurrent global constraints at equal levels on shorter range INF missiles and provisions for effective verification. The United States and our NATO Allies continue, however, to prefer a zero LRINF outcome -- the elimination of this entire class of missiles.

One of the central issues remaining to be resolved is that of shorter range INF missile systems. We and our allies have long sought appropriate global constraints on SRINF in an initial INF agreement. The Soviets earlier agreed that they would include constraints on SRINF in an initial INF agreement, but they now appear to wish to deal with SRINF both within an INF agreement and in a separate negotiation. During Secretary Shultz' recent meetings in Moscow, the Soviets made explicit that their position in separate SRINF negotiations would be a zero outcome, and they suggested that this would be on a global basis. Much of the Soviet position remains to be elaborated, however, and we hope this will be done during the coming round. Meanwhile, we are already consulting closely with our allies on this issue and are in touch with congressional leaders as well.

It is U.S. and allied determination to maintain our security, which I continue to view as indivisible, that has given us this opportunity to achieve an historic agreement which, for the first time, would actually reduce nuclear weapons. Ambassador Glitman and the members of the U.S. delegation have been doing a fine job in this endeavor, and they continue to have my strongest support.

Verification is another central issue that must be resolved. We cannot make progress on this fundamental issue until the Soviets respond in detail to the comprehensive verification proposals which the United States has already made in Geneva. Verification would be facilitated if the Soviets were to accept a global zero outcome for LRINF. This is the preferred outcome of the United States and our allies, and we will continue to seek Soviet agreement to it.

As we return to these talks, we are hopeful but also realistic. We know that there are a number of issues whose resolution will demand considerable hard bargaining. But, working closely with our allies in Europe and Asia, we are ready to do our part and hope that the Soviets are returning to the table with similar resolve.

Nearly 35 million Americans became victims of crime in 1986. Six million of them were victims of serious, violent crimes. Crime -- of any kind -- can have a devastating impact on innocent victims and their families. Besides the immediate physical and financial injuries, criminal deeds exact an emotional toll from their victims that can deprive them of their health, their sense of security and control, and even their basic trust in others, the core of our social contract. Many victims desperately and futilely search for the reason a criminal chose them as prey. When they turn to the wider community for solace and support, they are often ignored, treated insensitively, or, worst of all, blamed for their plight.

Nothing is benign about such neglect of those whom our society has failed to shield from harm. Evaluating our criminal justice system's response to the needs of victims, the President's Task Force on Victims of Crime found that it frequently compounded the indignity they suffered. The system often failed to protect victims from defendants released on bail; it did not inform or consult victims before crucial decisions were made regarding their cases; it failed to hold violent criminals fully accountable for the damage done to innocent lives. While affording assistance to the accused, the criminal justice system offered only limited support to the victim striving to cope with the sudden, tremendous, and utterly unjust burdens imposed by a criminal attack.

Four years ago the Task Force produced a reform agenda designed to restore balance to the criminal justice system. Since then, action has been taken on nearly 80 percent of its proposals in every part of our country. Law enforcement officers, prosecutors, and judges are being educated on the needs of crime victims. The number of community programs providing direct services and assistance to victims is growing rapidly. More than 40 States have enacted new laws recommended by the Task Force to better protect the interests of crime victims. In an unprecedented expression of support, the Federal government has given the States the proceeds from fines and penalties levied against individuals convicted of Federal crimes. The States are using these proceeds to expand their assistance programs for victims.

This progress is truly encouraging, and the swelling tide of support for victims suggests that reforms on their behalf will continue to be made in the future. I commend the men and women inside and outside the justice system, in government and the private sector, and in communities throughout our Nation who are dedicated to the fair treatment of the innocent victims of crime. By their actions, they affirm our Nation's commitment to the goal of liberty and justice for all.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 24th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President. All I know is that we've just received this message that several of our military personnel were injured, and apparently it was a rocket attack on a bus that was taking them to a military airport.

During the American Revolution, Morocco was one of the first states to acknowledge the independence of our young Republic. Today I want especially to applaud activities being undertaken by Americans and our Moroccan friends to commemorate the bicentennial of the U.S.-Moroccan Treaty of Peace and Friendship. This agreement, known as the Treaty of Marrakesh, was negotiated in that city in 1786 and subsequently ratified by the U.S. Senate on July 18, 1787. This was the first United States treaty with any Arab, Moslem, or African State. It is the longest unbroken friendship treaty of the United States. In July the United States and the Kingdom of Morocco simultaneously will issue stamps to commemorate this special and historic relationship.

U.S.-Moroccan relations have prospered and grown over time, drawing on shared interests and mutual respect for each other's concerns. We share a commitment to fundamental values including religious tolerance. Our governments and peoples are deeply committed to world peace and the principles of democracy, liberty, and justice. The United States has long supported the moderate and constructive policies of my good friend King Hassan II. We look forward to continued close cooperation in the months and years ahead. I am especially pleased to report that the Moroccan-American Foundation has agreed to assist in commemorative events for this bicentennial. Through the events planned for the celebration of this bicentennial, my hope is that more Americans will come to know and appreciate our close friendship with the Kingdom of Morocco.

Prime Minister Nakasone of Japan will be visiting me here at the White House next week. It's an important visit, because while I expect to take up our relations with our good friend Japan, which overall remain excellent, recent disagreements between our two countries on the issue of trade will also be high on our agenda.

As perhaps you've heard, last week I placed new duties on some Japanese products in response to Japan's inability to enforce their trade agreement with us on electronic devices called semiconductors. Now, imposing such tariffs or trade barriers and restrictions of any kind are steps that I am loath to take. And in a moment I'll mention the sound economic reasons for this: that over the long run such trade barriers hurt every American worker and consumer. But the Japanese semiconductors were a special case. We had clear evidence that Japanese companies were engaging in unfair trade practices that violated an agreement between Japan and the United States. We expect our trading partners to live up to their agreements. As I've often said: Our commitment to free trade is also a commitment to fair trade.

But you know, in imposing these tariffs we were just trying to deal with a particular problem, not begin a trade war. So, next week I'll be giving Prime Minister Nakasone this same message: We want to continue to work cooperatively on trade problems and want very much to lift these trade restrictions as soon as evidence permits. We want to do this, because we feel both Japan and the United States have an obligation to promote the prosperity and economic development that only free trade can bring.

Now, that message of free trade is one I conveyed to Canada's leaders a few weeks ago, and it was warmly received there. Indeed, throughout the world there's a growing realization that the way to prosperity for all nations is rejecting protectionist legislation and promoting fair and free competition. Now, there are sound historical reasons for this. For those of us who lived through the Great Depression, the memory of the suffering it caused is deep and searing. And today many economic analysts and historians argue that high tariff legislation passed back in that period called the Smoot-Hawley tariff greatly deepened the depression and prevented economic recovery.

You see, at first, when someone says, ``Let's impose tariffs on foreign imports,'' it looks like they're doing the patriotic thing by protecting American products and jobs. And sometimes for a short while it works -- but only for a short time. What eventually occurs is: First, homegrown industries start relying on government protection in the form of high tariffs. They stop competing and stop making the innovative management and technological changes they need to succeed in world markets. And then, while all this is going on, something even worse occurs. High tariffs inevitably lead to retaliation by foreign countries and the triggering of fierce trade wars. The result is more and more tariffs, higher and higher trade barriers, and less and less competition. So, soon, because of the prices made artificially high by tariffs that subsidize inefficiency and poor management, people stop buying. Then the worst happens: Markets shrink and collapse; businesses and industries shut down; and millions of people lose their jobs.

The memory of all this occurring back in the thirties made me determined when I came to Washington to spare the American people the protectionist legislation that destroys prosperity. Now, it hasn't always been easy. There are those in this Congress, just as there were back in the thirties, who want to go for the quick political advantage, who will risk America's prosperity for the sake of a short-term appeal to some special interest group, who forget that more than 5 million American jobs are directly tied to the foreign export business and additional millions are tied to imports. Well, I've never forgotten those jobs. And on trade issues, by and large, we've done well. In certain select cases, like the Japanese semiconductors, we've taken steps to stop unfair practices against American products, but we've still maintained our basic, long-term commitment to free trade and economic growth.

So, with my meeting with Prime Minister Nakasone and the Venice economic summit coming up, it's terribly important not to restrict a President's options in such trade dealings with foreign governments. Unfortunately, some in the Congress are trying to do exactly that. I'll keep you informed on this dangerous legislation, because it's just another form of protectionism and I may need your help to stop it. Remember, America's jobs and growth are at stake.

Two hundred years ago, when our Founding Fathers drafted the Constitution that has remained our charter of liberty, they began it with the immortal words, ``We the People.'' These are but three words, yet they say everything about America and about Americans. We have God-given dignity and rights neither granted by the state nor subject to it; we take responsibility for living our lives in freedom; and we come to the assistance of our neighbors in time of need.

The spirit of ``We the People'' is the American spirit, and we Americans will always honor it and live by it. Just one example of this is our heritage of voluntarism, which is flourishing today. ``We the People'' -- 89 million of us -- volunteer our time, energy, talents, and material resources to create a better America. There is no problem facing us today that volunteers are not addressing. We can all be grateful to America's generous volunteers and glad that the tradition of voluntarism will continue to serve us in the future as it has in the past.

In the 75 years since Taft addressed that first meeting, the chamber has worked to build a growing America filled with opportunity for all. In the last few years, as our administration has worked for that goal, you have been among our most effective supporters. You've been at our side as we pulled the American economy out of a stagnant swamp and gunned its engine to climb to the mountaintops.

Under the leadership of Dick Lesher, you've stood shoulder to shoulder with us as we fought the big spenders and special interests. Together we beat back tax rates and then beat them back again with tax reform. And we wrestled down excessive regulation, as well. We've eliminated 30,000 pages of regulations. We won these battles, but the real winners are the American people. Inflation and interest rates fell from record highs: interest to the lowest rate in a decade, inflation to the lowest in almost three decades. In the past decade, America has created more jobs than Europe and Japan combined. The American spirit of enterprise has soared as new businesses have created new jobs by the millions. And this year a larger percentage of Americans has been at work than ever before in our history.

Six years ago our opponents predicted that our policies would bring on disaster. You'd think the actual results would have left them speechless -- and they did, sort of. As I've said so many times before, I knew our policies were working when they stopped calling them Reaganomics. [Laughter] But with the big spenders, speechlessness never lasts long. Now they have new charges and battle cries. They say the middle class is disappearing -- and not just the middle class, American manufacturing, as well. Well, we aren't as productive as the rest of the world, they say. We're slipping behind the rest of the world. America is deindustrializing.

Well, you've got to give them credit for trying, but it just so happens they're as off the mark this time as they were before. Declining middle class? The truth is just the opposite. More than 60 percent of the 13 million new jobs created during our recovery are in the high-paying managerial, professional, and technical occupations. Deindustrialization? Since 1982 manufacturing productivity has shot ahead at the fastest pace in 20 years. Manufacturing output has soared almost 30 percent, and in the last 4 years, we have added more manufacturing jobs than either Europe or Japan.

As one commentator has said, talk about the decline of the middle class and related charges is ``an exercise in statistical mythmaking designed to advance . . . a political agenda . . . ,'' an agenda summed up in just one word: protectionism. Our critics say that a cause of all of these supposed ills is the trade deficit. The cause of that, they say, is unfair trading practices. Their solution is to build great dams across the international flow of commerce. Well, I say damming the flow of international commerce is the surest way to make our own economy stagnant. As America prepares for the 21st century, nothing is surer than that our future depends on growing world trade. For more than a century, growing trade has meant more American jobs; shrinking trade has meant fewer jobs. Today an estimated 10 million U.S. jobs are tied to imports, exports, or both. Yes, we have a trade deficit that's too big, and part of the reason is unfair trading practices. But, no, the way to solve that is not to lash out at our trading partners. And last week I think we showed the right way.

We had an agreement with the Japanese Government that concerned semiconductors. The objectives of that agreement were not being met. I didn't want to impose punitive tariffs on Japanese goods. I don't believe in tariffs or trade barriers or restrictions of any kind. I hope that before long we can lift these and that this episode will be recorded as a small incident in the building of our relationship. But we'll do what is necessary to see that other nations live up to their obligations and trading agreements with us. Trade must be free; it must also be fair.

You will know a tree by its fruit. And the fruit from this tree will not be just in the semiconductor trade but in the entire relationship between our two countries. At the end of World War II, Japan and America began a major construction project: to build a bridge across the Pacific uniting our nations. Well, that bridge is supported by the pillars of a common dedication to freedom and democracy, broad economic relations, and a sharing of defense burdens. Now that bridge is almost completed. The United States and Japan have become true partners in the security of the western Pacific, which is one of the pillars or our national security. Japan spends more on defense than all but seven nations of the world and more than all but two nonnuclear nations. This partnership is not only vital to our national security, it's also what gives the political impetus to resolving our economic problems. That's the spirit in which I will engage in these issues with Prime Minister Nakasone this week.

In economic relations, we are Japan's largest trading partner, and they are our second largest. And trade figures tell only part of the story. A number of American companies dominate the Japanese markets in their products, but they do it from plants in Japan. Well, now Japan is catching up with us, moving its plants to the United States, closer to its American markets. And soon Japan will be exporting its American-built cars to Taiwan, and there's even talk of exporting to Japan itself. Yes, our economies are becoming as closely tied as New York's is to California's and Michigan's to Florida's. And that has meant jobs and a better standard of living on both sides of the Pacific. But we haven't finished work on that bridge I mentioned. In areas like semiconductors, supercomputers, auto parts, telecommunications, construction projects, and agricultural products, these problems remain. Japan's financial markets aren't yet as open as ours is to outsiders. And the biggest losers in all this are Japan's consumers, who pay, for example, 10 times the world price for their daily rice.

Our semiconductor decision sends one message: It's time to get down to finishing work on the trade bridge that unites our countries. And the final answer to the trade problems between America and Japan is not more hemming and hawing, not more trade sanctions, not more voluntary restraint agreements -- though these may be needed as steps along the way -- and certainly not more unfulfilled agreements. The answer is genuinely fair and open markets on both sides of the Pacific, and the sooner, the better.

Free, fair, and growing trade -- this is also our message to the world. It's why we've responded with enthusiasm to Prime Minister Mulroney's call for a U.S.-Canadian free trade agreement. It's why we sought and now have a new round of international trade negotiations. It's also why we're the first administration ever to initiate unfair trade practice cases, not just waiting for industries to come forward with complaints, which was the past practice. We've used the full range of tools available under the law to work for more open markets. I've found they're good tools that fit many different situations, both those that require firmness and those that need finesse. That's why some trade legislation now before Congress is dangerous.

Legislation before the House of Representatives would make us use a steamroller against unfair practices every time, no matter whether the steamroller would open the trade doors or flatten the entire house. A particularly bad proposal would require retaliation against trading partners who have large trade surpluses with the United States. Well, it's better policy to allow for Presidents -- me or my successors -- to have options for dealing with trade problems. It's more effective, and we won't risk sending our economic relationship with a friendly country crashing into the sea because Congress put our policy on automatic pilot.

But this is a simple fact: Eliminating trade barriers won't put an end to our trade deficit. For example, if every unfair trading practice in Japan were ended tomorrow, we would cut our trade deficit by only about 10 percent. If our trade deficit is to come down, more must be done, and it is being done. The change in the dollar's value is part of it, and since the middle of last year, the actual volume of our exports has been on the rise. The broad economic policies of our trading partners is another part. We believe our partners should cut taxes and regulations, as we have, so they can create jobs and buy more, as we have.

In the last few months I've talked about the importance of education, training, and better commercial use of our science if we're to get on the ball, become more competitive, and prepare America for the 21st century. But the most important way to get on the ball is to finish the work that we were sent here to do 6 years ago. And first on the list of unfinished business is to get control of Federal spending. Eighty percent of America's businesses report taxes on the personal tax form. The businesses of most chamber members do, too, and most new jobs and technology come from those kinds of entrepreneurial businesses. Now, some in Congress want to reverse the course of the last few years and raise taxes on that job-and-technology-creating spirit of enterprise. Well, Congress should cut the Federal budget and leave the family budget alone.

Ever since the middle of the seventies, when Congress shoved the President out of the way and took over the budget process almost entirely, deficits have been soaring. I just can't help thinking that a lot of people up on the Hill are talking about the trade imbalance, because they don't want to talk about the spending imbalance -- I mean deficit spending. Even as they cried about the trade deficit in the last few weeks, Congress passed two outrageous spending bills over my veto. The chamber worked hard to help us stop those bills. One project in one bill alone will eat up 14 percent of all the Nation's new transit money. When that project is completed, its construction cost may equal $6 for each passenger's trip. We could actually save money by putting them all in taxicabs.

Congress has a budget process that's out of control -- missed deadlines, Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets that get ignored. Now they want a budget summit with the White House. Well, we've sent them a budget, and if Congress doesn't like it, they should first produce one of their own as a basis for talking. But even then, under today's rules, if we sit down to talk, no agreement they make would be binding on them. Congress needs to change the way it does business on the budget. They need ways of ensuring that they will stick to budget decisions once they're made -- no backdoor spending, no missed targets, no swearing off the bottle of spending only to take a nip the next morning. Lock away the bottle, and then we can talk.

Maybe with the budget summit they hope I'll bail them out. Well, if they want me to save them, there's one easy way to do it: Give me what 43 Governors have, a line-item veto, so -- [applause] -- you, I can see, understand. Then I could cut wasteful projects. We'll have that deficit coming down in no time. If some President abuses the use of that veto, the Congress has the power to override his veto. The truth is, they don't want to have to vote on some of those pure pork items when they're out standing alone in the open and not buried and hidden in a budget bill. I know, because as a Governor I vetoed some 900 of those in 8 years. And in California it takes a two-thirds vote of the legislature to pass the budget in the first place and send it back to me, and then it only takes a two-thirds vote to override my line-item vetoes. And not one of the more than 900 in 8 years was ever overridden. The same that voted two-thirds to put it in the budget wouldn't vote two-thirds to eliminate it all by itself.

In just over a month, I'll be going to my seventh economic summit, this one in Venice, an ancient city that at one time was the trading capital of the world. Four decades ago the United States joined with other nations and dedicated itself to building a more open world economy, and that dedication has brought us and the other major industrial nations the greatest prosperity in human history and the longest period of worldwide peace in this century.

Now it's time to look forward and ask what will the next 40 years bring? Can we finish building the bridges of international commerce so that 40 years from now there will be no barriers dividing trade among our nations? Can we find a way to end once and for all the wild swings in exchange rates that have kept all who sail the oceans of international trade a little seasick over the last decade? Can we, the world's great industrial democracies, remain united against the enemies of freedom? I believe the answer is yes. We can do all of this. We can take the next step to building a world of opportunity and peace for all mankind. Let's join together in working to make that world a reality.

There are two issues that affect both the 1988 Budget submitted to the Congress on January 5, 1987, and the 1988 Budget of the District of Columbia Government that I would like to bring to your attention. First, I want to reaffirm my concern that none of the funds appropriated for the District of Columbia should be used for abortion unless the life of the mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to term. Accordingly, I will support an amendment that goes beyond Section 116 in the accompanying District of Columbia Budget request and restricts the use of both the District's Federal and locally generated funds for abortion.

Secondly, I request your support for the initiative in the 1988 Budget that requires the District Government to directly bill the Federal establishments for the water and sewer services provided. In response to the fact that the District has had the technical capacity to bill individual Federal establishments since 1985, the 1988 Budget provides for the Federal establishments to make their water and sewer payments directly to the District Government. Thus, the 1988 Budget does not include an amount in the Federal Payment to District of Columbia for water and sewer services provided. The Budget provides for Federal establishments to make these payments directly. Although I understand the Comptroller General's office has expressed doubt about this proposal, I believe that existing law permits this change in billing practice, which will produce efficiency and accountability for the services provided. I urge the Congress to enact this needed reform.

This year we celebrate the 50th anniversary of the Act that created the National Cancer Institute. For half a century the NCI staff has worked with talent, dedication, and creativity and made much progress in cancer control programs. Our national investment in the NCI is paying impressive dividends. Cancer patients are living longer today and leading fuller lives than ever before; since the early 1940s, the 5-year relative survival rate for cancer has risen from 30 percent to 50 percent.

In its first decade, the NCI began to assist State cancer control activities and launched a journal for the scientific community. In its second decade, the NCI expanded grants for research and cancer control and supported better training of doctors and dentists in cancer research, diagnosis, and treatment. In the 1960s, the NCI developed task forces for specific types of cancer, established discipline-oriented laboratories and clinics, and integrated laboratory and clinical research programs.

The National Cancer Act of 1971, capitalizing on early achievements and intensifying our Nation's commitment to cancer control, expanded the NCI's missions and made it a unique structure capable of coherent and systematic attack on the complex problem of cancer. The NCI, part of the National Institutes of Health within the Department of Health and Human Services, today conducts and sponsors research, education, and training and collects and disseminates information worldwide.

The NCI's basic research over the last 15 years has brought about unparalleled understanding of the cancer cell and extraordinary insights into cellular biology. Applying knowledge now at hand could cut the annual cancer death rate by 50 percent by the year 2000. To reach this goal, the NCI urges us to stop smoking, cut fat consumption to 30 percent or less of total calories, and double daily consumption of fiber from whole-grain breads, cereals, fruits, and vegetables. All adults should also ask their doctors about special early cancer detection tests. Two such tests are mammography for breast cancer and Pap smears for cervical cancer.

The NCI also calls for nationwide application of state-of-the-art treatments for cancer. A national network now links major laboratories and cancer centers with doctors in local communities, bringing research advances to the bedside. NCI programs provide the latest treatment news through the computerized PDQ (Physician Data Query) System. The Cancer Information Service, whose toll-free telephone number is 1 - 800 - 4 - CANCER, answers cancer-related questions from the public, cancer patients and their families, and health professionals.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

For more than 70 years, we Americans have set aside the second Sunday in May to honor our mothers and tell them of our love. No matter how often we express these tributes of the heart throughout the year, we choose to do so in a special way on Mother's Day.

That is because we know and can never forget all that our mothers have given us every day, year by year, in love and courage, in toil and sacrifice, in prayer and example, in faith and forgiveness. There is no love like a mother's -- she who carries the child that God knits in the womb, she who nourishes and guides, she who teaches and inspires, she who gives of her heart and soul and self for the good and the happiness of her children and her family.

As mothers help give their families a stability rooted in love, steadfastness, devotion, and morality, they strengthen our communities and our Nation at the same time. Mother's Day is a wonderful time for each of us to give thanks for America's mothers and for all they mean and have meant to our country and our history. It is also a time to thank our own mothers; and whether we may do this in person still, or by loving memory, let us do it with all the love and thanks and prayer we possess.

By tradition, Americans celebrate the third Sunday in June as Father's Day in honor of the immense and indispensable contributions fathers make to our lives and to our Nation. They deserve our thanks and recognition every day of the year and especially on Father's Day.

Fatherhood is all about the things that matter most -- about love and new life, about trust and responsibility, about faithfulness to a family and to a calling. Fathers must be many things, but most of all they must be selfless. Fathers seek to give their children a share of the world's goods and an even greater share of its goodness; they must have the skill and strength to see to the immediate needs of their families and the wisdom to see to their children's lifelong need for character and conviction. They anxiously strive to impart to their sons and daughters a sense of their heritage and a notion of their obligations to one another and to the future.

Fathers take on these tasks out of love, and for their wages they want most the love and honor of their children and the respect of their community. With these, they can find peace and joy in the midst of the daily hardships and frustrations they face as parents and providers. What fathers do for their families, they do for our country as well, because the strong and loving families they help create are the soul of a nation. For all that fathers do, we show our heartfelt thanks and offer our love and prayers on the day every father can call his own.

Section 1. The President's Volunteer Action Award is hereby established for the purposes of recognizing outstanding voluntary contributions by individuals and organizations toward helping others in our society, and of demonstrating to all Americans what can be accomplished through voluntary action. The award shall consist of a sterling silver medallion, the design of which accompanies and is hereby made a part of this Order.

Sec. 2. The award may be presented by the President to recipients in ten categories: arts and humanities, education, the environment, health, human services, international volunteering, mobilization of volunteers, public safety, youth, and the workplace. The National Voluntary Service Advisory Council, in cooperation with the White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives, shall recommend recipients of the award to the President. The President may select for the award any person recommended to the President or any person selected by the President upon his own initiative.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to ask you the first question on arms control, and it has two parts to it. To what extent do you think Secretary Shultz' opinion that we ought to take the Russians at face value when they say they're talking seriously about arms control, because they want a less threatening and less nuclear world -- he said that when he came down to talk with us at Santa Barbara -- after you. That's the first part.

The President. Well, I think that since they -- and literally for the first time in history -- have actually volunteered a willingness to reduce weapons -- if you look back in history, this has never been true of them before -- I think, yes, that you say -- but that doesn't mean -- I know exactly how George feels about this other -- that doesn't mean that you don't insist on verification and the safeguards that we must have in such an agreement or treaty. I think that he was simply saying that as long as they've said that, yes, we're going to negotiate with them. But it doesn't mean that you're going to roll over and just give in to something without protecting yourself.

Q. So, you're going to take them at their word that they want a less threatening nuclear world. The other half of it is how can you retain General Rowny as a negotiator when he's basically broken away from your own declared position on INF and says that we're focusing on the wrong thing publicly?

The President. Well, I think the only thing I know is that the general perhaps thought that some of us were too optimistic in this. And basically most of us have tried to keep from expressing an optimism other than, well, expressing a hopefulness, rather than optimism. But, no, you have to recognize that I expect diverse opinions in the shop and among the people and the Cabinet and everything else. And I've always been that way. I want and encourage those other opinions, because I have to make the decisions, and I make them on the basis of everything that I hear from those who counsel me.

The President. Well, I always know that there are some people who don't give in; but I also do know that once I've made the final decision, no matter how they may have felt about it, right or wrong, that they'll carry it out.

Q. Mr. President, General Rowny essentially endorsed the Nixon-Kissinger position, and former President Nixon says you could end up creating what he called the most profound crisis in NATO history unless you demand that all INF weapons be eliminated worldwide and you link U.S. withdrawals to fixing the conventional arms imbalance. You haven't insisted on either of these points, so how do you respond to President Nixon?

The President. Well, it isn't exactly true about what we've done and how we feel with regard to those points. I have always believed, and have stated many times in our meetings, that if and when we succeed in reducing what I think are the most destabilizing weapons, the nuclear weapons -- and my ultimate goal has always been elimination -- but that then must recognize that you cannot proceed with that to the point that their conventional superiority is increased and leaves an imbalance. That would have to be taken into account, and that is true with what we're talking about presently. We recognize that we must keep in mind the conventional balance, and as a matter of fact, ever since I've been here, we have been, as you know, in negotiations with the Soviet Union on that matter of conventional weapons. So, it's wrong to assume that we're not aware of that and that we're not dealing with it.

The President. Well, no, verification is going to have to be solid on that or any other part of this agreement. As a matter of fact, I don't speak Russian, but I did speak Russian to Mr. Gorbachev in one of our meetings. I had learned a little Russian proverb: Dovorey no provorey. It means trust, but verify. And, yes, that must be a definite part of this. So, yes, we would like to have it be global, and we'll seek that in negotiations. But I'm not going to say what value I place on the other except that if it comes down to a small number maintained in another part of the world, so long as we will be in a position to have a deterrent capacity, which we would in this case -- but as I say, no, we're going to seek a global balance. We'd prefer that.

Q. Mr. President, in Los Angeles recently you expressed concern that ``something should be done about value-free education.'' You said the country has stopped teaching on the basis of moral principles. We now see in the newspapers and the press day to day a society which has produced Ivan Boesky, investment bankers being traipsed down Wall Street in handcuffs because of drug charges, television evangelists swapping charges on adultery and homosexuality, and even prominent individuals within your administration having been charged with wrongdoing and considering using drug impairment as a potential defense. In looking at some of these things, all together, what is your view about the condition of the society's values; and as you consider the legacy you'll leave, what do you hope will be the imprint that you have on these values and getting back to the basics?

The President. Well, I hope that the imprint would be left on one of high morality. And I fear, as many people do, that there's a kind of cynicism abroad, particularly among our young people. But there again, there have always been wrongdoing in the world; that's why we have laws and policemen and so forth. But if we have a system of education in which -- in a retreat from in loco parentis, which teachers did resist long ago -- the idea in loco parentis means that when the child leaves home and comes into the school, then the school becomes, for that period of time they have them, the parent and must decide on right and wrong and so forth.

The President. Well, I'm sure that when you -- AIDS is probably going to somewhat tie in with the prevalence of sex education in the schools today. And I have been very disturbed that under this same theory of no values being taught, value-free education, that how do you start talking about sex to children and to young people without the moral side of that question being brought up? Just treat it like a physical thing, such as eating a ham sandwich? And too much of this is going on. So, when it was proposed that such things as preventives and so forth should be recommended to the children, I said that along with that should go the moral teaching of what has always been a part of morality, and that is abstinence. There is one of the Ten Commandments that deals with that particular problem. And at the same time, recognizing that there are those who are not going to abstain, all right, then you can touch on the other things that are being done. But I would think that sex education should begin with the moral ramifications, that it is not just a physical activity that doesn't have any moral connotation.

The President. I was shocked when I read that that was happening. Yes, I've since heard some things about that particular instance. As I understand, it was one clergyman in one church and that there have been evidences of other expressions or procedures there that are not quite in keeping with most other religions.

Q. Mr. President, as you know, next week Congress opens hearings on the Iran-contra matter. Are you worried that when your former national security adviser, John Poindexter, testifies that he won't some way implicate you in the knowledge of diversion of funds to the contras?

The President. No, John Poindexter's an honorable man. And since I was not informed -- as a matter of fact, since I did not know that there were any excess funds until we ourselves in that checkup after the whole thing blew up, and that was, if you'll remember, that was the incident in which the Attorney General came to me and told me that he had seen a memo that indicated that there were more funds. We had gotten our $12 million dollars back for the weapons that we had provided. I have no way of knowing why or how. I can speculate as to how there was additional money, but we had no indication of it until that time. And that was at 4:30 on a Monday afternoon. And first thing Tuesday morning, he and I met with the joint leadership of the House and Senate, told them what we had learned, that there evidently was something of this kind, and then went before you in the press room and told all of you. And that, as far as I know, factually, that is all I know. I am still waiting to find out exactly how did there turn out to be more money and where did that money go.

The President. Well, I don't know. Apparently -- and on such things as the Tower commission has come up with and others so far -- apparently, there were some go-betweens on the Iranian side who, meeting the problem of did we deliver weapons before we got the money or did we get the money and then deliver the weapons and so forth, arranged some bridge loans so that a postdated check and so forth could be given and that money could be handled in that way, the transfer. Now, as I said before, the only thing I knew was the weapons were delivered and we received $12 million by way of what's called a sterile bank account, which I understand is the way of transferring money across the ocean. And the only thing that, apparently -- from what has been learned so far in these investigations -- that, evidently, those with this bridge loan, evidently, put a retail price instead of our wholesale price for the weapons. And thus there was more money paid than we had asked for.

Q. Mr. President, in your early years as President, you were credited with restoring faith in government and in the power of the Presidency. But since the Iran affair, polls have reported that people are deeply concerned about who is in charge of the country and where the Nation is headed. Now, this lack of trust in government is widespread according to the polls, and I'm wondering what you can do now to reverse that and restore confidence.

The President. Well, I don't think the mistrust is justified. I do think that the manner in which the whole thing when it -- it was a covert operation to begin with. And when the information was leaked through that rag in Beirut and then picked up worldwide -- if you will remember, my first reaction was, ``Please, don't. You can get some people killed.'' -- meaning the people that we were dealing with on the Iranian side and possibly our hostages. And [former hostage] Mr. Jacobsen when he came home, if you'll recall, made the same plea publicly, and for the same reason. But I know that this has been created on the basis that the people have been led to believe I'm covering up, that I do know all about the money and I'm somehow covering.

I was interested in one poll that went a step further. It asked another question of the people. And that was did they think it was all right for me to be covering up. And that poll was taken just of the people that believed I was covering up. And about two-thirds or more of those people said, yes, there are times when a President has to keep his mouth shut and not tell people certain things.

But, no, as I say, I didn't have any more knowledge than that. And I do hope that we can restore to them their faith in government, because we have not betrayed the people of this country in any way nor would I, nor would I permit it.

The President. I wouldn't see how, no. No, the things that -- now, there again, we don't know their involvement with that money thing, as I said that it was done -- that some of the go-betweens put up a bridge loan to enable the transaction to go through with. We don't know the extent of their knowledge of that and why there was extra money or whether they even participated in that in any way or agreed to it.

The other thing that the Tower commission report revealed to me was that contrary to what our purpose had been, you know, in other words, to establish that contact and see if we could not get a basis for a better relationship between our two countries, that we, in return for their asking, as a measure of good faith on our part for this -- really it wasn't much more than a token sale of weapons -- that we turned around and said, ``Because of the support by Iran of terrorism, we can't do business.'' They protested that they were opposed to terrorism themselves and would never have -- remember, we were talking not to Khomeini, as so many of our colleagues have indicated, we were talking to people that had sought a meeting with us on the basis that they were thinking of the government that was going to succeed the Khomeini. And this is why it had to be covert, because they were kind of sticking their necks out. And we went along with this, and then we put as a condition that said: ``Well, you can prove this antiterrorism procedure or provision on your part if you can seek to impress on the [radical Shi'ite terrorist group] Hizballah, who sort of have a relationship with Iran, to start turning -- give us our hostages back.'' And the other thing that did develop, then, was that somehow the whole thing just began to deteriorate into a hostage sale thing. And suddenly they were demanding more arms and more deals as to what would be necessary for the hostages and so forth.

Well, I wasn't aware of that. We had made an arrangement based on the two things: Yes, all right, we'd break our practice and provide those arms. They in turn would do their best, and they did deliver some hostages to us. And so, the whole distortion of the picture, that we were dealing with the Khomeini, and that in spite of all that he had done to us, and we weren't. We thought we were going around behind his back with some of his people. And therefore, I don't think there was anything wrong to have accepted the proposal by people from Iran who wanted, apparently, to talk a better relationship with us in the government yet to come. And as I have often said, I didn't think it was trading arms for hostages when the hostages -- or the kidnapers weren't getting anything. We were doing business with these people in Iran.

And as I say, there is more yet to come out now as to who was doing what and how much of it was being known. I do know that from the Tower commission report that at one point Bud McFarlane was demanding -- now, we know this afterward in their report -- demanded that they get away from this just straight bargaining about hostages and arms trading and get back to the process of the better relationship. And when they refused to do that, he walked away and wouldn't negotiate any further.

Q. Yes, if we could go back to the arms control question and the concerns about the imbalance in Europe because of the Soviet Warsaw Pact conventional force advantage. At what point do we draw the line and say the conventional forces are too far out of balance, we cannot remove any more nuclear weapons, we can't afford to? Where do we say that?

The President. Well, remember that, contrary to what has been said too many times, this is not a denuclearization of Europe. And first of all, we're in touch with our allies in NATO, and we want their feelings on this, too. But remember that even if the short-range and the long-range weapons -- and a deal is made, there are still thousands of warheads left in nuclear weapons on our part -- airborne tactical-type weapons and so forth. So, those are not a part of this negotiation at all.

The President. Oh, we won't ever give up on that except that we always had those delinked, even in Reykjavik. And this, since the Soviet Union came back with their willingness to discuss what had been our original proposal back in 1981 -- in fact, it was at the National Press Club that I think I made the statement about seeking zero-zero in Europe. And to start with that, I've always believed that if we could begin by getting some actual reductions, then we can continue -- and what we call our START proposal -- this is the one that we'd had an agreement on that in Reykjavik on the starting of reduction of those weapons until they tied the SDI to it. I think that broke things up.

The President. No, but I think it is very obvious that he is faced with a tremendous economic problem, and a great deal of that problem has been aggravated, made worse, by their military buildup. And I don't think you have to look for a change in philosophy of someone so much as -- if it suits their practical ends to have some arms reduction and it suits our policies also, then let's get together.

Q. Are punitive measures the wave of the future in U.S.-Japan trade relations? Will harsh sanctions resolve the semiconductor dispute? How will you balance the interests of the consumer against the need for fair trade?

The President. I decided to place high tariffs on $300 million of Japanese exports to the United States because of evidence that the semiconductor agreement was not being fully implemented. We are encouraged by recent actions by the Japanese Government to improve the implementation of the agreement. When the arrangement is working as intended, the sanctions will be lifted. We remain committed to the semiconductor agreement and want to see it function as intended. That would best satisfy both the interests of the American consumer and the need for fair trade.

My action is aimed at redressing a specific trade problem that has proven to be particularly difficult. The tariffs will affect less than one-half of 1 percent of Japan's exports to the United States. The economic relationship between our two countries is close and mutually beneficial, and the semiconductor issue should be kept in perspective. We will continue to seek to resolve problems through cooperation, and our commitment to free trade and opposition to protectionism also remains unchanged.

Q. Since last year, despite the yen-dollar currency realignment, the U.S. trade deficit has not decreased. Recently the dollar has plunged, and the latest U.S. figures indicate that the deficit has continued to climb. Are you satisfied with the current yen-dollar rate? How effective do you believe currency devaluations will be in significantly reducing the trade deficit?

The President. As Treasury Secretary Baker has said, all seven major industrial nations remain fully committed to strengthening policy coordination, promoting growth, and cooperating to foster stability of exchange rates. We all believe a further decline of the dollar could be counterproductive to our efforts.

The best way for the United States to reduce its trade deficit is by exporting more to trading partners. Since the Tokyo summit last May, Japan and the United States have worked positively to coordinate economic policies among industrialized nations, and Japan has said it will prepare a comprehensive economic program to stimulate domestic demand. Japan can make a major contribution to reducing external imbalances and sustaining world economic growth by adopting policies to promote stronger domestic demand in the short run and, over the longer run, by implementing fully the structural reforms identified in the Maekawa Report to ease Japanese dependence on exports as a source of growth.

Q. The United States now intends to raise the rice issue at the new round of the GATT. The Japanese, however, consider rice a political sanctuary. Would you like to see an open market in Japan for foreign rice?

The President. Yes. An open market would be in the interest of the Japanese consumer and the world trading community. I want the GATT negotiations on agriculture to be comprehensive. We have said that we are willing to put everything on the table, but we expect other countries to do the same. We have an opportunity to resolve problems in agricultural trade which have been an economic drain on many countries. In order to solve these problems, we must all cooperate, and we must all be willing to put our agricultural programs and policies on the negotiating table.

Q. Congress is preparing trade legislation that is considerably more protectionist than the administration bill. How will you reconcile Congress to the administration position? Can the United States produce a trade measure that will uphold the principle of free trade?

The President. As you know, I submitted a comprehensive trade and competitiveness bill that included important trade provisions to both Houses of Congress early in this session. Our proposal aims to enhance U.S. competitiveness, to uphold free and fair trade, and serve to keep U.S. and overseas markets expanding, not closing. I do not want to make specific comments on any of the proposals that Congress is considering, because the legislative process is not complete. The bills which are being considered by the House and the Senate contain both provisions which I fully support and provisions which I continue to find objectionable. My administration will continue to work very closely with Congress to achieve the goals in trade legislation that will result in beneficial, GATT-consistent, expanding trade.

The President. I do not believe the decision by the Japanese Government to abandon the 1 percent of GNP ceiling represents a fundamental change in Japanese defense policy. Rather, I understand that it was found that that artificial formula was no longer suitable for Japan's defense needs. Those needs reflect well-defined roles and missions adopted by the Japanese which are defensive in nature and complementary to the roles and missions of U.S. forces in our mutual security relationship. As Japan's ally, we welcome the more realistic approach to defense. I do not expect Japan's military roles and missions to change significantly in the future, but we will continue to consult closely on the security environment of the region and the most effective cooperative defense measures in response to change.

Q. The U.S.-Japanese relationship has become increasingly important, both economically and politically. On the economic side, the two countries are competing more and more each day for world influence and markets. In fact, a recent study at the Harvard Business School concluded that the United States and Japan may be on a ``collision course for world economic leadership.'' Are there confrontations ahead? How can they be avoided?

The President. There need not be any collisions if the leaders at the helm chart their courses together, as Prime Minister Nakasone and I have done. The Prime Minister and I firmly agree that the United States and Japan can help preserve peace and achieve greater prosperity by working together. Within the family of industrialized democracies, Japan's support has been essential to our success in building Western solidarity and expanding the global economy for the past 5 years.

In the business world, we have seen both increased cooperation and greater competition among U.S. and Japanese industries. We have made progress in fields ranging from superconductor research to the globalization of financial markets. Creative and open minds as well as open laboratories and markets have made such progress possible, and we are confident that a balanced two-way exchange in research and training will accelerate the rate of progress for both countries. However, along with the benefits of openness, there are responsibilities of economic leadership which must also be shared. Our democracies must be compassionate, but they must also facilitate necessary economic adjustment. We only harm ourselves by closing markets. Cooperation and fair competition can assure economic progress and a better future.

Q. You have talked of the ``Pacific Era'' and the importance of cooperation among Pacific rim nations. What initiative should Japan and the United States take to bring these nations closer together? What should China's role be?

The President. The strong economic growth that is expected through the next century will give the Pacific region increasing significance and influence. The United States and Japan, as the economically strongest industrial democracies, have a unique opportunity to influence the pace and scope of cooperation within the region without, of course, interfering with the independence of its nations. In order to promote a prosperous Pacific community, the United States and Japan should use their economic strength and democratic traditions to help create a climate of political stability, security, and economic growth. Certainly, these efforts might include opening domestic markets to the goods of developing Pacific nations. We will also encourage Japan to expand and deepen its role in the IBRD, IMF, GATT, OECD, and international development banks.

China, the world's most populous country, has become an increasingly important economic actor in the Pacific region. The United States and Japan should continue to encourage China's modernization and a positive Chinese role in the region.

The President. SDI and reductions in nuclear arsenals are not mutually exclusive goals. It is quite the contrary. It is SDI that brought the Soviets back to the negotiating table and persuaded them to negotiate deep reductions seriously for the first time. SDI is also our insurance policy against the possibility that an agreement is not fully implemented. We intend that SDI provide the stability necessary for further reductions as well. With significant reductions in U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals, we could rely more on defense than offense for deterrence. We would also need fewer strategic defenses than would be required at today's strategic offensive force levels. Accordingly, it makes sense to pursue SDI and an agreement on offensive force reductions concurrently. We should also not lose sight of the fact that offensive reductions apply equally to both sides. We are not seeking to bargain away SDI; instead, we are negotiating for mutual 50-percent reductions in offensive strategic forces and for a jointly managed transition to a defense-oriented posture. Such an outcome would make sense for both sides.

The President. As I said on April 15, we believe the exchanges that Secretary Shultz had in this area increase prospects for an interim agreement on intermediate nuclear forces. There remain, however, important outstanding issues to be resolved, particularly on SRINF and verification. We are consulting intensively with our allies in Europe and Asia, including Japan, on these issues.

The President. First of all, we must reach agreement on the relationship between a START agreement and the negotiations over defense and space weapons. We believe an agreement on 50-percent reductions on offensive weapons should be the highest priority. It need not be delayed while the United States and Soviet Union resolve the issues in the defense and space forum. Second, the Soviet side must address the important concerns the United States has regarding stability. The United States has proposed certain sublimits on the most dangerous and destabilizing ballistic missiles. Sublimits are an essential part of any future START agreement, in our view. Although the Soviets have, themselves, proposed similar sublimits from time to time, they have backed away from these earlier positions. This issue, as well as the subject of effective verification, needs to be adequately addressed before an agreement can be reached.

The President. When General Secretary Gorbachev and I met in Geneva in November 1985, we agreed to intensify the dialog between our two countries at all levels. To stimulate this process of dialog, I invited the General Secretary to visit the United States. I can't speak for the General Secretary as to whether, or when, he will accept; I can only say that my invitation remains open and the welcome mat is out.

Q. U.S. diplomats have been instructed to engage in a substantial dialog with diplomats of N. Korea (Democratic People's Republic of Korea) when opportunities arise. What has brought about this change?

The President. The United States is committed to the reduction of tension on the Korean Peninsula. We hope that we will begin a process of reciprocal steps that will ultimately lead to a reduction of those tensions.

The President. We believe that Korea needs a more open, broad-based government. We have repeatedly urged both major political parties in the Republic of Korea to come forward to negotiate in a spirit of compromise. Koreans themselves must design a more democratic system.

The President. The United States encourages greater stability on the Korean Peninsula by providing a firm security commitment, supporting democratic progress, and encouraging North-South dialog and understanding. We look to those on the peninsula, however, to take the lead in ensuring peace, stability, and democratic progress there by increasing contacts, developing understanding, and building confidence.

The President. No outside nations are more interested in reducing tension on the Korean Peninsula than Japan and the United States. We remain in close contact with the Japanese Government on this issue, working to promote political and economic policies toward the peninsula which will promote the cause of peace.

The President. There are a wide range of issues, many of which we discussed last year in Tokyo, that I and my colleagues will wish to examine. I believe that the focus will be on agriculture. At the Tokyo summit, we agreed that a cooperative effort is needed to redirect the agricultural policies of the summit countries. We must go beyond this at Venice, underscoring our firm commitment to comprehensive and expeditious negotiations in the Uruguay round to achieve the reforms that would help all of us. The agricultural subsidy and trade practices of the various summit countries hurt farmers and consumers and deprive developing countries of opportunities to produce more agricultural products.

Organ and tissue donorship presents an opportunity to share in these miracles. Medical technology has made it possible for thousands of Americans to benefit from organ and tissue transplantation. Sometimes this means restored vision or help for severe burns; sometimes, a heart, liver, or bone marrow transplant. But whatever the case, organ and tissue donorship shows the magnificent generosity of the American people.

More and more Americans are aware of organ and tissue donorship, thanks to much education about this worthy cause. The American Council on Transplantation has promoted organ and tissue donorship diligently for the last 4 years. Others, such as the National Kidney Foundation, the Lions Club, the Children's Transplant Association, and the Boy Scouts of America, have joined in the effort.

The results are most encouraging. Millions of Americans now carry organ and tissue donor cards. Many States give people the opportunity to sign donor cards when they complete their driver's license forms. Our schools and our media have also become involved in this cause.

But it is each American family and each citizen who makes organ and tissue donorship work. The generosity of organ and tissue donation is a very private matter between individuals and God, the giver of life. So, as all of us rejoice this springtime on the hope and promise of life, let us also think about signing organ and tissue donor cards. We keep that promise alive by helping others in need.

While the House of Representatives failed to defeat the Gephardt amendment today, I am pleased by the size and strength of the vote against protectionism and mandatory retaliation called for by this amendment. The strong leadership from those committed to free and fair trade sends a clear signal: that protectionism is not the way to resolve our trade imbalance. As this bill continues to move through Congress, we will work with them to craft a bill that will not put us on a collision course with the world and ignite a series of trade wars.

What doesn't go to winning back the Senate from tonight's revenues will be put to work by Guy Vander Jagt's National Republican Congressional Committee. And together, we're going to make certain that the next President is a Republican and that he has a Congress that will work with him rather than against him. Do you know how long it's been? The last time that a Republican President had a Republican Congress was in Dwight Eisenhower's term, and for 46 of the last 56 years, it hasn't been that way. Well, I'll come to that later. One thing becoming clearer every day is that the number of Republicans in Congress makes an enormous difference. As of next year, the other party, as I've said, will have had a majority in both Houses of the Congress for 46 of the last 56 years and one House for an additional 6 years. And we have had a majority in both Houses for only four of those 56 years, and two of those were with a Democratic President and two, as I said, with President Eisenhower. Let's make a commitment tonight to get the word out and get the vote out.

Many in the other party don't understand they're vulnerable, but the American people do understand that. For 6 years, they've been telling themselves that their political slippage is a fluke of history. Well, sometimes I'm taken aback to be given personal credit for throwing the predetermined course of history off track. Well, there's going to be a rude awakening out there when our opponents realize that our success has more to do with substance than style.

The unmistakable truth is that the other party still bends and twists to maintain the support of liberal activists whose values, goals, and interests are contrary to those of the American people. No matter how it's decorated, theirs is still the party of more regulations, bigger spending, and higher taxes. The Republican Party, for the sake of the country, must continue to offer a vigorous and distinct alternative, a platform consistent with the traditions and desires of those whose votes we seek.

Look at the evidence: It's only been a few months since our opponents regained control of both Houses of Congress, and already spending and tax schemes are bobbing to the surface like so much debris on the Potomac. [Laughter] One piece of pork floating our way is a housing bill to spend $131 billion over the next 5 years. The Federal Government is already the Nation's largest landlord, and the last thing we need now, for everyone's sake, is to expand that role. The Federal Government just shouldn't be building and maintaining housing units. If the goal is helping the needy, let's give them direct financial assistance and let the private sector build and maintain the housing.

No matter how well-intentioned government controls and grandiose programs are, for the most part they are counterproductive. The inefficiency and misallocation of resources inherent in this approach undercut effective local and private sector programs. You know, if central planning worked, we'd be getting our grain from the Soviet Union and not the other way around.

By the end of the last decade, our economy was exhibiting some of the same maladies associated with other lands and other systems -- shortages, long lines, stagnation, and pessimism. Turning that situation around and setting things right, was a team effort. It would never have happened without a band of stalwart Republicans in the House, headed up by Bob Michel, and also Republicans in the Senate, under Bob Dole's leadership. Proud of our accomplishments, we Republicans have made the mistake in believing the public will naturally reward us at the polls. Well, unfortunately, as we learned last fall, the fastest drying liquid known to man are tears of gratitude. [Laughter] The American people will cast their ballots based not on what we did yesterday, but on what we will do tomorrow.

By sticking to our principles, we've created an environment that encourages enterprise, investment, and innovation. As a result, we've had 53 months of sustained growth, inflation has gone from double digits to the lowest rate in 25 years, and over 13 million jobs have been created -- the American miracle, as our allies have called it. In the last 2 years, over half a million new businesses have been started. Yes, some fail, but they're free to try again. Our economy has been in a constant state of self-improvement from top to bottom. America is now well on its way into a new era of technology and enterprise.

What this has meant to our citizens -- one myth being spread is that old high-paying jobs are being replaced by lower paying new jobs. Well, this big lie should be laid to rest. Yes, many entry-level, lower paying jobs are being created, but 60 percent of those 13 million new jobs are in higher paying occupations -- management, technical skills, professionalism. This is one reason real take-home pay for the average American is up, poverty has declined 2 years in a row, the average lifespan continues to expand, and our standard of living is on the upswing. None of this, however, can be taken for granted. If Congress is permitted to slip back into old habits, it could well undermine prosperity, undo our reforms, and pull us back into the pit we left behind.

First and foremost, we challenge the new congressional leadership to live up to the spending limitations of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. If they do not, we'll take our case to the people. The situation already cries out for institutional reform. The primary item on our list is giving the President of the United States the same power now in the hands of 43 Governors, something that will help him eliminate the worst abuses of politically motivated spending. I'm talking about a line-item veto. And something else America clearly needs is a constitutional amendment requiring a balanced Federal budget. I'd prefer relying on Congress, but if they fail to act -- as I wrote to the minority leader of the Montana State Senate -- we can still turn to a constitutional convention to get the job done. Wasteful spending, especially in this time of high deficits, is a dagger pointed at the heart of everything we've accomplished. Let the big spenders note that if through their profligate ways they threaten to destroy the hard-fought tax reform achieved last year, they'll face not only a veto but an outraged electorate. I predict that if Congress spends itself silly, then tries to pay the bill by undoing last year's tax reform, a sort of Proposition 13-like rage will sweep across this land.

Of course, some of the most hard-fought battles that we've had in these last 6 years dealt with issues of national security. We were told time and again that if we didn't give into this or that Soviet demand, any hope for arms control would be lost. There was tremendous pressure, for example, to accept a freeze that would have left the Soviet Union in a position to dominate Europe with nuclear-armed intermediate-range missiles. Well, we held firm, and today we could be on our way to an historic first -- an actual reduction in the number of nuclear weapons threatening mankind. The details must be worked out, hitches may arise, but undeniably, progress has been made. But let me reaffirm one thing tonight: We are proud of the technological genius of our people, and we do not intend to stand still simply because our adversary can't keep up. We will not bargain away our right to develop a system that can offer protection against ballistic missiles. The Strategic Defense Initiative is not on the bargaining table.

Preserving the peace is one of America's primary goals in world affairs. However, equally important to us is our commitment to championing the cause of freedom. Freedom and peace are inseparably linked, and in no place is that more clear than in Central America. If we permit the cause of freedom to be snuffed out in Nicaragua, if we cower and refuse to support those who fight for democracy, our country will pay dearly for our lack of courage.

I received a letter signed by several of the field commanders of the democratic resistance a few months ago, just before they began their long trek back into Nicaragua. They went knowing they faced an enemy supported by Eastern-bloc and Cuban military advisers, an enemy armed with powerful Soviet weapons. In their letter these field commanders indicated they understood the political difficulties I was going through and appreciated the faith that I had in them. And they pledged, as individuals who were putting their lives on the line, fighting against tremendous odds, that they would not let me down. What they meant is, they would not let us down.

That same kind of spirit is found among the people in Afghanistan, in Angola, in Poland, and among all those who resist dictatorships. There is a power in the flame of liberty. It can melt the chains of despotism and change the world. It built our country into a mighty engine of progress and opportunity and made us a beacon of hope to all those who would be free. Today we must stand strong, because we are the keepers of that flame. And again, I appreciate your hard work and generosity. You are doing your part.

The President. It's a pleasure today to welcome again Prime Minister Nakasone, Mrs. Nakasone, trusted friends; and he is the elected leader of a valued ally, which is also one of the world's great democracies. The good will and cooperation between Japan and the United States has been a tremendous boon to both our peoples. Such relationships as our countries enjoy and benefit from are an historical rarity. Great care has been taken over four decades by political leaders on both sides of the Pacific to mold and create this gem of friendship which is of such immense value.

This hasn't been easy; it has taken effort on both sides. Ours, after all, is a dynamic and changing friendship, filled with all the energy and spirit which one would expect between two robust peoples. Today our governments must meet the great responsibility of overseeing a continued, positive evolution between the United States and Japan. I have confidence in your judgment, and by working together, any problem we face can be solved. Even the closest of friends have differences. Ours is the challenge of keeping trade and commerce, the lifeblood of prosperity, flowing equitably between our peoples. To do that, we must address the current unsustainable trade balance. It has spawned calls for protectionism that would undo the shining economic accomplishments we've achieved together. If history tells us anything, it is that great advances in the human condition occur during times of increasing trade. Conversely, it is also clear that interruptions in international commerce result in stagnation and decline.

We recognize the domestic political pressures that play a part in the decision-making processes of our respective countries, but we also know that it is the long-term well-being of our societies that must govern. Today the trading system is in need of adjustment, yet the answer is not in restrictions, but in increased opportunities. So together, let us seek positive solutions. As we've learned, progress will not happen on its own; tangible actions must be taken by us both. Mr. Prime Minister, I have heard outlines of new measures that you are considering, and I'm most encouraged by what appears to be a commitment to policies of domestic growth and the expansion of consumer demand in Japan -- something we strongly believe will have a positive effect on the trade balance. I look forward to exploring these new approaches with you in our meetings today.

Americans firmly believe that the free flow of goods and services, accentuated with head-on and above-board competition, benefits everyone. We would like to see Japan, for example, open its markets more fully to trade and commerce. Many of our companies in manufacturing, agriculture, construction, and the financial and high technology industries want to fully participate in the Japanese market. This, too, would also provide the benefits of lower prices in Japan. Mr. Prime Minister, there's an unseen bridge that spans the vast Pacific, a bridge built by the hard work, commercial genius, and productive powers of our two peoples. We must strive to see that it is maintained in good order and is traveled with equal intensity in both directions, carrying the goods and services that improve lives and increase happiness.

The bridge to which I refer rests on the firm bedrock of democracy. Today free government and free economics complement one another and are the basis of our Pacific partnership. Today Japan and the United States, with two of the world's most powerful economies, share heavy global responsibilities. Your country's skillful leadership at last year's Tokyo summit demonstrated the role Japan now plays. As we prepare for the upcoming summit in Venice, our two governments will continue working closely together, fully appreciating that our cooperation has much to do with prosperity enjoyed throughout the world. The summit is an opportunity to look to the future, to ensure the peace and prosperity of the last 40 years is maintained and strengthened as we approach the new century.

Similarly, our mutual dedication to the cause of peace and security has had vast implications, especially on the Pacific rim, where the upward thrust of human progress is so apparent. We're well into the third decade of the 1960 U.S.-Japan mutual security treaty, and we look forward, Mr. Prime Minister, to continuing and expanding upon our security cooperation.

I am pleased to have this opportunity to speak directly with Prime Minister Nakasone on the bilateral and international issues. It was a hundred and twenty years ago, since Commodore Perry first arrived on the shores of Japan. Commodore Perry sent a message, explaining his purpose to be ``a mutual interchange of those acts of kindness and good will which will serve to cement the friendship happily commenced and to endure, I trust, for many years.'' Mr. Prime Minister, in coming to our shores, we welcome you in that spirit. Let us, too, cement the friendship happily commenced so that it will endure for many years. Prime Minister Nakasone, Mrs. Nakasone, we most sincerely welcome you.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, thank you very much for your warm words of welcome. It gives me great pleasure to make an official visit to the United States at your invitation and to have this opportunity, together with my family, to meet again with you and Mrs. Reagan. Since I assumed the Office of the Prime Minister of Japan, I have consistently made my utmost efforts to strengthen further the friendly and cooperative relations between our two countries. Today the relations are basically strong and sound. In addition to our bilateral cooperation in many areas, the two countries are working closely together to solve the political and economic problems facing the world.

Mr. President, the United States is continuing a genuine effort to build upon the potential agreements reached in Reykjavik on arms control, to lay a solid foundation for world peace. For the success of such efforts, it is now more important than ever to strengthen solidarity among the Western nations. Looking towards the upcoming summit meeting in Venice, I strongly hope that my visit will prove to be constructive from this global perspective, as well. If our two countries are to fully discharge our global responsibilities, it is essential that our bilateral relations develop on an unshakable foundation.

I am deeply concerned that serious frictions on the trade and economic issues are on the rise between our two countries. We should not allow such a situation to undermine the friendship and mutual trust between our two countries. Throughout my visit, I intend to state clearly the policy measures Japan has taken so far and will take in the future for overcoming these problems. At the same time, I will listen carefully to the views of the administration, the Congress, and the people of the United States. I have journeyed across the Pacific Ocean knowing that at times one must sail on high waves. But I hope that my visit, with everyone's assistance, will offer maximum beneficial results for our two countries.

Mr. President, in your inaugural address in 1981, you said, ``We have every right to dream historic dreams.'' With energetic leadership, the American people have built this great nation, constantly moving forward and aspiring to seek out new frontiers. This pursuit of heroic dreams forms the driving spirit of your nation. We, the Japanese people, have built our present nation desiring to occupy an honored place in the international society and determined to contribute to world peace and prosperity. I am determined to exert all my efforts, too, so that our two peoples can dream heroic dreams together, looking towards a bright future for all mankind.

Mr. Prime Minister and Mrs. Nakasone, we are again honored to have you visit our home. One of the joys this high office has afforded Nancy and me has been the opportunity to develop a personal relationship with you. We cherish your visits here and our travels to Japan. We remember sharing many moments, sitting with you in a tranquil setting, sharing personal thoughts and feelings.

On February 12, 1984, his 43d birthday, he became the only climber to make a solo climb of Mount McKinley's 20,320-foot peak in midwinter, and only days later, Naomi Uemura lost his life. I cannot help but think that the message of this unique individual is something that touches the soul of both our peoples and should guide us in our dealings. Let us not be afraid to take our relationship to its utmost potential. Let us realize that every goal we reach is just a beginning of the next challenge.

Prime Minister Nakasone and I had forthright and productive discussions today. We, in a way, are also explorers, traversing unchartered paths and pushing on to achieve new goals and reaching for new heights. And, unlike Mr. Uemura, we do not travel alone. The American and Japanese people will climb this mountain together and will not only survive but triumph.

Child abuse is a tragedy that can and must be prevented. Yearly estimates of the number of children who are suspected victims of child abuse or neglect run into the millions. Each year, maltreatment kills several thousand children and inflicts long-term physical, mental, and emotional harm on many others. Much remains to be done if we are to guarantee all American youngsters the safe and happy upbringing due every child granted to us.

Fortunately, we have come to understand better the duty of every American to protect our children, and our knowledge about the prevention and treatment of child abuse continues to grow. We better realize the duty of individuals -- neighbors, friends, clergy, teachers, parents, relatives, doctors, nurses, volunteers, and so on -- State and local authorities and community child protection agencies to safeguard children and to provide support, information, and guidance to families in which maltreatment of children may happen.

All Americans should cherish the children of our land and revere the precious gift of every life. We must guard our children and join with citizens in our communities who are working to eliminate child abuse. We should also cultivate a safe and nurturing social environment for our children that promotes strong and loving families and embodies the morality, compassion, and traditional values that have ever protected society and its most vulnerable members.

Sec. 2. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget is authorized to perform the function, vested in the President by Section 4(d) of the Act, of approving the detailing of personnel to the Agency for International Development.

It is truly fitting that America observe April 9 in recognition of our former prisoners of war; that date is the 46th anniversary of the day in 1942 when U.S. forces holding out on the Bataan Peninsula in the Philippines were captured. Later, as prisoners of war, these gallant Americans were subjected to the infamous Bataan Death March and to other inhumane treatment that killed thousands of them before they could be liberated. In every conflict, brutality has invariably been meted out to American prisoners of war; on April 9 and every day, we must remember with solemn pride and gratitude that valor and tenacity have ever been our prisoners' response.

The term ``difficult circumstances'' referred to nothing less than physical and mental torture, starvation, disease, separation from loved ones, and deprivation of medical treatment -- an ordeal that for some, in every conflict, did not end until death. To their brave families we offer solace and salute. To our former prisoners of war who endured so much, we say that with your example and with God's help we will seek to meet the standards of devotion you have set; we will never forget your service or your sacrifice.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this first day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Passover and Easter are festivals of hope. That's why this weekend is a good time for all of us to reflect on the enduring importance to mankind of hope and faith in the future. And nowhere do our hopes take more visible form than in the quest of science.

Science has grown, and with it, the fascination it holds for all of us. But as the pursuit of science has become ever more nationally and even multinationally funded, it has also become more expensive. The problem here is that science, unlike a bridge or an interstate highway or a courthouse, has no local constituency. Today, when we're witnessing some of the most exciting discoveries in the history of science, things similar to the breakthroughs associated with Einstein, Galileo, and Newton, Federal funding for science is in jeopardy because of budget constraints.

That's why it's my duty as President to draw its importance to your attention and that of Congress. America has long been the world's scientific leader. Over the years, we've secured far more patents than any other country in the world. And since World War II, we have won more Nobel prizes for science than the Europeans and Japanese combined. We also support more of what is called basic research; that is, research meant to teach us rather than to invent or develop new products. And for the past 40 years, the Government has been our leading sponsor of basic research.

The remarkable thing is that although basic research does not begin with a particular practical goal, when you look at the results over the years, it ends up being one of the most practical things government does. For example, government-sponsored basic research produced the first laser. Today, less than three decades later, lasers are used in everything from microsurgery to the transmission of immense volumes of information and may contribute to our Strategic Defense Initiative that promises to make ballistic missiles obsolete. Well, I think that over the past 50 years the Government has helped build a number of particle accelerators so scientists could study high energy physics. Major industries, including television, communications, and computer industries, couldn't be where they are today without developments that began with this basic research.

We cannot know where scientific research will lead. The consequences and spinoffs are unknown and unknowable until they happen. In research, as Albert Einstein once said, imagination is more important than knowledge. We can travel wherever the eye of our imagination can see. But one thing is certain: If we don't explore, others will, and we'll fall behind. This is why I've urged Congress to devote more money to research. After taking out inflation, today's government research expenditures are 58 percent greater than the expenditures of a decade ago. It is an indispensable investment in America's future.

Let me tell you about just a few of the many projects we'll fund this year. This year we'll begin work on the great grandchild of those particle accelerators that have meant so much to our economic growth. It's called the superconducting supercollider. And it will harness the galloping technology of superconductivity, so we can explore subatomic particles in ways we've never been able to before. We'll also continue developing the space station. When it's in orbit, the space station will let us perform once impossible experiments in the weightless and sterile environment of outer space and understand our world and universe. And we're developing new technology to allow man eventually to journey beyond Earth's orbit. Astronaut Senator Jake Garn and others in Congress have given the space program the support it needs to once again reach for the stars.

We're working on new ways to spread the seeds of Federal research. Working with universities across the country, we have established 14 engineering research centers devoted to basic research on emerging technologies. And we're planning 10 to 15 new science and technology centers to do the same thing in the fields of general science. All of these centers will work with industries so that what they discover can quickly lead to new and better and internationally competitive products. All of this and more is before Congress now.

Some say that we can't afford it, that we're too strapped for cash. Well, leadership means making hard choices, even in an election year. We've put our research budget under a microscope and looked for quality and cost effectiveness. We've put together the best program for the taxpayers' dollars. After all, the American tradition of hope is one we can't afford to forget.

I am pleased to sign the instrument of ratification for the Montreal protocol on substances that deplete the ozone layer. The protocol marks an important milestone for the future quality of the global environment and for the health and well-being of all peoples of the world. Unanimous approval of the protocol by the Senate on March 14th demonstrated to the world community this country's willingness to act promptly and decisively in carrying out its commitments to protect the stratospheric ozone layer from the damaging effects of chlorofluorocarbons and halons, but our action alone is not enough. The protocol enters into force next January only if at least 11 nations representing two-thirds of worldwide consumption of chlorofluorocarbons and halons ratify the agreement. Our immediate challenge, having come this far, is to promote prompt ratification by every signatory nation.

I believe the Montreal protocol, negotiated under the auspices of the United Nations Environment Programme, is an extremely important environmental agreement. It provides for internationally coordinated control of ozone-depleting substances in order to protect a vital global resource. It requires countries that are parties to reduce production and consumption of major ozone-depleting chemicals by 50 percent by 1999. It creates incentives for new technologies -- chemical producers are already working to develop and market safer substitutes -- and establishes an ongoing process for review of new scientific data and of technical and economic developments. A mechanism for adjustment of the protocol is established to allow for changes based upon the review process. The wisdom of this unique provision is already being realized.

Data made available only during the last few weeks demonstrate that our knowledge of ozone depletion is rapidly expanding. For our part, the United States will give the highest priority to analyzing and assessing the latest research findings to assure that the review process moves expeditiously.

Montreal protocol is a model of cooperation. It is a product of the recognition and international consensus that ozone depletion is a global problem, both in terms of its causes and its effects. The protocol is the result of an extraordinary process of scientific study, negotiations among representatives of the business and environmental communities, and international diplomacy. It is a monumental achievement.

Just over a year ago the President signed into law the most sweeping immigration reform in more than three decades. Among the provisions of the new law was a generous legalization or amnesty provision that allows persons who are unlawfully in the United States to become legal residents if they meet certain requirements.

In general, they must have lived here continuously with only brief absences since prior to 1982, and they must have been contributing members of our society and free from serious criminal violations of our laws. More than 1\1/4\ million persons have already come forward to accept this one-time amnesty provision in the immigration laws. They are made up of nearly every nationality. By their actions in this country over the past 6 years, they have demonstrated that they deserve the privilege of remaining here in a fully legal status without having to live in an underground society and fearing discovery of their unlawful existence in this great nation. Like other immigrants who have come through normal, lawful channels, they have shown a great willingness to work and contribute to our nation while sharing in our economic well being.

There may still be those who for one reason or another have not taken advantage of this one-time opportunity. If they do not do so soon, they will be left behind while their brother and sister immigrants enjoy living in the daylight of liberty. The President calls on all Americans to do whatever is in their power to remind their neighbors, friends, coworkers, and others who may be living outside our immigration laws, but are eligible for legal residence, that the time is growing short for them to come forward and join us as recognized members of our nation and our society. And he urges those who may be eligible to attain this privilege and benefit to do so promptly.

American people in recent years have recognized the need for a return to solid educational achievement in our schools and colleges. Parents, educators, and students realize the lasting value of an education that imparts thorough skills in reading comprehension, composition, and mathematics and that provides a fundamental understanding of our country's heritage of liberty and of the entire body of wisdom and knowledge to which our civilization is heir. One of the many beneficial results of this focus on sound education is a reemphasis on the role of academic life for our Nation's student athletes.

For decades, we have cheered our high school and college athletes as they have played the sports our country loves. Sometimes lost in ``the tumult and the shouting,'' however, is the realization that, of every 10,000 student athletes, only one ever becomes a professional athlete; that the one who does so can expect a professional career of less than 4 years; and that the other 9,999 must rely for a living not on their athletic skills but on their educational background and a truly worthwhile academic degree.

We rightly support and salute our student athletes for their accomplishments on the diamond, the gridiron, the hardwood, the track, and every sort of playing field; but we must also do the same for athletes and all students for what they accomplish in the classroom as well. Parents, teachers, and coaches fulfill their obligations to student athletes by expecting and by fostering the high academic performance that is everyone's key to a bright, rather than a blighted, future. That is something for all of us to remember and to act upon, on National Student-Athlete Day and always.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Anniversary of the birth of New Mexico's Dennis Chavez, the first native-born Hispanic elected to the United States Senate and for many years the highest-ranking Hispanic in the Federal government. All Americans join the people of the Land of Enchantment and Hispanic Americans throughout our country in saluting the memory of this public servant, who left school as a child to help support his family and went on to become a lawyer, State Representative, U.S. Representative, and U.S. Senator.

As a Senator, Dennis Chavez chaired the Committee on Public Works and served on the Defense Appropriations Subcommittee. He sought the well-being of every American and displayed lasting concern for those in need. Dennis Chavez truly exemplified the dedication of the public servant and won distinction in the service of New Mexico and of his Nation; to this day, his life and career symbolize the countless achievements of Hispanic Americans and demonstrate the opportunity America offers.

Nation has long enjoyed a high standard of living, thanks especially to our high productivity, which has accounted for about half our economic growth over the last century. Productivity affects our total output of goods and services, helps keep inflation low, and is vital to our ability to compete in U.S. and foreign markets.

We must accelerate productivity growth in the service and other sectors. Good performance in productivity is especially necessary now that we are in world markets for most goods and services, and because many of our foreign competitors can target the U.S. market using state-of-the-art technology.

Government's job is to create a healthy climate in which private sector productivity growth can flourish. We have done this. We have adopted sound policies to reform internal laws, to encourage inventors to create better products and processes, to reduce burdensome regulations, to stimulate investment in research and development, and to strengthen private sector access to federally funded science and technology. These achievements provide a solid foundation for the private sector to build upon.

Our businesses and their individual leaders must continue their efforts to increase productivity by adopting new technologies and management innovations and by better strategic planning in the increasingly competitive international context.

Productivity is now intertwined with quality. To encourage U.S. companies to strengthen their quality, I have endorsed a major initiative, the Malcolm Baldrige National Quality Award, that will honor U.S. manufacturing firms, service companies, and small businesses for improving their goods and services.

To encourage Americans to understand the importance of productivity growth to their economic welfare, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 223, has designated the week of April 10 through April 16, 1988, as National Productivity Improvement Week and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

America, do hereby proclaim the week of April 10 through April 16, 1988, as National Productivity Improvement Week. I call upon the people of the United States and especially our business leaders, educators, workers, and public officials to observe this week with appropriate ceremonies and activities in a spirit of rededication to improving our Nation's productivity.

Shortly after the Secretary's certification, the IWC adopted a second resolution on February 14, 1988, recommending that Japan not proceed with its revised research program. Japan has continued its whaling activities notwithstanding this second resolution.

Given the lack of any evidence that Japan is bringing its whaling activities into conformance with the recommendations of the IWC, I am directing the Secretary of State under the Packwood-Magnuson Amendment to withhold 100 percent of the fishing privileges that would otherwise be available to Japan in the U.S. Exclusive Economic Zone. Japan has requested the opportunity to fish for 3,000 metric tons of sea snails and 5,000 metric tons of Pacific whiting. These requests will be denied. In addition, Japan will be barred from any future allocations of fishing privileges for any other species, including Pacific cod, until the Secretary of Commerce determines that the situation has been corrected.

The sanctions being imposed are the strongest possible under the Packwood-Magnuson Amendment. The immediate and prospective effects of a 100 percent reduction of fishing allocations, coupled with Presidential review in the near future, is the most effective means of encouraging Japan to embrace the IWC conservation program. Therefore, I will not impose at this time the sanctions available under the Pelly Amendment against Japanese fish products imported into the United States. I am asking Secretary Verity, in cooperation with Secretary Shultz, to monitor Japanese whaling practices during the next few months and to report to me no later than December 1, 1988.

I also am directing the Secretary of Commerce and the Secretary of State to continue consultations with our IWC partners to ensure that we bring to a halt all whaling that diminishes the effectiveness of the IWC's conservation program, specifically including that under Japan's contested research program. Our actions taken today and in the future should encourage all nations to adhere to the conservation programs of the IWC.

Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, find that the policies and actions in Panama of Manuel Antonio Noriega and Manuel Solis Palma constitute an unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security, foreign policy, and economy of the United States and hereby declare a national emergency to deal with that threat.

Section 1. I hereby order blocked all property and interests in property of the Government of Panama that are in the United States, that hereafter come within the United States, or that are or hereafter come within the possession or control of persons located within the United States. For purposes of this Order, the Government of Panama is defined to include its agencies, instrumentalities and controlled entities, including the Banco Nacional de Panama and the Caja de Ahorros.

Any direct or indirect payments or transfers from the United States to the Noriega/Solis regime of funds, including currency, cash or coins of any nation, or of other financial or investment assets or credits are prohibited. All transfers, or payments owed, to the Government of Panama shall be made into an account at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, to be held for the benefit of the Panamanian people. For purposes of this Order, the term ``Noriega/Solis regime'' shall mean Manuel Antonio Noriega, Manuel Solis Palma, and any agencies, instrumentalities or entities purporting to act on their behalf or under their asserted authority.

Any direct or indirect payments or transfers to the Noriega/Solis regime of funds, including currency, cash or coins of any nation, or of other financial or investment assets or credits, by any United States person located in the territory of Panama, or by any person organized under the laws of Panama and owned or controlled by a United States person, are prohibited. All transfers, or payments owed, to the Government of Panama by such persons shall be made into an account at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, to the held for the benefit of the Panamanian people. For purposes of Section 2(b), ``United States person'' is defined to mean any United States citizen, permanent resident alien, juridical person organized under the laws of the United States, or any person in the United States.

Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 shall not be deemed to block property or interests in property of the Government of Panama, including, but not limited to, accounts established at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York as described in section 2, with respect to which transactions are authorized by, or on behalf of, the recognized representative of the Government of Panama as certified by the Secretary of State, or are otherwise authorized in regulations which may hereafter be issued pursuant to this Order. Section 2 shall not be deemed to prohibit interbank clearing payments.

Order are intended to extend the effectiveness of actions initiated in cooperation with the Government of Panama and its President, Eric Arturo Delvalle, and are not intended to block private Panamanian assets subject to the jurisdiction of the United States or to prohibit remittances by United States persons to Panamanian persons other than the Noriega/Solis regime.

Sec. 6. The Secretary of the Treasury, in consultation with the Secretary of State, is authorized to take such actions, including the promulgation of rules and regulations, and to employ all powers granted to me by the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this Order. The Secretary of the Treasury may redelegate any of these functions to other officers or agencies of the Federal Government.

Sec. 7. Nothing contained in this Order shall confer any substantive or procedural right or privilege on any person or organization, enforceable against the United States, its agencies or its officers, or the Federal Reserve Bank of New York or its officers.

I have authorized these steps in response to the unusual and extraordinary threat posed by the actions of Manuel Antonio Noriega and Manuel Solis Palma, to challenge the duly constituted authorities of the Government of Panama. In taking these measures we have acted in cooperation with the authorized representatives of the Government and in support of the efforts of the Panamanian people to foster constitutional, democratic government in Panama.

The steps taken today follow the previous measures we have taken in coordination with the authorized representatives of the Government of Panama, including the decision to deposit United States Government payments owed Panama in an account established at President Delvalle's request at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, and removal of trade preferences under the Generalized System of Preferences and the Caribbean Basin Initiative. These further steps reaffirm our commitment to democratic government in Panama and our belief that Noriega would best serve his country by complying with the instruction of President Delvalle to relinquish his post.

The people of the United States and the people of Panama have shared a long and mutually productive relationship, exemplified by the historic Panama Canal Treaties. The United States has been, and remains, committed to fulfilling faithfully its obligations under the Panama Canal Treaties. We are prepared to resume our close working relationships with the Panamanian Defense Forces once civilian government and constitutional democracy are re-established.

These measures will provide further support to the efforts of the people of Panama and President Eric Delvalle to restore democratic government and constitutional order in Panama. Passed in 1977, the IEEPA is available to the President to deal with an unusual and extraordinary external threat to the national security, foreign policy, or economy of the United States.

You see, April marks the 65th straight month of the longest peacetime expansion in U.S. history. In that time, we've created nearly 16 million jobs. They're better and higher paying, too, which is one reason why the real income of the average American has been rising steadily for the last 5 years. The percentage of Americans employed is the highest in history, and the unemployment rate continues to drop down to its lowest level since 1974. Since 1980 U.S. manufacturing has increased its productivity almost 3 times as fast as in the 7 previous years.

Somehow our opponents have convinced themselves that this record growth, vibrant job creation, and more productive economy is bad news. And they say it's all the fault of Reaganomics. Well, I'd love to take the blame, or credit, as the case may be, but that just wouldn't be fair. All we did was get government out of your way. We cut taxes, inflation, and regulations; and we let the American people take back their own economy and run with it. In their effort to prove that this economic boom we're in is really a bust, our opponents have had to weave some pretty tall tales. One of those they tell about America is that we're threatened by foreign investment. Well, to paraphrase what Joe Friday used to say in ``Dragnet'': ``Let's just look at the facts, ma'am.'' Yes, foreigners now hold about 12 percent of U.S. public debt, but that's down from 16 percent in 1978. Foreign resources also accounted for 10 percent of total credit-market funds last year -- exactly the same as in the mid-1970's. But even so, foreign investment isn't something to be scared of. It brings us a host of benefits, including jobs and lower interest rates for all Americans, whether they be homebuyers, small businessmen, consumers, or farmers.

The fact is we live in a global economy. We can be glad people in other countries choose to invest in the vibrant and growing U.S. economy rather than their own nations. I don't blame them. I think America's a pretty good investment, too. Right now, however, there's a trade bill working its way through Congress that could go a long way toward making America a bad investment for Americans and foreigners alike. At this moment, we've not seen the final bill.

But from what we already know, we still have very -- underline very -- serious reservations. We'll continue to work with the full conference and the congressional leadership to clear up these problems. But the bottom line is this: I will veto a bad trade bill before I will let a bad trade bill veto our economic expansion.

Another important matter facing the Nation today is the INF treaty, which I signed with General Secretary Gorbachev at our Washington summit meeting last December. This treaty will, for the first time, eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet missiles. We called this the zero-option when I first proposed it in 1981. The treaty also requires the Soviet Union to make far greater reductions now in its missile systems to reach equality with us. This is an historic precedent, and we will apply it to other arms negotiations as well. Finally, the treaty has the most comprehensive verification regime in arms control history. This too is an important precedent for other negotiations, particularly those on strategic arms, where an even more elaborate verification regime will be required.

In sum, this treaty represents what can be accomplished when we negotiate from a position of strength. Action on it is now up to the United States Senate, which must give its advice and consent to ratification. I hope it will be given expeditious consideration by the full Senate, and I urge all Senators to provide their advice and consent without reservation. It is a solid treaty, and it enhances the security of our country and our allies.

For those of you with television stations, I have an announcement. As you know, I've never liked big government. And that was one of the reasons I was opposed to the so-called fairness doctrine, as you've already been told -- that particular legislation which I vetoed. And I think you'll agree, there's no reason to substitute the judgment of Washington bureaucrats for that of professional broadcasters.

Harry Truman became the first President to speak by way of television, followed by Dwight Eisenhower, who, in 1955, became the first President to be seen on color television. Today, just six short decades after Warren Harding first spoke over the radio, these remarks of mine are being recorded on HDTV, high-definition television. I'm told that HDTV represents an advance as dramatic as that from black and white to color -- a new and powerful manifestation of the broadcasting industry.

This technological creativity -- from primitive, early radio to HDTV and satellite transmissions during my own lifetime -- has, of course, transformed American life. But I would submit that it promises to transform world affairs as well, and this is a subject that I'd like to come back to. The truth is that there is no setting in which the cause of peace and human freedom is ever far from our minds. And so, I'd like to take a moment to address foreign policy not only because of the coming summit but because I believe lessons have emerged during these past 7 years that will endure far beyond this administration.

Now, a few words about an issue that is important to both the Washington summit last year and to the coming Moscow summit next month: arms reductions. I cannot, of course, describe to you the detail of the talks we've engaged in with the Soviets, or are engaged at the moment. Rather, I'd like to discuss with you our fundamental approach to arms reduction.

The first point is that we insisted upon arms reductions. We refused, in other words, to be drawn into an elaborate arms control process that could very well lull us and our allies into a false sense of security. After all, it was in a climate of arms control and so-called detente during the 1970's that the Soviet Union continued their pursuit of the biggest arms buildup in all history -- a buildup of nuclear and conventional forces alike -- while we in the United States permitted our own deterrent capability to weaken.

At first, many critics viewed the goal of genuine arms reductions as unrealistic, even, according to some, misleading, even put forward in bad faith. They claimed our administration was making proposals that the Soviets would simply never agree to. But by the autumn of 1985, you in the media began reporting a Soviet willingness to consider a 25-percent, then a 40-percent, and finally a 50-percent reduction in strategic arms. We do not know yet whether we can reach an agreement with the Soviets on such a dramatic production -- or reduction in strategic arms in time for the Moscow summit. But the negotiations are going forward, earnestly and in good faith, and that in itself is historic.

With regard to our zero-option proposal for intermediate-range nuclear forces, or as we call it, INF, the critics again derided our position as unrealistic when we first advanced it in 1981. Today it's my hope that the Senate will move expeditiously to give its advice and consent to the INF treaty that Mr.

If you will, contrast these events with the Soviet attitude when the United States ordered [offered] deep cuts in nuclear arms to Moscow at the beginning of 1977. You'll recall that the Soviets rejected that American offer out of hand.

First, the United States in the 1970's slashed our defense budgets and neglected crucial defense investment. We were dealing, in short, from a position of weakness. Well, today we're dealing from a position of strength. Second, the United States, those 11 years ago, had not yet shown what might be called a tough patience -- a willingness to stake out a strong position, then stand by it as the Soviets probed and made their counteroffers, testing American determination.

Why should the Soviets have agreed to a joint cut in 1977, when they had reason to believe the United States would go on permitting the strength of its deterrent forces to erode, when the Soviets had reason to believe, in other words, that in dealing with the United States they could get something for nothing? Yet today the Soviets understand that we can be tough enough and patient enough to hold out, that to improve their own position the Soviets themselves must bargain.

I said when I first ran for President that our nation needed to renew its strength. Some called me bellicose, even a warmonger. Some claimed that we should deal with the Soviets not by rebuilding our own defenses but by engaging in a nuclear freeze, a freeze that would permanently ratify Soviet nuclear superiority. Well, I speak today -- as I will speak increasingly in these months -- of the lessons we've learned. Now we know, without doubt, that strength works, that strength promotes the cause of freedom and, yes, the cause of peace. I do not claim this achievement for my own.

It's my fervent hope that this bipartisan coalition can be sustained and enlarged, in particular, to support strategic defenses for America and our allies. My concern -- my grave concern -- about efforts to cut the defense budget -- this is no time to weaken our defenses, not now, when we've been through so much to rebuild them, when our strong defenses have brought us so far in dealing with the Soviets.

Wherever our parties may differ in our dealings with the Soviets, let them always agree. I didn't say that exactly correctly. No matter how much we may divide and be divided in our relations with the Soviets, let us always agree: We must be patient, and yes, America must be strong.

Important as they are, arms reductions have represented only one aspect of our four-part agenda for dealing with the Soviets -- the other three being human rights; regional conflicts; and bilateral, people-to-people exchanges. This in itself represents another achievement, for we've gone from containment -- the mere defense of our interests -- to a strategy based upon the expansion of freedom.

Nowhere has the world movement toward freedom and democracy been more in evidence than in what might be called the outposts of Soviet expansionism. For in Afghanistan, Cambodia, Africa, and, yes, Nicaragua, we see domestic insurgencies directed against Communist tyrants. And it's been a central part of our new strategy, part of our new commitment to the expansion of freedom, to help them.

With regard to Nicaragua, it's no secret that I believe Congress should have done more, much more, to aid the freedom fighters. But the recent vote to send humanitarian aid will do much good. And I want to restate my commitment -- my unshakable commitment -- to stand by the freedom fighters and their efforts, in every way, to bring peace and democracy to their country.

Between now and the time I leave for Moscow, I'll be speaking at greater length about human rights and regional conflicts. In the very near future, we anticipate the signing in Geneva of an agreement that will result in the total withdrawal of Soviet forces from Afghanistan. Now, if that accord is complied with and the Soviets withdraw irrevocably from that long-suffering country, this will be a great victory for its heroic people, whom we shall continue to support. It'll also be a major contribution to the improvement of East-West relations.

But today, if I may, I'd like to talk for a moment about the bilateral relations between our two nations. It was at the Geneva summit in 1985 that General Secretary Gorbachev and I endorsed a new expansion in people-to-people exchanges between our two nations. Since then, exchanges of all kinds have begun taking place. Some have rightly received enormous publicity -- the performance of pianist Vladimir Horowitz in Moscow, for example, or the Bolshoi Ballet's tour of the United States. Others have been quietly going forward -- student exchanges, fine arts exhibitions, exchanges between academics and scientists. All of this has its impact. No Soviet citizen can return to his country from the United States seriously believing that America represents an aggressive power. No American can return from the Soviet Union without having his understanding of that country -- and, yes, of what it means to be an American -- deeply enriched. And so, in Moscow next month, I'll seek to expand these people-to-people exchanges still further.

I'd like to consider as well the implications of another kind of exchange, one that I touched on at the very beginning of my remarks: the information exchange, an exchange borne of high technology. To be sure, no revolution in our time is more striking, far-reaching, and profound than the revolution in technology and communications. The semiconductor and countless other breakthroughs have ushered in a new burst of economic creativity. We have products today -- the lap-top computer, for example -- that were quite literally undreamed of just a decade ago. Instantaneous communications have made possible the growing integration of world markets. And, yes, the new communications technologies have made it harder and harder for totalitarian states to control the information that reaches their peoples. All of this says a great deal about the nature of the two world systems.

In the West, as I've suggested, we see rising standards of living, medical breakthrough after breakthrough, enormous economic and technological creativity. And in the Communist world? Well, Khrushchev may have said, ``We will bury you,'' but today when we look at the Communist world, what we see is a vast economic stagnation. Today the Soviet Union cannot -- and remember, this is some seven decades after the revolution -- cannot feed its own people. And consider this: Endless shortages and long lines force the average Soviet family to spend 2 hours shopping every day just to obtain the necessities of life. It is not too much to claim that it lies in the very nature of freedom to promote growth and prosperity. Just as the technological revolution says much about the future [nature] of our two systems, so, too, it suggests a great deal about their future.

States that depend now on the consent of their people, but on -- not on the consent of their people, I should say, but on a rigid control of information those people receive -- such states will come under increasing pressure. So, too, economic growth has already come to rely less and less upon the labor of the hands and the sweat of the brow, and more and more upon the genius of the human mind. Consider, for example, the cover story of last week's Forbes magazine.

The article, by the author and economist George Gilder, described coming developments in computer technology, focusing on the work and views of the California Institute of Technology's physicist Carver Mead. The article was entitled, ``You Ain't Seen Nothing Yet.'' ``Mead,'' Gilder writes, ``believes that new developments in electronics are opening right now opportunities for entrepreneurial creativity and invention unprecedented in the history of technology. The current transition promises yet another 10,000-fold increase in the cost-effectiveness of computing in the next decade. Silicon slices with as many as 10 billion linked transistors will become possible.'' And listen, if you would, what Mead himself is quoted as saying: ``The entire Industrial Revolution enhanced productivity by a factor of about 100.

It means that nations will have to grant to their scientists complete freedom of inquiry; to their businessmen and entrepreneurs, freedom to invest, to risk, to create new products and with them new markets; to their entire economies, the freedom to grow and grow, unburdened by heavy taxation and unimpeded by needless regulation. This represents, as I said, the true challenge of openness to the Communist world. For the Soviets and their clients must open their countries to ever-wider freedoms, or they'll see their economies -- indeed, their whole way of life -- fall further and further behind.

I don't want to go on too long. This is, after all, Las Vegas, and outside, just a moment ago, I saw a fellow trading 10 passes to the Reagan talk for one ticket to Frankie Valli. [Laughter] I'm mindful, too, that bringing things to a good conclusion is always a tricky business. You were told that I was a sports announcer -- WHO, Des Moines. Well, back in those days, the great evangelist, Aimee Semple McPherson, was making a tour of the country, holding revival meetings, and one of them in Des Moines. Now, the station thought it would be a good idea -- an enterprising public relations man -- to interview Aimee Semple McPherson. But why they picked a sports announcer to interview that noted evangelist, I'll never know. But there we stood in the studio, and I asked her several, what I thought were appropriate, questions.

And then she answered graciously, but then went into a very fervent plea about the success of her meeting. And I sat down, until suddenly, I heard her saying good night to our radio audience. And I looked up at the clock, and there were only 4 minutes to go. Well, I didn't know enough about Aimee Semple McPherson that I could fill 4 minutes.

But to return to world affairs, you may recall that when I was in Berlin last year, I challenged Mr. Gorbachev to tear down the Wall, that grim reminder of all that divides East from West, the Communist world from the free. But there is another wall that divides us, an invisible wall. It's the wall the Communist world has erected against the free flow of information and ideas. It's the wall that prevents the Communist world from joining the West in this dazzling new age of prosperity and creativity. And as I challenged him in Berlin before the Washington summit, I challenge Mr.

Gorbachev and I have already addressed each other's people on television, and this was helpful. But I challenge Mr. Gorbachev to open the Soviet Union more fully to Western media. Western newspapers and journals should become freely available to Soviet citizens. Soviet airwaves should be opened to Western broadcasts. And, yes, the Soviets should open their country to books, all books. Here I have a specific first step to suggest. Mr. Gorbachev, open the Soviet Union to the works of a great man and an historic author. Open the Soviet Union to the works of Solzhenitsyn. We have been too long divided, East from West. Tear down this wall, Mr. Gorbachev, that our peoples might come to know one another and together build the world anew.

Caring for children is the primary responsibility of a parent. It is the task around which family life is organized, a major factor in every decision parents make about their own and their family's future, from choice of jobs and schools and neighborhoods to the selection of books, films, and every other form of instructional material or entertainment that will influence the development of the child's character and personality. Child care is also an organizing principle of society, for it is the primary means of transmitting knowledge, traditions, and moral and religious values from one generation to the next.

Sound public policy must support the family in its mission of child care. To do so effectively, public policy must increase and strengthen, not narrow and dilute, the variety of child care options open to families.

It must help ensure that child care serves as an adjunct and buttress to parental guidance and love; that it reflects as far as possible the actual preferences of parents for the personal care of their precious offspring; and that it is inherently flexible, to avoid the establishment of practices or programs that defeat these ends and undermine either the well-being of children or the health of the economy.

Heightened interest in child care is a result of tremendous growth and change in the U.S. work force. Between 1982 and 1986, American business created two and one-half times as many new jobs as Japan and the major industrial countries of Europe combined. Our country is well into its sixth consecutive year of expansion -- a peacetime record.

Women, particularly, are moving into the salaried labor force in large numbers, and their unemployment rate has dropped nearly a full percentage point in the past year alone. According to the Bureau of Labor Statistics, nearly half of all mothers with a child under one year of age work. Today one family in six is headed by a single, divorced, or widowed woman.

Americans have responded to these changes in a number of ways, reflecting the many options parents desire and need. Family members -- a sibling or grandparents -- and students provide both full- and part-time day care. Churches have developed effective day care programs that supplement custodial care with the religious atmosphere many parents seek. State-licensed facilities managed by public agencies or private entities have rapidly expanded, as have corporate child care programs. Moreover, the landmark tax reform bill I signed in 1986 included a provision beneficial to all families facing child care decisions: the near doubling -- to $2,000 by 1989, with indexing thereafter -- of the per-child personal exemption. This measure has restored at least a fraction of the exemption's original worth to families and more realistically reflects the rising cost of caring for children.

To be fair to all families, child care policy analysis must recognize the contributions of women who work, those who would prefer to work part-time rather than full-time jobs, and homemakers who forgo employment income altogether to raise children at home. Surely all of these are ``working mothers.'' As policy options are reviewed and implemented, we must also continue to assess carefully the growing body of research data on the effects of various forms of child care on the emotional, psychological, and intellectual development of children.

I ask all Americans to join with me in honoring the parents, relatives, schools, churches, and institutional child care providers who take on the enormously important task of child care. Theirs is a sacred trust gladly assumed for the future of our Nation. National Child Care Awareness Week affords us a welcome opportunity to offer them recognition and encouragement.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eleventh day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

For nearly six decades, observance of the annual Pan American Day has told the world that the nations of the Western Hemisphere share a unique harmony of ideals -- the love of liberty, independence, and democracy; the willingness to seek these treasures and to preserve them wherever they are found; and firm and profound opposition to totalitarianism. Each year the United States joins with countries throughout the Americas in pledging fidelity to these ideals so vital to our future.

Almost a century ago, in Washington, D.C., the First International Conference of American States made the idea of hemispheric unity a reality by establishing the International Union of American Republics, the predecessor of the Organization of American States (OAS). The common aspirations of the peoples of the Americas for freedom, independence, democracy, peace, security, and prosperity inspire the OAS, which is charged with upholding and defending these critical objectives within the Inter-American System.

The past decade has witnessed several victories for freedom and democracy in the Americas. Ten years ago, the great majority of Latin Americans lived under oppression; today, more than 90 percent of the people of the Americas live under democratic government. We can all be truly grateful for these transformations to democracy.

OAS Charter establishes the basis for hemispheric cooperation in the peaceful settlement of disputes, economic and social development, education, and the protection of human rights. In recent years, the OAS has added a new dimension to its regional problem-solving by creating the OAS Drug Abuse Control Commission to combat narcotics trafficking and drug abuse. The United States of America accords special priority to the crucial work of the OAS in the fields of human rights and narcotics control.

The foundations of the Inter-American System emerged from the Americas' independence movements, but its consolidation dates from the signing of the OAS Charter; so it is especially fitting that we renew our commitment to the principles of the Organization of American States and its Specialized Agencies on Pan American Day this year as 40th Anniversary celebrations take place.

Before welcoming our visitors, our guests here today, I have a brief announcement. I have to make it here because that's where the press is, and it's for them. I've just received a briefing from my national security advisers on the contents of the proposed Geneva agreements on Afghanistan that would provide for the complete withdrawal of Soviet occupation forces from that country. I believe the U.S. can now join the Soviet Union as a guarantor of the Geneva instruments. I've therefore asked Secretary [of State] Shultz to represent us at a signing ceremony for the historic accords as scheduled to take place in Geneva later this week.

This development would not have been possible had it not been for the valiant struggle of the Afghan people to rid their country of foreign occupation. We take great pride in having assisted the Afghan people in this triumph, and they can count on our continued support. We also pledge our continued friendship and support to the Government and people of Pakistan, who have so generously hosted millions of Afghan refugees during this period of Soviet domination of Afghanistan.

Congratulations go as well to coach Larry Brown and the University of Kansas Jayhawks. Now, it's no secret that at the beginning of the NCAA tournament, you Jayhawks -- well, I suppose the way to put it is to say that you weren't exactly favored to win. [Laughter] So, what happened is a testament to determination, to hard work -- lots and lots of hard work, to pride, to teamwork, and the courage to dream.

Well, they're both great stories, the stories of these two teams, these two fighters who happened to turn themselves into national champions. And if I could offer a thought to each of you young players, it would be this: Remember the lessons you've learned this season, the lessons about hard work and never quitting, about digging down into yourselves when you seem to be behind. Because what you've learned in basketball will be a strength to you all your lives. Especially here, in this great land of opportunity. Because it's true, if you keep your head up and work hard in America, anything can happen.

After studying at the University of Wisconsin and revealing an aptitude for mechanical invention, Muir decided to embark on ``the study of the inventions of God'' -- in the ``university of the wilderness.'' Both observant and eloquent, he began journeys and journal-keeping to investigate nature.

Success as a horticulturalist near Martinez, California, gave him the wherewithal to travel and study for a lifetime. He walked throughout his beloved Golden State, all America, and many other lands to record his observations and wrote books and articles on natural phenomena and especially on the forests he loved.

President has said before that he would like to be able to sign a trade bill that will open markets and improve America's international competitiveness. The 17 subconferences have made notable progress in moving toward such a bill, but further improvements must be made. The administration is prepared to continue working with the congressional leadership and the full conference on an acceptable bill. As the full conference moves to complete its work, the President has asked Secretary Baker, Senator Baker, and Ambassador Yeutter to make themselves available to resolve the remaining problems. But let there be no misunderstanding: The President will not hesitate to veto a trade bill that will hurt America's economic prosperity.

Geneva accords call for four instruments as outlined by Secretary Shultz yesterday in the briefing room. In addition, the Secretary noted our insistence that the obligations of the guarantors be symmetrical. We are satisfied that the Soviets understand our view and intent regarding the guarantees, i.e., that they must be symmetrical.

Thank you all very much, and thank you, Ken, and welcome to the White House. I am delighted to have you here to wrap up what I know has been a whole series of meetings and briefings that you've had with top officials of the administration. The Young Presidents' Organization has an extraordinary membership. I can't help but admire men and women who are already being called president when they're 40. [Laughter] It took some of us a little bit longer.

Well, what you've accomplished so early in life means that your biggest success still lies ahead. I know that you're -- well, now that you are used to being called president, no one knows where you might wind up. We certainly need risk-taking, bottom-line chief executives like you to serve in government.

I've been very fortunate to have in my administration former members of YPO like Jack Courtemanche, who isn't here with us this morning, but three others that are: Carl Covitz, Bob Tuttle, and Joe Wright. And without men and women drawn from the private sector, it is easy for the Federal Government to become unresponsive and out of touch.

Soon after we got here, I commissioned a task force to reduce excessive government regulation, which I asked Vice President Bush to head up. And thanks to that effort, we were able to eliminate some of the needless regulations that had built up and to subject all new proposed rules to the most careful scrutiny.

And the result has been pretty practical. The Federal Register, which lists all regulations, is just a little more than half the size that it was when we came here, and the estimate is that we have eliminated among people -- just citizens, small -- or community and State governments and so forth, businesses -- 600 million man-hours a year of work filling out government forms in answer to the regulations. A lot of you know personally the sort of paperwork the Federal Government can require.

Here in the Old Executive Office Building, you know, they tell me that officially we're in the White House, but I'm still not used to that. You see, back before the Federal Government was a growth industry, this one building housed most of the executive branch of government. But after a couple of world wars that changed, and existing Federal departments grew and new ones sprang up. And when each agency got its own complex, the White House sort of adopted this beautiful old building. After all, it's just across the street.

I'm happy to report that the Federal Government is not growing that way anymore, but many of your businesses are. And that's the best sort of news for America. In fact, I'll bet that it has been your companies that have needed the new office space in the last few years because the economy is in the longest peacetime expansion in U.S. history. April marks the 65th straight month of economic growth. And during this period, we have created nearly 16 million new jobs, and they're better and higher paying too.

I have to try something out. Did you ever know -- I didn't know before I got here -- what is considered the potential employment pool in America and upon which the statistics are based? It is everyone, male and female, 16 years of age and up, regardless of whether they're going to school, regardless at the other end whether they're retired -- they're all considered a part of that pool. Well, when you say the highest percentage of that pool is employed, 62.3 percent of all of that group presently are employed in the United States. It's no coincidence that while we've held down the rate of growth in government, the private economy has been booming -- real GNP grew by nearly 5 percent in the fourth quarter last year and inflation remains low. And because you are out there in the vanguard of American business, I don't have to tell you that economic growth is more than statistics, it's the cumulative daily efforts of men and women like yourselves.

It's thanks to the private sector that the real income of the average American has been rising steadily for the last 6 years. The Federal Government did one thing to contribute to this: we got out of your way as much as we could. So, when American business created new wealth for the country, it flowed to the American people and was not diverted to Washington to fund new bureaucracies and spending programs.

What the Federal Government needs to do now is what each of you always does -- balance the budget -- and not by raising taxes but by controlling spending. If we can continue the progrowth policies of the last 7 years, I believe that the next decade will be known as the ``Roaring Nineties.'' Our country is poised for even greater economic growth in the years ahead because we've opened up the economy, lowered tax rates, and restored the ideal of limited government and free enterprise.

America will face choices this fall that will determine what lies ahead for American business and the economy. And I want to ask you to become active and involved this year because the stakes are too high and the choice too clear for it to be left up to others. If the policies under which your companies have flourished are reversed, how could your companies' bottom line not suffer? We cannot afford to have American businessmen once again treated like a bunch of hired hands laboring on the Federal farm, where the folks in Washington act as if what you produce belongs to them.

Well, we've cut the top personal income tax rate by more than half -- making U.S. tax rates among the lowest in the world -- and revenues have increased, not decreased, with those cuts. And right now, all of our trading partners and neighbors are going through the same thing and making the same kind of tax cuts. We've proved that lower rates enhance economic growth and greater growth results in higher tax collections. We've demonstrated that American business and entrepreneurship are second to none. Let's keep America moving forward.

I ask each of you in the coming months to direct some of your talent, energy, and leadership to the choices that lie before us. In doing so, you'll be serving your country as citizens, serving your companies and industries as corporate leaders, and helping to preserve and build the jobs, growth, and opportunity that working Americans depend on. After you leave here, I want you to remember this building and think whether next year and beyond, America will be constructing new plants and offices for expanding businesses like yours, or will we be raising more and more Federal office buildings to tax, regulate, and stifle the energy, imagination, and enterprise of the American people.

The choice we face is a very simple one. Is the Federal Government going to grow, or is your business going to grow? I want to let you know that I'm on your side. Thank you for all that you have done to make America stronger and more prosperous. I thank you all, and God bless you all.

I can't tell you how happy I am. And yes, the Queen and I did go riding when we were guests there at Windsor Palace on a visit. She's a good rider. [Laughter] I have to take a second and tell you something about that. I knew about her and her riding before she invited me there to join her, and I had known it because earlier, when I was in England way back in 1949, I was invited to visit the Royal Mews. That at Buckingham Palace is the stable and indoor riding hall and all. And she had just become the commander of -- as their -- I can't remember which regiment it is, but cavalry regiment.

And the man that was taking me through, that was in charge of the stables, was telling me about her and how they trained her. They get all the household help down there with towels and tin pans and so forth all around the riding hall.

But for the more than three million Americans who stutter, speech is associated with struggle. Rapid-fire repetitions of sounds, prolonged vowels, and verbal blocks disrupt the smooth and easy flow of speech and limit the spontaneous exchange of ideas and feelings. Many stutterers suffer frustration and embarrassment that can lead to harmful emotional stress.

Stuttering has a tendency to be inherited, and it affects four times as many males as females. Children usually outgrow stuttering before reaching adulthood. When the disorder continues or begins in adults, it is considered chronic and very difficult to control.

Just what causes stuttering is not yet known, but research is providing clues. In normal speech, the brain and more than 100 muscles of the vocal system work together to produce fluent sounds. Within the larynx, one set of muscles contracts to pull the vocal folds apart and works in close coordination with the set of muscles that allows the folds to close. In stuttered speech, however, these muscle sets do not coordinate properly, preventing normal movement of the vocal folds.

Focusing on this specific malfunction, scientists at the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke (NINCDS) have developed a promising, but as yet experimental, treatment for severe chronic adult stutterers. Injections to the larynx temporarily paralyze one of the muscles, easing the disruptive tug-of-war between opposing muscles and thereby improving speech.

NINCDS leads the Federal government's research effort on stuttering, funding projects around the country in addition to conducting studies in its own laboratories. Research supported by private voluntary health agencies adds to the growing pool of knowledge. These private organizations also provide invaluable counseling and other services to stutterers and their families. Together, Federal and private groups call attention to simple ways the public can help; for example, many stutterers actually improve their speech when listeners know to be patient and supportive.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Investigators at the Federal government's National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke (NINCDS) discovered that Gaucher's disease is caused by the failure of the body to produce an enzyme needed to break down fatty substances called lipids that arise from the normal renewal of the body's cells and tissues. In Gaucher's disease, a specific lipid builds up in body tissues, causing enlargement of the spleen and liver, bone pain, and fractures. In severe cases, serious neurological disorders may occur.

NINCDS scientists and other investigators supported by both public and private funds have narrowed the search for effective management and treatment of this disease. It is now possible to identify carriers of Gaucher's disease. The gene responsible for producing the needed enzyme has been cloned and its structure in normal individuals and Gaucher's disease patients is being studied. Scientists are continuing to refine techniques for replacing the missing enzyme as a useful form of therapy. They are also examining methods that may eventually allow them to replace the defective gene and provide a permanent cure.

Gaucher's patients are further encouraged and sustained by the work of dedicated voluntary health agencies such as the National Gaucher Foundation. These groups provide information and services to patients and their families and work closely with the NINCDS to promote research. When Gaucher's disease is finally conquered, it will be thanks to the cooperative efforts of both private and Federal agencies.

Now, not all Presidents have been that generous. I've told this story before, and if you've heard it, I hope you'll just bear with me. That's the nice thing about this job; you get to quote yourself shamelessly -- and if you don't, Larry Speakes will. [Laughter] But as you may know, historians trace the Presidential press conference back to a Chief Executive who was quite reticent with the press, John Quincy Adams. He didn't hold press conferences.

I've always believed that the key to good press relations is tact, candor, and seeing most things from the point of view of editors and reporters. Sort of like Lyndon Johnson. [Laughter] There's a story about Johnson when he was Vice President. He was coming off the Senate floor when he ran into a reporter for the New York Times. Johnson grabbed him, shouted, ``You, I've been looking for you,'' pulled him into his office, and began a long harangue about something or other. About halfway through, he scribbled a note on a scrap of paper, buzzed his secretary, and gave it to her. She was back in a minute with another note.

And for my lead -- something that's at the top of the page in any election year and certainly this one -- the economy. It's time to take a blue pencil to the nonsense that some who are applying for my job are circulating about our economy. We've heard about hundreds of thousands of lost jobs, the decline of the middle class, and the deindustrialization of America -- and this is at a time when our nation is in the longest peacetime expansion on record, is creating hundreds of thousands of jobs each month, has a larger proportion of the work force employed than ever before, has been seeing real personal and family income climb ever since our expansion began, and is exporting more than ever in our history.

It's powerful. And on the whole, it's good, creating more and better jobs for our nation, making us vastly more productive and more competitive around the world. And there's no better place to see just what it is than in the newsrooms and pressrooms of your papers.

I got out of the movie business and first tried for public office, most of the newspapers that covered my race for Governor ran on technology just one generation removed from Gutenberg, the technology of the first industrial revolution, linotypes and the rest. Today, less than a quarter century later, you are reporting, editing, and publishing the news about the current Presidential campaign with a technology that is light-years removed from anything that preceded it. Computer stations to write, light pencils to edit, lap-top word processors that let reporters file finished copy in seconds over the phone, satellite hookups to shoot entire issues to remote printing plants -- these incredible transformations have opened vast new horizons to you and your staffs. The result is that while, in what you might call the manufacturing end of newspapers -- for example, printing and running presses -- employment is about the same today as in 1960, in the service end, reporters and editors in particular, employment has boomed. Newspapers now have almost half again as many people on the job as 27 years ago, and pay is better.

What you did in the sixties and seventies, the rest of American industry has been doing in the seventies and eighties. And that doesn't mean that we're deindustrializing or becoming a hollow service economy or that our paychecks are shrinking. It does mean that we're becoming much more productive, and so we're spending more time, energy, and manpower on the thought that goes into our products. The story behind the story is that's just what we must do to grow and prosper and stay the world's leader.

I've talked a lot about technology and the economy, but there is a greater truth that gives life and strength to technology in your industry and throughout our economy, and that's freedom. Here in Washington, about a half mile from the White House, stands a monument to one of the early fathers of modern medical technology, an 18th century physician. It's a gray stone statue of the man sitting in his chair in a pose of contemplation. Behind his head is a mosaic of brilliant colors, as if these colors depicted the quality of his thought. Technology, like literature, like journalism, flourishes in our land because we have the freedom to bring the brilliant mosaics in our minds to life. I'm talking here about the first amendment, although technology is not, strictly speaking, a first amendment issue. But our freedom of expression, of debate, of the unfettered airing of ideas is the great plain on which our technological harvest grows.

There is a titanic struggle in the world today. I've often characterized it as the struggle between freedom and totalitarianism, but you could as easily call it the struggle between the pen and the sword, between the first amendment of our Constitution and article 6 of the Soviet Constitution -- that's the one that places the party over the country. More and more, the tide of battle seems clear, at least on one front. As America and the free industrial nations leap ahead through technological time, the Soviet Union and its clients are falling farther and farther behind. How can a blindfolded society keep its balance on the Earth's ever-shifting industrial base when the only way is to take the blindfold off and allow the people to see the world and its kaleidoscopic wonders?

Let me suggest some first steps you might join me in, in encouraging the Soviet leaders to take. Mr. Gorbachev and I addressed each other's people on television. This was helpful. But now we should move even further and see the Soviet Union open more fully to Western media. Western newspapers and journals, for example, should be freely available to Soviet citizens -- books, too. And here, let me repeat a challenge I made recently. Mr. Gorbachev, open the Soviet Union to the works of a great man and historic author. Open the Soviet Union to the works of Solzhenitsyn.

The struggle between the pen and the sword is worldwide, and despite the moral force of freedom and the disadvantages of totalitarianism, the final outcome is by no means certain. And wherever the battle is joined, you, willingly or unwillingly, are in the field. During the period leading up to the cease-fire negotiations in Nicaragua, the Sandinistas acknowledged that they were going forward with internal reforms because they wanted the aid vote in Congress to go their way. They were playing to you in the press and through you to the country and Congress.

Are we taking steps toward democracy in Nicaragua, or are the Sandinistas biding their time, waiting for the attention to wander, whereupon they will crush the disarmed opposition? I support democracy in Nicaragua. If the cease-fire brings democracy, I'm for it. If it does not, we will ask what will. To advance democracy has been my policy for 7 years. It hasn't changed.

Last week the opposition newspaper, La Prensa, had to stop publishing for several days because it was denied newsprint, in direct violation of the Central American peace agreement. La Prensa is no friend of the Sandinistas. This January, its editor and publisher said that ``In 8 years we have gone from Somoza to a dictatorship that is even worse, with a Marxist-Leninist ideology.'' Well, perhaps this denial of newsprint was a one-time thing. Perhaps it won't happen again. We hope it's not a sign that the Sandinistas are starting, as we warned they might, to revert to oppression now that pressure from the democratic resistance is off.

What a contrast between what's happened in Nicaragua and the course of events, and American policy, in Afghanistan. The freedom fighters are on the verge of a great victory over tyranny and aggression. The United States will continue unchanged its support for the freedom fighters and their fierce struggle for what is rightfully theirs: the right to determine their own country's future.

The question of democracy in Central America will not die and will not fade away. We will be judged on how we address it not merely by voters and readers but by our grandchildren and great-grandchildren. Yes, we are engaged in a great struggle to determine if this hemisphere will be free, whether millions will be ruled by the sword or will rule themselves with the pen. And more than in the Halls of Congress, more than in the Oval Office, more than in the jungles or at the bargaining tables of Latin America, this struggle will be won or lost in your newsrooms and editorial offices. If you do not forget the cause of democracy, neither will the American people. So, this is my message and appeal to you today: Remember that not only are you the guardians of the American people's right to know, you are in a larger sense guardian of the hopes of people all over the world. They look to you to tell their story.

Well, let me offer a slightly different view. Yes, we've done more than ever before, and right now we're holding our own. We've stopped America's free-fall into the drug pit. We're getting our footing to climb out. We're paying now for the indifference of the seventies.

But to just take two of many signs of progress -- the number of drug users has leveled off and may be dropping, and almost all high school seniors now say it's wrong even to try cocaine -- these are big changes from just a few years ago. We've gone after smugglers and dealers as never before. The big international arrests of the last few weeks are just one result of this. And we've enlisted the military. And let me say, if you want to see effective leadership, take a look at Vice President Bush's role in this. While others talked about leading the military into the fray against drugs, the Vice President has led. And the result: Last year the Navy steamed some 2,600 ship days, while military planes flew more than 16,000 hours in the fight against illicit drugs.

But in the end, this effort will be won not on foreign battlefields but on the homefront. When all of us insist that drug abuse is not only not for us but intolerable in family, friends, neighbors, acquaintances -- anywhere by anybody -- then we'll win. We're not there yet, but we're on our way.

Ms. Fanning. President Reagan has agreed to take questions. I want to remind you that questions should be asked only by ASNE members. Would you please come to a microphone, state your name and the name of your paper, and I'll recognize you from here. I think I'll take the prerogative of asking the first question, if I may, Mr. President.

You spoke eloquently of the free flow of information, and yet, as you referred in jest, your former press spokesman, Larry Speakes, has confessed that he manufactured quotes for you. Would you tell us, please, did you approve of that process, and will you continue to allow that to happen in your White House?

The President. I was not aware of that and just learned it recently, as all the rest of you did, in the words in his book. And I can tell you right now that I have no affection for these kiss-and-tell books that are being written, and I find them entirely fiction.

Jimmy Denley, Birmingham Post Herald, in Alabama. Mr. President, as you near the end of two terms in the White House, what is the one thing you want the public to remember you most for as President, and do you expect to take any specific action in the next few months to enhance that image?

The President. Oh, my goodness. I never know how to answer that question because, frankly, I'm just going for the day-to-day battle here and haven't thought about how I'm going to be remembered. I'll be pleased if they remember me at all. [Laughter] And I'm going to continue pushing as hard as I can for some of the things, in these last months, that are part of the economic reform and the things that we brought about to see if they can't be planted permanently and not something that will just go away when someone else comes in. And among those are things like -- well, for example, I'm getting pretty soon -- they're sending me the first budget I've ever had since I've been here. The law tells me I have to submit a budget, and it always turned into a continuing resolution. And I think that we do need a constitutional change. We need an amendment that will ban -- as Jefferson once asked right after the acceptance of the Constitution -- that will ban the Federal borrowing. And the second thing, to bring about an end to the deficits that -- when I'm out of here, I'm going to campaign for as hard as I am while I'm in here, and that is the line-item veto. I used it 943 times as a Governor of California with a hostile, other-party legislature and was never overridden once. And in California, two-thirds of the people have to vote -- or the legislature have to vote to pass the budget, and only two-thirds to overturn a veto. The same two-thirds that would vote to send those pork items up buried in the whole budget wouldn't vote to overturn my veto when they had to appear and stand up for them, singly, where the people could see them. So, I think I'm just going to continue the battle until the last day and then head for the ranch.

Mr. President, Robert Morton, New York City Tribune. During the summit, you gave an interview to some columnists in which you said that you no longer believed the Soviet Union was intent upon world domination. If you had heard yourself say that 8 years ago, what would you have thought, and what led you to change your mind?

The President. Well, I begin with the comics -- [laughter] -- a lifetime habit -- and then my next turn is to the editorial pages. And I say that in the numbers because there are more than one paper that come to breakfast with me. And I do as much as I can then before I have to run for the office. And then it is true that I rifle through the clippings they get because they bring those in also from papers that I don't get -- from out of Washington, or out of the beltway -- papers from across the country. And I do look at that. But he's wrong when he implies that I don't read the papers. Yes, I do. So, you're not getting away with anything.

I'm just sorry about the fact that evidently they misunderstand, as many of our other people have -- our own citizens have misunderstood. The Geneva accords that we've been negotiating on and picking back and forth at each other for a long time -- we have finally reached an agreement, and there is nothing in that agreement that is going to prevent us from supplying the Mujahidin as long as they need it and as long as the Soviet Union continues to supply the Afghan forces in their puppet government that they're leaving behind. So, there's no restriction on us; the Mujahidin are going to continue to have our help.

President, during this conference, we've talked a lot about race relations in this country. This is the 20th anniversary of the Kerner commission report. I'm sure many of us would be interested in your assessment, in this year when we have a black man running for President, of the status of race relations in this country.

The President. Well, I hope that race will not be a part of this campaign in any way. And I'm sorry that in the campaign that's going on with one candidate of the black race that it seems that more attention is being paid to the difference in color than is being paid to what he is actually saying. And I have to believe that a great many of us would find ourselves in great disagreement with the policies that he is proposing and that we would perhaps be more vocal about them if it wasn't for concern that that be misinterpreted into some kind of a racial attack.

Contrary to what some people say, the most frustrating thing that I have endured since I have been here in the image making that goes on is that I have been portrayed so often as, in some way, a racist and prejudiced in regard to racial matters.

And it's hard for me to take because I grew up in a family in which that was considered the greatest sin -- prejudice and discrimination. And all my life -- back when I was a sports announcer and broadcasting major league baseball, I was one of the little handful across the country that continued to editorialize for the breaking of the ban and the allowing of blacks into organized baseball. And it's carried on through my life.

The President. Oh, you've caught me in a weak spot. When I was a sports announcer, I was superstitious about ever talking about who was going to win the game or whether they would. And I wouldn't even mention that the pitcher was pitching a no-hit ball game because superstition has it that then you'll jinx him if you do. And to ask me to predict what's going to happen here -- well, I think in the Republican Party, of course, it has now narrowed down to one candidate. But even so, there's a convention to be held. And on the other side, I don't know whether the candidates now campaigning -- whether any one of them is going to wind up at the convention with the nomination or whether there will be a brokered convention or whether the Democratic Party will go afield seeking to draft someone who has not been campaigning in the primaries. And I just refuse to try and make a guess on this.

Mr. President, one of the senior administration officials was quoted last week as saying that the contra war is over and that the resistance forces have been effectively dismantled. Mr. President, do you agree with this? And also, several years ago you said that your intention was to get the Sandinistas to cry uncle. Have they gotten you to cry uncle instead?

The President. No, and if I find that unnamed official, he may not be official. [Laughter] No, I don't believe it's over. And I believe that -- with all my heart and soul -- that the pressure that is being imposed on Nicaraguan citizens that are being called the contras, who have taken up arms to try and bring about the continuation of the revolution that had them in conflict with Somoza as a dictator and who was denying democratic rights -- and they were succeeded by the Sandinistas, who not only seized the government and took it over for themselves after the armed revolution but violated the agreement of the revolutionaries to the Organization of American States that they would install democracy as we know it, a pluralistic democracy and so forth. But in doing so we forget there were other revolutionaries that fought beside them, but who were not part of a longtime organization. And so, they were ousted, some exiled, some imprisoned. And many of those are now in what we call the contras. And I think we have an obligation to support those people until -- call it crying uncle -- I meant that the Sandinistas would permit the people of Nicaragua to make their decision on the kind of government they wanted.

The President. I think it has some troubles, yes, that have grown out of the -- well, some of the problems that were left with us by double-digit inflation with loans and so forth. And we know that, through the Government and the institutions that we have in government to help, we're giving as much help as we can there. I don't think that it is a problem that could suddenly bring disaster down upon us and end this expansion and this economic growth that we're having. But we're going to continue to try and help. And as I say, when you think back to the almost sudden change from inflation to what we have now, that meant that there were a lot of loans that were based on collateral that no longer has the value that it did back in the inflationary era, and problems of that kind are bothering us.

It is not possible to estimate precisely the amount of guarantee authority that will be needed. However, given the likelihood of continued economic growth within the United States as well as the general recovery throughout the world, there is a reasonable prospect that demand for Eximbank's guarantees and insurance could accelerate in the remainder of fiscal year 1988, and require the commitment of amounts greater than currently estimated of the existing guarantee authority.

Section 481 (h) of the Foreign Assistance Act. Passage of these resolutions could result in more drugs entering the United States, not less. In the case of Mexico, significant damage to a broad range of major U.S. interests would also result. I strongly urge the Senate to vote both resolutions down.

I understand a number of Senators are attracted by the idea that a ``national interest'' certification would send Mexico a needed message regarding the drug menace, while protecting the extensive bilateral and foreign policy interests we have there. Unfortunately, this would not be the case.

I have already sent that message, both in my February 13 meeting with President de la Madrid in Mazatlan and in the statement accompanying my ``full cooperation'' certification. It is absolutely clear, from the Mexican President's words and his Government's subsequent actions, that the message was received and understood.

Should the Congress now overturn the Administration's ``full cooperation'' certification, the political impact in Mexico would be harmful to U.S. interests. We believe, for example, that Mexico -- although it would continue to fight the drug traffic on its own -- would terminate U.S. ties to its aerial eradication program and reject the $14.5 million in direct anti-drug aid we currently provide. The ability of the DEA to operate efficiently in Mexico might also be impaired.

The political impact of decertification by the United States would adversely affect every aspect of our relationship with Mexico, including trade, investment, immigration and vital border-area cooperation. The U.S. would become an issue in Mexico's current election campaign, and a more constructive bilateral relationship would become politically difficult for the next Mexican president. The political left and other elements in Mexico opposed to closer ties to the U.S. would get a new lease on life.

I believe my certification decision was correct. While we fault Mexican efforts in some areas, we should not overlook the many positive actions they have taken. For instance: Mexico was the first Latin American country to sign and ratify a Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty with us; in 1987, they increased by 26% their eradication of marijuana while slightly improving opium poppy eradication; their seizures of all drugs in 1987 were up (cocaine by 75%; opium derivative 12%, and marijuana 400%); they arrested 9,800 persons for trafficking including nine major (class 1) narcotics violators.

March 1, I recommended full certification for The Bahamas. As with Mexico, the April 12 vote by the full Senate Foreign Relations Committee to deny such certification could seriously jeopardize our joint efforts to counter the flow of narcotics through that country.

Bahamas is the only country in the world which allows U.S. law enforcement units to enter its territory in hot pursuit of drug targets. These decisions reflect a political will by the Bahamian government to fight narcotics trafficking.

Negotiations have been proceeding extremely well on a new modern extradition treaty which would greatly broaden the scope of extraditable offenses. Tough new asset forfeiture laws have been enacted. Bahamians are taking steps to prosecute corruption offenders. And a new special drug court, and a proposal for a second, should relieve the over-burdened legal system.

With operational level cooperation excellent and anti-corruption efforts improving, we want to encourage and strengthen those Bahamians, including officials at the highest level, who clearly want to do more. Again, as with Mexico, I feel strongly the congressional action to overturn my recommendation for certification for The Bahamas would be seriously counterproductive and unjust.

President has said he would like to be able to sign a trade bill that will open markets and improve America's competitiveness. The Congress made good progress in moving towards such a bill, although further reasonable improvements still need to be made.

The bill does improve our negotiating authority. It strengthens our hand in taking action against unfair trade practices. It helps us protect our intellectual property rights. Unfortunately, it still contains the plant-closing provision and other nontrade provisions that are injurious to a dynamic economy and America's future prosperity.

Our negotiators yesterday were encouraged to believe that the plant-closing provision would be eliminated. Later, however, we were told that after certain consultations took place they could not remove that provision. The labor unions apparently would sacrifice the entire trade bill for this provision.

While the administration would be willing to accept a positive trade bill, we cannot accept a bill that includes seriously flawed elements that will hurt America's competitiveness and economic success. If the bill reaches the President in its present form, the President will veto it.

You know, one of the things I've continually talked about during the past few years was how impressive this young generation of Americans really is. And everywhere I've gone in this country, I've been moved to see their interest in our nation and in the issues before us. In fact, I'd like to tell a story about when one of our Ambassadors visited an American armored cavalry regiment stationed on the NATO line in Germany.

And that's why all of you are here today and giving so generously of your time. You want all young Americans to know what the young soldier knew: that the system does work. But you also want them to know something else that soldier knew, and that is that democracy takes time and personal effort. And that's why we're dedicated to the goals of Vote America.

This generation is a generation that's bright with hope, filled with energy, and ready to make a difference. They're talented and optimistic. But for all of that, they also have the lowest percentage of voters. So, it's up to us to remind young Americans that the first step in democratic involvement is voting.

With Vote America, you're doing tremendous work. The commercials, the partnership programs, the curriculum materials, the votemobiles, and the mobilization of corporate America are all part of your extraordinary effort to get Americans out to vote. This private sector initiative is bearing fruit, and I'm hopeful we'll see abundant evidence of that in the voting percentages for 1988.

So, all I can say is keep up the great work. And believe me, I hope this project is put on the front burner. The future of our young leaders represents the future of America. And again, because this is a priority of mine, I want to express my personal thanks to each of you. However, beyond this personal interest, our country also owes you a debt of gratitude for your dedication to our young citizens.

You know, I have opportunities every once in a while now to go to a school or college and appear on the campus and speak there. And having been Governor for 4 years at a time when if I went to a campus I would have started a riot and been hung in effigy -- [laughter] -- it's quite a change. And believe me, to stand there and say something that normally might be responded to by an ordinary audience with applause, and then the many times I've heard instead them chanting, ``U.S.A.! U.S.A.!'' it really sends you out of the room about 3 inches taller than when you came in.

Well, speaking of getting out of the room, I'm going to see each of you in the Blue Room down the line here for a handshake, which I wasn't able to do at the beginning of our lunch here. So, I'm going to thank you here, and God bless you. And I'm going around, and I'll meet you there in the Blue Room. Thank you all.

I am pleased to submit to the Congress a report of the National Science Board entitled Science and Engineering Indicators -- 1987. This report is the eighth in a continuing series in which important aspects of the status of American science and engineering are examined.

The importance of scientific and engineering research to the well-being of our Nation is widely recognized. Science and engineering play a vital role in maintaining our Nation's defense, improving its health, and increasing its economic productivity.

The news has been bad lately, and that's good. And here's why. You've probably been hearing reports about Panamanian strong man General Noriega, who's been indicted for drug trafficking, and his struggle to stay in power despite pressure from his own people and our government to step down. You've also been hearing about the drug-related arrests of many street gang members in Los Angeles. And then, too, there's the news about congressional investigations of organized crime's involvement in the drug trade.

Now, these news reports reflect an important change since the start of our administration in 1981. At the time, we faced a crisis of crime stemming from the illegal drug trade, especially in south Florida. At my urging, Vice President Bush headed up a task force that performed invaluable service by coordinating the activities of all law enforcement agencies in the area and for the first time brought to bear against the drug smugglers the full weight of Federal resources. This included high-tech military equipment and the resources of the intelligence community.

Less than a year later, I went over to the Justice Department to announce a sweeping effort to break the back of organized crime in America. And a key part of this approach was the hiring of more than 1,000 new agents and prosecutors as part of 12 regional drug task forces based on the south Florida model. We also set up a President's Commission on Organized Crime that did landmark work in tracing the international connections of the domestic drug trade, pointing out the usefulness of drug testing, and exposing not only the old style Mafia's involvement in the drug trade but also the danger of new, emerging crime gangs.

This early attention to the criminal side of the drug problem, which has translated into a tripling of the overall antidrug budget, is now paying dividends. Cocaine seizures have increased by over 1,800 percent, arrests of major drug traffickers have increased by almost 200 percent, and well over $500 million in drug-related assets were seized in 1987 alone. And this kind of success at the Federal level would not be possible without an unprecedented degree of Federal, State, and local cooperation. Here in Washington this commitment is best evidenced by our Cabinet-level National Drug Policy Board, as well as the Vice President's National Narcotics Border Interdiction System, and the Department of Justice's Organized Crime Drug Enforcement Task Forces.

But emphasizing the criminal side of the drug problem is only part of defeating the drug menace. Thanks to the efforts of Nancy's Just Say No campaign, Americans are understanding that the permanent way to end the drug menace is to deny the drug pusher his market -- to stop demand.

And that means education and prevention. It means understanding that drug use is not a victimless crime -- that drugs kill and maim and finance the criminal underground. It means accepting the concept of user responsibility. It means realizing that those who use drugs are, in Nancy's words, making themselves accomplices to murder.

Now, in addition to prevention and education and drug law enforcement, we have also been emphasizing the international side of the problem. When we came into office there were drug eradication programs underway in only two countries.

Today that number is 23. In fact, this administration has signed an unprecedented number of mutual legal assistance treaties, extradition treaties, and eradication agreements. The unprecedented indictment of Panamanian leader Noriega for drug trafficking by a U.S. grand jury is a further indication of our nation's resolve to end the foreign supply of drugs. His nation is in a crisis of his making.

But, as I said at the beginning, the fact that we're seeing more media coverage of the drug problem and the heat put on people like General Noriega and the street gangs in Los Angeles, or organized crime in general, is good news. Public awareness about the destructiveness of illegal drugs is at an all-time high. Americans are increasingly saying no to drugs. A recent survey of high school seniors showed a significant drop in cocaine and marijuana use.

We have a long way to go before we have a drug free America, and I hope the media keeps emphasizing that point. But it's also true America has awakened to this problem. That's quite a change from just a decade ago. So, that's the good news, the very good news, about the bad news of drug abuse.

Acting under his authority as Commander in Chief, the President has directed United States forces at 1 a.m. eastern daylight time today to strike Iranian military targets in the southern Persian Gulf. Our forces attacked oil platforms at Sirri and Sassan in the southern Gulf. These platforms are used as command and control radar stations for the Iranian military. The attacks are underway at this time. These actions were taken in response to Iran's recent resumption of mine-laying in international waters and its mine attack on the U.S.S. Samuel B.

Our actions were taken following consultations with congressional leadership and after informing friendly governments. They are designed and intended to deter further Iranian mining. They represent a measured response to Iran's unlawful use of force against the United States and to Iran's numerous violations of the rights of other nonbelligerents. And they constitute a lawful exercise of the United States inherent right of self-defense under article 51 of the United Nations Charter. Appropriate notification of such actions is being provided to the President of the United Nations Security Council.

We have repeatedly told Iran that we do not desire military confrontation, but the Government of Iran should understand that we will protect our ships and our interests against unprovoked attacks. We urgently seek an end to tensions in the region and to the Iran-Iraq war. This would benefit the people of both nations who have suffered so much from the brutal conflict. We urge Iran to accept Security Council Resolution 598 and to agree to its rapid and comprehensive implementation. Iran has nothing to gain from continuation of the war. The Department of Defense will brief later this morning as we have more details come in. We're receiving details on a continuing basis at this time.

President today announced his intention to nominate S. Jay Plager to be Administrator of the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs at the Office of Management and Budget. This is a new position.

The President. Thank you all very much. It's a pleasure to welcome all of you here to the White House for the kickoff to National Volunteer Week. I know we're across the street from it, but they still consider this part of the White House.

Well, yes, as de Tocqueville saw so clearly, voluntarism -- and what some of us call private sector initiatives -- go hand in hand with freedom. I like to think that helps explain why in the last 8 years Americans have been volunteering more than ever. In these years when we've pulled back the hand of government and increased personal freedom, we have also seen a revolution of compassion sweep our land. Charitable giving has soared by 77 percent, and more Americans than ever before are volunteering their time to help their community and those in need. The figure for just 1 year, last year, as it was given to me, was that $84 billion was raised in the United States just by various groups like your own, for doing worthwhile things in this country.

But the revolution of compassion is, most of all, a person-to-person revolution. It's Kevin Gounaud, 15, of Springfield, Virginia, who heard about the need for a drive to raise food for the needy. Kevin pulled together 40 of his friends, and together they knocked on 3,000 doors and collected 500 bags of food for those who don't have enough. The revolution of compassion is Pamela Dawley, 17, of Hanover Park, Illinois. Several years ago, through her Girl Scout troop, Pamela organized a drive to collect books to send to needy young people in Mexico. After the 1986 earthquake, Pamela organized an event that raised $1,400 to help the people who had lived in a Mexico City housing project that the quake destroyed. The revolution of compassion is Mike Evans, 16, of Kalamazoo, Michigan. Mike gets around in a wheelchair, and that just seems to mean that he gets around faster than the rest of us. This year, on top of his schoolwork, Mike has volunteered more than 200 hours in everything from tutoring elementary school students to doing data entry for a local community organization that helps handicapped adults. And, yes, the revolution is Andrea Adams, 17, of Kokomo, Indiana. Andrea, who has done so much -- it's hard to know what to mention. But after helping start a United Way project to help students at her high school, she met, through the project, another girl whose parents had abused her and thrown her out of her home. The girl was sleeping on the streets and attending school during the day. Andrea, with the support of her parents, invited the girl to come and live with Andrea's family. And today, thanks to Andrea, Andrea's family, and her own determination, that young lady has a high school diploma.

I want to hear what our great nation is all about, I listen not to the cynics but to people like you. This year Americans are joining together to expand voluntarism beyond anything we've ever seen before. It's called Give 5, and it means why don't we all take it upon ourselves to give 5 hours a week and/or 5 percent of our income to charitable causes and worthy goals.

Not only is voluntarism national, it's becoming international. In just 2 weeks, in London, American and British business and community leaders will gather to discuss voluntarism and charitable giving at the first British-American Conference on Private Sector Initiatives. One important topic they will take up will be inspiring the spirit of community service in the leaders of tomorrow. I wish that those attending this conference could meet each of you, because you embody that great spirit. Albert Einstein once said, ``It's every man's obligation to put back into the world at least the equivalent of what he takes out of it.'' And that's what the great American tradition of neighbor helping neighbor is all about. And that's what each of you is doing.

You know, I receive so many letters about things that are going on, and I just received this morning a memorandum from within the White House staff there. And I thought I would bring it along, since it came just before I came over here.

On Saturday, 29 White House staff members and friends participated in a special preview project for Christmas in April, the annual program to repair the homes of the poor, the elderly, and the handicapped. Now, that started as a local thing in a town in Texas, where in April, all year long, the people go around finding homes of the elderly or the aged -- or, I mean, of the poor or the handicapped, that need work -- shingling of roof, painting, plumbing repairs, and so forth. And then, in April volunteers from all over the city come forth, and they go to these homes and do all of this work. They're amateurs at it, but they're pretty handy also at it. I didn't know until I came to Washington that that had already spread from people hearing it in other communities and has spread here to Washington. So, we decided the White House should get involved, too. Skilled and unskilled volunteers spent that day, just this last Saturday, plastering, painting, and doing carpentry at the home of an elderly widow in Northwest Washington.

And additionally, Paolo Biscioni, an organizer of the upcoming British-American Conference on Private Sector Initiatives, came from London, England, and participated in that effort, and he's here this morning. I just ran into him a little while ago in the Oval Office. On April 30th -- that's the real Christmas in April day -- another White House team of volunteers will join 2,500 other workers in the citywide Christmas in April project to repair 83 other homes. I thought that maybe you'd like to hear that little item in connection with all that you are doing.

I thank you for it, and a great many other people thank you for all that you're doing. And God bless all of you. Thank you. I understand I'm just supposed to stand aside here for a moment, as something's going to happen.

Cobb. Thank you, Mr. President, for recognizing the accomplishments of the youth volunteers. I am Kendalle Cobb, a youth volunteer with the United Way. Greetings from California! [Laughter] There are many volunteer youth groups represented here today, and we are all thrilled to be here with you, one of the country's greatest volunteers.

To me, there are many wonderful things about volunteering, but one of the greatest is that volunteering always makes me feel that I can make a difference. Though many of us are still in high school, our effort can improve the quality of life of others and in so doing can better the world. Thank you for inspiring us and again reminding us that our future lies in helping one another. I agree with you, Mr. President, there is a revolution of compassion sweeping this country, and the youth of today will carry this revolution through the 21st century.

Now, on behalf of all youth volunteers across the country, I would like to present to you a Young America Cares T-shirt. We hope that you will treasure it, because when you care, you're among the very young at heart. Thank you.

Thank you all very much. God bless you. And you know something, I have a feeling that the 21st century, when another generation -- yours -- replaces all of us, things are going to be just fine not only in America but in the world.

The principle of liberty and justice for all is one of our Nation's most fundamental goals and responsibilities. The vicious conduct of criminals against innocent, law-abiding citizens, however, continues to victimize millions of Americans each year. Our heritage of liberty and justice for all is threatened by this toll, so all of us -- government officials, the criminal justice system, opinion-makers, and members of the public -- must heed and help crime victims. Crime Victims Week is a fitting time for reflection on ways to assist fully those of us whose unalienable rights have been violated by criminals.

Victims of crime carry a burden inconceivable to others, and America is turning its attention to their plight. We must always remember that the responsibility for crimes lies with those who commit them, not with the innocent victims. Seven years ago, my Administration took some first steps toward meeting crime victims' needs. Since then, we have made great progress, with the President's Task Force on Victims of Crime, the Attorney General's Task Force on Family Violence, and the President's Child Safety Partnership. The Victims of Crime Act of 1984 established a Crime Victims Fund in the U.S. Treasury that is financed by penalty assessments on all convicted Federal defendants. The same Act also authorized U.S. Attorneys to recover the proceeds of literary endeavors of certain violent criminals.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Ann Supica here. And it's a pleasure to welcome all of you here today, especially since we see so many familiar faces. Before I get into my remarks, however, I have something in the nature of a bulletin that I would like to impose on you.

Earlier today our Navy made a measured response to Iran's latest use of military force against U.S. ships in international waters, as well as its continued military and terrorist attacks against a number of nonbelligerents. Following the destruction of the two Iranian military platforms, whose personnel evacuated after our warning, several Iran naval vessels and small boats attempted to engage our ships and aircraft. Three Iranian naval vessels and at least two small boats were sunk or very severely damaged.

We've taken this action to make certain the Iranians have no illusions about the cost of irresponsible behavior. We aim to deter further Iranian aggression, not provoke it. They must know that we will protect our ships, and if they threaten us, they'll pay a price. A more normal relationship with Iran is desirable, and we're prepared for it. But such a relationship is not possible so long as Iran attacks neutral ships, threatens its neighbors, supports terrorism, and refuses to end the bloody war with Iraq.

I'll get on with the business of the day. I was looking over my notes from our last meeting, back in 1986, and I noticed that I told you about one of my first jobs as a young man, working for a contractor who was remodeling old homes. I was just 14 years old -- by the way, it's not true that the homes that we were remodeling were log cabins. [Laughter] As I say, I was just 14 years old; and as I told you, by the time the summer was over, I'd dug out foundations, laid hardwood floors, shingled roofs, and learned a respect for good, honest labor that has stayed with me all my life. But my notes show that I never did tell you just how it was that I left that construction work.

But it is indeed a pleasure to have you here, and I wanted to speak to you today in large measure to give you my thanks. You're the ones, after all, who build our roads and put up our buildings, who do so much to help keep America growing. And as President, I extend to you the respect and gratitude of the Nation. But more than that, I owe you, as well, a personal debt of gratitude, for you've done much to make this administration a success.

I referred a moment ago to our meeting in '86. But there was an earlier meeting as well, all the way back in 1981. I asked you then to support our economic recovery program. You did so, even though in the short term many of your firms went through some tough times. But you knew that in the end it was free enterprise, not government regulation, not high taxes or big government spending, but free enterprise, that had led to the building of a great America. And I like to point out that the Federal Register, which lists all new regulations, is just a little more than half the size it was when we came here. The estimate is that we eliminated for our citizens and small businesses some 600 million man-hours a year of work just filling out government forms in answer to the regulations.

American economy is in the longest peacetime expansion in U.S. history. Indeed, this month, April, marks the 65th straight month of economic growth. We've created nearly 16 million new jobs -- jobs that on balance are better and higher paying. Altogether, the United States has created close to twice as many new jobs as the other leading industrialized nations combined.

During this expansion, a greater percentage of our population is employed than at any other time in our history: 62.3 percent of our total potential employment pool is currently at work. Now, maybe you might be like me; I didn't know at first how they figured what was the potential employment pool. And a little over 60 percent of that doesn't sound so well if you're thinking of the entire population. Well, I found out that that potential pool is everyone, male and female, from 16 years of age up, including all the retirees and the people on Social Security, all the kids that are still going to school and not looking for jobs and so forth. And so, that is 62.3 percent -- the highest percentage ever in the history of the United States -- have jobs.

And the real income of the average American has been rising steadily for the last 6 years. Even areas of our economy that were long thought to be in special trouble have begun to show signs of new creativity and prosperity. As Business Week magazine reported recently: ``Basic manufacturers, once considered a dying breed, are selling products many thought wouldn't even be made in the United States any longer -- escalators to Taiwan, machine tools to West Germany, lumber to Japan, and shoes to Italy.'' Since the third quarter of 1986, the volume of American goods exported has been growing some four times as fast as the value [volume] of imported goods. And since 1980 U.S. manufacturing has increased productivity roughly 3\1/2\ times as fast as in the previous 7 years.

And of course your own industry, too, has grown with the new prosperity. Between 1980 and 1987, total new construction grew 24 percent, for an average annual rate of 3.1 percent. The nonresidential sector grew by 4 percent annually, with an overall growth rate of 32 percent. That's not bad, not bad at all.

American construction industry is not only prospering here in the United States, it also faces new opportunities abroad because the Japanese Government has announced a large-scale public works program. And Japan, in particular, offers vast potential for American construction firms. Just last month we reached an agreement with Japan that will permit American companies to bid, for the first time, on major Japanese construction projects, giving them a much-needed foothold in this important market. Since American construction firms are the most experienced and competitive in the world, I challenge you to take full advantage of this opportunity. Government can create opportunities by knocking down unfair barriers, but businesses themselves must follow through with the proposals, creativity, and workmanship that made America the leader in this field.

And because we've opened up the economy, lowered tax rates, and restored the ideal of limited government and free enterprise -- for all these reasons, America today stands poised for even greater economic growth in the year ahead. But even as we celebrate all that we have accomplished, we must acknowledge that hanging over the future are some enormous ifs. If we keep tax rates down, economic incentives will remain strong. If we get government spending under control, the private sector can continue to grow without fear that it will become crowded out by the public sector. If we continue to combat needless regulations, we can keep the economy from suffocating beneath redtape. If -- and I know this is an issue that especially concerns you -- if we prevent government from mandating additional costs on business. And so, the ifs continue -- on and on and on.

I'm not about to launch into a campaign speech; there will be enough for that in the days to come. I could mention, however, that some of the campaign speeches I've been hearing must have been living in another country for the last few years, not this one. [Laughter] In any event, my main purpose in speaking to you today has been, as I said, to offer you my thanks. But more than we owe each other thanks, we owe gratitude to this great land of opportunity and freedom, thanks that we must never cease to repay by remaining active in the political life of the nation. For to be sure, America will face choices this fall that will determine perhaps the entire economic course of the coming decade. Will it be economic growth or the growth of big government?

But of course I'm not asking you to become professional politicians, merely to remain engaged in the life of the Nation -- as engaged as you've been so successfully during these past 7\1/2\ years. The choice is simple: Is big government going to grow, or is your economy going to grow? And so, I thank you one last time for all you've done. And I say to you as well, we can't afford to rest. We must keep America strong -- strong and growing.

But talking about the difference between government and the private sector -- the greatest example we have of that, of course, is the Soviet Union. And I have a new hobby. I collect stories, jokes that I can prove are told between the Russian people, that they tell. They reveal that if we ever got to know them we'd find they have a great sense of humor. Also, they have a pretty cynical attitude about their government.

Supica. Mr. President, the construction industry loves you and salutes you because you have restored and expanded the faith, the hope that was so badly needed to keep this nation great. You know America to its deep heart's core. You have stayed closely in touch with the hearts and the minds and the souls of Americans. In 1981 AGC named you our man of the year. You have always been our man of the hour, sir. Today, Mr. President, you honor us again.

American eagles that soar over this great nation, well, you have aspired to a better and stronger America and a safer world. And you, sir, have led the way. As a small gesture of the construction industry's regards for you, our nation's number one builder, I have the privilege of presenting you the Associated General Contractors of America's Eagle Award. May God bless you, Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, and God bless America. Thank you very much.

Prior to joining the White House staff, Mr. Addington served as the minority chief counsel for the Committee on Foreign Affairs of the House of Representatives. He served previously as an Assistant General Counsel at the Central Intelligence Agency and as counsel to the Subcommittee on Legislation for the Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence of the House of Representatives.

The President. Well, thank you all for your greeting this morning, and welcome reverend clergy, Nancy, Attorney General Meese, Members of the Congress, diplomats, and members of our Cabinet, and distinguished guests.

Today we're gathered to honor, as you've been told, the brave public servants who have fallen in the war on drugs. These men took a solemn oath to uphold the law. They accepted the dangerous work of defending our communities, our borders, our families from the scourge of narcotics. And in the line of duty, these courageous citizen soldiers paid the ultimate price. Some died close to home in the towns where they were born. Others fell in foreign lands. But they were each lost to us far too soon. And they each made their love for this country and for us, their countrymen, something real that they lived each day.

Today and in days to come, it'll be our turn to show our love for them. We can show our love by teaching our children to just say no to drugs, by teaching them to choose life, by helping them to live in the world God made, not in an artificial, drug-induced world of false hopes and permanent darkness, of imaginary freedom, but absolute slavery. America's liberty was purchased with the blood of heroes. Our release from the bondage of illegal drug use is being won at the same dear price. The battle is ultimately over what America is and what America will be. At our founding, we were promised the pursuit of happiness, not the myth of endless ecstasy from a vial of white poison. We won our personal freedom so that we could serve God and man, so that we could freely produce and create and build a nation of strong families, rich farms, and great cities. We struggled for liberty in order to cherish it and defend it and transmit it undiminished to our children and theirs.

What sort of a nation is America? The kind that produces heroes like Enrique Camarena Salazar, Eddie Byrne, Terry McNett, and many others who gave their lives in the battle against illegal drugs. We're the kind of country that will pull together and sacrifice to rid ourselves of the menace of illegal drug use because we know that drugs are the negation of the type of country we were meant to be.

York City, a young rookie cop, Eddie Byrne, was sitting in his patrol car protecting a government witness in a drug case. On February 26th, at 3:30 a.m., Eddie Byrne was shot in the head three times at point-blank range. His father, a retired police lieutenant, said, ``If my son, Eddie, sitting in a police car, representing and protecting us, can be wasted by scum, then none of us is safe.'' Newspaper accounts say he was ordered killed by a drug kingpin in order to send a message to the police.

For these men and for all men and women in this country and around the world who've perished in the war on drugs, I would like to ask that we observe a moment of silence on this solemn occasion. Would you join me?

United States is joined by other countries in a common battle against drugs. I've received a report from Attorney General Meese on his recent trip, that he mentioned in his remarks, to the Dominican Republic, Colombia, Ecuador, Peru, and Bolivia. And I'm particularly encouraged by the commitment he received from the leaders of those countries to heighten efforts in the crusade against narcotics trafficking. The drug enforcement and justice officials overseas have our full support.

I want to pay special tribute to the many sacrifices made by our international allies in this fight. In Colombia alone, 12 supreme court justices, an attorney general, justice minister, and scores of other judicial and law enforcement officials have lost their lives. The traffickers in Colombia have also extended their terror beyond its borders. In 1987 former justice minister, and then Ambassador to Hungary, Enrique Parejo was shot and nearly killed in Budapest at the direction of traffickers. Fortunately he survived and last week received PRIDE's Spirit of Freedom Award. We have the honor of his presence today and salute his courage. Recently, Colombia's Chief Prosecutor, Attorney General Carlos Hoyos, while fighting his country's war on drugs, was abducted and murdered. Similarly, officials from Bolivia, Mexico, Peru, Thailand, and other nations have perished in this international struggle. These giants of courage and the brave men and women like them around the world will be remembered in our prayers.

I spoke to our nation's police chiefs 7 years ago, we pledged a united effort against the menace of illegal drugs. And since then, important progress has been made. Since 1981 the antidrug law enforcement budget has tripled, and another 13 percent increase has been requested.

No-nonsense Federal judges are part of the war on crime. Drug convictions have more than doubled since 1979, with prison sentences 40 percent longer. And last year new, tougher sentencing guidelines were issued. The Comprehensive Crime Control Act, passed in 1984 after a long effort -- passed with the help of Members of the Congress who are here today -- they helped put drug dealers out of business by confiscating their assets. Last year over $500 million in ill-gotten assets were seized. The Anti-Drug Abuse Act, which I signed into law in October, 1986, contributed additional tools to our effort.

Our antidrug effort spans the Federal Government. It is coordinated by the Cabinet-level National Drug Policy Board chaired by Attorney General Meese. The coordination of Federal, State, local, and international drug enforcement is at an all-time high. Under the leadership of the Vice President, our national drug interdiction system has enabled unprecedented levels of narcotics to be seized enroute from source countries and at our border by law enforcement agencies. These efforts were significantly assisted by the U.S. military, which last year provided more than 16,000 hours of air surveillance and over 2,500 ship days of maritime support in the war against drugs.

Drug eradication programs are now underway in 23 countries. That's up from just two in 1981. And to stem demand for illegal drugs, more funds than ever before are being spent on drug education and public awareness, and I've requested a further 12-percent increase in that.

We can list the accomplishments in this war, but by themselves these efforts, impressive as they may seem, are still not enough. It'll never be enough until we have fully honored the memory of those who have perished and until we have won for them, and for ourselves, a drug free America.

I'm especially proud of the antidrug work that Nancy has done, which is an act of love beyond anything money can achieve and which has changed the way we talk and think about drugs. You see, we too often forget how the level of drug abuse reached the proportions that it did. Back in the 1960's and 1970's, America crossed a deadly line.

The use of illegal drugs became not just condoned but even celebrated by a permissive cultural establishment whose slogan was ``Just Say Yes.'' It was a time when all the restrictions on personal behavior were under attack. Some liberal politicians decried our prohibitions on drugs as conservative, moralistic, reactionary, and old-fashioned -- or simply remained silent that there even was a drug problem. Many universities adopted a hands-off attitude toward so-called recreational drug use, and the entertainment industry produced films and music that promoted and legitimized the drug subculture. When our young people looked for guidance and direction, instead of finding positive role models warning them of the dangers of drugs, they would too often see celebrities portraying drug use as cool, hip, and with it. What greater shame can there be? With the active encouragement of the progressive culture, our young people began to use drugs -- not to rebel but to fit in.

And tragically, countless thousands of young lives were needlessly destroyed. The truth was that drugs are killers, but for nearly a generation that vital message was ignored by a whole group of people who should have known better.

The good news is that America is on the attack in the fight against drugs. Our young people are turning away from illegal drug use and learning to say, just say no. Almost all of the high school seniors, in the latest annual survey, said that it was wrong to even try a drug like cocaine.

Today reports that in Philadelphia the police department has trained 25,000 residents to observe, identify, and report drug dealers under its town watch program. In Boise, Idaho, the police work with a group called Parents and Youths Against Drug Abuse to promote drug education. In Jackson, Mississippi, a group of teenagers is fighting back by forming Teens on Patrol to act as the eyes and ears for the local police force. These efforts serve as fitting tributes to the fallen heroes that we honor here today. Our heroes embody the courage and commitment that built America and which will see us through this battle. Let us, through our efforts, keep faith with these men and their sacrifice.

Six months ago, I sent to the Congress a new and important piece of legislation, the Criminal Justice Reform Act of 1987, that would provide a powerful new deterrent to violent crime and narcotics trafficking.

This critical legislation takes on the drug syndicates on their own terms. It says that when narcotics racketeers kill and are convicted they will face execution. In 1986 the House of Representatives twice approved this provision, but this year neither the House nor the Senate Judiciary Committees have yet taken up this bill. It is time to back up the rhetoric on the drug problem with action. And I call upon the House and Senate to vote promptly on my bill providing for capital punishment when a death results from drug dealing and when a DEA or other law enforcement officer is murdered. When drug syndicates commit murder, our sympathy should be with the victims, not the killers. It's time for the Congress to pass this bill and make it law. It's time for us to send our own message to people who kill cops.

They have made a difference, a difference that will save lives and assure our children a better future in the type of America they deserve to grow up in. Our dream is a nation of drug free communities, drug free workplaces, drug free homes, and drug free schools. And that is what these men died for, and that is what we must work for.

In the crusade for a drug free America, these heroes gave all that they had and all that they were. Let us do all that we can to honor their memory. Through our prayers, let us be with them. Through our work, let us commemorate their sacrifice. And through our achievement, let us celebrate their lives. Together we can achieve what they died for -- a drug free America. Thank you, and God bless you.

General Meese. Thank you, Mr. President, for those inspiring remarks, which highlight our being here today. In your remarks you mentioned the heroes we are commemorating. Among those are two agents from the Drug Enforcement Agency, one of the key institutions in our struggle against drug abuse. We're pleased to have representing our drug law enforcement organizations, Jack Lawn, the Administrator of DEA, seated here on the dais.

We had a tragedy in the DEA recently, when two special agents, Paul Seema and George Montoya, were killed in the course of a heroin investigation near Los Angeles. In that operation, one of their colleagues, special agent Jose Martinez, was wounded. We thank God that he survived, and we're pleased to have him with us today. Surely, no one is a more worthy spokesman for those who risked their lives in the course of the battle against drugs than Mr. Martinez. And so, it is my great honor at this time to ask special agent Martinez to step up and say a few words.

Martinez. First of all, I'd like to take this opportunity to thank all my friends, family, and everyone in the DEA family, and all the other law enforcement officers and community for their support while I was hospitalized, and the general public for their encouragement to me -- all the letters I received. And I would also like to thank everyone for the encouragement that was shown to the loved ones of my slain fellow agents, Paul Seema and George Montoya. I am thankful for the greater public concern about drug abuse. And thank you, Mr. President and Mrs. Reagan, for your contributions to this awareness.

Those of us in drug enforcement are committed to the task of removing drugs from our society, knowing and accepting the dangers involved. At the same time, many in society rationalize the drug use as being a victimless crime and not harmful to anyone. Paul Seema and George Montoya were victims of society's demand to satisfy their desire for drugs. Not until people quit using drugs will it become safer for those of us in law enforcement and the rest of society. Thank you.

The President. The Attorney General tells me I can just conclude it. [Laughter] I didn't bring a whistle, and I can't think of a good get-off line, except I think that what we have just heard from this young man, his lovely wife -- I think all of us know what's at stake here. And I think all of us are going to continue doing this until it's a chapter of our history that we can look back upon, but know that we'll never see that chapter repeated again in our nation's history. God bless you all.

ROBERTS had spotted three mines lying perpendicular to the ship's course and about 700 yards away. The ROBERTS struck a mine set deeper than the others and not visible from the ship. Ten servicemen were injured. The detonation caused a nine-foot hole in the ship's hull near the main engine room, below the water line; a split in the ship's bulkhead between the main engine room and an auxiliary machinery room; and a fire. The ROBERTS is now safely in a repair facility.

These necessary and proportionate actions by U.S. Armed Forces were taken at my specific direction in the exercise of our inherent right of self-defense, recognized in Article 51 of the United Nations Charter, and pursuant to my constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander in Chief. We have completed these self-defense actions and consider the matter closed.

March 1987, I and members of my Administration have provided to Congress letters, reports, briefings, and testimony in connection with developments in the Persian Gulf and the activities of U.S. Armed Forces in the region. In accordance with my desire that Congress be kept fully informed on this matter, I am providing this report consistent with the War Powers Resolution. I look forward to cooperating with Congress in pursuit of our mutual, overriding aim of peace and stability in the Persian Gulf region. In this connection, I regard the continued presence of U.S. Armed Forces to be essential to the achievement of that aim. Our Forces remain prepared to take any additional action necessary to protect themselves, U.S.-flag vessels, and U.S. lives.

Senators, distinguished guests, you know, more than half a century ago, there was a halfback at the University of Chicago who was so powerful, so skilled, and so dashing that he became a hero to millions of football-loving Americans, including a certain young fellow named Dutch Reagan. In 1935 this great halfback, Jay Berwanger, received a new award, and the tradition of the Heisman Trophy was born. Jay Berwanger is with us here tonight, and I couldn't begin without telling him and all the Heisman Trophy winners who are gathered here what a great honor it is to be in their presence.

Pete, Judi [Mrs. Dawkins], and everyone, we're here this evening less to celebrate Pete Dawkins' past as an athlete than to show our support for his future as, yes, the next United States Senator from the great State of New Jersey. Athlete, scholar, soldier, businessman -- Pete Dawkins is one of the finest candidates to compete in the elections of 1988. But I'll go even further: Pete Dawkins is one of the finest candidates I've ever known. The reason goes beyond Pete's extraordinary competence and skill. It has to do with his deepest values -- with his fierce belief in freedom, in the family, in economic opportunity for all.

On the issues, Pete has already staked out forthright positions. He stands with me in wanting to keep your taxes low in order to keep our economy growing. He's staunch in his support of the Strategic Defense Initiative, which Pete has rightly called a step ``to reduce the threat of nuclear arms.'' And he understands the need to keep the pressure on Soviet-backed regimes by supporting those struggling for freedom around the world, especially in Afghanistan and, yes, in Nicaragua.

This election will determine whether we'll continue on the path we began in 1981 -- a growing, expanding economy at home and a strong and secure America abroad -- or whether we'll return to the failed policies of the past -- high taxes, increasing inflation and unemployment, a stifling bureaucracy, and weakness abroad. Our opponents are saying that America wants to return to the good old days of the 1970's. Well, I don't know about you, but I don't think that's what the public wants. [Laughter] We're prepared to move forward into the next decade and tackle the new challenges that it offers.

Dawkins is running for the Senate because he believes in the new America, not the old; because he believes America should be strong, not weak; because he believes we should discipline the Federal budget, not the family budget; and because he knows that tax hikes in Washington are seldom used to cut the deficit, just to go on spending. If I could just add one personal note: As President, I've seen the Senate in Republican hands. It was during my first 6 years. And I've seen it run by the Democrats, as it is today. Believe me, this country needs Pete to come down here and help return the Senate to GOP control.

But to turn for a moment from the Nation as a whole to the State of New Jersey, the State so many of you serve and cherish. Under the outstanding leadership of Governor Kean, New Jersey has changed in recent years, changed dramatically. There was a time not too long ago when New Jersey was becoming thought of as one huge, unmanageable sprawl, as a State that was being taken over by the most unpleasant aspects of the big cities in neighboring States. Today New Jersey is rightly seen as a State that has made a comeback -- a State of economic growth, but of compassion for its less fortunate citizens; a State of reform and good government; a State where, for millions of Americans, life is good, very good. Today there's a new New Jersey. Isn't it time for New Jersey to have a new Senator?

Now, with all of these football greats here, if you'll permit me, I'd like to close with a football story. Back when I was in Hollywood, one day I picked up the Daily Variety and read where Warner Brothers was announcing that they were making the life story of Knute Rockne.

And then I went home because some cameramen, in those early days, had told me that the fellas in the front office only knew what they saw on film. And I dug down in the trunk and came up with my own pictures of myself playing football in college and brought them back and showed them to the producer. Well, believe it or not, he let me do the test. And Pat O'Brien, knowing of my nervousness and desire, graciously agreed to be a part of it.

I'm very proud and pleased to be here. Never thought I'd be associating with that many Heisman Trophy winners -- [laughter] -- but also, I know where your hearts are with regard to this coming election. Do everything you can, and buttonhole those neighbors. The one big trouble today with a lot of people who think like us is that they just have forgotten to vote and think they can just go their way and everything will turn out all right.

Well, the thing to remind those that don't go to the polls anymore what Will Rogers once said. He said: ``The people you send to public office are no better and no worse than the people who send them there. But they're all better than those who don't vote at all.'' So, get out there, get out the vote, and I'll be waiting here to greet a new Senator from New Jersey. Thank you very much.

Well, tonight I'd like to talk with you about our nation's commitment to leadership and imagination, and your role in America's future. I'm talking about our space program. I believe it is time to look ahead and envision breaking the bounds of earthbound imagination and to begin to conceive of a 21st century. The national aerospace plane is an important investment in our future. Its technologies will yield routine access to space. We will be capable of taking off from Dulles Airport in a second generation shuttle, leaping into space, and docking with the space station, almost like taking off from Washington for London. Not only the Moon but the entire solar system beckons, which is why I have issued a new national space policy that reaffirms the goal of U.S. leadership in space and sets a new long-term goal of expanding human exploration into the solar system.

I ask you: Can America ever afford to stop dreaming great dreams? And can we afford to jettison the next generation of technical spinoffs? Just think about the thousands of discoveries, all the commercial and industrial products and techniques that came because we developed the technology to go to the Moon. We hear a great deal about American competitiveness. Other nations often cite our major scientific programs as among our greatest competitive advantages, and they're right. Tonight I ask Congress and all the American people to join me in making the long-term investment required to advance U.S. leadership in space. We must begin that investment by funding the increases I've proposed for our civil space program. Can we afford to stop our exploration and wait for others to pass us?

And exploration is not all we want. Recently, we announced that it would be the policy of the Government to encourage private sector investment and involvement in outer space. We are now committed to being the anchor tenant in a privately financed, constructed, and operated commercial research and manufacturing facility. We'll help develop a highway to space by using private launch services to the greatest extent feasible, and we're working to win legislation to limit liability for commercial launch providers. We'll make equipment, like the external fuel tanks of the shuttle fleet, available to private commercial and nonprofit ventures in space. And we're looking at ways to avoid precluding or deterring American private enterprise in taking commercial advantage of the unique aspects of the space environment.

To do our part in building on the base of technology and talent we'll need, we're instituting policies to turn federally funded discoveries into commercial products and technologies. We're encouraging Federal scientists, engineers, and technicians to take sabbatical years to teach at any level of American education. We're opening the way for even greater contacts between NASA and schools and universities. And we're emphasizing the importance of the superconducting supercollider to the advancement of science.

It's a future beyond the most distant star in our dreams that beckons us. And to those who say it can't be reached, that it's impossible, I'd just point toward your industries and ask if a few years ago they thought what you are doing today would also be impossible. Carver Mead, professor of computer sciences at the California Institute of Technology, recently noted that ``the entire Industrial Revolution enhanced productivity by a factor of about 100. The Microelectronic Revolution has already increased productivity in information-based technology by a factor of more than a million, and the end isn't in sight yet.'' Is that the accomplishment of people who listened when others used the word impossible?

More than any other group, yes, we've challenged America's scientists to help find a safe and effective means to protect our borders and those of our allies by developing technologies for the Strategic Defense Initiative. Five years ago, I proposed SDI, and much to my satisfaction, we've made tremendous progress in that research. We must not stop dreaming because a few naysayers insist on limiting our options for a safe and secure future.

I ask each of you today to carry out your dreams and to continue to make this nation the greatest innovator in the world. I ask you today to help us all with our feet on the ground to look to the stars and, in doing that, to remain number one in technology here on Earth. And if even some of you still think that maybe I'm being too optimistic, you're hearing all this from a fellow who was a second lieutenant in the horse cavalry. [Laughter] With that, I think it's high time that you enjoy dinner. I thank you all. God bless you all.

The heritage of the Jewish people finds expression in America today just as in the days of our Founders. During Jewish Heritage Week, we recall that throughout our history the American people have drawn inspiration from and analogies to Jewish history. That history -- which in this century alone includes the horrors of the Holocaust, the establishment of the modern State of Israel, and the current struggle of Soviet Jewry for freedom -- symbolizes humanity's long and continuing quest for liberty.

Happily, the United States, the land of the free, has become home to a thriving Jewish community whose members have made inestimable contributions to our national life. Jews have distinguished themselves in virtually every field, to the benefit of us all. Jewish Heritage Week, which this year includes April 21, the 40th anniversary of the founding of Israel, is a fitting occasion for us to study once again the lessons of Jewish history and to rededicate ourselves to the ideals of freedom for all peoples.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

For more than three decades our country has observed May 1 as Law Day, U.S.A., in grateful recognition that our free Republic is a government of laws, not men. On Law Day, U.S.A., we join in proud commemoration of America's legacy of liberty, justice, and self-government, and we pause to salute those past and present who have served and sacrificed to win and protect our freedom and to preserve law and tranquility in our communities -- including the men and women of law enforcement whose daily courage and dedication make our laws and liberties a living reality.

Because ours is a government by consent of the people, we are our own lawgivers; hence, the virtuousness of our laws depends on our individual and civic virtues. That is truly something to remember on any Law Day, U.S.A., but especially in a national election year, when we recall how important it is that each of us be familiar with our rights and liberties and with the legal and political guarantees of our freedoms. Only through knowledge, awareness, and love of country can we take full part in the self-government that is ours as Americans to perpetuate.

This is why all Americans of legal voting age should make up their minds, this year and each year, to vote in every election for which they are eligible and to observe all election laws faithfully. By voting, we have our say in who our representatives are and thereby in the shaping of laws that affect us, our communities, our States, and our Nation. We should always remember that those who vote not only demonstrate their voice in public affairs but also exercise one of the precious rights for which brave people around the globe today fight and die just as did our ancestors. Let us understand that our voting is a way to keep faith with them, with our fellow citizens, with the brave Americans who defend us at home and abroad, and with all who cherish our American heritage of liberty, justice, and equality before the law.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 20th day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

This dispute, in the judgment of the National Mediation Board, threatens substantially to interrupt interstate commerce to a degree such as to deprive a section of the country of essential transportation service.

Conditions. As provided by Section 10 of the Act, as amended, from the date of the creation of the board and for 30 days after the board has made its report to the President, no change, except by agreement of the parties, shall be made by the Carrier or the employees in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

Presidential Emergency Board No. 213 to investigate a current dispute between the Chicago and North Western Transportation Company (CNW) and certain of its employees represented by the United Transportation Union. The President, by Executive order, established the Emergency Board on the recommendation of the National Mediation Board, which found that the dispute threatens to interrupt interstate commerce to a degree that would deprive a section of the country of essential transportation services.

CNW employs over 8,000 persons and in terms of revenue generated is the 8th largest railroad in the United States. The railroad is a major link in our interstate rail network, as a number of major U.S. Class I railroads rely on the CNW to receive or forward their traffic. The CNW handled nearly 1.5 million carloads and over 80 million tons of traffic in 1986. This represents 7 percent of total rail carloads nationwide and 15 percent of all traffic moved in the western territory.

More than one-third of CNW's traffic originates on its lines and is forwarded to connecting lines; another one-fourth is received from other rail carriers and terminated on the CNW. Bridge traffic (received from one carrier and subsequently passed along to another carrier) accounts for 21 percent. Only 16 percent represents local shipments (those that both originate and terminate on CNW lines). The largest commodity handled by the CNW in terms of revenues is coal, which accounted for 14 percent of its annual revenues in 1986, 28 percent of its total carloads, and 7 percent of all U.S. rail coal loadings.

Northern Plains and corn in the Missouri and Mississippi River Basins. Grain accounts for 13 percent of CNW-originated carloads, representing 12 percent of all western railroads' grain originations and 9 percent of rail loadings of grain nationwide.

In addition to its freight-handling activities, the railroad is the major rail passenger provider for the city of Chicago, handling approximately 40,000 passengers daily. Alternatives to this commuter rail service are limited. As a result, the Chicago area would suffer a substantial disruption of normal business activities in the event of a strike.

Consequently the President has invoked the Emergency Board procedures of the Railway Labor Act, which in part provide that the board will report its findings and recommendations for settlement to the President within 30 days from the date of its creation. The parties must then consider the recommendations of the Emergency Board and endeavor to resolve their differences without engaging in self-help during a subsequent 30-day period.

America and the Kingdom of the Netherlands on Social Security that consists of two separate instruments: A principal agreement and an administrative arrangement. The Agreement was signed at The Hague on December 8, 1987.

U.S.-Netherlands Agreement is similar in objective to the social security agreements already in force with Belgium, Canada, the Federal Republic of Germany, Italy, Norway, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom. Such bilateral agreements provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other.

Today, on the 40th anniversary of Israel's independence, the United States and Israel have signed a memorandum of agreement (MOA). This MOA formalizes and perpetuates the bilateral U.S. and Israeli consultative groups that meet periodically to discuss joint military, security assistance, and economic developmental questions. The MOA reiterates for the public record our long-standing relationship of strategic cooperation with Israel. Strategic cooperation can only succeed when there are shared interests, including the commitment to building peace and stability in the region. It reflects the enduring U.S. commitment to Israel's security. That commitment will never flag. The U.S. commitment to peace will also not flag. The President knows that a strong Israel is necessary if peace is to be possible. He also knows that Israel can never be truly secure without peace.

To that end, the President has asked Secretary of State Shultz to continue his peace-making efforts, seeking a comprehensive settlement which will assure Israeli security and provide for the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people. The President remains convinced that our peace initiative is balanced and offers the only realistic basis on which to make progress. The President reiterates his appeal to the leaders in the region not to miss this opportunity to move ahead and get to productive peace negotiations. This is an objective that Israel has fervently sought over the last 40 years.

Historians have wondered ever since what it was that made men like Adams and that outnumbered band of colonists believe they could overthrow the power of the mightiest empire on Earth. How appropriate it seemed, 5 years later, when the British band played at Yorktown, ``The World Turned Upside Down.'' Truly, the predictions of the wiser heads in Europe had been proven wrong.

The boldness, the vision, and yes, the gift for dreaming of a few farmers, merchants, and lawyers here on these shores had started a revolution that today reaches into every corner of the world, a revolution that still fires men's souls with the ravishing light and glory of human freedom.

As members of the World Affairs Council, as active students of global politics, all of you here today can testify to how unlikely the prospects for freedom seemed at the start of this decade. You can recall democracy on the defensive in country after country, an unparalleled buildup of nuclear arms, hostages in Iran, the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, predictions of economic contraction, and global chaos, ranging from food and fuel shortages to environmental disaster. All of these were the unrelenting themes of so much of what we read and heard in the media.

With the economic recovery of the United States and the democracies, however, much of this talk abated. And this economic recovery, anticipated in Massachusetts in 1981 and '82 with reduced State and local tax rates, was itself rooted in the insight that was at the heart of the revolution begun here two centuries ago. Trust the people, let government get out of the way, and leave unharnessed the energy and dynamism of free men and women.

I've come here today to suggest that this notion of trusting the power of human freedom and letting the people do the rest was not just a good basis for our economic policy, it proved a solid foundation for our foreign policy as well. That's what we've given to the people, why we have repeated what they instinctively knew, but what the experts had shied away from saying in public. We spoke plainly and bluntly. We rejected what Jeane Kirkpatrick calls moral equivalency. We said freedom was better than totalitarianism. We said communism was bad. We said a future of nuclear terror was unacceptable. We said we stood for peace, but we also stood for freedom. We said we held fast to the dream of our Founding Fathers: the dream that someday every man, woman, and child would live in dignity and in freedom. And because of this, we said containment was no longer enough, that the expansion of human freedom was our goal. We spoke for democracy, and we said that we would work for the day when the people of every nation enjoyed the blessing of liberty.

Well, at first, the experts said this kind of candor was dangerous, that it would lead to a worsening of Soviet-American relations. But far to the contrary, this candor made clear to the Soviets the resilience and strength of the West; it made them understand the lack of illusions on our part about them or their system. By reasserting values and defining once again what we as a people and a nation stood for, we were of course making a moral and spiritual point. And in doing this, we offered hope for the future, for democracy; and we showed we had retained that gift for dreaming that marked this continent and our nation at its birth.

But in all this we were also doing something practical. We had learned long ago that the Soviets get down to serious negotiations only after they are convinced that their counterparts are determined to stand firm. We knew the least indication of weakened resolve on our part would lead the Soviets to stop the serious bargaining, stall diplomatic progress, and attempt to exploit this perceived weakness. So, we were candid. We acknowledged the depth of our disagreements and their fundamental, moral import. In this way, we acknowledged that the differences [that] separated us and the Soviets were deeper and wider than just missile counts and number of warheads. As I've said before, we do not mistrust each other because we are armed; we are armed because we mistrust each other. And I spoke those words to General Secretary Gorbachev at our very first meeting in Geneva.

And that was why we resolved to address the full range of the real causes of that mistrust and raise the crucial moral and political issues directly with the Soviets. Now, in the past, the full weight of the Soviet-American relationship all too often seemed to rest on one issue: arms control, a plank not sturdy enough to bear up the whole platform of Soviet-American relations. So, we adopted not just a one-part agenda of arms control but a broader four-part agenda. We talked about regional conflicts, especially in areas like Afghanistan, Angola, and Central America, where Soviet expansionism was leading to sharp confrontation. We insisted on putting human rights on our bilateral agenda, and the issue of Soviet noncompliance with the Helsinki accords. We also emphasized people-to-people exchanges, and we challenged the Soviets to tear down the artificial barriers that isolate their citizens from the rest of the world. As for the final item on the agenda, arms control, even that we revised.

We said we wanted to go beyond merely establishing new limits that would permit even greater buildups in nuclear arms. We insisted on cutting down, reducing, not just controlling, the number of weapons -- arms reductions, not just arms control.

And now this approach to the Soviets -- public candor about their system and ours, a full agenda that put the real differences between us on the table -- has borne fruit. Just as we look at leading indicators to see how the economy is doing, we know the global momentum of freedom is the best leading indicator of how the United States is doing in the world.

When we see a freely elected government in the Republic of Korea; battlefield victories for the Angolan freedom fighters; China opening and liberalizing its economy; democracy ascending in Latin America, the Philippines, and on every other continent -- where these and other indicators are strong, so too is America and so too are our hopes for the future.

Gorbachev in Moscow for our fourth summit since 1985. Negotiations are underway between our two governments on an unparalleled number of issues. The INF treaty is reality, and now the Senate should give its consent to ratification. The START treaty is working along. And I know that on everyone's mind today is this single, startling fact: The Soviets have pledged that next month they will begin withdrawing from Afghanistan. And if anyone had predicted just a few years ago that by the end of this decade a treaty would be signed eliminating a whole class of nuclear weapons, that discussions would be moving along toward a 50-percent reduction in all strategic nuclear arms, and that the Soviets had set a date certain for pulling out of Afghanistan, that individual would have faced more than a little skepticism. But that, on the eve of the fourth summit, is exactly where we are.

So, let me now summarize for you some of the issues that need crucial definition as we approach this summit. Let's begin with Afghanistan. History records few struggles so heroic as that of the Afghan people against the Soviet invasion. In 8 years more than a million Afghans have been killed; more than 5 million have been driven into exile. And yet, despite all this suffering, the Afghan people have fought on -- a determined patriotic resistance force against one of the world's most powerful and sophisticated armies. Yes, their land has been occupied, but they have not been conquered.

But let me say here that the next few months will be no time for complacency, no time to sit back and congratulate ourselves. The Soviets have rarely before, and not at all in more than three decades, left a country once occupied. They have often promised to leave, but rarely in their history, and then only under pressure from the West, have they actually done it. Afghanistan was a critical, strategic prize for the Soviets. The development of air bases near Afghanistan's border with Iran and Pakistan would have dramatically increased the Soviet capability to project their power to the Strait of Hormuz and to threaten our ability to keep open that critical passage. We believe that they still hope to prop up their discredited, doomed puppet regime, and they still seek to pose a threat to neighboring Pakistan, to whom we have a longstanding defense commitment.

Well, we don't know. We can't know until the drama is fully played. We must make clear that any spreading of violence on the part of the Soviets or their puppets could undo the good that the Geneva accords promised for East-West relations.

Soviets are now pledged to withdraw their forces totally from Afghanistan by next February 15th at the latest. In the meantime, they know that as long as they're aiding their friends in Kabul we will continue to supply the Mujahidin by whatever means necessary. Let me repeat: We will continue to support the Mujahidin for as long as the Soviets support the Kabul regime. The Soviets understand that this is our position and that we wouldn't have entered into this agreement without it. And it's more than a position. This is a hard and fast commitment on my part, backed up by a unanimous resolution of the United States Senate.

From the start, our policy in Afghanistan has, of course, been directed at restoring that country to an independent, nonaligned status, in which the Afghan people could decide their own future and to which their refugees could return safely and with honor -- the same goals as those stated in successive United Nations General Assembly resolutions over the years. But these aren't the only goals of our policy there. In a broader sense, our policy is intended to nurture what you might call more normal relations between East and West.

You see, just as a Soviet Union that oppresses its own people, that violates the Helsinki accords on human rights to which it is a party, that continues to suppress free expression and religious worship and the right to travel -- just as such a Soviet Union can never have truly normal relations with the United States and the rest of the free world, neither can a Soviet Union that is always trying to push its way into other countries ever have a normal relationship with us. And that's what has happened in countries like Angola, Nicaragua, and Ethiopia: The Soviet Union has helped install or maintain client regimes against the will of the people.

None of these regimes has brought peace or a better life to their people. Each has brought misery and hardship. Each is an outrage to the conscience of mankind, and none more so than Ethiopia. Two years ago a pitying world believed that at last the hopes of all compassionate people had been realized and that the famine in Africa had come to an end. Humanity prayed that it would never again see pictures of children with bloated stomachs or hear stories of families dying one by one as they walked dozens of miles to reach feeding stations. But now in one country the famine has returned. Ethiopia suffers from drought, yes, and even more it suffers from inadequate agricultural policies. But now to drought and failed policy has been added a third, even more deadly element: war. The Ethiopian Army has recently suffered major defeats in its long war with the Eritrean secessionist forces. The combination of drought and the dislocations of war is the immediate cause of famine in that part of the country. But the Ethiopian regime recently ordered all foreign famine relief workers to leave the afflicted northern region. That leads us to the horrible conclusion that starvation and scorched earth are being considered as weapons to defeat the rebellion.

The subject of Ethiopia has long been on the U.S.-Soviet agenda, but now it is more urgent because of this tremendous human catastrophe in the making. Is the world to know another holocaust? Is it to see another political famine? The Soviets are the principal arms supplier and primary backer to the regime in Addis Ababa. They're also supplying 250,000 tons of food this year. They can stop this disaster before it happens.

And I appeal to them to persuade the Ethiopian regime, as only they can, to change its decision and to allow the famine relief efforts to continue. And let me add, I hope, as well, that the Soviet Union will join us and other concerned governments in working toward a peaceful, negotiated solution to the civil war.

The years of Western passivity in the face of Soviet aggression ended, of course, 7 years ago. But the issue here is that the mentality that produced such analyses, as the Soviet official called them, has not ended. Until it does, the world cannot know true peace.

That's a lesson we should apply closer to home, in Nicaragua. A few months before the Soviets launched their invasion of Afghanistan, the Soviets also helped Sandinista Communists in Nicaragua to steal a democratic revolution. The Communists promised democracy and human rights, but they instead imposed a cruel dictatorship, massively militarized, and began a secret war of subversion against Nicaragua's peaceful neighbors.

The people of Nicaragua took up arms against the Communists, and they've fought a valiant struggle. But our Congress, instead of giving the Nicaraguan resistance the same steady support the Afghans have received, has repeatedly turned aid on and off. Even now, while the Soviet bloc pours half a billion dollars of arms a year into Nicaragua, Congress has denied the freedom fighters the support they need to force the Sandinistas to fulfill their democratic promises. I think it's about time that Congress learned the lessons of Afghanistan.

America, by supporting freedom fighters against brutal dictatorships, is helping to advance the values we hold most dear: peace, freedom, human rights, and yes, democracy. At the same time, we're helping to secure our own freedom by raising the cost of Soviet aggression and by extending the battle for freedom to the far frontier. Some say the Soviet Union is reappraising its foreign policy these days to concentrate on internal reform. Well, clearly, there are signs of change. But if there is change, it's because the costs of aggression and the real moral difference between our systems were brought home to it. If we hope to see a more fundamental change, we must remain strong and firm. If we fulfill our responsibility to set the limits, as well as offering constructive cooperation, then this could indeed turn out to be a turning point in the history of East-West relations.

By starting now to show real respect for human rights and abandoning the quest for military solutions to these regional conflicts, the Soviet Union would also be working to build trust and improve relations between our two countries. Regional conflicts and human rights are closely intertwined. They are issues of moral conscience. They're issues of international security. Because when a government abuses the rights of its own people, it is a grim indication of its willingness to commit violence against others.

Two of the most basic rights that we've called on the Soviets to comply with under the Helsinki accords are the right to emigrate and the right to travel. How can we help but doubt a government that mistrusts its own people and holds them against their will? And what better way would there be to improve understanding between the United States and the Soviet Union than to permit free and direct contact between our two peoples? In the new spirit of openness, why doesn't the Soviet Government issue passports to its citizens? I think this would dramatically improve U.S.-Soviet relations.

Of course, the World Affairs Council here is a major sponsor of USIA's International Visitors Program. So, I don't have to tell you the importance of people-to-people exchanges. And I want to personally -- to thank all of you who have provided assistance and hospitality to foreign visitors. I just left a meeting in the Oval Office to come up here, and that meeting brought about by Director Wick of USIA was a meeting with an assemblage of media and publishing people from the Soviet Union. That, I think, is a first in our relationship. I have often reflected in public on how if our planet was ever threatened by forces from another world all nations and all people would quickly come together in unity and brotherhood.

And I'm hopeful that American foreign policy, based as it has been on strength and candor, is opening a way to a world where trust and affection among peoples is an everyday reality. This is my hope as I prepare to leave for Moscow. I'm grateful for your prayers and for your support. I thank you, and God bless you.

Mr. President, my question to you, sir, is what will be the central theme of your message that you'll carry to the people of the Soviet Union next month, and how will the Senate's ratification of the INF treaty, or in the alternative, the Senate's failure to ratify the treaty, affect that message?

The President. Well, let me answer that part first and then get to the other. I think it would be very, well, upsetting, and it would put a strain on the summit if the Senate has not ratified the treaty by the time we go there. And we're hoping and praying they will, and yet their scheduling of it for discussion and debate is such that I'm very concerned that possibly we may have to go without it having been ratified.

Now, as to the message to the Soviet people, I don't know how much contact we'll be able to have with them. We're going to try. We have been providing lists by name of individuals in the Soviet Union to the General Secretary and his people, and so far, I have to say there has been quite a response in their allowing these refuseniks we've named to emigrate -- most of them to the United States, but many to Israel and to other countries.

But to the people -- I have a feeling that the people of the Soviet Union, as well as what Gandhi said about the people everywhere -- that if we had a chance and they had a chance for more contact, we would find that they were very much like us. They have a great sense of humor, and I think they tend to be very friendly. I'm not going to burden you with it now, but I have a new hobby. I'm collecting jokes that I can find are told by the Russian people, among themselves, that reveal that sense of humor as well as a little cynicism about their own system. But I'm looking forward to meeting -- and meeting with some of the refuseniks.

Mr. President, I'd just like to ask you one question about the trade deficit and foreign trade policy here in America. What do you think the United States people should look for in the next election -- for a candidate that would have a policy that would help this country tackle the trade deficit and compete at a more stronger rate with, say, Japan and West Germany on a manufacturing base?

The President. Well, if you'll forgive me, you've got an administration now that has been trying to do something about the trade deficit. We have continuously reduced the trade deficit. We have not brought it to where there is no trade deficit as yet. And this last one, even though they said, oh, why the deficit went up a little bit -- they didn't say little bit, they made it sound horrendous -- something about around $13 billion-plus in this trade deficit. But what they didn't announce was that our exports were at their highest level that they've been so far. And it so happened that also there was -- because of a little lowering in the price of the dollar -- there was a little increase in imports at the same time, so that there was still a deficit. But we have continued, in the years we've been here, every year, to have an increase in our exports.

I'll tell you, though, something. I don't feel the way about the trade deficit that I do about deficit spending here within our own country. In the 70 years, back when our country was growing from its colonial beginnings into the great industrial power that it is today, every one of those 70 years we had a trade imbalance. There were things that we hadn't learned to produce yet in our own country, and so forth. And yet that was our great period of growth. Now, with all of this trade imbalance, these last 65 months have been the longest period of economic expansion in the history of the United States.

I've said repeatedly, the trade bill that is now before the conference comes to me as it is, I will veto it not because I'm against a trade bill but because they've loaded on so many items -- and one item in particular that would be very restrictive on business and industry in America. And I have served notice that if that item is in there I can't sign it. But if I do have to veto it, I will immediately call on the Congress to adopt a trade bill that is similar to this one without those things that have been added on.

Because we've been working in the economic summit as hard as we can to bring about changes in the GATT treaty -- that's the general tariff and trade agreement of the industrial nations of the West and Japan.

All we've been asking for is not protectionism but asking for a free and fair area so that we're all playing on a level field. If they've got restrictions on our exports coming into their country, then we're going to respond. We've gotten some great changes made. So, I'm very optimistic and not concerned as much about that trade imbalance. It'd be fine to change it, but the imbalance I want to get is a Congress that will join truly in eliminating the reckless spending that has us overspending. And then I would look for all your support in having a change in the Constitution that says hereafter it'll be against the Constitution to have a trade -- or not a trade in, but to have a deficit spending situation in our country.

Mr. President, good afternoon. I'm a sophomore English major at Springfield College. My question to you this afternoon: Are you considering any military intervention when it comes to stifling drug traffic into the United States? If so, will it be on an -- wide, lateral, or bilateral basis and to what scale?

The President. Well, we have been. For the first time, we have been utilizing the military. There are some laws that limit what you could ask the military to do. But last year alone, there were 16,000 flying hours of surveillance by our military aircraft in helping us interdict the drugs coming into America. And there were 2,500 full sailing days of the Navy out there patrolling and helping us interdict this drug entry.

I have to tell you though, we have done a remarkable job. Incidentally, we've increased our spending with regard to drugs and the fighting of the drug abuse. We have increased that -- tripled it -- since we've been here. But that is not going to do the job, as much as we have to keep on intercepting those drugs. Last year we confiscated $500 million of assets of the drug dealers and still the problem is with us. I think Nancy set out on the course that we must all do more to bring about. You can't totally ever, with the boundaries we have, shut off the influx of drugs. The deal is: Take the customer away from the drugs. Turn the customer away from drugs. I'm sure you've heard about the Just Say No idea in drugs.

We had great unemployment. And we had some pretty high taxes. And we set out on an economic recovery program that was aimed at changing that. And also, I had always felt before I came here that there was a growing spiritual hunger in the United States to once again believe, and believe not only in the Almighty but in this country of ours.

So, we answered some of those questions. We found out that by cutting the tax rates the Government got more revenue than it did at the higher rates, because when there's an incentive and you can keep more of the money that you're earning, people earn more money. One percent of our highest taxpayers when we came here was actually paying 18 percent of the total tax revenue from the income tax. When we reduced their rates, that 1 percent is now paying 26\1/2\ percent of the total revenue. And yet we still have some people saying we must tax the rich, we must go after them. And those taxes, I think, helped start us very much on the road of economic recovery.

In these last 5 or 6 years, we have now created 16 million new jobs. And the family income average is higher than it has ever been before. Inflation is under control; it's no longer double digit. And one of the things I will always be very proud to see is that Americans are proud once again, to be Americans.

The President. We're going to keep on trying as hard as we can. We feel that the coming together in negotiations, sitting down at a table with the other countries -- you know, most of us have forgotten that technically the state of war still exists between the Arab nations and Israel. But we're not going to cure it until we come together and find out how we can arrive at a fair settlement of the differences between those peoples.

And I don't think that there's any negotiation between someone who just says, you're not even a nation, I won't talk to you. Israel is a nation, recognized as such by almost all of the civilized world. And so, this is what we're seeking -- are Palestinian leaders who are agreeable to coming together and with the other Arab States.

We have worked very hard also to make the other Arab States aware that -- even in addition to our agreement and the security, we agree, of Israel -- that we want to and can be fair and friends with them. And so we have established a relationship that I think is growing very much about -- that we have the trust of a great many of the Arab States. And a number of those are willing to join in this kind of negotiation that we want to achieve.

Hello, Mr. President. I'd just like to tell you what an honor and totally unexpected privilege it is for me to ask you a question here. My question has to do with the article that was in the Wall Street Journal today about the Stealth bomber -- the artist's sketch of it, and after all these years of secrecy, why it was unveiled now. Perhaps it has something to do with your foreign trip and how the Stealth program is going to be incorporated with the Star Wars defense system?

The President. Well, this is, of course, a form of conventional weapon, an airplane and a bomber, and I think the timing was probably somewhat accidental about revealing this photo. What has happened is we have just reached the testing point. So, very shortly that plane will be in the air and visible to all. So, there didn't seem to be any more reason to keep it secret. And I don't think it will hurt at the summit.

I know that you were the sixth, and that was all. Can I do something terrible here? The press knows I do this. I mentioned that hobby of mine. So, as long as I can't answer any more questions, can I conclude in just telling you one of those jokes which illustrates the sense of humor -- [applause]. And this is one that I told to Gorbachev.

But the media has certainly had a lot to report on lately. I thought it was extraordinary that Richard Nixon went on ``Meet The Press'' and spent an entire hour with Chris Wallace, Tom Brokaw, and John Chancellor. That should put an end to that talk that he's been punished enough.

Bush is doing well. George has been a wonderful Vice President, but nobody's perfect. [Laughter] I put him in charge of antiterrorism, and the McLaughlin Group is still on the air. [Laughter] But with so much focus on the Presidential election, I've been feeling a little lonely these days. I'm so desperate for attention I almost considered holding a news conference.

President may like members of the press personally, and I do -- Jerry and Norm and Johanna and Lou and so many others of you -- but a President institutionally seeks to wield power to accomplish his goals for the people.

The press complicates the wielding of that power by using its own great power, and that makes for friction. Every President will try to use the press to his best advantage and to avoid those situations that aren't to his advantage. To do otherwise results in a diminution of his leadership powers. The press is not a weak sister that needs bracing. It has more freedom, more influence, than ever in our history. The press can take care of itself quite nicely. And a President should be able to take care of himself as well.

So, what I hope my epitaph will be with the White House correspondents, what every President's epitaph should be with the press is this: He gave as good as he got. [Laughter] And that I think will make for a healthy press and a healthy Presidency. And I think all that's left to say is to thank you for inviting me, and thank you for your hospitality.

I think there is a toast -- I try to think here a -- if I said to Nancy, let us toast all of you, well then, you'd all be standing there, and we'd be the only ones having a drink. [Laughter] And what could you say. I think there's a toast that we all can have, and Yakov made that pretty evident also.

O'Leary. Ladies and gentlemen, the President and Mrs. Reagan have to go back to the White House now. And we request that you please remain in your places until they have left. And thank you all for coming. It's been a marvelous evening.

The generosity for which the American people have always been known shines clearly today in the willingness of many people to become organ and tissue donors so that others might live or have an opportunity to enjoy a fuller life. Thousands of Americans will receive an extraordinary gift this year -- a kidney, heart, liver, pancreas, a combination of heart and lung, skin, a cornea, bone, or bone marrow. The great majority of these gifts will have been possible only because a caring American agreed to donate an organ or tissue for transplantation.

We can all take pride in this generosity; yet the need for additional transplants remains great. Thousands of Americans will wait this year for a well-matched organ or tissue to become available. For some, no donor may be found. The decision to volunteer as an organ donor is a significant act of personal sacrifice. Fortunately, knowledge about organ donorship has spread in recent years. Groups in our communities stand ready to answer questions about organ and tissue donation. The American Council on Transplantation and school, church, and community groups are involved. Many States give people the chance to sign donor authorization cards when they complete their driver's license forms. Others require hospitals to offer people the opportunity to donate under appropriate circumstances.

Encouragement of organ and tissue donation must always be accompanied, of course, by thorough reflection and complete information. Recent medical and technological developments are posing new moral and ethical questions about transplantation in certain circumstances. Individuals, and society as a whole, must carefully consider these questions so that we never undercut our reverence for the sanctity God vests equally in the life of every person, from the moment of conception until natural death.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

It is with great sadness that we mourn the passing of the brave men and women aboard the Space Shuttle Challenger, but it is more important to remember them for their bravery and pursuit of challenge. I believe they would be proud of the challenge we have undertaken to move the Nation forward into a new era of space flight, one more stable, more reliable, and safer than before.

Space activities continue to provide vital support to U.S. national security interests. In response to expendable launch vehicle failures as well as the Challenger tragedy, the Department of Defense has embarked on a space launch recovery program that will provide for more assured access to space and reduce the backlog of critical national security payloads that were scheduled for launch on the Space Shuttle. In addition, critical space communications, navigation, meteorology, and surveillance programs continue to make vital contributions that enhance the effectiveness of our military forces and strengthen the overall deterrent posture of the United States. Also, space-related research conducted in support of the Strategic Defense Initiative continues to make impressive progress toward a more safe and secure future.

Defense initiated the joint National Aero-Space Plane research program that could result in an entirely new family of aerospace vehicles. Also, NASA and the Department of Defense examined and continue to study space transportation requirements for the late 1990's and early years of the 21st century. This study could lead to future development and technology efforts associated with advanced manned and unmanned space transportation systems aimed at providing increased responsiveness, flexibility, and reliability, as well as learning the costs of assured access to space while meeting evolving payload requirements.

Advanced planning continued for a permanently manned Space Station. At my request, our friends and allies cooperated with us in the initial planning and design phases of the Space Station. In addition to helping us build an enhanced facility, their investments will help to strengthen free world ties in space science and exploration.

During the year, we continued to unlock the mysteries of the universe. In January 1986, Voyager 2 become the first spacecraft to fly past Uranus, transmitting over 7,000 images of that planet and its rings and moons. The fastest known spinning binary pulsar was discovered.

In studies of the Earth and its environment, scientists continued to observe conditions from Earthbound and spaceborne platforms and to participate in interdisciplinary research activities that will allow better understanding and prediction of environmental problems throughout the world.

As most of you are aware, space is no longer just the domain of the United States and the Soviet Union. It has become a highly competitive international arena where more and more nations are vying for economic, scientific, and military advantages. Continued advances in aeronautics and space technology will strengthen the Nation's scientific capabilities and develop the technological infrastructure needed to maintain U.S. national security interests as well as economic competitiveness.

Because of the Challenger tragedy, the year 1986 was a difficult one for all of us who support U.S. space activities. In the aftermath of Challenger, we established goals to restructure and strengthen our space planning and organizations. I believe we have made considerable progress toward realizing these goals, which will allow the United States to return space transportation capabilities to safe and reliable operation.

The President. Thank you all very much, and a special thank you to your chairman, Senator Owen Johnson, to your executive director, Connie Heckman, and there happens to be a fellow, I think, down here that -- a longtime old friend who founded this organization, Don Totten. And, well, welcome to the White House complex. The White House complex -- they call it that because nothing in Washington is ever simple.

I'm not joking when I say that every one of the eight times I've met with you these 8 years I've wished more like you were in our Congress. And yet I'm also glad you're where you are: leading our conservative revolution in the State legislatures of America. Yes, when we talk about federalism here in Washington, we're really talking about putting the States more and more in charge. And that means that if what we conservatives believe in, if the principles that we stand for, are to succeed and prevail, we will need more conservatives like you in our State legislatures.

Already you're leading not only the States but the Federal Government as well in an agenda of hope for the future. In areas like tort reform, drug legislation, AIDS testing and research, welfare reform, privatization, and education reform, you've been way out in front of the pack. In fact, when I look at all you've done -- and in areas like welfare reform, for example -- I can't help wondering about that old argument for federalism. It used to be said that if we gave the States more power they'd show that they had the maturity to handle as well as Congress handles its power. Talk about faint praise. [Laughter] Well, we'd be lucky if Congress had your maturity, your foresight, and your wisdom.

Congress usually won't act without a little friendly prodding, and you can do that. Thirty-two States have passed resolutions calling for a constitutional convention to draft a balanced budget amendment. As my good friend Ed Feulner, president of the Heritage Foundation, wrote recently about the prospects of making it 33, in Ed's words: ``With 33 States on board, Congress would feel enormous pressure to take control of the situation, lest it be cut out of the process, as a convention would do.'' Now, I prefer Congress to deal with the issue directly. But if they don't, a good nudge in the right direction will get their attention.

But you'd never know it to hear those fellows on the other side who want to pick up the lease here when mine runs out, but we're in the longest peacetime expansion on record. Inflation is under control. A greater proportion of Americans are at work today than ever before in our history. After a falling roller coaster ride of almost a decade, real family income has risen strongly ever since our recovery began. Our expansion is creating hundreds of thousands of new jobs a month, and taken as a whole, these jobs pay better than the jobs already in the economy. Far from deindustrializing, as those other fellows say our nation is doing, many of our manufacturing industries are running near capacity. Far from losing out in world competition, which they also claim is the case, we're exporting now more than ever before in our history.

I'd like to be able to sign trade legislation this year. I've worked in good faith with Congress to produce an acceptable bill. Such a bill would open markets and improve America's competitiveness. And while the legislation working through Congress does enhance our negotiating authority in the ongoing international trade talks and helps us protect intellectual property rights, both good measures, it contains provisions that are unacceptable.

Put simply, on key provisions in the trade bill, the Democratic leadership in Congress has caved in to pressure from organized labor. The plant-closing restriction in the bill would make American industry less competitive -- not the way to go if you want to reverse the trade imbalance and save jobs. In fact, the restriction would cost jobs. One example of how -- since our recovery began, most net new jobs in the United States have come from companies that were 5 years old or less, entrepreneurial companies, both very large and very small. Europe, on the other hand, has had little entrepreneurship and almost no new -- net new jobs.

Recently one of our leading experts on job creation asked why. And he found some straightforward answers including, as he's written, that ``regulations are so much more onerous in Europe than in the United States, eliminating much of the flexibility that is bread and meat for entrepreneurs.'' And what regulations hurt entrepreneurs and their job-creating powers most? In his words, ``Europeans face a host of rules governing their right to close down facilities, fire workers, and relocate operations.'' So, this is how the supporters of the plant-closing restriction would help America's workers -- by copying Europe in ways that have led to Europe actually losing jobs between 1980 and today, the same period in which we have created over 15 million new jobs.

Washington lobbyist recently said of my veto threats: ``I think he's crying wolf.'' Try me! [Laughter] If this bill is unloaded on my desk, I'll stamp it reject and ship it back to where it was made. By the way, that same lobbyist added that he was sure that, in his words, ``the administration doesn't want to go into the next election without a trade bill.'' Well, if they want a trade bill, it's time they took out those provisions that have nothing to do with improving American trade.

I hope Congress will produce a good trade bill this year. Indeed, I want Congress to produce a good trade bill, and I'll work to secure it. But that depends on the leadership in both Houses. Are they willing to put national interest above special interest? If so, we can all join together to help keep America strong and growing.

Let me close by saying thank you for all you've done and all you will do, and with an appeal to each of you. This is my last meeting with you as President. You're not only today's leaders of our revolution in the States, you are the next generation on the Federal level. So, never forget how much we've done and how fast. Just a few years ago, most of us would have said that it would take decades to make as much progress as we've made in just 8 years.

The hopes of our young people are depending on you. And the cause of freedom is depending on you. In a way that few are ever privileged to know, the whole world is in your hands. So, again, I just want to say a heartfelt thank you to all of you, and God bless you.

Johnson. Mr. President, we're very honored that you've met with us again as you have in the past. We're grateful for your longstanding support which you've rendered to ALEC. We'd like to take this opportunity today to present you with a token of our appreciation, and at this time I'd like to ask Don Totten to step forward -- your old friend, and our first chairman. He was going to unveil that picture. He doesn't have to unveil it -- [laughter] -- but I'll go through the motions as we rehearsed it.

President, for 8 years we've joined with you in striving for limited government, lower taxes, and more effective judicial and educational institutions. We're deeply appreciative of your achievements and your longstanding relationship with ALEC from your days as Governor of California to the present time. It's with great admiration and appreciation that we present you with this portrait, which you will receive for the Ronald Reagan Presidential Library, along with a set of 50 of the State flags in honor of your service to the country and your service to federalism. Thank you, and God bless you.

On the one hand, I support the expressed goal of this legislation, which is to reduce potential public health risks that may result from the distribution of mislabeled, subpotent, counterfeit, or adulterated prescription drugs in the secondary source market, the so-called ``diversion market.'' The investigations and prosecutions involving counterfeit and diverted drugs that have been conducted by the Department of Justice during the past few years have demonstrated that the principal factor facilitating the illegal activity that this bill is designed to combat is the almost total lack of traceability of drug products in the diversion market. This bill, to some extent, provides a response to this problem.

On the other hand, I have grave reservations about the bill's provision that would require States to adhere to Federal standards when licensing wholesale drug distributors. This provision represents a substantial intrusion into traditional State responsibilities and prerogatives. The States have always had the primary role in the regulation of wholesale drug distributors, and this bill would substitute the Federal Government for the States in that role.

This provision of H.R. 1207 is contrary to fundamental principles of federalism upon which our Constitution is based. Accordingly, I have directed the Department of Justice to submit to the Congress legislation repealing this portion of the bill, and I urge the Congress to enact this legislation promptly.

I am also troubled about the bill's provision that would generally prohibit certain types of beneficial competition in the sale of pharmaceuticals by hospitals and other health care providers. Such competition from innovative health care providers can benefit consumers through increased choices and lower prices, and should be encouraged, rather than discouraged. To be specific, I am very concerned that this legislation could impose on the sick and the elderly increased prices for prescription drugs. Consequently, I have requested the Attorney General to monitor the implementation of this portion of the bill and to make recommendations for remedial actions if warranted.

Finally, although the lack of traceability of drug products in the diversion market is a valid concern that I share, the magnitude of the public health problem created by diverted drugs is still not clear. I am therefore also concerned by provisions of the bill requiring use of substantial amounts of scarce Federal public health resources to police these practices.

Despite these concerns, I am willing to accept the view of the Congress that H.R. 1207 can assist in preventing potential health and safety problems for the American public. For this reason, I am approving this bill.

Czech initials, VONS, will mark 10 years of monitoring human rights abuse in Czechoslovakia. VONS grew out of the Czechoslovak human rights initiatives, Charter 77, as an effort to document the plight of those individuals and their families who suffer from various forms of oppression within Czechoslovakia.

Despite persecution and past imprisonment of some of its members, VONS provides a vital source of information on the status of human rights in Czechoslovakia. We note the 10th anniversary of VONS with great admiration for the dedication and courage of its members, both inside and outside Czechoslovakia, and deep regret at the conditions which spawned the Committee and continue to compel its work. We encourage the Government of Czechoslovakia to respect its international commitments on human rights and to extend to its citizens basic freedoms, which all people have the right to enjoy.

We seem to hear every night on the evening news that the trade deficit is looming over our economy, threatening at any moment to plunge us back into a second Great Depression. Well, I'm sorry to disappoint these doomcriers, but the economy is strong and getting stronger.

What you don't hear so often on the news is that the trade deficit has turned around. Exports are at record levels, factories are expanding, and more Americans have jobs than ever before in our history. Whether it's cars, steel, or high technology, the label ``Made in the U.S.A.'' is seen more and more around the world. This good news doesn't get reported too much because the rising price of imports makes it seem like we're importing more. The truth is when you account for price changes the trade deficit has decreased and is now 20 percent smaller than it was during the third quarter of 1986.

The fearmongers had their heyday last October, when the stock market fell 508 points in 1 day of trading. Many blamed the merchandise trade deficit and predicted a dire future for the U.S. economy. Depression, recession, catastrophe, and calamity was all we heard.

Everyone talks about wanting a level playing field, but what Congress would be doing is putting American workers and industries on the field with one hand tied behind their backs. They call this a trade bill, but there's a lot in it that has nothing to do with trade.

I want a trade bill, and we've been working with Congress in good faith to produce a bill that would open markets and improve America's competitiveness, but we must guard against enacting legislation that would reverse the gains of the past 5 years. The draft legislation does contain a number of important measures: It enhances our negotiating authority in the ongoing international trade talks, repeals the windfall profits tax, and creates a retraining program for workers who've been laid off. We strongly support these measures. But it also contains provisions that are unacceptable. I've made it very clear to Congress: I will veto this bill, and I am confident that my veto will be sustained. Then I'll work vigorously to secure responsible trade legislation and urge the congressional leadership to schedule prompt action on the new bill. As long as I'm President, we're going to keep traveling the road we're on, one of free and fair trade, record sustained growth, job creation, rising incomes, and technological leadership into the 21st century.

I'd like to turn for a moment to events this past week in the Persian Gulf. The actions that our forces took in the Gulf were a measured response to Iran's resumption of minelaying and continued aggression against nonbelligerents. We have completed these self-defense actions and consider this incident closed.

Their performance under very difficult circumstances has been superb. We're also very pleased with the role that the European allies are playing in a cooperative effort to counter the Iranian mining threat and to help protect freedom of navigation. Such cooperative efforts, supported by our Gulf Arab friends, offer the best means of deterring Iran and enhancing Gulf security. Working together, we can also put new life into the U.N. Security Council's efforts to end the increasingly bloody, inhumane Iran-Iraq war and remove the root cause of tensions in the Gulf. Our role in this war is neutral, and we do not seek to confront Iran. However, its leaders must understand that continued military and terrorist attacks against nonbelligerents and refusal to negotiate an end to the war will be very costly to Iran and its people.

Because the actions and policies of the Government of Nicaragua continue to pose an unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States, the national emergency declared on May 1, 1985, and subsequently extended, must continue in effect beyond May 1, 1988.

President, as you'll recall, on March 26th of last year, at an education symposium in Columbia, Missouri, you gave me a homework assignment: the preparation of a report assessing America's educational progress since 1983, when the National Commission on Excellence in Education 5 years ago today declared us a ``nation at risk.'' You asked that this report tell the American people how far we've come and what still needs to be done, what reforms have worked and what principles should guide us as we move ahead. Well, here's the gist of my report, Mr. President.

American education has made some progress in the last few years. The precipitous downward slide of previous decades has been arrested, and we have begun the long climb back to reasonable standards. Our students have made modest gains in achievement. They are taking more classes in basic subjects. And the performance of our schools has slightly improved. All this is encouraging. We are doing better than we were in 1983. But we are not doing well enough, and we are not doing well enough, fast enough. We are still at risk. The absolute level at which our improvements are taking place is unacceptably low.

Widespread and fundamental reforms remain necessary. What these reforms are is not mysterious. Indeed, identifying what works, establishing the ideas and practices that make for effective schools, has been a signal accomplishment of the reform movement to date. Extending and applying the lessons of what works to every school in every community and State in the Nation is the task that lies ahead of us.

To do this, we need, we believe, to pursue five basic avenues of reform. First, we need to strengthen the content of our elementary and high school classes and provide our students with a solid core curriculum of basic studies. Second, we need to do a better job of extending equal intellectual opportunity to all our students by dramatically improving the education that is provided to minority and disadvantaged children. Third, we need to revive and restore a healthy ethos of achievement, discipline, and hard work in all our schools. Fourth, we need more effective and sensible methods of recruiting and rewarding good teachers and principals for our schools. And finally, we need to make American education accountable for results. We need to hold our school system responsible for doing its job, and we need to hold our schools responsible for ensuring that our students are learning.

We know how to achieve these goals. Necessary reforms are described and explained in this report. We know there is wide public support for these goals and reforms. The American people endorse by overwhelming margins almost every significant proposal made in this report. And we know that if we fail to act on such proposals, our schools cannot meaningfully improve.

It can be. The Nation's modest success over the past 5 years is both proof of reform's possibilities and a summons to all of us for renewed effort. All Americans concerned for the quality of our children's education -- Governors, legislators, educators, and parents -- must become knowledgeable, aggressive, and courageous proponents of education reform.

I offer this report to you, Mr. President, as a guide to our future work together. It is work for our children and our country. I know you agree with me that there are few things more important than this work. So, here it is, Mr.

Brenda Lee is with us today. She has my admiration and the Nation's. And another star who is with us today is Jaime Escalante. Jaime Escalante has taught calculus at Garfield High School, a predominantly Hispanic inner-city school in Los Angeles, since 1974. And when he arrived there, Garfield was terrorized by gangs and close to losing its accreditation. And Jaime set out to prove that their kids could learn math as well as any -- with incredible success. In 1982 his students did so well on the advanced placement calculus exam that the Educational Testing Service in Princeton couldn't believe their eyes. They thought the Garfield students must have cheated. Escalante advised his students to take the test again, and they served [scored] as well or better. Today, thanks to Mr. Escalante, Garfield has one of the best calculus programs in America. A movie about Mr.

I'm going to back a ways here and pick up some other things before I get too far along that line. You know, that report that I mentioned first, it concluded that, in its words: ``If an unfriendly foreign power had attempted to impose on America the mediocre educational performance that exists today, we might well have viewed it as an act of war.'' It helped heighten and accelerate a wave of education reform in States and communities all around the country. Last year Secretary Bennett and I had a chance to hear about some of those reforms when we flew out to Columbia, Missouri, and attended a conference there that was sponsored by the Secretary's department and the National Governors' Association. At that conference I gave Bill a little homework assignment -- well, maybe not that little, since I knew he'd need a whole year to complete it. [Laughter] I wanted a full progress report.

Yes, some States had installed career ladders, merit pay, and other means of rewarding good teachers. Many schools were placing a new emphasis on quality and discipline, more homework, more attention to basic skills, more attention to what works, that is, to results. This was truly revolutionary after two decades in which money had been the only measure of progress in education, and in which, while Federal spending on education went steadily up, test scores fell steadily down and too many schools accepted the fashions of the day -- the fashions of liberal culture -- that held traditional standards in scorn.

It appeared in the newspapers and is about a guidance counselor who asked a class what they should do if they found a purse with $1,000 in it. The class decided that returning it would be neither right nor wrong, just dumb.

When we've looked at schools that work across the country, we've found that the key to what works is not money or being in a prosperous neighborhood but establishing a direction, that is, setting standards. And that's what Edison Primary School in the inner-city area of Dayton, Ohio, does. Almost all of the students at Edison come from low-income families. When they first enter the school, many suffer from intellectual understimulation and other problems associated with poverty.

Principal Brenda Lee, that I mentioned before, combats that with love and caring and by teaching each child to do his or her best. In her more than 5 years at the school, she has strengthened the academic program.

She established a schoolwide homework policy and required that students demonstrate that they are ready to be promoted before they're promoted. With the help of outside volunteers, she set up a tutoring program. She also got to know parents, meeting them first at bus stops or on the playground. Now more than 50 volunteer to help at the school each day, and having their parents care like that is an incentive for the children to do well. Another incentive is the Student of the Month Award that Principal Lee established to recognize and encourage excellence. The result of all of this is that in just 3 years students doing math at or above grade level went from 40 percent to 64 percent, while those reading at or above grade level rose from 65 to almost 80 percent.

I'm confident that this report will help us find the way. As I'm told the report notes, we've all heard the arguments of those who believe education reform will fail: that it will take much more steadfastness than the American people possess, much more money than we are willing to pay, or a more fundamental transformation of society than we're willing to bring about.

I reject these arguments. American education can be made to work better, and it can be made to work better now. The first step is to identify where we stand and what needs to be done, and that has largely been done. Now, there is a second step: We must overcome the obstacles that block reform. Successful reform won't come about from the top down. Central planning doesn't make economies healthy, and it won't make schools work, either. How can we release the creative energies of our people? By giving parents choice, by allowing them to select the schools that best meet the unique needs of their children, by fostering a healthy rivalry among schools to serve our young people. Already, the power of choice is revitalizing schools that use it across the Nation. We must make education reform a reality. And if we act decisively, American education will soon work much better than it does today, and we'll provide our children with the schools they deserve.

Every school in America needs to have a solid curriculum of basic studies. Every school in America needs to offer its students equal intellectual opportunity that knows no distinction of race, class, or family background. Every school in America needs to have an ethos of achievement, moral quality, discipline, and hard work. Every school in America needs to be able to recruit and reward good teachers and principals. And all of American education needs to be accountable for the only result that matters: student learning.

I believe we can do it. We know what works. It's already working at schools around the country. It just needs to be done everywhere. Every American child deserves the kind of school that Brenda Lee runs. Every American child deserves the kind of teaching that Jaime Escalante provides. So, let's dedicate ourselves to giving it to them.

President today announced his intention to appoint George F. Moody to serve as a Governor on the Board of Governors of the American National Red Cross for a term of 3 years. This is a reappointment. He will also be redesignated to act as the principal officer of the corporation.

President today announced his intention to appoint Al Cardenas to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Federal National Mortgage Association for a term ending on the date of the annual meeting of the stockholders in 1989. This is a reappointment.

Maternal love is the first tangible bond any human being knows. It is a tie at once physical, emotional, psychological, and mystical. With all of the words that have been written about motherhood, all of the poems of tribute and gratitude that have been penned through the ages, all of the portraits of a mother and child that have been painted down the centuries, none has come close to expressing in full the thankfulness and joy owing to mothers.

The mark of motherhood, as the story of Solomon and the disputed infant in the first Book of Kings shows, is a devotion to the well-being of the child so total that it overlooks itself and its own preferences and needs. It is a love that risks all, bears all, braves all. As it heals and strengthens and inspires in its objects an understanding of self-sacrifice and devotion, it is the parent of many another love as well.

The arms of a mother are the newborn's first cradle and the injured child's first refuge. The hands of a mother are the hands of care for the child who is near and of prayer for the one who is far away. The eyes of a mother are the eyes of fond surprise at baby's first step, the eyes of unspoken worry at the young adult's first voyage from home, the eyes of gladness at every call or visit that says she is honored and remembered. The heart of a mother is a heart that is always full.

May 8, 1988, be observed as Mother's Day. I urge all Americans to express their love and respect for their mothers and to reflect on the importance of motherhood to the well-being of our country. I direct government officials to display the flag of the United States on all Federal government buildings, and I urge all citizens to display the flag at their homes and other suitable places on that day.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Brian et Mila. [Welcome, Brian and Mila.] Nancy and I welcome you in the name of all Americans. Your visit is more than the last Washington meeting of two fortunate Irishmen who became leaders of their two countries. Together, we're looking ahead to a new era of growth and well-being for our two countries. In 1988 we're witnessing a dream come into being that many on both sides of the border have worked for: an agreement created to drastically reduce trade and tariff barriers between our two great nations. We shall show by deed and dedication, after the legislative process has been completed, that the lowering of tariffs and trade barriers is the way to a more prosperous world.

We're embarking on an exciting new beginning. Our free trade agreement is recognized beyond North America as a venture never before attempted on such a scale by two sovereign and independent nations. When accepted by Parliament and Congress, the agreement will become one of the most important achievements of my tenure in Washington. President Eisenhower asked ``the free world to recognize that trade barriers, although intended to protect a country's economy, often in fact shackle its prosperity.'' Ike would be satisfied, I'm certain, with our efforts this past year. We are unshackling our trading relationship in a broad-based effort to make our two countries more prosperous at home while making ourselves more competitive abroad. We're players in a world economy, and our free trade agreement will help make us the world-class competitors we must be.

Our agreement is remarkable in many ways. It has balance and offers mutual gains for two huge trading partners. Permit me, Brian, to salute the very special and dedicated Canadians and Americans who worked to put this agreement together and who made it happen. We both fielded teams of big league negotiators, and the agreement is indeed a product of their combined abilities. Our countries and peoples have been well served.

I am confident that the legislatures in both of our countries will vote favorably on this historic free trade agreement. Important as that step is, there are still other steps to be taken on the global economic stage. You and I will be meeting again, in Toronto this June, at the economic summit, where we will have discussions with our colleagues from Europe and Japan. We hope to move the process of international economic coordination forward. These discussions will also speed the way to what we trust will be a successful GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] round of negotiations. We know that Canada shares with us our concerns about those many barriers to agricultural and services trade that are damaging to world trade.

We both attach great importance to GATT. While the tasks of the present round are formidable, it is essential that we give substance to a comprehensive multilateral reform of the international trading system. This will not be easy to accomplish, but it must be undertaken. And our objectives must include meaningful progress on agriculture. Agriculture is fundamental to both our economies, and it is an export area in which we're highly competitive in a free and open world market. The United States actively seeks the elimination of all subsidies in agriculture as a top priority. Together we must be successful in order to restore market forces in world agriculture.

Cooperation is the hallmark of our relationship in other areas. We will be working with Canada on the largest cooperative high-technology project we have ever undertaken: the permanently manned civil space station. Cooperation has also been the basis of our nearly 80-year tradition of shared concern for our environment. Much has already been done, and experts on both sides of the border recognize the results that have been achieved. Both our countries have made substantial progress in improving air quality. We have advanced our efforts to improve the water quality of the Great Lakes. More can be done to protect our environment as science clearly points the way, but make no mistake, we are moving.

Ours is a relationship of people and their ability to hold personal relationships across a national border. They form them easily and quickly, in good times and during times of stress. Today warm and close professional working ties are enjoyed and valued by service men and women of both our armed forces. It has made for an everyday camaraderie that has become both unique among Armed Forces and commonplace in our bilateral security relations. It is of great benefit to the smooth operation of NORAD and NATO and our shared responsibilities for the defense of North America.

In recent years we've been heartened by Canada's renewed efforts to strengthen its military forces -- efforts forcefully spelled out in last year's defense white paper. With this strengthening has gone the Canadian Government's commitment to enlarge its contribution to the defense effort of the West and to support this commitment with the necessary budgets. This is but another illustration of a shared sense of purpose that Canada and the United States nurture to make the alliance stronger.

Last year, Americans made almost 37 million visits to Canada, the world's largest tourist invasion, save one, which would be the nearly 45 million visits made last year by Canadians to the U.S. And I think that gives you an indication, Mr. President, of what really goes on in February in Canada. [Laughter] Don't try and call a meeting. [Laughter] You would be quick to note an imbalance in those figures, and I point this out to Secretary Baker -- there's an imbalance in those figures, an imbalance in your favor. But I assure you, we have no plans to legislate against it.

President, I was determined when I took office to approach relations between our countries in a spirit of openness and perseverance in dealing with the problems that faced us. I found in you a leader of warmth and directness. We have met regularly. In fact, our series of annual meetings is unprecedented in the history of Canada-U.S. relations, and I would hope that it is now a permanent feature of our relationship. In the President's second term of office and in what I hope will be known afterwards as my first -- [laughter] -- we have done much to repair and refurbish the relationship between Canada and the United States. I haven't the slightest doubt that the President could go on and on -- to quote Mrs.

Thatcher's noted turn of phrase -- but I gather you have something in this country called the 22d amendment. But the principles we set out for ourselves at Quebec in 1985, by this President and myself, I believe have served us well.

We have reinforced our links in the largest trading partnership in the history of the world. In January the President and I signed the free trade agreement, under which both countries stand to gain. As Secretary Baker said in Ottawa last week, this achievement will grow in stature and importance over time. Its geopolitical potential is most significant. And I, too, want to pay tribute to Jim Baker and Clayton Yeutter for the very constructive role they played with our top people at a most critical juncture of the negotiations. The implications of the free trade agreement go far beyond our border and far beyond the shores of this continent, for what transpires between the world's largest trading partners holds a certain significance in the multilateral context.

We have renewed our defense relationship with the modernization of air defense arrangements and enhanced contributions to NATO. We have reached a pragmatic solution on the issue of transit through the Northwest passage. The issue of acid rain remains a challenge for us. This, as you said in Quebec City, Mr. President, is a problem that belongs to both of us. We must continue, and we shall, to work together for an equitable solution to this important challenge.

And so, we have a good deal to discuss together and with our officials. I look forward to my lunch today with Secretary Shultz, as well as my meetings with the congressional leadership and, in a special way, my meetings with the Vice President.

The Prime Minister. Oh, maybe I'll be saying a few things later on today. This was a welcoming ceremony. It wasn't the United Nations. I'm going to be making three or four other speeches today, and I think that if you're interested in acid rain you won't be disappointed.

Develop a complete inventory of all appropriate functions to be included in the productivity program, use the agency's planning process to review current functions, and develop agency goals and objectives for improvement in services to the public.

Assess annually the agency's progress toward achieving objectives and priorities, including documented gains and cost savings. This assessment will form the basis of the agency's report to the President as required by Section 4.

Encourage employee participation in the productivity program through employee training, employee involvement in work-related decisions, incentives, recognition, and rewards and by taking actions to minimize negative impacts on employees that may occur as a result of the productivity program.

Sec. 4. The head of each Executive department and agency shall report annually to the President through the Domestic Policy Council on accomplishments achieved under the plan. The annual report will form the basis of the Management Report to the Congress.

Sec. 7. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall submit to the Congress, in conjunction with the President's budget, a report on productivity plans and accomplishments of the agencies and the government as a whole.

Review policies and programs for Federal employees who may be displaced by productivity improvements and make or recommend such changes as are appropriate to ensure that such policies and programs will minimize any adverse impact on Federal employees.

Well, your visit comes as we're on the threshold of a major event, important and historic to you and me and the nations we lead. I speak of our recently signed free trade agreement. Years ago British Admiral Beatty voiced the sense of our trade agreement when he explained what defends our common border: ``nothing but the sound common sense and sound good will of two practical nations.'' Well, our new agreement makes much common sense and sets the stage for much good will. We shall avoid the perils of protectionism and gain the advantages of each country producing what each is best able to bring to market. Generations of Canadians and Americans will know you as the farsighted leader who proposed the free trade agreement. It will prove to be as big and as important as the magnitude of our bilateral trade. It signals to our trading partners that we are sincere in our belief that lowering tariffs and trade barriers is clearly the only answer to the distortions growing in world trade.

We've had important discussions of questions of peace and security. Canada's role is critical for the security of the Atlantic community. Canada's contribution to NATO is to be increased, which all your allies welcome. And I have seen at firsthand, Brian, the constructive contribution you've made personally in alliance deliberations like the NATO summit in March.

This is our fourth and my final summit. They started high on the ramparts of Quebec, and we've never lowered our lofty goals and objectives. I regret, however, that I could never reach those same high notes that the Prime Minister's voice so easily reached in song. [Laughter] These have been enjoyable meetings, useful meetings, and they've created bonds between us that have been seen as refreshing -- as they have been hopeful to the execution of my office. In the process you've won my respect for your wise counsel and admiration for your leadership.

Canadian economy grow and unemployment fall during your tenure in office. You have achieved a special place in history with our free trade agreement. Above all, you've been a strong and persistent advocate for Canada, liberally applying your adage that ``we can disagree without being disagreeable.'' You have taught all of us about Canada's point of view on issues important to Canada while at the same time being a good neighbor and a firm friend. There can be little doubt that relations between the United States and Canada have prospered these last 4 years, and I thank you for both the effort and the success.

President of the United States and the First Lady. I rise also in a personal sense on behalf of Mila and myself to toast our friendship with Ronald and Nancy Reagan. For just as this is a glittering occasion of state, it is also a special one for us. This visit marks the last time we will be under this roof at a state dinner as guests of the Reagans. This is not to say, Ron, that I have no expectation of being here again -- [laughter] -- subject to the approval of the voters in Canada this year or next. And we'll be seeing the Reagans again at the economic summit in Toronto in June. But this is the last of our home-and-home visits, which began in Quebec City in 1985. I believe these annual meetings begun by our two administrations have now become part of the institutional framework of Canada-U.S. relations.

I suppose that too much can be made of special relationships between countries, and too much can probably be made of personal relationships between leaders. I don't think that's the case between these two countries or these two leaders.

But the fact is that Canada and the United States are one another's best friends and largest trading partners. It's also a fact that Ronald Reagan and I happened to hit it off at the beginning and have got along ever since. This is not to say that either one of us has ever lost sight of the national interest of his own country, but it has helped us define the mutual interest of both our countries. And often, as we did on one or two issues today, we will disagree while continuing to search for common ground.

Those of us who hold elective office are called politicians. There's no dishonor in that. But I have seen Ronald Reagan, the statesman. I want briefly to speak to that tonight from the perspective of a friend in the eighth year of his Presidency. We're looking tonight at a period in American and world history that will in large measure, when the day is done, be known as the Reagan era.

Reagan years have been a time of peace and prosperity. There have been moments of great difficulty and regional crisis, but the peace has been preserved. When Ronald Reagan came to this house as President, he was accused of saber rattling. In the event while strengthening Western security, he paved the way for historic arms reductions in the INF agreement and opened the door to strategic arms reductions. This is the legacy of a man of peace.

The forthcoming Moscow summit is a significant opportunity for the further reduction of East-West tensions. And the President goes with the hopes and prayers of all his allies for another successful meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev; for, as the President himself has said, a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought.

Ronald Reagan came to this house, the world was on the brink of the deepest recession in half a century. As he prepares to leave it next January, the United States and Western economies are in their 6th consecutive year of unprecedented recovery and expansion. When he leaves office, his popularity will be undiminished and his place in history secure.

Every leader of a democracy knows the turbulence and the challenges that free societies exemplify. Every leader worth his salt knows the joys of high accomplishment and the sadness of hopes unfulfilled. But history is usually generous to those who show leadership, who brought prosperity, who strengthened freedom, and who kept the global peace. Ronald Reagan has done these things, while never losing his engaging manner and his warm, good humor.

When you look around this house, you get a sense not only of history but of serenity and continuity and of how much Nancy Reagan has contributed to that. She has brought her own brand of commitment and elegance to the White House. She has brought as well her own sense of public purpose to addressing the tragedy of drug abuse not only in your country but throughout the Western Hemisphere. As a Prime Minister and a head of government, I know something of the pressures and tensions on relationships and families that come with these jobs. And of all the world capitals, nowhere is the curiosity greater and the pressure higher than here in Washington. In this unique and demanding climate, Nancy Reagan has been more than a model of grace; she has demonstrated exemplary qualities of loyalty and resolve, which I believe are to her great credit.

On an occasion such as this, one speaks briefly of the achievements, the agenda between our countries, and I'll be very brief. The agenda is comprehensive, the issues are complex, and the solutions are, as President Kennedy once said in regard to Canada-U.S. relations, ``neither easy nor automatic.'' As for the achievements, there is still work for you, Mr. President, to get the free trade agreement ratified by Congress. This is a tremendous accomplishment -- the largest trade agreement ever negotiated between two sovereign countries -- and it opens up a world of new possibilities and prosperity for both our peoples on both sides of the border. And one of the reasons we made that agreement is that President Reagan believed in the initiative from the beginning and stayed with it to the end.

Engraved on the mantlepiece of this room, there is a quotation, I believe, from the first occupant of this house. I quote it because it applies to the present occupant of this house: ``May none but honest and wise men,'' President John Adams wrote, ``ever rule under this roof.'' Ronald Reagan has been both honest and wise, and for us and for Canada he has been a good and a valued friend.

Well, we've taken a firm and uncompromising stand against drugs in our nation's schools. We've encouraged a return to basics and common sense in primary and secondary education. And we have shifted authority away from distant Federal bureaucracies and returned it to parents, principals, and school boards.

Secretary Bennett's report this week makes clear, much remains to be done. We remain, as that earlier commission said, ``a nation at risk.'' But today, more than ever before, the American people, the Federal Government, and the States are working together, and not at cross-purposes. We all have come to realize what is at stake: our standard of living, the cohesiveness and unity of our society, our moral standards, and in short, our future.

The legislation that I'll sign today is a product of that common purpose. H.R. 5, the Augustus F. Hawkins-Robert T. Stafford Elementary and Secondary School Amendments of 1988, reauthorizes and improves a wide variety of Federal programs at the elementary and secondary school level. At the same time, it recognizes a fundamental truth: that the primary responsibility for educating these children lies with the local communities and the States, and not with the Federal Government.

The school improvement act will further this important but supplementary role of the Federal Government in elementary and secondary education. It will extend programs for the disadvantaged and other students with special needs, stimulate education innovation and reform, enhance local control and flexibility, improve program accountability, and focus program benefits on those with the greatest need. I'm pleased to note that the bill reauthorizes the magnet school program and expands parental choice. I'm also pleased to see that the bill amends the Bilingual Education Act in ways that provide greater flexibility to local school districts in the selection of instructional approaches. This administration has struggled for several years to amend Federal bilingual requirements so that we may more effectively teach students English. I'm also pleased that the bill enhances parental involvement in programs for disadvantaged children. Parents are, after all, our first and most important teachers.

These central features of the bill echo the themes that the Vice President, Secretary Bennett, and I have been sounding, and I'm pleased that they received overwhelming bipartisan support in both the House and the Senate. From the beginning, we worked with the Congress, educators, and interested members of the public to ensure legislation that would improve basic education for America's youth. I want to commend the Members of Congress who are here today for their leadership in guiding this bill through the Congress.

I want to note that this bill renames the Guaranteed Student Loan Program after Bob Stafford. Bob has had a major influence on Federal education policy for many years, and I commend him on his distinguished career.

I urge the Congress to focus in the appropriations process on the existing, successful programs that this bill reauthorizes. It is these current programs that offer the greatest promise of educational opportunity and educational excellence to our nation's children.

In order that the Government of the United States of America may give full and complete effect to the Convention and Additional Protocol, it is expedient and necessary that the Department of Justice perform certain functions.

Americans have great reason to regret and to seek to repair the alarming incidence and prevalence of child abuse and neglect that continue throughout our country. Each year many American children suffer child abuse, and every year many perish in these attacks. The incidence of child abuse and neglect cuts across every income level and geographic area in our land.

This tragic situation is unacceptable -- and preventable. Dedicated individuals, private and civic groups, and government bodies are doing much to protect children, but, unfortunately, much remains to be achieved. Caring for children is, of course, the responsibility of parents; but neighbors, relatives, and friends must help protect children when parents or others attack or neglect them. We will truly prevent child abuse and protect our youngsters only to the extent that we cherish children as gifts from our Creator; foster deep and abiding reverence for the innocence and the God-given individual dignity and worth of every child; and treasure the sanctity of every human life.

It is in this spirit that we must assure America's children a loving, safe, and healthful environment. The members of professions, such as law enforcement, social work, church, medicine, mental health, and education, must continue to do their part, as must concerned individuals. Let all Americans reflect on our obligation to children and to families, and then let us put our compassion into action.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Day, May 1, is a day we set aside to promise allegiance to our country; to revere our heritage of individual freedom, limited government, and respect for every man's divinely bestowed dignity; and to reaffirm our sacred trust to preserve, for our children and for all generations to come, this blessed land of liberty we call America.

Americans have both pledged and practiced loyalty from the moment the first patriots conceived the idea of a new and independent Nation where only freedom would reign -- where people would live as free as God made them and where tyranny alone would never find welcome. We have given our loyalty generously, in times of peace and times of peril. That we will always do, God willing.

Day says much about the meaning of our country. In other parts of the world, as we know, totalitarian states proclaim May 1 a day of fealty and require a show of loyalty from the people. No such demand is needed here, of course, because in America we are blessed to be able to govern ourselves; ``We the People'' are in charge, and we need give our loyalty not to self-appointed rulers but to liberty.

The self-government that protects our rights and liberties has been won and defended in each generation by loyal Americans. That remains true, of course, of our gallant service men and women at home and in a hundred foreign climes.

It is true as well of every American in home or office, in factory or farm, in hall of government or place of worship, who calls upon the Author of Liberty to guide and bless our land; of every citizen who cherishes brotherhood and patriotism; of every boy and girl who begins the day with the Pledge of Allegiance to the Flag.

The allegiance we Americans owe, and give gladly, on Loyalty Day and throughout our lives, is to a land and an ideal that beckon human hearts today just as always, here and around the globe -- the land of the free, where the only command and the only loyalty are freedom's way and freedom's sway.

The President. Some of the duties that come with this job of being President are more enjoyable than others, but nothing could give me more pleasure than honoring one of our finest First Ladies with the Congressional Gold Medal.

Rayburn, L.B.J.'s political mentor, said that marrying Lady Bird was the best thing Lyndon had ever done, and though his career and his Presidency were filled with many momentous achievements, I think we'd all have to agree. As skilled businesswoman, unofficial diplomat and spokesman for America, regent for the University of Texas -- Lady Bird has had an impressive career in her own right. Her concern for the poor and underprivileged helped inspire a nation. Her efforts to beautify America, continuing up to today, still blossom in our Nation's Capital and beside our nation's highways.

Johnson. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, I know very well how gracious and generous this is of you in your busy, demanding lives to give this time to make this such a great day for me and my family and many of my friends. And I also think what it really means is a salute to all those people all over this great land who are working to preserve and to enhance the natural beauty of America. I thank you.

The President. Now, we're going to slip out the way we came in, all of us, and then when they release you we will have a chance to see and greet each one of you individually right down here in the hall. So, we shall be saying hello in just a few minutes.

I have today approved S. 90, the ``Big Cypress National Preserve Addition Act,'' with the understanding that additional legislation will be forthcoming this year to provide for Federal acquisition of the private land to be added to the Preserve through a land exchange, which would eliminate any direct cost to the Federal government of expanding the Preserve.

The cost of the Department of the Interior for purchasing the surface rights to these lands under the provisions of S. 90 would require $40 to $65 million in new appropriations. The Administration has consistently advised the Congress that this cost is excessive and will oppose any appropriations for this purpose. To avoid this cost, and in recognition of the important role of the Big Cypress National Preserve in conserving nationally significant fish, wildlife, and other natural resources in southern Florida, the Department of the Interior has entered negotiations to acquire the private land to be added to the Preserve through an exchange with the private landowners.

Such an exchange would require additional legislation, since the lands involved are in different States. I have been assured by the congressional delegation from Florida that legislation approving the Administration's exchange proposal will soon be considered by the Congress. I urge prompt passage of such legislation, which will not only provide the same protection that S. 90 provides, but also will generate Federal receipts of nearly $35 million resulting from the exchange.

In the last century, Americans began to realize the wisdom and the necessity of replenishing our supply of trees for their many natural benefits and so that our use of wood for fuel, lumber, and other products would not impoverish future generations. The idea of Arbor Day caught the imagination of many people; for example, on the first Arbor Day, in Nebraska in 1872, citizens of that State planted a million trees, and they added about 350 million more in the next 16 years.

This tradition continues, on Arbor Day and every day; we Americans have planted more trees each year for the last 6 years, and last year's total acreage of trees planted was a record. Arbor Day remains a time for planting and caring for trees in our cities, towns, and countryside, and it should also remind us to learn more about trees and forests and how to protect them at home and guard against desertification and destruction abroad.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of April, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Since my report of October 30, 1987, fewer than 70 applications for licenses have been received with respect to Nicaragua, and the majority of these applications have been granted. Of the licenses issued in this period, most either authorized exports for humanitarian purposes, covering medical supplies and animal vaccines, or extended authorizations previously given to acquire intellectual property protection under Nicaraguan law. Certain licenses authorized the exportation of equipment to La Prensa, an opposition publication that had been shut down by the Sandinista regime for a period of time. The FAC's director testified at a congressional hearing concerning FAC's licensing policy with respect to humanitarian donations to Nicaragua. Food, medicine, and clothing donated to relieve human suffering are exempt from the embargo, and Treasury and State have established guidelines for the licensing of donations of other goods.

The trade sanctions complement the diplomatic and other aspects of our policy toward Nicaragua. The deteriorating economic situation in Nicaragua was one of the principal reasons for the Sandinistas' pledge to meet the democratization and national reconciliation provisions of the Guatemala Accord (also known as the Arias Peace Plan) and to sign a preliminary cease-fire agreement with the Nicaraguan Resistance on March 23. It is essential that pressure be maintained to induce the Sandinistas to undertake serious and productive dialogue concerning a permanent cease-fire with the Nicaraguan Resistance and with all democratic opposition groups concerning democratization in Nicaragua. The trade sanctions are part of a larger policy seeking a democratic outcome in Nicaragua by peaceful means.

The policies and actions of the Government of Nicaragua continue to pose an unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States. I shall continue to exercise the powers at my disposal to apply economic sanctions against Nicaragua as long as these measures are appropriate and will continue to report periodically to the Congress on expenses and significant developments pursuant to 50 U.S.C. 1641(c) and 1703(c).

Subsections 501(1) and (4) of the Trade Act provide that, in affording duty-free treatment under the GSP, the President shall have due regard for the effect such action will have on furthering the economic development of developing countries and the extent of the beneficiary developing country's competitiveness with respect to eligible articles. Subsection 502(c)(2) provides that, in determining whether to designate any country a beneficiary developing country under this section, the President shall take into account the level of economic development of such country. Section 504 authorizes the President to withdraw, suspend, or limit the application of duty-free treatment under the GSP with respect to any article or to any country upon consideration of the factors set forth in sections 501 and 502(c) of the Trade Act.

Subsection 504(f) provides that if the President determines that the per capita gross national product (calculated on the basis of the best available information, including that of the World Bank) for any beneficiary country for a calendar year subsequent to 1984 exceeds the applicable limit for the determination year in question, such country shall not be treated as a beneficiary developing country under this Act after the close of a 2-year period.

Section 604 of the Trade Act authorizes the President to embody in the TSUS the substance of the relevant provisions of that Act, of other acts affecting import treatment, and of actions taken thereunder.

There are two issues that affect both the Fiscal Year 1989 Budget submitted to the Congress on February 18, 1988, and the Fiscal Year 1989 Budget of the District of Columbia Government. First, I want to reaffirm my concern that none of the funds appropriated for the District of Columbia, including locally generated funds, should be used for abortion unless the life of the mother would be physically endangered if the fetus were carried to term. Accordingly, the District of Columbia Budget that I am hereby submitting goes beyond the current Section 117 of the District of Columbia Budget in that it restricts the use of both the District's Federal and locally generated funds for abortion.

I request your support for the initiative in the Fiscal Year 1989 Budget that requires the District Government to bill Federal establishments directly for the water and sewer services provided. The District has had the technical capacity to bill individual Federal establishments since Fiscal Year 1985. The Fiscal Year 1989 Budget proposal to have Federal establishments make their water and sewer payments directly to the District Government will only treat the District like other State and local governments, which bill Federal agencies directly for these services. This direct billing will achieve better efficiency and accountability for services rendered. Thus, it is unnecessary for the Fiscal Year 1989 Budget to include a separate lump-sum amount in the Federal payment to the District of Columbia for water and sewer services provided. I urge the Congress to enact this needed reform in order to avoid the experience of the 1988 Continuing Resolution where the Congress increased the deficit unnecessarily by adding $32.6 million to the requested Federal payment when many Federal agencies already had sufficient funds to pay the District directly. To address previous congressional concerns about the District's ability to bill Federal establishments directly, I am submitting legislation that specifically authorizes the District to bill Federal agencies directly.

We can do a great deal of good for ourselves and our fellow Americans the more we realize the toll traumatic injury takes each year in our country -- and the more we understand that the extent of this toll is unnecessary, unacceptable, and preventable. National Trauma Awareness Month is an excellent chance for all of us to learn and to do more about the prevention and treatment of traumatic injury.

Traumatic injury is a major public health problem that mainly affects young people; it kills more Americans before age 34 than do all diseases combined. Each year, some 140,000 citizens lose their lives to traumatic injury, and 400,000 suffer severe and often permanently disabling brain or spinal cord injury. Some of the many causes include motor vehicle-related injuries, murder, suicide, and falls.

It is up to all of us to learn how to reduce the risk of traumatic injury to ourselves and our children. Citizens can initiate behavior changes and sustain them, and volunteer groups, civic organizations, private businesses, health care providers, researchers, academia, and government can all help discover and implement new and more effective ways of preventing and treating traumatic injury and of assisting victims and their families. Let us always remember that our efforts in this regard will be a blessing to ourselves, our families, and our neighbors.

One has only to imagine for a moment a world without nurses to realize how vital their services are. In hospitals and ambulatory settings, in the inner city, in rural and metropolitan communities, in homes and on military posts -- wherever a need exists -- nurses are there working diligently to serve and to protect the health of our people. It's not an easy task. Nurses work all hours and long hours, respond to shortages of nursing personnel, and face many other adverse conditions.

In addition to their technical skills, they must bring to their duty stations a generous dose of compassion in dealing with patients who are severely ill and in need not only of constant care but also of emotional support and encouragement. To perform their tasks in a rapidly changing scientific environment, nurses must continually study to keep abreast of developments in the health care field.

Nurses have responded to these challenges with the highest commitment to excellence, helping make all of us the beneficiaries of the finest health care in the world. For this they deserve our profound gratitude and respect.

This week in Washington, trade was the talk of the town, and important talk it was. I've often mentioned trade issues in these broadcasts. And with your help during these last few years, we've been able to resist attempts to block free and fair trade. It hasn't been easy, because not a few politicians still think the way to reelection is to portray themselves as the great friend of the American worker by pushing protectionism. It's been up to us to point out that over the long run this approach halts growth and costs jobs, but as I say, with your help this message has gotten through.

Believe me, this ability to resist protectionism -- along with our commitment to lower taxes, less spending, and fewer regulations -- has made a huge difference in all of our lives. I don't think any of us can easily forget that sense of desperation Americans felt a few years ago as they saw inflation driving the weekly grocery bill up and up, the value of their savings shrinking, jobs growing increasingly scarce, and economic growth going down to virtually nothing. Well, all that's been changed around.

Just this week, Beryl Sprinkel, the head of my Council of Economic Advisers, went down to the White House briefing room to deliver this quarterly report on the state of the economy. Some experts, who had noted we're in the 65th month of our economic expansion, were saying a slowdown was inevitable, and others, noting last October's stock market plunge, made dire predictions about what the economy was going to do in the first quarter of this year. But the results were exactly what we had hoped for and, in fact, what we had predicted: The economy is moving along at a moderate rate of growth, and inflation is well under control.

My fellow Americans, I remember only too well working in 1981 on my first televised speech describing ``the worst economic mess since the Great Depression'' and wondering even then how long it would take us to repair the damage. Well, thanks to the dynamics of less government and more free markets, the damage has been repaired -- and repaired much faster than anyone could have originally hoped. And that's why I'm certain you don't want me or Congress taking any risks with this progress. And that's also why I've made it clear that I'm going to be very severe with any trade legislation coming out of Congress that threatens America's prosperity.

For the last year, we've all been working on a trade bill here, one that initially contained many objectionable provisions. Working with Members of Congress, we managed to remove almost all of these bad provisions. Unfortunately, however, when it comes to safeguarding prosperity, almost can never be good enough. The current legislation, despite all the hard work, still has provisions that threaten economic growth. These provisions are comprised mainly of demands for unnecessary, burdensome, and costly regulation of private industry. Provisions range from rules on plant closing notifications to restrictions on exports. Unfortunately, these provisions serve the special interests and not the Nation's interests. They would reduce the flexibility of our economy and render us less able to respond to the realities of the international marketplace. In short, they would make us less competitive, not more.

This bill did pass the Congress this week, but the good news is the vote showed we have the strength to sustain a Presidential veto. And you can be sure that this bill is going to get a veto, but fast. And then all Congress has to do is drop the ruffles, frills, and flourishes put there for the special interests, and we can have a trade bill, and have it soon. As I have stated repeatedly, I want a trade bill and will work vigorously to secure one. I urge the congressional leadership to schedule prompt action on a bill immediately after my veto is sustained. It is time to set aside the special interests and advance America's interests by passing trade legislation that will assist, not impede, our dynamic economy.

In the meantime, I'm delighted to tell you that there was some good news on trade this week. Prime Minister Mulroney of Canada was in town, and we discussed our two nations' pending agreement on an historic free trade zone between the United States and Canada. This is the kind of trade legislation we need -- legislation that promotes growth and prosperity and keeps America away from the protectionism that once cost the world and our country so much.

The President today announced the appointment of Janet Colson to be Special Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs. Ms. Colson has been Executive Assistant to the Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation The vitality of the United States derives in great measure from the richness of our cultural heritage. The values and ideals brought to these shores by people of many races and religions are woven deeply into the fabric of America.

American Jews have contributed significantly to the spiritual and cultural elevation of our society since the founding of our Nation. Jewish immigrants and their descendants have brought dignity and distinction to every field of American endeavor. Our Jewish citizens have served America by fighting for her freedom, building her industry, striving for her goals, and nurturing her dreams.

Yet, Jewish heritage reaches far and deeply into the dawn of history, when America was but a wilderness. The Jewish people still firmly carry these ancient and revered traditions, which have been harshly tested over the centuries.

In the spring of each year, through special celebrations and observances, American Jewry remembers its past and renews its dedication to the challenges that remain. Beginning with the observance of Passover, recalling the passage from bondage to freedom, through the anniversary of the Warsaw Ghetto Uprising and the Days of Remembrance honoring the victims and survivors of the Holocaust, Jews all over the world pay tribute to their past. In the celebration of Israeli Independence Day, Jerusalem Day, and Solidarity Day for Soviet Jews, Jewish people reflect upon their common heritage.

In recognition of the special significance of this time of year to American Jewry, in homage to the significant contributions made by the Jewish community to the United States, and to foster appreciation of the cultural diversity of the American people, the Congress of the United States, by joint resolution, has requested the President to proclaim May 3 through May 10, 1981, as Jewish Heritage Week.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this first day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

I am pleased to add my congratulations to Academician Andrei Sakharov on the occasion of his 60th birthday. Sakharov is one of the true spiritual heroes of our time. An outstanding scientist whose position insured him all the security and comfort he might desire, he was willing to risk all to speak out on behalf of human rights and freedom. He persisted in this mission even after being subjected to increasingly harsh penalties.

Mr. Sakharov is a Russian patriot in the best sense of the word because he perceived his peoples' greatness to lie not in militarism and conquests abroad but in building a free and lawful society at home. His principled declarations on behalf of freedom and peace reinforce our belief in these ideals. We hope and pray that his exile will be ended and that he will enjoy a long and creative life on behalf of science and humanity.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Jose S. Sorzano to be the Representative of the United States of America on the Economic and Social Council of the United Nations, with the rank of Ambassador.

Dr. Sorzano is the recipient of many honors and awards, including the Superior Achievement Award for outstanding performance of the duties and responsibilities of a Peace Corps Country Director (1977) and a two-step meritorious increase in recognition of having tripled Peace Corps programs in Colombia without increasing administrative and managerial costs (1979).

During the 1980 Presidential campaign, Mr. Herrington was a full-time volunteer advanceman with the Reagan for President committee. Following the Republican National Convention he was named western regional director for advance.

The Task Force will recommend to the President ways in which private support might offset the cuts in the budgets of the National Endowments for the Arts and Humanities. The Task Force will, however, direct its inquiry to all of the activities of both Endowments, as well as other Federal arts and humanities programs. Special attention will be paid to three areas: First is the possibility of increasing support to State and local programs; second is increasing the role of nongovernmental, professional judgment in award making; and third is the desirability of converting the Endowments into public corporations.

I am naming this Task Force because of my deep concern for the arts and humanities in America. Our cultural institutions are an essential national resource; they must be kept strong. While I believe firmly that the Federal Government must reduce its spending, I am nevertheless sympathetic to the very real needs of our cultural organizations and hope the Task Force will deliver to my desk by Labor Day a plan to make better use of existing Federal resources and to increase the support for the arts and humanities by the private sector.

The President. Well, thank you all for coming here. Sorry that we delayed you for a few minutes, and let me explain -- we won't have time to take any questions because we're due in to a major briefing meeting now. But I wanted to welcome the Secretary of State back from his trip to the meeting in Rome, NATO, and to be able to tell you -- having had about a half-hour's briefing this morning, and we'll go in now for a much more thorough briefing -- he comes home in triumph from a most successful meeting, in a situation that could have been critical for us with regard to our allies and their reactions, and it is a triumphal return.

I think that we have a better relationship with our NATO allies now and resolved many points of difference that might have existed there and erased their worries about out relationship with the Soviet Union.

The Secretary of State. By and large, Mr. President, all I would add to that is that this meeting, which the Secretary General describes as perhaps the most important that has occurred in recent years, served to underline the most important object of American foreign policy, and that's solidarity within the Alliance and especially the transatlantic aspects of it. And secondly, this meeting enabled me to present President Reagan's foreign policy to the North Atlantic Council, and it received unanimous, enthusiastic endorsement by all of the member states. And I think that's a major achievement of which we're all very proud.

Frank Fitzsimmons was an important and powerful voice in the American labor movement. His death is a sad moment not only for the millions of Teamster union members he so diligently represented but for our nation as well.

Affable and humorous, Frank Fitzsimmons was also -- from his earliest days as a labor organizer in the 1930's -- a hard bargainer who won the respect of both business and political leaders throughout the Nation.

The people of Japan and the people of America are friends of separate pasts. We have a different language, different ancestry, and yet together, our actions have helped to shape the future. Today, we have a chance to bring freshness and a new direction to the deep friendship between our peoples.

The custom when leaders of our two nations meet is to look back, to measure how far we've come. It's true that we've accomplished much in a relatively short period of time. Today, however, you and I will look forward. We'll chart the future course of our friendship for peace.

You have said that harmony is the keynote of your government's philosophy, and harmony is a philosophy I admire very much. Harmony requires differences to be joined in pursuit of higher ideals. It is the philosophy that you have said you want to share with the world. It is the foundation of a philosophy necessary to mold strength into greatness. Japan has been a harmonious and loyal ally whose people understand that free societies must bear the responsibility of freedom together. And Japan and the United States understand and work with each other because of the strong ties that we have built upon the principles of a harmonious relationship.

We in America are grateful for the strong measures that you have taken to penalize the Soviet Union for its violent aggression in Afghanistan. You have come to the aid of countries resisting Soviet expansion. You have rescued refugees, imposed sanctions against tyrants, and offered economic assistance to the oppressed. The people of Japan stand with Americans, Europeans, and people of other democracies in a community of free powers. But even in this world community of leadership, Japan and the United States stand out in their achievements.

The economic forces at our command are the basis of a powerful grarantee of progress in peace. They are the essential tools with which we can help others to advance and to ensure freedom. Our most valuable resource, our people, have the strength to carry out their dreams, and in our dreams, we both yearn to be the best. Our mutual search for excellence, for achievement, for genuine security is conducted in the spirit of harmony.

There is a hill in Boston where dreams are made and sometimes shattered. Runners beaded in sweat and panting for breath must conquer that hill to win -- demanding foot race known as the Boston Marathon. It is called Heartbreak Hill. About 2 weeks ago, a young man from Japan raced up that hill and won. His name: Toshihiko Seko, a sales clerk from Tokyo. After the race, he told us that he was motivated by respect for the American who had won last year. In Japan, he said, when you respect somebody, you show it by going beyond his achievements. Well, Mr. Seko is not only an awesome athlete, he is a gracious and wise man. And let me say, Mr. Seko has earned the respect of a pack of American runners who look forward to the pleasure of meeting him again next year.

Let us continue to be challenged by our accomplishments, by the accomplishments of each other. Let us compete in the same contests with each victory becoming the next goal to conquer. But let us also always remember and let the world be aware -- Japan and America will go forward together.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, thank you very much for your very warm welcome. Let me express my heartfelt thankfulness for your truly remarkable recovery from the unfortunate incident and my delight that you are now standing here in very good health and with that winning smile that is now known throughout the world.

Mr. President, the world is now beset by unprecedentedly complex political, economic, and social challenges. I am convinced, however, that the industrialized democracies, by strengthening their cooperation and solidarity and by addressing these challenges with firm determination, can dispel misery, oppression, and violence from the face of this Earth and can bring peace, justice, freedom, and prosperity to the international community. Japan and the United States are great powers whose combined national products account for one-third of the world's total. Close coordination between our two countries can contribute immeasurably to the peace and security of the entire world.

I have come, Mr. President, to hold a candid exchange of views with you about the responsibilities Japan and the United States should discharge and the roles we should play in the current international situation. It is also my earnest desire to consolidate the bond of friendship and expand further the horizons of cooperation between our two countries. I must add that the opportunity to talk with you so soon after you have assumed the Presidency in such trying times, but with the full and sacred trust and mandate of the American people, I regard as very timely and significant.

Mr. President, the moment I set foot on American soil this time, I sensed the aspirations of the American people to build a society filled with vitality. The Japanese people have profound respect for the American people who are now embarked on the new beginning under your leadership. We wish to advance hand in hand with you toward realizing the aspirations of the international community by expanding our cooperation with your country and by strengthening the ties between our two peoples, both of whom aspire to peace and to societies filled with vigor and vitality.

I am extremely grateful to the Members of the House of Representatives, both Democratic and Republican, for their vote today on the 1982 budget. This is a resounding victory -- not only for our economy but for a spirit of bipartisanship that we can build upon in the months and years ahead.

In my conversations with Members of the House over the past several days, they have repeatedly told me how serious they are about bringing the Federal budget under control. This budget resolution is a major step in that process. It sets responsible spending limits within which we must now work together.

There is another message here that is equally important: When the people speak, Washington will now listen -- and will act. For years, the American people have been asking the the Federal Government put its house in order. Today, the people have been heard.

There's a legend in Japan about two villages separated by a river, and on moonlight nights a man from one town would come out and sing. And his voice would resound farther and farther, floating out across the river until it reached the other town. Meanwhile, the people of the second town decided to compete. They looked for a singer who could surpass the excellence of the man across the river. And then it happened that one night another voice was heard, and the second was fully as rich as the first. And when the original singer heard it, he realized he was faced with a strong rival, and he sang and sang at the top of his voice. And the singing grew more and more beautiful as each singer found depths to his talent that he hadn't known were there.

Well, Japan and America are like those singers. We each seek great achievements, and the standards we set for each other are marks of excellence. And yet we do not exhaust ourselves in the contest, but rather, pursue our respective goals as friends and allies.

The Japanese-American relationship is the anchor of American policy in East Asia. It is a pillar of strength in a world where democratic values are always under challenge. Our friendship is based on respect and mutual trust. America will honor her commitments to Japan, and we will continue to consult fully as true partners. Together we confront a serious world situation.

Energy supplies are uncertain. Economies are fragile. The Soviet Union continues its aggression, and the dynamics of the Persian Gulf are precarious. And the United States will play an active role in addressing these challenges, and we welcome Japan's determination to participate as a full partner in behalf of world peace. Just as we will count on Japan, Japan can count on America.

We will continue our respective search for excellence, and we shall cooperate with each other, bringing to the world the high standards of the future a little more quickly. The voices that call to each other across the Pacific will remain in harmony.

Let me first express my sincere gratitude to President Reagan for this splendid banquet and for your warm greetings to my wife and me and the Japanese people. Though I have met with you only this morning for the first time, Mr. President, this gathering tonight and your warm hospitality make me feel as if we have known each other for many years.

I was born on the Pacific coast of the northern part of Japan and grew up beside the roaring surf coming from the east. California, which has been your home for so many years, is facing my home country across the Pacific. I spent my youth dreaming of America, the land of liberty, lying far across the sea. Belonging as we do to the same generation, Mr. President, I expect that you and I share a similar experience of the vicissitudes of our times. Add to that the fact that Japan and the United States have a long history of helping each other as true friends, and it is natural that I should feel a deep sense of friendship for you, Mr. President, as if we had known each other for many, many years.

Mr. President, allow me to mention two recent events in the United States which have moved me very deeply. The first has to do with the unfortunate incident you came across a short time ago. My colleagues and I, and indeed the people of Japan as a whole, were all deeply distressed to learn of that regrettable event. What struck us most of all, however, was the fortitude and devotion with which Mrs. Reagan supported you and the calm presence of mind and admirable sense of humor which you, Mr. President, displayed in dealing with the situation. The affairs of state, in the meantime, remained in firm and reliable hands, and at no time was there any cause for concern among your allies about the United States leadership capability. Japan's faith in the United States of America has been greatly enhanced.

The second event is the heroic achievement of the space shuttle Columbia. Despite the fact that it was after 3 a.m. local time, over 3 million Japanese sat glued to their television sets to watch the Columbia's successful return to Earth. The frontier spirit of the American people has been a constant source of courage and inspiration to the Japanese people, and frontier spirit is in perfect harmony with our traditional spirit of enterprise.

Ladies and gentlemen, President Reagan and I have today reaffirmed how important solidarity and cooperation between Japan and the United States is to the prosperity of mankind in the years to come. We have also affirmed that Japan-U.S. partnership has grown to be an indispensable element in the peace and stability of the Asian-Pacific region, as well as that of the international community as a whole.

The present turbulent international situation makes me intensely aware of the precious value of freedom that Japan, the United States, and other democracies have consistently defended over the years. We must cooperate in pooling our wisdom to build still more peaceful and vigorous societies imbued with the spirit of freedom. As the Prime Minister of Japan, I am determined to do everything I can to join hands with you, Mr. President, and to work together for the sake of the future generations of the 21st century.

The success of the space shuttle inspires us to challenge the unknown. Tireless effort to build a better world for the future is a common task for the people of all nations. I would like to share with you this spirit of challenge.

The President. Well, ladies and gentlemen of the press, I won't take too much of your time, but I just want to say first, and before the Prime Minister is heard, that this has been a most fruitful meeting for both our countries. We have established a bond of friendship. In fact, last night, the Prime Minister referred to it that we were buddies. And we have come to an agreement, or at least discovered, perhaps I should say, that we're in agreement on a number of broad issues -- economic, political, military -- and have established a base whereby we can have full consultation, and any possible difference or misunderstanding that might arise that we can be in instant contact to resolve it. So, we're most grateful and honored that the Vice President [Prime Minister] has been here. And as I say, I think we're all much better for what has been decided in the meetings we've held.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, thank you very much for your kind words. As you've just said, through the 2 days of talks with you, Mr. President, we have been able to establish between us an unshakable basis of friendship and mutual trust. And this is the greatest treasure that I take home from my visit to the United States to Japan.

Also, in the course of our 2 days of talks, we touched on a broad range of issues -- political, economic, and other issues, including the questions of the relationship between the developing and the developed parts of the world and also including the question of how the countries in the West should cooperate together in securing, in a comprehensive manner, the security of the West as a whole.

We did engage in very forthright and open exchanges of views and, as a result, we were able to confirm that we have a basic convergence of views and perceptions about the important matters that face the international community today. We were also able to reaffirm that we are both dedicated to the common goal of securing world peace and stability and prosperity, and we reaffirmed our common resolve to join our hands together and move vigorously forward to that end.

We also agreed that we will always be in very close touch. We will communicate with each other very closely, consult very closely on these global issues, as well as on the problems that we may have in our bilateral relations. On the basis of mutual trust and friendship that I have been able to establish with you, Mr. President, as true partners and as true friends, we can certainly contribute together to the further advancement of the relations between our two countries.

At the invitation of the Government of the United States, the Prime Minister and Mrs. Suzuki paid an official visit to the United States from May 4 through 9. President Reagan and Prime Minister Suzuki met in Washington on May 7 and 8 for a comprehensive and fruitful review of the current international situation and U.S.-Japan relationship. They pledged that they would work closely together in pursuit of world peace and prosperity. The President and the Prime Minister, recognizing that the alliance between the United States and Japan is built upon their shared values of democracy and liberty, reaffirmed their solidarity, friendship and mutual trust.

The President and the Prime Minister viewed with concern the Soviet military build-up and the Soviet activities in the Third World as seen in its military intervention into Afghanistan and its behavior elsewhere. They reaffirmed their position that the Soviet intervention into Afghanistan cannot be condoned and that the immediate, unconditional and total withdrawal of the Soviet troops should be realized. They restated their view that the problems of Poland should be resolved by the Polish people themselves without any external interference and that any intervention in Poland would have a serious adverse effect on world peace. They shared the view that should intervention in Poland occur, the Western industrialized democracies should cooperate and implement their policies in concert.

The President and the Prime Minister placed high value on the respective role each country is playing in this regard as exemplified recently by the President's decision to maintain U.S. ground forces in Korea and by the Prime Minister's visit to ASEAN countries this January.

They agreed that an early and comprehensive political settlement of the Kampuchean problem, including the withdrawal of foreign forces, through an international conference based on the resolutions of the General Assembly of the United Nations is important for the restoration of a durable peace in Indochina.

The President and the Prime Minister affirmed that the maintenance of peace and security in the Middle East, particularly in the Gulf region, is highly important for the peace and security of the entire world. They agreed that the determined efforts of the United States in the face of fragile security conditions in the region contribute to restoring stability, and that many countries, including Japan, are benefiting from them. They also agreed that the process of achieving a comprehensive peace in the Middle East should be further promoted to strengthen the security of the area.

In the process of reviewing the international situation, the President and the Prime Minister took note of the presence of various elements of instability in other areas of the world, and particularly with respect to some parts of Africa and Central America, they expressed their concern about the existence of conditions affecting peace and stability.

The President and the Prime Minister recognized the role that international efforts toward genuine arms control and disarmament should play in advancing world peace ansd stability, encouraging restraint and responsibility in international affairs, and promoting the security of the West as a whole.

The Prime Minister stated his view that it is important for the industrialized democracies to have a shared recognition of the various political, military and economic problems of the world and to cope with them in a consistent manner in order comprehensively to provide for the security of the West as a whole.

In meeting these international challenges to their peace and security, the President and the Prime Minister recognized that all Western industrialized democracies need to make greater efforts in the areas of defense, world economic improvement, economic cooperation with the Third World, and mutually supportive diplomatic initiatives.

The President and the Prime Minister reaffirmed their belief that the U.S.-Japan Treaty of Mutual Cooperation and Security is the foundation of peace and stability in the Far East and the defense of Japan. In insuring peace and stability in the region and the defense of Japan, they acknowledged the desirability of an appropriate division of roles between Japan and the United States. The Prime Minister stated that Japan, on its own initiative and in accordance with its Constitution and basic defense policy, will seek to make even greater efforts for improving its defense capabilities in Japanese territories and in its surrounding sea and air space, and for further alleviating the financial burden of U.S. forces in Japan. The President expressed his understanding of the statement by the Prime Minister. They recognized their common interest in contributing to the defense of Japan, and expressed the hope for even more fruitful dialogue between the two countries on security matters. In this regard, they looked forward to the scheduled meetings in June on security matters by representatives of the two Governments both at the ministerial and working levels.

The President and the Prime Minister agreed upon the importance of the relationship between the industrialized countries and the developing countries. They expressed their hope that constructive progress will be make in dealing with the countries of the south through various means, in particular through the discussion scheduled for Ottawa and Mexico.

They affirmed that political, economic and social stability of developing countries is indispensable for the maintenance of peace and stability of the world. The Prime Minister stated that the Government of Japan will strive to expand and improve its official development assistance under the New Medium Term Target and that the Government will strengthen its aid to those areas which are important to the maintenance of peace and stability of the world.

The President and the Prime Minister discussed various problems facing the world economy. In this connection, they expressed their concern about the rising pressure toward protectionism in many countries and affirmed that the United States and Japan are determined to continue their efforts to maintain and strengthen free and open trade principles embodied in the GATT framework. In this regard, the President expressed his appreciation for the voluntary action taken by the Government of Japan to restrain the export of automobiles to the United States at a time when the United States automobile industry is passing through a difficult adjustment period.

The President and the Prime Minister expressed their satisfaction with the close bilateral economic relationship and noted the prospects for a further expansion of these ties. They shared the view that economic issues between the two countries have been and should continue to be given early and mutually satisfactory solutions in the spirit of goodwill and cooperation.

The President and the Prime Minister highly valued the report of the Japan-United States Economic Relations Group which contains recommendations that will contribute to the long term development of the United States-Japan economic relations. They agreed that the two governments should address the various recommendations for possible implementation. They also expressed the hope that the recommendations would be studied in such fora as the U.S.-Japan Businessmen's Conference.

The President and the Prime Minister, noting that the energy problem continues to be critical to the healthy development of the world economy, reaffirmed the need for the two countries to make further efforts, together with other industrialized countries, in such fields as increase of energy production, promotion of development and use of alternative energy sources, and conservation of energy.

The President and the Prime Minister, in recognition of vital importance of preventing nuclear weapons proliferation, reaffirmed the need to continue to promote international efforts to this end. They shared the view, on the other hand, that the role of nuclear energy ought to be further expanded under appropriate safeguards to meet the increasing energy needs of the world and that the United States and Japan have special responsibility to cooperate further in promoting the peaceful uses of nuclear energy. In this connection, the President endorsed the view of the Prime Minister that reprocessing is of particular importance to Japan. The President and the Prime Minister thus agreed that the two governments should promptly start consultations with a view to working out a permanent solution at an early date on such pending issues as the continued operation of the Tokai Reprocessing Facility and the construction of an additional reprocessing plant in Japan.

Underscoring their belief that cultural exchange is an important element in fostering mutual understanding and friendship, the President welcomed the announcement of the Prime Minister that the Government of Japan has made a financial contribution to the Japan-U.S. Friendship Commission and that it has announced its intention to give substantial financial assistance respectively to the Japan Society of New York and, in a continuing manner, to the Special Japan-U.S. Exchange Program of ``Youth for Understanding'' which is to commence next fiscal year.

Finally, the Prime Minister expressed his sincere appreciation to the President for the warm reception he has received during his visit to the United States. The Prime Minister extended an invitation to the President to visit Japan. The President thanked the Prime Minister for his gracious invitation, and said that he hoped to visit Japan at a mutually convenient time.

Well, ladies and gentlemen, members of the Cabinet and staff and all of you who are here, I don't think the East Room has ever seen exactly this kind of meeting here before. And I think last week we saw an extraordinary example of cooperation between the legislative and executive branches of government, and I want all of you Members of the House to know how deeply grateful I am for what you did last week.

During these past 112 days we've worked well together, and I think we've made a little history. Thanks to you, we've made it clear that spending can be controlled and that our system works. The voice of the people can be heard here in the Capital, and in so doing, we've restored their confidence of our people in their government and in the institutions of this Government. I know that what we did was only the first step, but I have confidence that in the weeks and months ahead we'll continue to put country ahead of partisanship.

Yes, we have a big job ahead of us putting tax cuts into effect that are really the other half of returning America's prosperity. I believe the reduction in the tax rates, as I know I've said to many of you, is essential to restoring the spirit of enterprise.

You know, some years ago there was an economist at Harvard, now deceased, Sumner Schlichter. And he said once that if a visitor from Mars came to Earth, he would conclude that our tax policy had been created to make private enterprise unworkable. [Laughter] And, you know, maybe what he was talking about, sometimes in a business or a sports team or an army, will outperform its competitor even though the material assets of the two seem to be roughly equal.

Now, some academicians have commented -- well, they've referred to this as the x factor in human affairs, a confidence or a spirit that makes men and women dream and dare and take greater risks. Well, for too long a time our tax structure has stifled that x factor and that spirit of confidence and daring in our economic doings here in our land. Those who have the means to invest have sought tax shelters instead. And workers have been discouraged from saving or even trying to increase their earnings by increasing their productivity. I think the people have told us they want to see America return to the can-do spirit that made this country an industrial and economic giant.

Would I be wrong in suggesting that all of us here today feel a kind of special closeness? It's a feeling, I think, born of standing together for something we believed in. And I appreciate the courage it took for some of you to take that stand. I hope that we can maintain this bond established so far in the days to come. And again, I thank you from the bottom of my heart.

During National Nursing Home Week, we are particularly reminded of the needs of nursing home residents. They require special medical and health-related services delivered by individuals dedicated to their care in safe and healthful settings.

Let us remember the elderly and dedicate our efforts to enabling these citizens to remain healthy and independent while at the same time ensuring that the care provided them in nursing homes fulfills the human needs of the people whom they are committed to serve.

The people of this country won another great victory tonight when Members of the Senate passed the 1982 budget resolution. With the Senate vote, we are closer to achieving our goal of fiscal responsibility and a government that lives within its means.

Senator Pete Domenici, chairman of the Budget Committee that so promptly reported the resolution to the floor, put it well when he said that, in the past, we have been spending the blessings of America while forgetting where the blessings came from. Tonight, we are putting that kind of habit behind us, thanks to his able leadership and that of Majority Leader Howard Baker.

Just as Members of the House of Representatives did a few days ago, Senators of both parties worked together to shape and pass this resolution. This was an example of bipartisan cooperation and representative democracy at its best.

On behalf of all Americans, I thank the Senators who heard the voice of the people and found the courage to commit themselves seriously to budgetary restraint, tax rate reduction, and renewed national prosperity.

I have just received the shocking news of the attack on you. All Americans join me in hopes and prayers for your speedy recovery from the injuries you have suffered in the attack. Our prayers are with you.

Note: The White House announced that on hearing of the shooting incident, the President spoke by telephone with Terence Cardinal Cooke, Archbishop of New York. The President expressed the sorrow of the American people and his personal concern and prayers for the Pope.

Pope John Paul II, a man of peace and goodness -- an inspiration to the world -- has been struck today by a would-be assassin's bullet. The world is horrified, and all of us grieve over this terrible act of violence.

We are grateful that he has been spared. We pray that all of us will heed Pope John Paul's call for a ``world of love, not of hate;'' that we will hear his words reminding us that all men are brothers, that they must forever forsake the ways of violence and live together in peace.

The people of the United States, whose unbounded affection for Pope John Paul II was shown in our city streets a year and a half ago, join millions throughout the world in fervent prayer for his full and rapid recovery.

Nancy and I are delighted to have you here this evening and particularly delighted because of the occasion that this marks. Not too long ago we had a slightly bigger crowd -- I guess the other House has more Members than you -- in hailing the House's passage of the economic program. And I'm not going to try to get into any jokes or anything about the two Houses. I did that once when I was Governor.

But anyway, I want to thank you very much for not only what you did with regard to the legislation which we have been pushing but for something else on a bigger scale that you did, I think, for all the people of this country. I think a certain faith was restored for a lot of people in our institutions of government. And with this evidence that when the events justified, the people came ahead of partisanship, and I hope it is something that we can continue in the years ahead. I know we're not going to always agree on everything or every single issue, but as long as we have the bond that you can almost feel in this room and that I felt in that other room and can talk to each other instead of about each other -- I'm sure the people will be justified in their confidence, and all of us will feel a lot better about this land of ours.

Mr. Frank's 30-year business career has been spent as an investment banker, economist, and financial consultant. As an investment banker he primarily served as a general partner of Singer Deane & Scribner and its director of research (now Butcher Singer), also vice president of Shearson Hayden Stone for research and investment banking, and president of E. J. Frank Associates. He is currently a consultant and vice president with M. Waddell and Towne, Inc., Pittsburgh, Pa.

Through the years Mr. Frank has undertaken a wide variety of financial and economic studies for numerous companies and financial institutions. He has published articles and papers on economic and financial subjects.

Prior to his government service, Mr. Minor managed a Cincinnati printing concern for 6 years and a broadcasting company owning radio stations in Ohio and California for 4 years. Mr. Minor served on the board of directors of America's first public broadcasting station, WCET - TV Cincinnati.

The President today announced the appointment of the new members of the President's Commission on White House Fellowships. The Commission is bipartisan. Its purpose is to recommend to the President the White House fellows who serve for a 1-year period on the White House staff, in the Executive Office of the President, Office of the Vice President, or the offices of members of the Cabinet.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Nunzio J. Palladino to be a member of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission. Upon confirmation the President intends to designate Dr. Palladino Chairman.

Dr. Palladino served as the first head of the Department of Nuclear Engineering at the Pennsylvania State Unversity in 1959 - 66, when he was appointed dean of the College of Engineering. As head of the Nuclear Engineering Department, he was responsible for development and implementation of course work and graduate programs and research in nuclear engineering.

Dr. Palladino has served on many committees, including the Governor's Energy Council and the Governor's Science Advisory Committee, for which he chaired the Energy Management Subcommittee; member and chairman of both the Pennsylvania Advisory Committee on Atomic Energy Development and Radiation Control and the U.S. Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguards, which reviews all nuclear plants proposed for construction and operation in the United States. More recently, he has been a member of the Governor's Commission on Three Mile Island, and participated on a Nuclear Regulatory Commission special task force to evaluate the cleanup activities at Three Mile Island, which culminated in the preparation of a report submitted to the NRC Commissioners.

Today their job is vitally important -- their sacrifice and patriotism makes it possible for those of us who are civilians to go about our everyday lives. Their commitment keeps our nation strong and our future free.

Today millions of Americans are asking themselves that same question about the dedicated men and women who serve in our Armed Forces. Like me, they're asking that question with gratitude, with respect and affection in their hearts. Today, I want all those wearing American uniforms around the globe to know: America is grateful to you -- and proud of you, too.

Immediately following his graduation from law school in 1966, Mr. Lacovara served a judicial clerkship with Judge Harold Leventhal of the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit. Mr. Lacovara graduated summa cum laude from Columbia University School of Law, where he was first in his class for each of 3 years. He received his bachelor's degree magna cum laude from Georgetown University in 1963, where he graduated in 3 years.

Mr. Lacovara has served as an adjunct professor of law at Georgetown University Law Center and lecturer in law at Columbia University School of Law. He has been a frequent author and lecturer in many areas of the law, including the criminal justice system, constitutional law, antitrust law, and professional responsibility.

Father Hesburgh, I thank you very much and for so many things. The distinguished honor that you've conferred upon me here today, I must say, however, compounds a sense of guilt that I have nursed for almost 50 years. I thought the first degree I was given was honorary. [Laughter] But it's wonderful to be here today with Governor Orr, Governor Bowen, Senators Lugar and Quayle, and Representative Hiler, these distinguished honorees, the trustees, administration, faculty, students, and friends of Notre Dame and, most important, the graduating class of 1981.

Pat and I haven't been able to see much of each other lately, so I haven't had a chance to tell him that there is now another tie that binds us together. Until a few weeks ago I knew very little about my father's ancestry. He had been orphaned at age 6. But now I've learned that his grandfather, my great-grandfather, left Ireland to come to America, leaving his home in Ballyporeen, a village in County Tipperary in Ireland, and I have learned that Ballyporeen is the ancestral home of the O'Briens.

Now, if I don't watch out, this may turn out to be less of a commencement than a warm bath in nostalgic memories. Growing up in Illinois, I was influenced by a sports legend so national in scope, it was almost mystical. It is difficult to explain to anyone who didn't live in those times. The legend was based on a combination of three elements: a game, football; a university, Notre Dame; and a man, Knute Rockne. There has been nothing like it before or since.

A number of years later I returned here in the company of Pat O'Brien and a galaxy of Hollywood stars for the world premiere of ``Knute Rockne -- All American'' in which I was privileged to play George Gipp. I've always suspected that there might have been many actors in Hollywood who could have played the part better, but no one could have wanted to play it more than I did. And I was given the part largely because the star of that picture, Pat O'Brien, kindly and generously held out a helping hand to a beginning young actor.

Having come from the world of sports, I'd been trying to write a story about Knute Rockne. I must confess that I had someone in mind to play the Gipper. On one of my sports broadcasts before going to Hollywood, I had told the story of his career and tragic death. I didn't have very many words on paper when I learned that the studio that employed me was already preparing a story treatment for that film. And that brings me to the theme of my remarks.

I'm the fifth President of the United States to address a Notre Dame commencement. The temptation is great to use this forum as an address on a great international or national issue that has nothing to do with this occasion. Indeed, this is somewhat traditional. So, I wasn't surprised when I read in several reputable journals that I was going to deliver an address on foreign policy or on the economy. I'm not going to talk about either.

You members of the graduating class of 18 -- or 1981 -- [laughter] -- I don't really go back that far -- [laughter] -- are what behaviorists call achievers. And while you will look back with warm pleasure on your memories of these years that brought you here to where you are today, you are also, I know, looking at the future that seems uncertain to most of you but which, let me assure you, offers great expectations.

Take pride in this day. Thank your parents, as one on your behalf has already done here. Thank those who've been of help to you over the last 4 years. And do a little celebrating; you're entitled. This is your day, and whatever I say should take cognizance of that fact. It is a milestone in life, and it marks a time of change.

Now, I'm going to mention again that movie that Pat and I and Notre Dame were in, because it says something about America. First, Knute Rockne as a boy came to America with his parents from Norway. And in the few years it took him to grow up to college age, he became so American that here at Notre Dame, he became an All American in a game that is still, to this day, uniquely American.

As a coach, he did more than teach young men how to play a game. He believed truly that the noblest work of man was building the character of man. And maybe that's why he was a living legend. No man connected with football has ever achieved the stature or occupied the singular niche in the Nation that he carved out for himself, not just in a sport, but in our entire social structure.

Now, today I hear very often, ``Win one for the Gipper,'' spoken in a humorous vein. Lately I've been hearing it by Congressmen who are supportive of the programs that I've introduced. [Laughter] But let's look at the significance of that story. Rockne could have used Gipp's dying words to win a game any time. But 8 years went by following the death of George Gipp before Rock revealed those dying words, his deathbed wish.

And then he told the story at halftime to a team that was losing, and one of the only teams he had ever coached that was torn by dissension and jealousy and factionalism. The seniors on that team were about to close out their football careers without learning or experiencing any of the real values that a game has to impart. None of them had known George Gipp. They were children when he played for Notre Dame. It was to this team that Rockne told the story and so inspired them that they rose above their personal animosities. For someone they had never known, they joined together in a common cause and attained the unattainable.

Now, it's only a game. And maybe to hear it now, afterward -- and this is what we feared -- it might sound maudlin and not the way it was intended. But is there anything wrong with young people having an experience, feeling something so deeply, thinking of someone else to the point that they can give so completely of themselves? There will come times in the lives of all of us when we'll be faced with causes bigger than ourselves, and they won't be on a playing field.

This Nation was born when a band of men, the Founding Fathers, a group so unique we've never seen their like since, rose to such selfless heights. Lawyers, tradesmen, merchants, farmers -- 56 men achieved security and standing in life but valued freedom more. They pledged their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honor. Sixteen of them gave their lives. Most gave their fortunes. All preserved their sacred honor.

They gave us more than a nation. They brought to all mankind for the first time the concept that man was born free, that each of us has inalienable rights, ours by the grace of God, and that government was created by us for our convenience, having only the powers that we choose to give it. This is the heritage that you're about to claim as you come out to join the society made up of those who have preceded you by a few years, or some of us by a great many.

This experiment in man's relation to man is a few years into its third century. Saying that may make it sound quite old. But let's look at it from another viewpoint or perspective. A few years ago, someone figured out that if you could condense the entire history of life on Earth into a motion picture that would run for 24 hours a day, 365 days -- maybe on leap years we could have an intermission -- [laughter] -- this idea that is the United States wouldn't appear on the screen until 3\1/2\ seconds before midnight on December 31st. And in those 3\1/2\ seconds not only would a new concept of society come into being, a golden hope for all mankind, but more than half the activity, economic activity in world history, would take place on this continent. Free to express their genius, individual Americans, men and women, in 3\1/2\ seconds, would perform such miracles of invention, construction, and production as the world had never seen.

As you join us out there beyond the campus, you know there are great unsolved problems. Federalism, with its built in checks and balances, has been distorted. Central government has usurped powers that properly belong to local and State governments. And in so doing, in many ways that central government has begun to fail to do the things that are truly the responsibility of a central government.

All of this has led to the misuse of power and preemption of the prerogatives of people and their social institutions. You are graduating from a great private, or, if you will, independent university. Not too many years ago, such schools were relatively free from government interference. In recent years, government has spawned regulations covering virtually every facet of our lives. The independent and church-supported colleges and universities have found themselves enmeshed in that network of regulations and the costly blizzard of paperwork that government is demanding. Thirty-four congressional committees and almost 80 subcommittees have jurisdiction over 439 separate laws affecting education at the college level alone. Almost every aspect of campus life is now regulated -- hiring, firing, promotions, physical plant, construction, recordkeeping, fundraising and, to some extent, curriculum and educational programs.

I hope when you leave this campus that you will do so with a feeling of obligation to your alma mater. She will need your help and support in the years to come. If ever the great independent colleges and universities like Notre Dame give way to and are replaced by tax-supported institutions, the struggle to preserve academic freedom will have been lost.

We're troubled today by economic stagnation, brought on by inflated currency and prohibitive taxes and burdensome regulations. The cost of stagnation in human terms, mostly among those least equipped to survive it, is cruel and inhuman.

Now, after those remarks, don't decide that you'd better turn your diploma back in so you can stay another year on the campus. I've just given you the bad news. The good news is that something is being done about all this because the people of America have said, ``Enough already.'' You know, we who had preceded you had just gotten so busy that we let things get out of hand. We forgot that we were the keepers of the power, forgot to challenge the notion that the state is the principal vehicle of social change, forgot that millions of social interactions among free individuals and institutions can do more to foster economic and social progress than all the careful schemes of government planners.

Well, at last we're remembering, remembering that government has certain legitimate functions which it can perform very well, that it can be responsive to the people, that it can be humane and compassionate, but that when it undertakes tasks that are not its proper province, it can do none of them as well or as economically as the private sector.

We need you. We need your youth. We need your strength. We need your idealism to help us make right that which is wrong. Now, I know that this period of your life, you have been and are critically looking at the mores and customs of the past and questioning their value. Every generation does that. May I suggest, don't discard the time-tested values upon which civilization was built simply because they're old. More important, don't let today's doomcriers and cynics persuade you that the best is past, that from here on it's all downhill. Each generation sees farther than the generation that preceded it because it stands on the shoulders of that generation. You're going to have opportunities beyond anything that we've ever known.

The people have made it plain already. They want an end to excessive government intervention in their lives and in the economy, an end to the burdensome and unnecessary regulations and a punitive tax policy that does take ``from the mouth of labor the bread it has earned.'' They want a government that cannot only continue to send men across the vast reaches of space and bring them safely home, but that can guarantee that you and I can walk in the park of our neighborhood after dark and get safely home. And finally, they want to know that this Nation has the ability to defend itself against those who would seek to pull it down.

And all of this, we the people can do. Indeed, a start has already been made. There's a task force under the leadership of the Vice President, George Bush, that is to look at those regulations I've spoken of. They have already identified hundreds of them that can be wiped out with no harm to the quality of life. And the cancellation of just those regulations will leave billions and billions of dollars in the hands of the people for productive enterprise and research and development and the creation of jobs.

The years ahead are great ones for this country, for the cause of freedom and the spread of civilization. The West won't contain communism, it will transcend communism. It won't bother to dismiss or denounce it, it will dismiss it as some bizarre chapter in human history whose last pages are even now being written.

For the West, for America, the time has come to dare to show to the world that our civilized ideas, our traditions, our values, are not -- like the ideology and war machine of totalitarian societies -- just a facade of strength. It is time for the world to know our intellectual and spiritual values are rooted in the source of all strength, a belief in a Supreme Being, and a law higher than our own.

When it's written, history of our time won't dwell long on the hardships of the recent past. But history will ask -- and our answer determine the fate of freedom for a thousand years -- Did a nation borne of hope lose hope? Did a people forged by courage find courage wanting? Did a generation steeled by hard war and a harsh peace forsake honor at the moment of great climactic struggle for the human spirit?

If history asks such questions, it also answers them. And the answers are to be found in the heritage left by generations of Americans before us. They stand in silent witness to what the world will soon know and history someday record: that in the [its] third century, the American Nation came of age, affirmed its leadership of free men and women serving selflessly a vision of man with God, government for people, and humanity at peace.

A few years ago, an Australian Prime Minister, John Gorton, said, ``I wonder if anybody ever thought what the situation for the comparatively small nations in the world would be if there were not in existence the United States, if there were not this giant country prepared to make so many sacrifices.'' This is the noble and rich heritage rooted in great civil ideas of the West, and it is yours.

My hope today is that in the years to come -- and come it shall -- when it's your time to explain to another generation the meaning of the past and thereby hold out to them their promise of the future, that you'll recall the truths and traditions of which we've spoken. It is these truths and traditions that define our civilization and make up our national heritage. And now, they're yours to protect and pass on.

I have one more hope for you: when yoy do speak to the next generation about these things, that you will always be able to speak of an America that is strong and free, to find in your hearts an unbounded pride in this much-loved country, this once and future land, this bright and hopeful nation whose generous spirit and great ideals the world still honors.

Note: The President spoke at 3:11 p.m. at the 136th commencement ceremony of the university, which was held in the Notre Dame Athletic and Convocation Center at the campus in South Bend, Ind. The President was introduced by Rev. Theodore M. Hesburgh, president of the university, who had presented the President with an honorary doctor of laws degree prior to the commencement address.

The intercommunal negotiations between Greek Cypriot and Turkish Cypriot representatives continue under the chairmanship of the Secretary General's Special Representative on Cyprus, Ambassador Hugo Gobbi. The two sides are proceeding in their detailed review of the four basic, mutually agreed-upon issues and continuing to devote each session to one topic.

Meetings were held on March 18, April 2, 15, and 29, and May 6. The pace of weekly sessions has slowed somewhat as both Greek and Turkish Cypriots prepare for elections. A reduced schedule in May and June is anticipated with resumption of a regular schedule in July. Both sides have continued their talks in a congenial negotiating atmosphere.

Although not directly connected to the intercommunal talks, the problem of missing persons in Cyprus has been a significant issue dividing the communities. Consequently, we are pleased to note a significant, positive development in this area. Ambassador Gobbi announced on April 22 that an intercommunal agreement had been reached on the terms of reference for a Committee on Missing Persons (text attached). The date for the first meeting of the Committee will be fixed soon following coordination with the International Committee of the Red Cross and appointment of members of the Committee.

The issue of setting up a Committee on Missing Persons could, in our view, only be resolved with the cooperation of both Cypriot communities. Consequently, we are gratified by the United Nations' announcement and hope that subsequent discussion in the Committee will be productive and lead to a resolution of this important, humanitarian question.

We also believe the formation of a Committee will contribute to a positive negotiating atmosphere facilitating progress in the intercommunal talks. The agreement reached to form a Committee suggests that patient, persistent negotiating between both communities, under United Nations aegis, holds the potential for success even on the most difficult of issues. I am confident that the productive attitudes characterized by the formation of a Committee on Missing Persons can be employed in the pursuit of a just and lasting settlement of the Cyprus question.

The President today announced the nomination of James A. Belson to be an Associate Judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, filling the vacancy created by the retirement of Associate Judge George P. Gallagher.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, welcome. And before we say anything at all or I make any remarks -- because there are many here who probably don't know that in addition to the men we're honoring today, that there are in our midst, as a great part of this audience, many who have been those pioneers out into space, our astronauts going back to the very beginning of the program. Could I ask that all of you who fit that description, all of you, to please stand up?

Well, we're in very distinguished company, believe me. Commander Young and Captain Crippen, all the world held its breath in the silent moments of your reentry, and when we finally heard your voices again, all the world knew America had begun a new age.

A few moments ago, I had the privilege of decorating Commander Young and Captain Crippen for their personal courage and the honor they have brought to our nation, and also honored Dr. Alan Lovelace, who is here with us today, but more about that later. I presented to John Young the Congressional Space Medal of Honor, our highest award for achievements in space, and to both him and Bob Crippen, the NASA Distinguished Service Medal, the highest award the space agency can bestow.

These men have traveled across the country since their shuttle flight, and I think they now must be conscious of and realize that to all America they have now become John and Bob. The American people have welcomed them with tremendous affection, and no wonder. Through them, we've all been part of a greatness pushing wider the boundaries of our freedom. As I told them before they took off, through them we all felt as giants once again. And once again, we felt the surge of pride that comes from knowing that we're the first and we're the best -- and we are so because we're free.

The space shuttle is the world's first true space transportation system. It will be the space workhorse for many years to come, and soon we'll have the operational capability that will place cargo in orbit for a variety of users. Because we lead the world in science and space travel, we're on the cutting edge of technology and discovery. The shuttle will affect American life in both subtle and dramatic ways, bringing energy and excitement into our national renewal.

The flight of the Columbia was a victory for the American spirit. John Young and Bob Crippen both made us very proud. Their deeds reminded us that we, as a free people, can accomplish whatever we set out to do. Nothing binds our abilities except our expectations, and given that, the farthest star is within our reach.

To paraphrase John Greenleaf Whittier: We are the people who have thrown the windows of our souls wide open to the sun. We will follow as we can where our hearts have long since gone, and progress will be ours for all mankind to share. Americans have shown the world that we not only dream great dreams, we dare to live those great dreams.

Mr. President, I'd like to just say one brief remark -- and I know I speak for myself, I think I speak for everybody in NASA -- and that is, we thank you for the opportunity to serve the country, and we are prepared to continue to do that.

Mr. Young. It's a great honor for Bob and I to be here today. And we'd also like to make a presentation to the President that tells, for all of you who contributed so much to this program, just exactly what it's all about. Could you unveil that, please?

The President. You won't mind if I only wear this within Earth's atmosphere. [Laughter] But, thank you all very much. And now, I think there's two individuals here that you'd like to meet also, because I think they have to be just as courageous or even more so than those who make the flight. I think you'd like to see Mrs. Young and Mrs. Crippen. Would you stand, please?

Mr. DuBois' background encompasses 23 years of diversified experience in the mining industry. Since 1975 he has been Nevada State Inspector of Mines, Carson City, Nev. In this position he was responsible for enforcement and industry compliance with Nevada revised statutes regulating mine health and safety. Mr. DuBois began his career in 1958 as a surveyor with Isbell Construction Co., Reno, Nev., and has taken an active role in mine activities at a variety of levels including exploration, land-use engineer, metallurgical consultant, mine lease operator, right-of-way consultants, and general manager of a mine exploration company.

Mr. Rowland was State vice chairman of the Reagan for President Committee during the 1980 Presidential primary campaign and was a member of the State steering committee for the Reagan - Bush Committee during the general election campaign.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation There is no institution more vital to our Nation's survival than the American family. Here the seeds of personal character are planted, the roots of public virtue first nourished. Through love and instruction, discipline, guidance and example, we learn from our mothers and fathers the values that will shape our private lives and our public citizenship.

The days of our childhood forecast our lives, as poets and philosophers long have told us. ``The childhood shows the man as morning shows the day,'' John Milton wrote. ``Train up a child in the way he should go: and when he is old, he will not depart from it,'' Solomon tells us. Clearly, the future is in the care of our parents. Such is the responsibility, promise and hope of fatherhood. Such is the gift that our fathers give us.

Our fathers bear an awesome responsibility -- one that they shoulder willingly and fulfill with a love that asks no recompense. By turns both gentle and firm, our fathers guide us along the path from infancy to adulthood. We embody their joy, pain and sacrifice, and inherit memories more cherished than any possession.

On Father's Day each year, we express formally a love and gratitude whose roots go deeper than conscious memory can recite. It is only fitting that we have this special day to pay tribute to those men -- our natural fathers, adoptive fathers and foster fathers -- who deserve our deepest respect and devotion. It is equally fitting, as we recall the ancient and loving command to honor our fathers, that we resolve to do so by becoming ourselves parents and citizens who are worthy of honor.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 20th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

That's all right. By the time they've given you all the latest information -- or they have, I'm sure, on spending and taxes, we may just ask you to go on up to Capitol Hill then and give the word that I'm still hanging tough for a good tax bill. [Laughter] I'm just as eager for this as I was for the bill on cutting spending. So, we'd just like to have them just get it over with and give us the tax cuts, and we'll go forward from there.

Let me say on behalf of Nancy, who couldn't be here but who wanted to be -- she's got a schedule too, I found out. I used to just come home and open the front door and say, ``I'm home.'' And now I come home, look through 132 rooms, and then look at her schedule -- [laughter] -- to know where she is. But on her behalf -- you who worked on that great Foster Grandparents spot, and on behalf of our administration and millions of our citizens, I'm very honored to continue the tradition that has been observed by every President since FDR. I salute you and your organization on this, your 37th annual conference. My goodness, I was only a small boy when you started. [Laughter] And may I add a simple, ``Thank you, '' for all that you've done.

Through the years you've done this both for peace and in wartime, and your public service work has provided an indispensable source of communication between our Government and the American people. Your ad campaigns have educated, have motivated, have united, have improved the quality of our lives. And you've demonstrated what is really the American spirit, and that is what voluntarism is all about. As you've probably suspected, I'm a great believer in this spirit of voluntary service, cooperation of the private and community initiatives. And that spirit flows like a deep, mighty river through the history of our nation.

In recent years, we've seen the river go down a little bit as government has steadily expanded its own influence over our economic and our personal lives. And as government did this more and more, Americans developed an attitude of, ``Well, why should I worry or get involved? Let the government handle it. That's their business.'' And it really isn't. It's ours, as I think you've always known. So, we know that letting government handle it, as it has done, has done to our economy just about what Mrs. O'Leary's cow did to the city of Chicago -- [laughter] -- which makes organizations like yours all the more important.

I was very gratified to hear that once again you were planning to take action. And this, together with the National Association of Broadcasters, that you're preparing a giant public service ad campaign to educate Americans on the need to improve productivity -- nothing could be more welcome. And if it will help cut through any redtape, let me pledge to you right now the full enthusiastic support of our administration.

Improving productivity, you know, really only requires two things: people who have better ideas and people who have savings and want to invest in those ideas. Now, we have the first. Our problem is today we don't have the second. So, this need for greater savings and investment is why our administration insists that while reducing excessive spending, monetary growth, and regulation, we must also enact tax rate reductions across the board.

I was just looking at some figures up there, and we have doubled the taxes of the people of this country since 1976. What we're asking in our tax cut actually is only the prevention of a gigantic tax increase that is built into the system for the coming year, and we're not really reducing them, we just want to reduce the increase. And I think if the people get to know that, then I think maybe up on the Hill they'll get to know that.

So, we're willing to enact the total recovery program -- economic recovery program, which I think is what the people of this country want. Then we'll provide incentives for greater economic growth than we've had in more than a decade. And when that happens, we'll not only restore strong productivity, we'll reduce inflation, and we'll save that American dream that we all love. The ultimate objective in everything that we're trying to do is to give this economy back to the American people, where it belongs, because they are the most valuable resource of our nation.

You know, America's revolutionary gift to the world is the idea that individual freedom is the inalienable right granted by God to all of us as a birthright, and this is at the core of everything that we've accomplished so far. Now, I know that some call this idea old-fashioned, even reactionary. Well, it's still the most unique, the newest and the most exciting and successful idea the world has ever know.

Albert Einstein, one of the greatest of geniuses, probably summed it up best when he said, ``Everything that is really great and inspiring is created by individuals who labor in freedom.'' Now, this is the message that all of us, and that you and your Advertising Council, we in this administration, must give to our countrymen and the world beyond, because when we do, they'll be telling millions of people the true story about hope and a better tomorrow. And we'll be telling them about America.

The President. Chancellor Schmidt, one of the warmest greetings that Americans can offer in welcoming a guest into their midst is to say, ``Make yourself at home.'' On behalf of our fellow citizens, Nancy and I hope that you and Mrs. Schmidt will make yourselves at home during your visit to the United States. We remember with great pleasure how welcome and at home you made us feel on our visit to Germany in 1978.

As you know, millions of German immigrants over the years have made America their home. With strong hands and good hearts, these industrious people helped build a strong and good America. But as proud as they were of this country, they didn't forget their German heritage. They named towns in the New World after those in the Old. The Federal Republic of Germany has just one Bremen; the Federal Republic has one, but we have Bremens in Indiana, in Georgia, and Ohio. And our States are dotted with Hamburgs and Berlins. In honor of Baron von Steuben, the Prussian officer who aided our revolution, we have cities and towns in a number of States named after him. But I hope you'll forgive us, over the years we've sort of anglicized the pronunciation. We call them now Steubens and Steubensvilles. And the list goes on from Heidelberg, Mississippi, to Stuttgart, Arkansas.

But the Federal Republic of Germany and the United States of America share more than a common background and a well-established friendship. We share values about the importance of liberty. This year marks the 20th anniversary of the Berlin Wall, a border of brutality that assaults the human spirit and the civilized mind. On one side of the wall, people live in dignity and democracy; on the other side, in domination and defeat. We of the United States are aware of the relentless pressure on the Federal Republic and her citizens, and we admire you for your courage in the face of such grim realities.

The Federal Republic is perched on the cliff of freedom that overlooks Soviet dependents to the East. While the dominated peoples in these lands cannot enjoy your liberties, they can look at your example and hope. The United States is proud to stand beside you as your beacon shines brightly from that cliff of freedom.

We both recognize the challenges posed to our security by those who do not share our beliefs and our objectives. And together, we will act to counter those dangers. The United States will work in partnership with you and with our other European allies to bolster NATO and to offset the disturbing buildup of Soviet military forces. At the same time, we will work toward meaningful negotiations to limit those very weapons.

Mr. Chancellor, under your thoughtful and responsible leadership, the Federal Republic has sought to ease tensions in a world taut and quivering with the strains of instability -- not only between East and West but between North and South. And we're aware of the Federal Republic's other contributions as well. Americans remember that when the United States sought support in freeing American prisoners in Iran, the Federal Republic stood firmly by us, and we thank you for that support.

Our economic policies should be as closely allied as our defense policies, for in the end, our military capabilities are dependent on the strengths of our economies. Sound fiscal management was the hallmark of the Federal Republic's economic miracle, and we in the United States intend to import some of that responsibility to gain control of our own economy.

Chancellor Schmidt, I began these remarks speaking of German immigrants who came to America. Let me mention one immigrant in particular -- Johann Augustus Roebling, the man who build the Brooklyn Bridge, which at its opening in 1883 was called the eighth wonder of the world. Well, Mr. Roebling spanned more than the East River with his accomplishment; he spanned two countries and two peoples. The discussions we have today will span our common goals and bridge our joint concerns. They will set the scene for the closest possible consultations in the future.

We have come to rely on one another in times of calm and in times of crisis, and that certainly is the basis of a true friend-partnership. It is in that spirit that I look forward to the important talks ahead.

This is not the first time I've been here, but on each occasion I'm impressed by the authority and dignity which radiates from this seat of government of the mighty United States of America. I am very glad to have this opportunity for an exchange of views with you, Mr. President, on major issues which both of us have much on our minds.

I cannot tell you how happy I am to know that you have recovered so well from the treacherous attempt on your life on the 30th of March. We in Germany have followed your rapid progress with much feeling, sir, and with a great sense of relief.

My visit to Washington is taking place against the background of a serious international situation. At the beginning of the eighties, we are confronted with a whole range of problems and challenges. I need only mention the excessive Soviet arms buildup, the challenge toward the community of nations resulting from the continuing Soviet intervention in Afghanistan, the threat to the non-alignment of the Third World countries stemming from unresolved political conflicts and as a result of East-West conflicts being transferred to their part of the world. And I need only mention, also, the impact of the oil price explosion on the whole world economy.

The Western democracies will be able to cope with these challenges if they show their determination, if they do take joint action, and if they let themselves be guided by the principles of consistency, predictability, and reliability.

Three weeks ago in Rome, Italy, our Alliance gave a clear signal for the continuity of our common policies. I regarded this as a proof of the Alliance's political strength. And as I said in the German Parliament 2 weeks ago, I also regard it as a success for your new administration, sir, here in Washington, D.C.

German-American partnership is today again manifest in the wide-ranging consultations between you, Mr. President, and the German head of government. Good and reliable relations between the Federal Republic of Germany and the United States of America are, in my view, a major factor for the security of the West and for international stability. I am confident that this visit will help us to fulfill our common responsibilities.

Over the past several weeks, all Americans have been proud of the bipartisan spirit that we have created in working on the nation's economic recovery. Today I am writing to you to ask that we now bring that same spirit to bear on another issue threatening our public welfare.

As you know, the Social Security System is teetering on the edge of bankruptcy. Over the next five years, the Social Security trust fund could encounter deficits of up to $111 billion, and in the decades ahead its unfunded obligations could run well into the trillions. Unless we in government are willing to act, a sword of Damocles will soon hang over the welfare of millions of our citizens.

Last week, Secretary Richard Schweiker presented a series of Administration proposals that we believe are sound, sensible solutions, both in the short and long term. We recognize that Members of Congress on both sides of the aisle have alternative answers. This diversity is healthy -- so long as it leads to constructive debate and then to an honest legislative response.

It is clear that the half - actions of the past are no longer sufficient for the future. It is equally clear that we must not let partisan diffferences or political posturing prevent us from working together.

Therefore, I have today asked Secretary Schweiker to meet with you and other leaders of the Congress as soon as possible to launch a bipartisan effort to save Social Security. I have also asked him to make the full resources of his department available for this undertaking. And of course, you can count on my active support of this effort.

None of us can afford to underestimate the seriousness of the problems facing Social Security. For generations of Americans, the future literally rests upon our actions. This should be a time for statesmanship of the highest order, and I know that no one shares that desire more strongly than you.

Earlier today I spoke of America's debt to German immigrants who settled here. Many of their names are easily recognizable: a piano craftsman, Heinrich Steinway; a space scientist, Werner von Braun; Levi Strauss, who created bluejeans -- [laughter] -- and a brewer, Adolphus Busch. But one of our most notable German Americans is the caricaturist Thomas Nast, who made some very special contributions. He gave us our images of Santa Claus, the Republican elephant, the Democratic donkey, and he even created the character of Uncle Sam, the personification of America all around the world.

Now, these symbols have been important to Americans and their self-image. Today I hope we've dealt in both symbol and substance. The arrival ceremony and this state dinner are symbols of a respect and a friendship for the Federal Republic of Germany and its Chancellor. Our discussions, on the other hand, dealt with the substance of our economy and our defense partnership. From these talks, we have a better understanding of our common goals and aspirations.

Let me frankly say that in a way, I regard this evening as a kind of homecoming after having been in your great country so many times, after working with political leaders of both sides of the aisle in America, so many long years, and with four American Presidents, and seeing, of course, so many old friends as your guests tonight, Mr. President. We deem it a great pleasure to be able to end this day, a day of important political discussion here in the White House, as you and Mrs. Reagan's guests.

My wife and I wish you both success and happiness in the years ahead, and I say this with specific emphasis, because we are still feeling the shock of the attempt made on your life, in which you were seriously wounded. We all are grateful and relieved to see that you have recovered so quickly, and I cannot tell you how much I was relieved this morning in getting out of the car and seeing you there, standing upright, and smiling a little and seeming strong and vigorous. We felt deeply sorry about that attempt, and we deeply admired your courage, you circumspection, your unbroken energy. And I'm also glad that the other members of your staff who were wounded are well again or are recovering. And if some of your staff would care, please give them our regards, transmitted to them.

Mr. President, under your leadership the United States is now embarking on a steady course of confidence and self-assuredness. You have set about the task of resolving your country's economic problems with new ideas, exceptional vigor. And I followed with interest how you have applied yourself with great energy, personal commitment to your program for America's economic renewal. And the interest of us Europeans, of us Germans, in your economic renewal is, of course, only too understandable, because the economic well-being of the United States is of direct importance for us in Europe and for us in Germany. It is also for this reason that we hope that your administration will soon meet with success in its efforts to overcome the economic difficulties.

The United States and the Federal Republic are allies whose close cooperation has proved its value in difficult times over more than a quarter of a century now, and I guess it will continue to stand the test in an international environment that is becoming increasingly difficult and also increasingly dangerous. In view of the instability around the world, the partnership between Western Europe and North America, I think, is the prime factor of stability. That partnership remains a constant feature of our policy. It is at no one's disposal. Our American friends can rely on us just as we do rely on the United States.

And we, in particular, welcome the self-confidence, the self-assuredness, of the American Nation under your leadership, Mr. President. We Europeans know that it is crucial for the United States to live up to its responsibilities as a world power allied with Western Europe. We believe that Europe and America have a common destiny. America's political and military presence in Europe is not only an indispensable condition for the security of West Europeans, it's also an essential element of global security, and German-American friendship is one cornerstone of that Euro-American partnership.

The present generation on both sides of the Atlantic know this from past experience. Meanwhile, a new generation is in the process of assuming the responsibility for the destiny of our countries. It is, I feel, one of the foremost tasks of our generation to make sure that the next generation will appreciate the decisive role of this close and trustful partnership -- better still that they themselves experience it. Only then will they be in a position to cherish, defend, and further develop this precious legacy.

The talks and meetings I've had today have proved that we continue with fresh confidence the successful cooperation for the benefit of our peoples and for the preservation of peace. It is on this note, ladies and gentlemen, that I would like to ask you to drink with me to the health of the President of the United States of America and Mrs. Reagan, and to the well-being of the great American Nation.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen of the press, the time has come to me to say goodby to our visitor here. I just want to tell you that we have had fine meetings, and we have an understanding that there will be full consultation and cooperation between us, as there properly should be between friends and allies.

We have been in agreement on the various issues that confront us, ranging from the matters of the problems in Eastern Europe, Poland, of the theater nuclear forces, and the fact that we are going forward with arms limitation talks also, with the Warsaw Pact and with the Soviet Union. All of these things and all of these problems were discussed, and I think we've established a cordial relationship and a friendship that bodes very well for the future and for the West.

Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to agree with every line that the President just relayed to you. The amount of mutual understanding you can measure by the secret which I'm going to disclose right now. The President had a lengthy speech -- a lengthy paper prepared for him by the White House staff, and I was without any such paper. And I said, ``This is unfair.'' And he dropped it immediately.

So, you see, we really did not only agree on such more peripheral issues, but we did agree on the substance of policies whether it is, as the President said, vis-a-vis the Soviet Union and their allies, whether it is in concern of such specific problems as Eastern Europe right now or Afghanistan or the Gulf or the Middle East or Africa or Latin America, Central America, or whether it is in the other fields in which we have mutual interests and shall cooperate in the future.

I would like, Mr. President, also on behalf of my delegation and also on behalf of my wife, to thank you personally, to thank the Vice President, to thank the Secretary of Foreign Affairs, the Secretary of Defense, the Secretary of the Treasury, and the other Cabinet members, to thank all of the hosts in Washington for the warm and cordial welcome not only but also regarding the free uninhibited exchange of views.

I'm not so sure, it's about my 45th or 46th or 47th visit to the United States. It was the fourth time that I had the privilege of meeting you, Mr. President, the first time in your new capacity as the head of state and head of government of the most important nation of the world, the greatest nation. I, to some degree, feel at home in the United States and at home in Washington, D.C. I felt very much at home these 2 days, and I will get back to my people, get back to my parliament, will report to the German Parliament Tuesday next week on how much did we agree on very difficult matters in worldwide politics.

It is due to my lacking a paper, ladies and gentlemen -- and I apologize, Mr. President -- of speaking so long, but what I really want to project towards the ladies and gentlemen of the press is how deeply satisfied I am about this visit.

During the official visit of Chancellor Helmut Schmidt of the Federal Republic of Germany to the United States from May 20 - 23, 1981, President Reagan and the Federal Chancellor held detailed talks on a wide range of political and economic questions. They noted with satisfaction that they share a common assessment of the international situation and its implications for the Western Alliance. They agreed that their two countries have a common destiny founded on joint security interests and firmly rooted in their shared values of liberty, a democratic way of life, self-determination and belief in the inalienable rights of man.

They regard the reliable and proven U.S.-German partnership as an essential factor in international stability and Western security based on the North Atlantic Alliance. They agreed that substantive and effective consultations are a mainstay of the relations between Western Europe and the United States.

The President and the Federal Chancellor welcomed and reaffirmed the results of the recent NATO Ministerial meetings in Rome and Brussels as renewed proof of the political strength of the Alliance and the continuity of Alliance policy. They stressed the determination of Alliance members to take the necessary steps to work with their NATO partners to strengthen the Western defense posture and to address adverse trends due to the Soviet military buildup. Together with deterrence and defense, arms control and disarmament are integral parts of Alliance security policy.

The President and the Federal Chancellor affirmed in this connection their resolve to implement both elements of the NATO decision of December 1979 and to give equal weight to both elements. The Federal Chancellor welcomed the U.S. decision to begin negotiations with the Soviet Union on the limitation of theater nuclear weapons within the SALT framework by the end of this year. He also welcomed the fact that the U.S. Secretary of State has initiated preparatory discussions on theater nuclear forces with the Soviet Union, looking toward an agreement to begin formal negotiations. The President and the Federal Chancellor agreed that TNF modernization is essential for Alliance security and as a basis for parallel negotiations leading to concrete results on limitations of theater nuclear forces. They further agreed that the preparatory studies called for in the Rome Communique should be undertaken as matters of immediate priority by the relevant NATO bodies.

The President and the Federal Chancellor assessed very favorably the close cooperation between the Federal Republic of Germany and the Three Powers in matters relating to Berlin and Germany as a whole. The Federal Chancellor thanked the President for his reaffirmation of the pledge that the United States will continue to guarantee the security and viability of Berlin. They agreed that the maintenance of the calm situation in and around Berlin is of crucial significance for European security and stability.

Both sides noted that a serious international situation has been created by Soviet expansionism and armaments efforts. To meet this challenge and to secure peace, they are determined to respond with firmness and to maintain a dialog with the Soviet Union.

The President and the Federal Chancellor agreed that it is important for the stabilization of East-West relations that the current CSCE Review Conference in Madrid agree on a balanced substantive concluding document which includes enhanced respect for human rights, increased human contacts, a freer flow of information, and cooperation among and security for all of the participants. In this regard, and as part of such a balanced result, the President and the Chancellor favor agreement on a precise mandate for a conference on disarmament in Europe, providing for the application of militarily significant, binding and verifiable confidence-building measures covering all of the continent of Europe from the Atlantic to the Urals.

Poland must be allowed to solve its problems peacefully and without external interference. The President and the Federal Chancellor reaffirmed unequivocally their view that any external intervention would have the gravest consequences for international relations and would fundamentally change the entire international situation.

Genuine nonalignment of the states of the developing world is an important stabilizing factor in international relations. The Chancellor and the President support the independence and the right of self-determination of the states of the developing world. They will, in concert with their Allies and the countries affected, oppose any attempts, direct or indirect, by the Soviet Union to undermine the independence and stability of these states. They confirmed their willingness to continue their cooperaion with these states on the basis of equal partnership and to continue their support of their economic development.

The President and the Federal Chancellor reaffirmed their view that the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan is unacceptable. They demanded the withdrawal of Soviet troops from Afghanistan and respect for that country's right to return to independence and nonalignment. The destabilizing effects which the Soviet intervention in Afghanistan has on the entire region must be countered.

The President and the Federal Chancellor agreed that the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany, the latter within the framework of European political cooperation, should continue the search for a comprehensive, just, and lasting peace in the Middle East. Their efforts should continue to be complementary and build upon what has been achieved so far.

They stressed the vital importance for political and economic stability of further energy conservation and diversification measures to reduce the high degree of dependence on oil. The pressing energy problems can only be mastered on the basis of worldwide cooperative efforts that strengthen Western energy security and reduce the vulnerability of the West to potential supply cutoffs from any source. The supply problems of the developing countries require particular attention.

The President and the Federal Chancellor agreed on the need in framing their economic policies to give high priority to the fight against inflation and to the creation of improved conditions for renewed economic growth and increased productivity. Both sides stressed the need for a close coordination of economic policies among the industrial countries.

The President and the Federal Chancellor noted that their talks once more demonstrated the friendly and trusting relationship that has linked their two countries for over 30 years. They welcomed all efforts which serve to broaden mutual contacts and underlined the responsibility of the coming generation for maintaining and developing German-American friendship.

The American people and I have been shocked and saddened to learn of the tragic death of President and Mrs. Jaime Roldos Aguilera and the Minister of Defense and his wife, Major General and Mrs. Marco Subia Martinez.

Note: President and Mrs. Roldos, Defense Minister and Mrs. Subia, and five other persons were killed on May 24, when the plane in which they were traveling crashed in the mountains near the Peruvian border with Ecuador.

The President has asked Ambassador [Philip C.] Habib to return to Washington for consultations about the progress and future of his mission in the Middle East. As the President's special representative, Ambassador Habib has been engaged in talks with the leaders of Lebanon, Syria, Israel, and Saudi Arabia during the last 3 weeks. The President believes that this is an appropriate moment to receive firsthand Ambassador Habib's views and to discuss with him the future of his continuing mission in the context of efforts peacefully to resolve the crisis involving events in Lebanon.

The President. No -- well, you know, there's a kind of a pause while everybody considers where they are. But we felt that it was necessary now for him to come back here to see us, and then he'll go back.

But we honor you for the responsibility that you're willing to accept. Today you become officers in the Armed Forces of the United States, guardians of freedom, protectors of our heritage. But more than that you become the keepers of the peace.

Those shrill voices that would have us believe the defenders of our nation are somehow the enemies of peace are as false as they are shrill. A Chinese philosopher, Sun Tzu, 2,500 years ago, said, ``Winning a hundred victories in a hundred battles is not the acme of skill. To subdue the enemy without fighting is the acme of skill.'' A truly successful army is one that because of its strength and ability and dedication will not be called upon to fight, for no one will dare to provoke it.

We set out to restore the war-ravaged lands of our erstwhile enemies as well as our friends. We prevented what could have been a retreat into the Dark Ages. Unfortunately another great power in the world was marching to a different drumbeat, creating a society in which everything that isn't compulsory is prohibited. The citizens in that society have little more to say about their government than a prison inmate has to say about the prison administration.

About 10 days ago I addressed the graduating class at the University of Notre Dame. Young men and women of your generation were facing a future in which they wonder what jobs will be available and who their employers will be. You don't have that problem. [Laughter] You know what your job will be, and your employers will be those Notre Dame graduates as well as the rest of your fellow citizens.

Now, of course, they won't be directly and personally in charge. That's left to those of us that they've chosen to represent them -- Secretary Marsh, who is here, Secretary of the Army. But speaking on behalf of all the people, those employers of yours, may I say that we intend that you shall find better working conditions, tools adequate to the tasks you're expected to perform, and pay somewhat more commensurate with the responsibilities you assume than has been the case in recent years.

Now you may have heard rumors to the effect that increasing government spending is not something I'm prone to do, and to tell the truth, there's a certain substance to those rumors. At the same time, I accept without question the words of George Washington: ``To be prepared for war is one of the most effectual means of preserving peace.'' Now, in spite of some things you may have heard, he didn't tell me that personally -- [laughter] -- still, I'm in full agreement and believe that he did say it.

But let me seriously speak about your employers. We've been through a period in which it seemed that we the people had forgotten that government is a convenience of, for, and by the people. And while we were busy with our own affairs, government began to grow beyond the consent of the governed. Its growth was nourished by an ever-larger share of the people's earnings that it took by taxation which became more and more confiscatory. At the same time government neglected one of its prime responsibilities, national security, as it engaged more and more in social experimentation. Our margin of safety in an increasingly hostile world was allowed to diminish, and for a time it seemed that there was an erosion of respect for the honorable profession that you have chosen.

All of this has led to an economic crisis. Deficit spending, an almost trillion dollar debt resulted in runaway inflation, lowered productivity, and great unemployment. And the tools of your trade were given a very low priority.

Well, I'm happy to tell you that the people of America have recovered from what can only be called a temporary aberration. There is a spiritual revival going on in this country, a hunger on the part of the people to once again be proud of America -- all that it is and all that it can be.

Now, the first step in restoring our margin of safety must be the rejuvenation of our economy. A vibrant and expanding economy is necessary if we're to have the research, the technology, and the industry and capacity to provide you with what you need to practice your profession.

Reflecting the will of the people, the government has returned to our long-time tradition of bipartisanship -- not only where national security is concerned but with regard to the economic needs of our people. In recent weeks one could say there were no Democrats or Republicans in Congress -- just Americans.

Yes, there are and will be disagreements, but they are legitimate differences of opinion on how best to reduce government costs, what tax changes will provide incentive to increase productivity, and how best to restore our defense capability. Already the Congress has voted the greatest reduction in the budget ever attempted and, at the same time, has mightily increased the spending for the military. The argument, if there is any, will be over which weapons, not whether we should forsake weaponry for treaties and agreements.

But weaponry alone does not mean security. General George Patton said, ``Wars may be fought with weapons, but they are won by men. It is the spirit of the men who follow and of the man who leads that gains the victory.'' Now, today we seek to make one change in that statement. It is, ``The men and women who follow and the men and women who lead.'' Now -- I meant to ask the General before I got up here, and I forgot to do it, because I've been given two figures -- I know that there are either 58 or 68 women in this graduating class. And I do know that women do constitute more than 9 percent of the Army today.

The indispensable factor for protection for all that we hold dear is leadership, a leadership of you and young men and women like you, that you offer to this Nation. You will be the individuals who most inspire and lead those who are called upon to do the hard and sometimes thankless job.

A torch of leadership is being handed to you in this commencement ceremony today, a ceremony that in all this land is duplicated only in the several other service academies. I know that you've learned the principles of leadership here in this historic place. You know that it requires one to command respect of those who follow by deserving that respect, by dedication and total commitment to the defense of our country and all that it represents.

You've had an excellent example to follow. General Goodpaster, who is, I know, an honorary member of your graduating class now, he arrived as Superintendent almost at the same time as you enrolled as plebes, and he retires now as you graduate. He served his country well, retired as a four-star general, but was willing to leave retirement and give up a star to return to West Point.

You are part of a great tradition. It's overused, I know, but the term ``the long gray line'' is descriptive of the tradition of which you are now a part. In that line have been men who turned defeat into victory, who stood in the breach till citizen armies could be raised. For a time West Point was the nation's principal source of professionally trained engineers. The West was explored and mapped by members of the long gray line. A West Point graduate helped design the Panama Canal and the Holland Tunnel. Two were Presidents. Two are presently Cabinet members in this administration. Others have been giants of commerce and industry -- Henry du Pont, class of 1833; Robert E. Wood, class of 1900.

But our country has a unique tradition among the nations. Unlike the other powers with armies of conscripts, our military was always composed of citizen volunteers. In times past, the standing Army was a skeleton force that expanded in wartime to absorb the draftees, the conscripts. We also counted on a National Guard, a trained reserve to bridge the period when the draftees were undergoing basic training. We must still have that reserve, and we're taking steps to upgrade it to a state of immediate readiness.

We once had the luxury of time provided by the two great oceans -- a luxury we no longer have. At the end of World War II we continued the draft into peacetime even though the peacetime draft was counter to American tradition. We had always believed that only in the most severe national emergency did a government have a claim to mandatory service of its younger citizens.

Young men and women volunteered for duty in our Armed Forces and then found that too much of their reward was expected to be patriotism. And in recent years even here they were shortchanged. In much of the seventies there was a widespread lack of respect for the uniform, born perhaps of what has been called the Vietnam syndrome. The result was inevitable -- a fall-off of enlistments, but even worse, a drop in reenlistment, resulting in a great loss of experienced noncommissioned officers. The cry for a draft arose to a crescendo.

Well, I still believe there is another way, one more in keeping with our system of rewarding those who work and serve, on a scale commensurate with what we ask of them. I don't suppose we could put an exact price on the sacrifice that we ask of those who guarantee our safety, but one thing is certain: They deserve better than a bare subsistence level.

I have asked Secretary of Defense Weinberger to form a Defense Manpower Task Force to review the entire military manpower question and to make proposals which will increase the effectiveness of the active and reserve all-volunteer forces.

Last year's pay increase was a step in the right direction, but we're asking for another one in the fiscal year that begins October 1st. We seek to channel pay increases and bonuses to those in the most needed skill areas. We're studying proposals for a merit pay system and increased flexibility in personnel practices.

A few years ago the GI bill was eliminated and replaced with a program having fewer benefits. At the same time we were expanding Federal aid to college students. The Federal Government, in effect, provided more benefits to those who were not serving their country and reduced them for those who were. The Defense Manpower Task Force will be studying ways in which we can make enlistment more attractive to the kind of young people we need in our military forces.

Already enlistments are up, and so are reenlistments. And surprisingly -- well, maybe we shouldn't be surprised -- many who have already left the service are now returning. There's also been a decided rise in quality as measured by educational and testing attainment. Something other than pay and benefits contributed to this.

I mentioned earlier the new spirit that is abroad in our land. The era of self-doubt is over. We've stopped looking at our warts and rediscovered how much there is to love in this blessed land. All of us together and you very definitely in the posts you go to can help restore the sense of pride our men and women are entitled to have in wearing the uniform.

Let friend and foe alike be made aware of the spirit that is sweeping across our land, because it means we will meet our responsibility to the free world. Very much a part of this new spirit is patriotism, and with that goes a heartfelt appreciation for the sacrifices of those in uniform.

You are a prime ingredient that keeps us free, that protects all we cherish and hold dear. You can transmit the historic heritage which is in the very air of West Point. The first Purple Heart medal was awarded here. It was the first decoration ever given to an enlisted man.

At Trophy Point I'm told there are links of a great chain that was forged and stretched across the Hudson to prevent the British fleet from penetrating further into the valley. Today you are that chain holding back an evil force that would extinguish the light we've been tending for 6,000 years.

Now, before I finish, there is one thing that I should say on behalf of you directly. And that is that in keeping with what I understand is a tradition, I have asked the Superintendent to grant an amnesty. [Applause] I knew I should have saved that for the last -- [laughter] -- but seriously, I wanted to close with some other remarks.

In addition, Mr. Cummings has been the recipient of numerous honors, including the degree of honorary doctor of law from the University of Southern California, the degree of doctor of humane letters from the University of San Fernando, and the degree of doctor of laws from Pepperdine University of Los Angeles.

The President. I am pleased that you're here because I think, in large part, one of the things underlying the program upon which you've been briefed and are going to continue to be briefed today is the balance between State and Federal and local government. And I think that balance is the key to economic recovery in our country and recovery of a lot of other things that you have to deal with every day.

You know what's best for your States; you know what's best for your communities. You are the closest to the people; you hear them. And we in this administration want a partnership with you, and I think with such a partnership there'd be no limit to what we can accomplish.

We need your help in getting the consolidation of categorical grants into block grants. Granted, there are going to be reductions in the budget, as you've been told. But I think if you were given the flexibility to use those block grants with your judgment, the way they should be, set your priorities, that I don't think that you'll feel the pain of those cuts as much as maybe somebody in the bureaucracy up here's going to feel them.

There is one other thing that I think -- if you haven't heard today -- that you would be interested in -- our task force on regulations. So far, more than 100 of them have been targeted for elimination, and more than a third of that 100 will remove the restrictions that are presently imposed on local and State government entities. And having been in State government myself, I've got some experience with some of those regulations and restrictions and the additional paperwork that they call for.

You know what's happening in the country. You're closer to the people, and you hear the cry of the people for some reform. We hope that we'll soon have -- I'm hoping anyway; I know Don Regan has spoken to you this morning already about it -- but I hope that very shortly we'll have a bipartisan tax policy similar to the Gramm-Latta bill, one that we can all go forward together on.

One last point here: Senator Paul Laxalt is chairing a task force and an advisory committee, chairing both of them, and they're on federalism. This, if we'll only look at it, is the secret of America's success. We're unique in all the world in that we were set up to be a federation of sovereign States with as much law as possible kept at the local level.

Q. Mr. President, Joe Malone from Boydentown City, New Jersey. Much has been said about the possibility of a national workfare program. Will the administration be getting involved in a national workfare program?

The President. This is what we are hoping we can achieve. It was an experiment that we tried in California, when we reformed welfare out there, of getting the able-bodied welfare recipients to work at useful community projects in return for their welfare grants. And the way we operated it there -- I don't know what the plans are that are going forward over in Senator Schweiker's office now, but I know he's heart and soul in favor of this, in support of it.

What we did was, they worked 20 hours a week, not 40. And we assigned representatives from the State labor department to them as, what we called, job agents. In other words, we did not want them as permanent. We started first by getting every element of local government, from school districts to communities, counties, whatever, to submit to us those things that, as we defined it, they would be doing if they had the manpower and the money, but which they were otherwise not able to do. In other words, don't invent, make work.

And we screened all those to make sure they were legitimate undertakings. Then these people were sent for to go to work, report for work in those projects. And the job agents watched them, and on the basis of what they saw, they actually acted as agents and went out and tried as quickly as possible to move them from those jobs into private enterprise jobs. And this was most successful in putting tens of thousands of people through that program out into private enterprise jobs at a time when unemployment was increasing in the '73 - '74 recession.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Virgil Brown from Cuyahoga County, Cleveland, Ohio. How do you propose to get fair treatment for, let's say, in a State like Ohio, where we have Cleveland, which is a very urban area, and you have rural areas, and if the block grants are going to come through the State, how do we get fair treatment out of that?

The President. Well, again, I just have to feel and have faith that a State government has got to be fair in this or there will be a different State government. And we haven't had an opportunity -- I haven't had yet -- in the arranging of this program to talk about whether there would be any recourse kept available for the Federal Government if someone tried unfair tactics. But I've met with all the Governors on this, and I know a number of them are very supportive, and I believe these are honorable men who are not going to let that happen. They think they represent all the people.

Q. Jim Long from Indianapolis, Indiana. Mr. President, I have a question on Federal revenue sharing. I feel, and I'm sure a lot of other local officials feel, that we should be helping ourselves, like you do here at the national level. And at the same time, I think some of us are going to have to be prepared enough to know what's going to happen with regards to Federal revenue sharing and whether it's going to be done away with in the near future or not.

The President. Well, you mean Federal revenue sharing; you mean by way of the block grants that we're talking about. Let me tell you, we need your help, because this is going to be probably one of the most difficult of all the parts of our reform program to bring about. There is a great reluctance on the part of the Federal Government to trust the people out there, and they believe that inhaling the fogs off the Potomac imparts a wisdom that is not generally shared. [Laughter] But we are going to need help to get that. There's a reluctance to give up that authority.

I have to tell you that I think the block grants -- my long distance dream is that the block grants are only a bridge, that the real ultimate goal should be to transfer the actual sources of taxation to State and local governments.

Q. Gary Thalen, Mr. President, and I'd like to thank you for this afternoon here, and appreciate the administration's effort in their deregulation program and the bureaucracy that causes so many problems on counties and municipal governments. Thank you, sir.

Q. Mr. President, we're going through the same process -- I'm Marie Muhler from New Jersey -- on our budget as the Federal Government is. The only information that we are getting from our bureaucrats in every area in government at the State level is a list of all the cuts. What we would like to know is the information about the block grants, some idea. If there's a billion dollar cut, we want to know just what portion -- is it 20 percent that can be restored in block grants, is it 70 percent? -- or some way to lobby our congressional delegation so that those of us that are in a minority have the ammunition to say, fine, maybe those are the cuts, we make these decisions, and this is where we have to trim before we adopt our budgets.

The President. Well, I think very possibly this afternoon you might get an answer to that in the briefing that will be on block grants. If not, I certainly will make sure that that is a consideration. I think all of us are aware that most of the screams of pain that we're hearing are coming from the bureaucracy and not from the supposed victims of our cuts.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Hazel Gluck. I'm an assemblywoman from New Jersey. I know one of the cornerstones of your economic recovery program is your tax cut plan. I read with great concern, through the media, through the New York media and the New Jersey media, that Wall Street, the financial community, is resisting the tax cut plan because they feel it's inflationary. How do you address that?

The President. Well, one thing that I address it on is that I have never found Wall Street a source of good economic advice. [Laughter] They are sitting there watching anything that they think may change the interest rates and the bond market and so forth, and it is true that they have not recognized history, for that matter.

John F. Kennedy proposed a broad, across-the-board income tax cut over a 2-year period, and it was implemented after he was gone. But the economists were rising up and telling him that this was going to reduce Federal revenues by $83 billion, and he had some very good answers, such as he said, ``A rising tide raises all boats.'' And he stuck to his guns.

Well, they made about a $143 billion mistake, because when the score was finally in, the government had actually increased its revenues at the lower rates by more than $50 billion. In other words, proper tax cuts can stimulate the economy. The individual pays less tax but there are more individuals paying it, and the economy is broadened at every level.

This happened with regard to the cut in the capital gains tax. They reduced the rates in the capital gains tax, and the next year the government got more money from the lower rate. Now, what was the answer to that? The answer was that when the tax rates are at a certain level, those people with money to invest start looking for tax shelters, and they're not going to increase productivity with tax shelters. And once you make it more profitable, they bring that money out of the tax shelters and start investing in industry, in America, and backing entrepreneurs with commercial ideas and so forth.

You can go all the way back. I mentioned the tax cuts in Coolidge's era. Every one of those tax cuts resulted in more revenues for the Government because of the increased prosperity of the country as a whole.

Q. My name is Emily Morris, and I reside in a county that is three to one Democrat registration. I want to applaud you on your program, to let you know that I support it and many of my race support the program as well, and also to let you know that direct services to people do not have to be phased out or eliminated. We can look for other options and other alternatives, and I want you to know that in Delaware that's the way we're going to be going.

The President. Oh, bless you, and thank you. Thank you very much. I could take advantage of this. They said that I could only take one more question. That would be a great one to quit on. If you'll all forgive me, I'll take this gentleman here. I know you've had your hand up before.

Q. I'm Chuck Hebner, speaker of the house, in Delaware, also. I applaud your practical approach to the regulation problem, but I'd like to call your attention, if I may, to one of the most pervasive regulatory bodies we face. That is the Federal courts and the Federal judges, particularly. I don't want you to try to fetter them, sir, but I wish there was a way to channel their practicality, and I just ask you to take a look at that problem.

The American people join me in extending our deepest condolences over the passing of a great leader and a great son of the Polish nation, Cardinal Wyszynski. Americans nurtured a deep respect and admiration for Cardinal Wyszynski as Primate of Poland. He played a vital role in helping to safeguard deep and enduring values which both our peoples share, and in the development of close relations between our two countries over the past quarter-century. My compatriots and I fully share Poland's deep sense of loss.

The treaty is one of a series of modern extradition treaties being negotiated by the United States. It expands the list of extraditable offenses to include narcotics violations, aircraft hijacking, bribery, and obstruction of justice, as well as many other offenses not covered by our existing extradition treaty with Colombia. Upon entry into force, it will terminate and supersede the existing Extradition Treaty and Supplementary Convention between the United States and Colombia.

This treaty will make a significant contribution to international cooperation in law enforcement. I recommend that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to the treaty and give its advice and consent to ratification.

The administration as of this hour has received only secondhand reports on the Democratic caucus this afternoon. Treasury Secretary Regan looks forward to a more complete, firsthand report from Chairman Rostenkowski in the near future.

In the meantime, President Reagan's position remains firm: Across-the-board, multiyear tax cuts are just as essential to economic recovery as across-the-board, multiyear budget cuts. The President remains hopeful that a bipartisan coalition can be built in Congress to give the American people the tax cuts that they so clearly need, want, and deserve.

As of the end of February 1981, a total of 3,872 individuals had commenced education training under the VEAP program. The relatively low training rate reflects, in part, the fact that under the law an individual may not begin to use his or her educational entitlement until completion of the first obligated period of active duty or 6 years of active duty, whichever period is less. Since the law did not become effective until January 1, 1977, the number of persons eligible to pursue training has thus far been minimal.

Over the next several months the Administration will be continuing its evaluation and review of both the VEAP and Department of Defense test programs, with a view towards developing legislative recommendations regarding education programs for servicemembers and veterans. In view of this effort, I am recommending that the VEAP program be continued beyond its current termination date of December 31, 1981. This will permit the Administration to complete its review and will provide time for submission of legislative recommendations that I anticipate will be submitted in early 1982.

Recently, the Veterans Administration submitted legislation to the Congress that would authorize a 1-year extension of the Veterans' Educational Assistance Program and make certain other adjustments in Public Law 94 - 502. I urge the Congress to enact this legislation.

I was shocked and deeply grieved to learn of the assassination of President Ziaur Rahman. The United States -- indeed the world -- had come to respect President Zia's profound and compassionate commitment to a better life for his people and his dedication to the rule of law. His wisdom in international affairs will be sorely missed. I am confident that the people of Bangladesh are united in their determination to assure that the stability and progress of recent years will survive this tragedy. Please extend to Begum Zia and her children my sincere condolences on this sad occasion.

May 1 is celebrated as Labor Day in many parts of the world. Although this celebration originated in the United States, recently the Communist world has paid it special attention. This takes on ironic significance in the wake of the brutal actions by Polish authorities to crush Solidarity, the only free trade union in a Communist country.

Poland is no longer on the front pages every day, but we must not allow her people to be forgotten. We must continue to honor the unbroken spirit of the Polish people and to call upon Poland's leaders to recognize their commitments. The Polish leaders must take positive action if there is to be hope for either economic recovery or a healing of the hatred and bitterness that the political repression has generated.

On December 23, we imposed a broad range of economic sanctions against Warsaw in response to the government's declaration of martial law. We made it clear that these sanctions are reversible if and when Polish authorities restore the internationally recognized human rights of the Polish people. When that happens, we stand ready to provide assistance to help in Poland's economic recovery.

The actions taken earlier this week by the Polish Government are a welcome step in the right direction but are not enough. By their own count over 2,000 citizens, including Lech Walesa, are still imprisoned. I would like to lift our sanctions and help Poland, but not until the Polish Government has ended martial law, released the detainees, and reopened a genuine dialog with Solidarity, led by Lech Walesa.

So on this day, Law Day in the United States, when we commemorate our principles of liberty and individual rights, we reflect upon the Polish people's lack of such freedoms and upon their struggle to gain them.

Two nights ago I went on national television asking you to help us get a bipartisan budget passed in this Congress -- not just any budget, but a budget that will hold down your taxes and get spending under control so we can reduce deficits, interest rates, and put unemployed Americans back to work. Let me just say, your calls and telegrams really warmed my heart. You came through with the greatest outpouring of support our administration has ever received, and you let us know that while our program did not in its first 30 weeks solve all the problems that have piled up for more than 30 years, it is beginning to work.

We're seeing signs that the economy is ready to turn up. The record high interest rates we inherited nearly wrecked the housing industry, but as we've begun to bring those rates down, housing starts have increased steadily over the last 5 months. Airline travel, an indicator of future business activity, is up. There'll be an increase in automobile production in the second quarter of 1982.

Another very important sign -- Americans are starting to save again. In the 6 months since that first 5-percent phase of our tax cut took effect, the rate of personal savings has risen to 5.7 percent from 5.1 percent for the year before. This means billions more in the capital pool to finance new investments, jobs, and economic growth. It also indicates lower interest rates ahead.

Federal budget to assisting low-income Americans. But let's ask ourselves, where was the fairness in those bankrupt spending policies that gave us double-digit inflation, record interest rates, and a trillion-dollar debt? Where is the fairness now if we make even more painful the highest peacetime tax burden we've ever known? We're not going to do that. With your support, with responsible Republicans and Democrats working together, we can pass a good budget that will help taxpayers more than it hurts them.

Federal budgets, and that's why I'm appealing to all of you at the grassroots. Start putting pressure on the Congress now. Let's find out who's hiding behind the rhetoric of balanced budgets but is unwilling to make the cuts in spending needed to bring them about.

There are now two resolutions pending, one in the House and one in the Senate, that enjoy strong support and that would lead to such a constitutional amendment. They would require the Congress to adopt a balanced statement of taxes and spending each year. But the growth in revenues could not exceed the prior year's growth in national income. In other words, it would contain a limitation so that you couldn't just have a balanced budget by always sending the bill to the taxpayers for whatever the deficit might be. A balanced budget amendment would have to be ratified by three-fourths of the States. The Congress could approve a deficit, but only by a 60-percent vote of the full membership of both the House and Senate.

All Americans can be proud of this World's Fair that we open today. For the next 6 months, we'll be host to representatives of 22 nations -- more countries than have participated in any world exposition in more than a decade. Here in Knoxville, in the Tennessee foothills, in the hometown of John Duncan, the home State of my good friends Howard Baker and Lamar Alexander, Robin Beard, and Jimmy Quillen, the world will share its knowledge, accomplishments, and hopes  for tomorrow. Americans welcome the world to Tennessee.

The technology exhibited here once seemed as fanciful as the extraction of sunbeams from cucumbers in ``Gulliver's Travels.'' But as de Tocqueville said, when people live in democracy, enlightenment, and freedom, their societies will be marked by scientific genius and discovery.

Inventors of the world share the discoveries of their laboratories, universities, and research centers; let us pool our knowledge, technology, and our dreams. In the days and months ahead, let this spot be the focus of progress, not only in the field of energy but for the cause of the peace.

The theme of this fair, ``Energy Turns the World,'' is appropriate for this decade, as our nation and many of our allies struggle to produce and use energy efficiently -- to provide for our energy security.

We've seen the havoc and felt the pain brought on when vital energy sources outside our influence have been cut off. We've seen our economies manipulated, our industries hamstrung, and our people squeezed between scarcity and inflation. Together and independently, we've taken steps to make sure that never again will we be so vulnerable.

Here in America, in this administration, our national energy policy dictates that one of the government's chief energy roles is to guard against sudden interruptions of energy supplies. In the past, we tried to manage a shortage by interfering with the market process. The results were gas lines, bottlenecks, and bureaucracy. A newly created Department of Energy passed more regulations, hired more bureaucrats, raised taxes, and spent much more money, and it didn't produce a single drop of oil. In fact, American oil production continued to decline. Just as in today -- and too many other cases -- government did not solve the problem; it became the problem.

Our administration is determined to press forward for real solutions. Already we have dramatically increased our Strategic Petroleum Reserve. Instead of managing scarcity, we'll help ensure continued supplies from a strategic stockpile, alleviating shortages while permitting the private market to work.

Our stockpile, I'm happy to tell you, is now one of the largest in the world -- more than a quarter billion barrels -- an amount greater than 135 days' supply of the crude oil we import from the Arab OPEC nations. Last year, this reserve has been stocked with more than twice as much oil as was accumulated in the preceding 4 years. We will increase it to nearly three times our current supply as a symbol to our allies of our resolve to reduce our vulnerability. We will ensure that our people and our economy are never again held hostage by the whim of any country or cartel.

In the area of conservation, our industries and our citizens have increased energy efficiency and cut back on waste. The amount of goods and services that we produce for each unit of energy went up last year by 4\1/2\ percent -- the greatest increase in 30 years. For the last several months, our net oil imports have been less than half of their 1977 levels. But energy is still a great concern. Even with our improved conservation, we consume 16 million barrels of oil a day.

We are one of the most productive nations in the world. Estimates show that the 25 eastern States and Washington, D.C. -- which expends most of its energy shuffling paper -- produce about as much in goods and services as the entire Soviet Union. And with only 5 percent of the world's population, we Americans account for more than 21 percent of the world's output. But we can't afford to be complacent. Our energy appetite means our energy production must be allowed to keep pace.

America produced nearly 90 percent of the energy that is consumed. What caused this turnaround? The same principle responsible for most of the prosperity, production, and progress in the world today: free enterprise.

Our economic and energy problems were in large part caused by government excesses and quick fixes, not by a basic scarcity of supply. Our principles have not failed us. Too many times, we have failed to live up to our principles.

Since January 1981, when I ordered immediate decontrol of oil, we have removed requirements for more than a million man-hours of energy-related paperwork, eliminated more than 200 energy-related regulations, cut taxes to encourage capital investment, begun to dismantle the Department of Energy, and reduced spending nearly $5 billion from the levels proposed by the previous administration. We're unleashing, again, the power of our people and the forces of democratic capitalism.

Within a year of decontrol, more than 1,000 new drilling rigs began searching for oil and natural gas. Forty percent more successful oil wells were completed in '81 than the year before. In February our oil production was the greatest it's been for the last 2 years. There is magic in the free marketplace, and it works.

Although oil has been decontrolled, natural gas, the nation's largest source of domestic energy production, remains under price controls. As a result, natural gas wells have increased only 10 percent. The legislative agenda this year is too crowded to handle the issue of natural gas decontrol. But if America is to provide for her energy security, if we're to continue growing more self-reliant, if we're to free ourselves from foreign pressure, we must press toward the ultimate solution to our energy problems: the decontrol of all of our energy sources, including natural gas.

Within our boundaries and just off our shores, experts estimate that compared to our current reserves, three times as much oil and gas are yet to be discovered. We're also blessed with a quarter of the free world's coal and uranium resources.

In the last year, America has also greatly increased exports of coal, strengthening our economy and helping our allies lessen their dependence on imported oil. In 1981 exports from this country of coal reached 110 million tons. That's 20 percent more than the previous year. Coupled with our decreasing oil imports, this meant America's net dependence on foreign energy fell to less than 13 percent. It was nearly 25 percent in 1977.

Though quite small, our use of solar power is expanding. Many people across the country are experimenting with renewable technologies such as wind and geothermal power. The Synthetic Fuels Corporation has also become operational, managing loan guarantees and price supports for some important projects. But heavy reliance on these sources is still in the future. We still have to depend on practical sources available today, such as nuclear power, which now produces more of America's electricity than oil. The Clinch River reactor, which will use new breeder technology, and the Oak Ridge National Laboratory, not far from here, symbolize our commitment to developing safe nuclear energy and technology to secure our energy future.

Carolina he spotted a car bearing a bumper sticker, ``Split wood, not atoms.'' Well, he said he didn't think the fellow driving the car had ever split much wood -- especially not a one, enough for a typical family's needs -- because it isn't very easy. I can testify to that. But Jim said he wanted to tell him that America must split both atoms and wood. It'll take the use of many technologies to satisfy our future energy demands.

The staggering statistics of progress that I've recited today -- our growing independence from foreign oil and our increasing sophistication in using our reserves -- reflect American ingenuity at its best. This progress didn't come about as the result of some government program. It's the result of getting government out of the way.

We're applying the same philosophy to our economy: restoring incentive, rewarding risktaking and hard work, encouraging investment, and returning more freedom to the marketplace. An economic mess has been piling up for more than 40 years. Our economic recovery program began only 6 months ago, but already there are visible signs of success.

In the last 6 months, inflation, which was 12.4 percent, has been running at a rate of only 3.2 percent. And last month the Consumer Price Index -- the measure of inflation -- actually went down. For the first time in 17 years, not only did goods not get more expensive; they got cheaper.

Now, we still have a long way to go before our economy is back in shape. And this recession is causing great pain to too many of our people. But there was a thing called the misery index that was created in the 1976 Presidential campaign. It was used against the then incumbent President Ford. And the misery index had been created by adding the rate of inflation and unemployment.

And at that time, they were something around 12 percent. And they were used over and over against, as I say, the President in that campaign. Well, in the 1980 campaign, they didn't mention the misery index, because it had risen to 20.8 percent. I'm happy to tell you the misery index is now currently 9.8 percent.

Still, there is pressure from many sides to retreat to business-as-usual. There are still those in leadership positions who would allow government to grow bigger and bigger. Many well-intentioned people suggest that we can't spend less and we must tax more. As the decisions become tougher and the stakes get higher, some people in Washington are throwing up their hands. Their only answer for our energy problems, for our economy, and for virtually any difficulty at all, is more government.

Orange trying to pull a football game out in the fourth quarter by punting on third down. No government in the history of civilization has ever voluntarily reduced itself in size. But with God's help, this one's going to.

Yes, we had the largest tax cut in history last year, but it barely offsets the massive, largest tax increase in history that had been passed in 1977. And yes, we cut the rate of growth in government spending -- nearly in half. But if we don't cut spending more and if we don't protect the people's tax cut, we'll see the largest deficit and the highest personal tax burden in American history.

Washington just to do what everyone did before us -- spend and spend and spend. We don't have a trillion-dollar debt because we don't tax enough; we have a trillion-dollar debt because we spend too much.

We must balance the budget but history shows it can't be done simply by raising taxes. And for that reason, I've asked the Congress to pass as soon as possible a constitutional amendment to require a balanced budget. Then there will be no partisan pointing of fingers; there'll be no refusal to compromise; and there will no longer be any red ink below the bottom line of our budget.

Twenty years of tax-and-spend policies resulted in 21-percent interest rates, back-to-back years of double-digit inflation, and the unemployment rate that afflicts us today. Retreating to those tired old policies will only bring us more of the same. We plan to hold down spending, reduce taxes, and return prosperity. And we think that's the most compassionate program of help for the people that we can possibly produce.

Abraham Lincoln said, ``God would never cease to call America to her true service, not only for her sake, but for the sake of the world.'' I believe the challenge of this generation of Americans is to turn our country to a different path, to restore it to the principles that made it great, because the free world -- indeed, western civilization -- needs a strong United States.

You know, to those who have refused to take part, who are conspicuously absent, who continue to lock their people in misery through isolation and tyranny, we can say to them only: We wish you had come. But we'll make no effort to hide this wealth of ideas. We believe advances in the human condition can only come from open markets, free trading, and stiff competition. Men and nations who ignore those forces will be lost to time.

Let the rest of us draw from this exposition a sense of confidence and community. Let us realize that free men and women still have the power to better their lives and raise the standard of living for all mankind. Let us recognize that those things that bind us and keep us strong: our democratic political institutions, our market economic systems, our commitment to liberty, and our belief and faith in human dignity. And let us reaffirm our partnership among citizens, among States, and among nations.

What a partnership it was for this community to bring forth this great exposition. Maybe we should all recall that late in the last century, there was a great world exposition. And, at that time, there was a Member of our Congress who actually proposed a measure to eliminate the Patent Office, because he said that everything had been invented that needed to be invented or that could be invented. Well, I wouldn't be talking into a microphone today, if we'd gone along with that.

The President. Simply because there was no report of it to us, until we received the reports that I mentioned this morning and the claims by both countries. But I'm keeping informed here, and we have nothing yet that we can add to what I've said.

Mac, I hope you won't be wronged if I tell something about -- Mac stands up here as a businessman and a Cabinet member now, handling that great Department of Commerce. But one of my fondest memories after I was elected was when I called to ask him to take that position.

But isn't it wonderful to see young people still understand that growing up American means they can reach as high, accomplish as much, and go as far as their talent and effort will take them? This beautiful pavilion is proof that other generations of Americans believed in dreams. It's wonderful to see that these young people believe they can see their dreams come true.

Earlier today, awestruck by just the glimpses that I've been able to get of some of the technology here, I referred to ``Gulliver's Travels.'' That's a book that Omar may be familiar with. There's a character in that book who's trying to find a way to extract sunbeams from cucumbers. And I remarked that not long ago the technology exhibited here seemed every bit as fanciful as cucumber power. Now, I'm not suggesting that America devote much time or money to researching cucumbers. But we are a people known for dreaming with our eyes wide open.

We live our dreams. We make them come true. Our ideas and energies combine in a dynamic force -- the kind of force that made the developments and breakthroughs and discoveries in this building possible. And that force has always enabled America to overcome great odds, and it always will. We just refer to it as the American spirit. That's the spirit Omar has, and that spirit is why I'm sure this country is going to do just fine.

I think the greatest description of the difference between the two countries is simply that one has to put up fences and walls to keep its people in, and there's nothing like that that has to keep anyone in America. And thanks be to God. We're free just as we have been. Omar and his generation are free to dream and then turn those dreams into reality.

Our task is to ensure that children and their children's children have their same chance to grow up in liberty. So, Omar, once again, bless you, and thank you for your gift. Thank you for the inspiration. And I can assure you that every time we'll look at this, we'll be more and more sure that the impossible can be done. It just takes a little longer.

The Northern Mariana Islands, as part of the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, are administered by the United States under a Trusteeship Agreement between the United States and the Security Council of the United Nations (61 Stat. 3301). The United States has undertaken to promote the political development of the Trust Territory toward self-government or independence, to protect the rights and fundamental freedoms of its peoples, and to guarantee freedom of speech and of the press.

Certain provisions of that Act limit the issuance of licenses, other authorizations, and privileges to citizens of the United States. Other provisions of the Act prohibit the issuance of certain licenses to foreign governments, aliens, corporations organized under the laws of a foreign government, and corporations of which any officer or director is an alien, or of which more than one-fifth of the capital stock is owned by aliens, or to corporations which are directly or indirectly controlled by corporations under alien control.

United States until the termination of the Trusteeship Agreement. Consequently, the Government of the Northern Mariana Islands, its citizens, and corporations organized or existing under laws of the Northern Mariana Islands, as well as domestic corporations which have officers, directors, or stockholders in excess of 20 percent, who are citizens of the Northern Mariana Islands, or which are otherwise under the control of Northern Mariana Islands interests cannot receive certain licenses, authorizations, and other privileges under the Act. This result would be inconsistent with the obligation assumed by the United States in the Trusteeship Agreement to protect the rights and fundamental freedoms of the people of the Trust Territory and to guarantee freedom of speech and of the press.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 3rd day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

I said I simply told them what a pleasure it was to come and be able to visit them here and how much I regretted any unpleasantness that they may have had, because there shouldn't be any place in our country for that sort of thing.

Act of 1965 had made in protecting the voting rights of minority citizens, I called for a 10-year extension of that law. No previous extension had been as long. I also asked that the bilingual provision in the law be extended so that it is concurrent with the other special provisions of the act.

The matter is now before the Senate Judiciary Committee, which has held extensive hearings and is preparing to report out a bill to the floor of the Senate. There appears to be nearly unanimous support in the committee for some form of extension.

Specifically and most importantly, we have questioned whether the standard of proof introduced in voting rights cases would lead to proportional representation in many election districts. Such proportional representation would, of course, be alien to the traditional political principles of our country.

During the past week, a majority of the Judiciary Committee has worked hard to fashion a constructive, bipartisan compromise that addresses this concern. In this regard, their compromise would greatly strengthen the safeguards against proportional representation while also protecting the basic right to vote.

Today I not only want to salute the efforts of those who have forged this compromise, but I also want to give it my heartfelt support. My hope is that it will now pave the way toward swift extension of the Voting Rights Act by the entire Congress.

Two hundred seven years ago, in June 1775, the first distinctive American flags to be used in battle were flown over the colonial defenses at the Battle of Bunker Hill. One flag was an adaptation of the British ``Blue Ensign'' while the other was a new design. Both flags bore a symbol reflecting the experience of Americans who had wrested their land from the great forests: the pine tree.

Philadelphia still flies today over our Nation, symbolizing a shared commitment to freedom and equality and altered only to reflect our growth to fifty states with the gradual addition of thirty-seven more white stars.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 4th. day of May in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

It is a great pleasure to be here tonight among those of you who have, with your interest and generosity, made a real difference in American politics. We need more people like yourselves to make that vital difference to help in the struggle for the principles that we all believe in.

But if politics has its drawbacks, I think you'll also agree that it also has its great moments. And being here tonight is one. What we accomplish between now and next November can provide us with another one.

Now, let me put you at ease. I didn't come here tonight to lecture you on the economy or to make off-hand predictions about the exact figures making up this year's growth rate. The problems of interest rate, unemployment, and deficits aren't any secret. And you, of all people, know that it was the policies, as Guy has told us, of tax and tax and spend and spend over many decades that brought those problems on.

Getting our message across will take time and effort, but we do have tremendous advantages. The issues are with us this year. And by November 2d, if we do our job well, the voters will be in a mood to reconfirm the mandate that they gave us in 1980.

Remember, after the national political debate gets underway, it's the other party that will have to make some stark admissions to the American people. It's the liberal leadership of the other party that is going to have to say, ``We're the ones who refuse to cut spending. We're the ones who tried to take away your tax cut. We're the ones who tried to protect every lord and fiefdom in the Federal bureaucracy. We're the ones who wanted a bargain-basement military and held a fire sale on national security.'' And, believe me, when they start talking like that, I think we, as Republicans, ought to give them all the running room they need and want.

Republic was founded on: that there resides in the American people a common wisdom, a basic decency that comes to the fore just when it's needed most. The American people know the kind of economic catastrophe that this administration and this new majority in the Senate and these Congressmen who are here tonight inherited. They sense the enormous strides that we've made in reversing that trend and laying the foundation for economic recovery.

With the help of responsible Democrats and Independents, the American people also know that our party has done something that hasn't been done in politics for a very long time. Yes, as Guy said, we were going to cut spending, reduce the tax burden, rebuild our national defenses, and keep the peace by being firm with the Soviets. We said those things, and we meant them. We made our promises, and we kept them. Now it's vital that all of us, officeholders and nonofficeholders alike, remind the people of what they already instinctively know and feel.

Most Americans spend their time bringing up their families and making a living. They don't talk and think politics nearly as much as we who are in this room do. Remember, something that might sound repetitive to us in politics is probably something that most Americans will be hearing for the first time. So, starting tonight, let's go to the American people.

Let's remind them of the economic mess we faced when we took office that January: inflation in double digits, as you've been told, for 2 years in a row, back to back; first time in peacetime, interest rates that had hit, yes, 21\1/2\ percent; productivity and the rate of growth in the gross national product down for the third year in a row; and a money supply that had increased at a 13-percent annual rate in the last half of 1980.

Let's remind them that when we took office, unemployment had been climbing and business failures increasing. When the recession hit us, it was our legacy from the years of boom-and-bust, of erratic spending and monetary policy. And that recession didn't just come out of the sky; it actually began in 1979.

I remember standing in one town in the Midwest during the campaign and calling attention of the audience to the fact that in that town then unemployment was 20 percent. And in the next city that I went to it was 18 percent. And so it went down through the Ohio Valley, into the midwestern States, where the collapse had already begun in several important industries.

By 1980 one out of every three American families was receiving Federal assistance of one sort or another -- one out of every three families. The budget for the Department of Health and Human Services -- $250 billion roughly, the third largest budget in the world, exceeded only by the total budgets of the Soviet Union and the United States.

I use the food stamp program here because surveys show that it is the one Federal program whose abuses Americans have personally seen on a weekly basis at the checkout counters of their supermarkets. One report a few years ago by the auditor general of Florida, for example, showed that in a single month, 16 percent of the State's recipients had fraudulently obtained food stamp benefits totaling $4 million, and another 15 percent of the Florida recipients had received 1\1/2\ million in benefits through bureaucratic errors. And those figures were for a single month in a single State.

Topsy-like growth of all entitlement programs. Total payments as to individuals grew 400 percent in the last decade alone. Now, include in this picture the interest payments on our tremendous Federal debt, that, as you've been told, reached more than a trillion dollars last year. The yearly interest payments are a hundred billion dollars, and that's as much as the entire Federal budget was just 20 years ago -- and we can all remember back 20 years ago, and I don't think that we were lacking for any amount of government with what we were spending then.

In fact, if you take the cost of automatic spending increases and entitlement programs, add them to the interest payments and the Federal debt and the other uncontrollables, and it means that 70 percent of the entire Federal budget is made up of items over which the Congress and the administration are supposed to have no control. I wonder how some of you in the private sector would feel if you were told to rescue a sinking business, but only on the condition that you could work with 30 percent of that business' budget and the other 70 percent was off-limits. So I think you can begin to understand the difficulty of halting the kind of momentum built up by the Federal spending juggernaut over the past few decades.

Capitol, and signed an Executive order [memorandum] that began the long and difficult process of slowing the growth of government. It was an Executive order freezing the hiring of Federal employees at the limit at which they were then in their offices and jobs.

Our economic recovery program has cut the rate of growth in Federal spending nearly in half. It'll cut taxes for individuals and business by more than $300 billion by 1984. It will cut taxes for individuals and business by more than $300 billion by 1984. For the first time in history, taxes are scheduled to be indexed to the rate of inflation. That takes away government's hidden incentive to inflate the currency. And finally we acted quickly and effectively to cut away the thicket of Federal regulations -- a thicket that was stifling business and industrial growth.

Bush is on his way to China right now to have some conversations with them, but George has been chairing that task force that has been whittling away at those regulations. And the Federal Register is smaller by some 23,000 pages. That's the book that lists the regulations.

We're cutting the number of people in the Federal payroll by 75,000 over the next few years and are fighting to dismantle the Department of Energy and the Department of Education -- agencies whose policies have frequently been exactly the opposite of what we need for real energy growth and sound education for our children.

I think we can stand on the record. We managed in less than 1 year to substantially slow the momentum of decades of growth in government. The new management of a failing company that made changes like this in only 1 year would soon be the talk of Wall Street. Things are a little different in Washington.

Our program has been in effect for only a little more than 7 months. Our dollar is stronger than it's been in 10 years. The inflation rate, which a year ago was the number one economic concern of most Americans, has taken a dramatic turn. The year 1981 ended with an inflation rate of 8.9 percent. It had been 12.4 in 1980. And since the beginning of this fiscal year, in October, inflation has averaged 3.2 percent. The rate for February was only 3 percent. And then in March, for the first time in nearly 17 years, the Consumer Price Index actually declined. It actually went below zero, and the prices went down. Now, that's a record we can point to.

We have to go to the American people and explain how our economic recovery program is designed to help everyone. We have to go to the American people and make clear the basic philosophical difference between we Republicans and the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party, that that is the difference that sets us apart and that the people must choose between.

Federal bureaucrats the right to redistribute our people's income in the hope of ushering in some great new utopia. Our economic program will try to help everyone. It'll encourage wealthier Americans to stop seeking tax shelters and invest in productive industries and businesses that will provide new jobs and greater wealth for all of us. It'll give the middle class -- the middle-class, working American a fatter paycheck, a lowered inflation rate, a chance to invest and save, a chance to get a little ahead of the game again.

It'll help entrepreneurs, small businessmen, those who hope someday to go into business for themselves by giving them greater rewards for the risks they take in the marketplace. Small business, as you all know, provides 80 percent of the new jobs in America. So, our tax cuts will help gradually to cut the rate of unemployment and get Americans back to work by stimulating small business and new enterprise.

And our program is going to help lower income Americans. Let me revise that. It has already helped them. A family of four with a fixed income of $15,000 has over $1,000 more in spending power because of the decreased inflation rate already. Now, that's a bigger increase in help to lower income Americans than was ever given in a single year by the increase in many of the aid programs dreamed up by the other party during the last few decades.

Federal programs partly because they're interested in preserving the huge bureaucracies that those programs feed on. You know, with all of the attempt to help the truly needy and the people who must have our help, actually too many of those programs really set up, established, and then perpetuated an upper-middle class level of bureaucrats who had to maintain those needy people in their needy state as a clientele to preserve their own new-found wealth.

Dependency on government should never be looked on as a chance to build a political constituency. Those who were dependent on government through no fault of their own must always be provided for. But to the millions of Americans who want to end their own dependency, we must offer a better way to improve their lives and climb the economic ladder as high as their aspirations will take them.

There are people who are sharpening their pencils tonight to talk about this dinner and write about this dinner, and it will be listed as the ultimate in wealth and so forth. And we, of course, will be referred to as we are so often as the party of the rich. You know, that isn't what is -- that isn't true. And that isn't what our party wants to be. No party, I guess, wants to be that. But I'll tell you what I think we can be proud of. We're the party that wants to see an America in which people can still get rich.

We've actually cut tax rates and the rate of growth in spending, something that American politicians have been promising for more than 20 years but somehow never delivered. But even more than that, we offer the American people what Franklin Roosevelt offered them in the 1930's -- not the policies, of course, but hope -- a way out and a way up, the hope of returning this country to the road of greatness that it once enjoyed.

American people -- Republicans, Democrats, and Independents alike -- in this November, a message that with your help can win us the seats in the Senate and the House that we need to finish the job that we have so well begun.

We have a majority in the Senate, which we must keep. But do you realize that our opponents, virtually without exception -- there's only one 2-year exception in 27 years -- that they have controlled both Houses of the Congress, that they are responsible for the programs. They are responsible for the tax structure that took away incentive from both business and individuals. Can you imagine what it is like to go to bed at night in that public housing we live in and dream what it would be like to wake up one day soon and know that the administration was doing business with a House and a Senate that were both under the majority leadership of Republicans?

General Orhan Gunduz in Massachusetts last night. He has directed Federal law enforcement agencies to take every appropriate measure in cooperation with local authorities in Massachusetts to apprehend those responsible for this vicious act.

The President is determined that the U.S. Government will provide no quarter for individuals or organizations engaged in terrorist activity. The Government and people of Turkey are our friends, and we join with them in mourning the loss of Consul General Gunduz and in condemning those responsible for his death.

On that day, in the battle of Puebla, General Ignacio Zaragoza led 2,000 Mexicans against an invasion force of 6,000 French troops who were on the march toward the capital of Mexico. After a long day of fighting against overwhelming odds, the Mexican patriots emerged victorious.

In ceremonies in the United States and Mexico, that victory of the Cinco de Mayo is remembered with great pride, for it testifies not only to the courage and patriotism of the Mexican people, but to the yearnings of citizens everywhere to live free of foreign domination.

D. The fees established in paragraph B of this proclamation shall be adjusted on a quarterly basis beginning July 1, 1982. Such fees shall be adjusted on an intra-quarterly basis as provided by the proviso of paragraph (c)(ii) of Headnote 4 of part 3 of the Appendix to the TSUS, as added herein, beginning with any 10 consecutive market day period following the day this proclamation is signed.

E. The provisions of Proclamation 4887 of December 23, 1981 are hereby terminated, except with respect to those articles which are exempted from the provisions of this proclamation under paragraph F below.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 5th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Secretary) shall establish for each calendar quarter the total amount (expressed in terms of raw value) of sugars, sirups, and molasses described in items 155.20 and 155.30, the products of all foreign countries, which may be entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, during such calendar quarter. The Secretary shall determine such amount, inform the Secretary of the Treasury of his determination, and file notice thereof with the Federal Register no later than the 15th day of the month immediately preceding the calendar quarter during which such determination shall be in effect. In determining such amounts the Secretary shall give due consideration to the interests in the United States sugar market of domestic producers and materially affected contracting parties to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.

Notwithstanding the allocation provisions set forth above, the Secretary may, after consultation with the U.S. Trade Representative, the Department of State, and the Department of the Treasury, issue regulations modifying the allocation provisions governing ``Other specified countries and areas'' if the Secretary determines that such modifications are appropriate to provide such countries and areas reasonable access to the United States sugar market. Such regulations may, among other things, provide for the establishment of minimum quota amounts, the establishment of quota periods other than quarterly periods, and the carrying forward of unused quota amounts into subsequent quota periods.

State, may suspend the allocation provisions of paragraph (c), or may establish quantitative limitations for periods of time other than calendar quarters as provided in paragraph (b), if the Secretary determines that such action or actions are appropriate to give due consideration to the interests in the United States sugar market of domestic producers and materially affected contracting parties to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade. The Secretary may reinstate the allocation provisions of paragraph (c), or may amend any quantitative limitations (including the time period for which such limitations are applicable) which have previously been established under this paragraph or paragraph (b), if the Secretary determines that the considerations set forth in the previous sentence so warrant. The Secretary shall inform the Secretary of the Treasury of any determination made under this paragraph. Notice of such determinations shall be filed with the Federal Register, and such determinations shall not become effective until the day following the date of filing of such notice or such later date as may be specified by the Secretary.

State, and other concerned agencies, review the operation of this headnote prior to September 1 of each year. In making such review, the Secretary shall determine whether the continued operation of paragraphs (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this headnote gives due consideration to the interests in the United States sugar market of domestic producers and materially affected contracting parties to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, and whether the operation of paragraph (g) of this headnote would give due consideration to such interests. The Secretary shall file a notice of such determinations in the Federal Register no later than September 1 of each year.

If the Secretary determines that the continued operation of paragraphs (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this headnote would not give due consideration to the interests in the United States sugar market of domestic producers and materially affected contracting parties to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, and that the provisions of paragraph (g) of this headnote would give due consideration to such interests, paragraphs (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this headnote shall terminate as of the first day of October following such determinations.

Government to purchase sugar at a cost of up to $400 million. The action is precipitated by our inability to defend the domestic program with duties and fees alone in view of a continued sharp drop in the world sugar price, now below 9 cents a pound. The world price has fallen 30 percent in 4 months in the face of a prospectively large world crop.

The administration has taken a number of steps to maintain the domestic price of sugar since the enactment of the price support program by Congress in December. On December 23, I proclaimed an import system, including import duties and fees, under authority of section 22 of the Agricultural Adjustment Act of 1933 as amended. On April 1, import fees were adjusted upward, based on a 20-day world average price of 11.69 cents for late February and early March.

The ability to use import fees under section 22 is limited, however, by a statutory restriction on the level of fee that can be applied. At present depressed world prices, this level is inadequate to prevent imports from coming into the domestic market at a price below the domestic support price mandated by current law.

The quotas will be applied non-discriminatorily on an historical basis. The Presidential proclamation will provide for quotas to be apportioned among exporting countries according to percentage performance of those countries in 1975 - 1981, a period during which no restrictive quotas were in effect. Each country's high and low years will be excluded in order to assure a fair and representative allocation of quotas.

The objective is to defend the domestic price support program by creating a market situation that will enable U.S. beet and cane producers to sell in the market rather than forfeiting their production to the Commodity Credit Corporation. The interests of foreign suppliers are also protected since this system provides such suppliers reasonable access to a stable, higher priced U.S. market.

In arriving at this decision, we have taken fully into account the Caribbean Basin Initiative. The historical formula chosen to allocate quotas among countries fully reflects the traditional role of Caribbean Basin countries in our sugar market.

In separate action, steps are also being taken to provide Caribbean Basin sugar producers with additional financial assistance during the remainder of this year beyond that already proposed in the Caribbean Basin Initiative legislation and normal budget requests.

Last Thursday evening I told the American people that the road to economic recovery begins with a responsible budget now. I pledged to them my personal all-out commitment to work with the Members of both Houses of Congress on both sides of the aisle to break the budget deadlock, and we've been doing that continuously. And last night, in cooperation with the Senate Budget Committee, we took an important step toward the balanced and fair compromise the American people want and our economy needs.

We reached agreement on a 3-year deficit reduction package totaling $416 billion. Two-thirds of the amount will come from spending reductions and interest savings, only 23 percent from revenue increases; and while we realize no compromise can please everyone, this one meets the most important criteria. It will continue to bring down the growth in Federal spending.

It should measure financial markets -- or reassure, I should say, financial markets by sharply reducing projected deficits next year and in the years beyond. It will preserve our commitment to a stronger defense and to the all-important incentives to broaden the tax base by stimulating more savings, investment, production, risk-taking, and growth in the private economy.

Social Security Trust Fund. But as I promised the American people, social security beneficiaries will receive their full 7.4-percent cost-of-living increase in July, and we will continue to protect the basic benefits of social security recipients in the future.

And now with me this morning are some of the key leaders in the Congress that we've been working with in the past few weeks. And with their great leadership and the leadership of many others from both parties, I believe we can put our country firmly on the road to economic prosperity. And I'm going to turn around and say thanks to these gentlemen right now for being here. Pete?

The President. No, that figure is a plug that is simply put in there based on -- you'll remember, there is a task force working, a bipartisan task force, on restoring the solvency of social security, the integrity of it which we told the people a year ago was lacking. And, at that time, this was rejected, and there were people who told us in the debate that, oh, there was no danger to the system. They now recognize, yes, there is.

The President. I have said to the delegates that I appointed to that task force that the people who are now dependent on social security must be assured that they're going to continue to get their benefits.

The President. No, it could come from an entire restructuring of the program, actuarially looking back down toward people who are just beginning in the program. As you know, there is a gigantic increase in social security tax built into the system past -- well, it went into effect in '78. We had one increase in the payroll tax in January. There will be two more in the next few years that are scheduled to take place. And the task force is supposed -- and that does not restore the solvency, even though the promise was made by the previous administration that that guaranteed the program's solvency until the year 2015. It didn't even guarantee it beyond 1984.

Now, these -- the things that we're considering are not the kind of things that are going to impinge on the incentive features of the way we have built in the business tax cuts and the individual income tax cuts.

The President. No, not at all. I am suggesting that the fact that we have inflation virtually down to zero and that it's come down that fast -- and other factors in the economy that indicate that the recession is bottoming out indicate that we would have been better off economically right now if they had not made us compromise and if the tax cut had been retroactive to January 1st, 1981, and had been 10 percent, not 5. We really are not beginning our tax cuts in reality to have an effect on the economy until this first July tax cut.

Let me, if I could, also say something else to many of you. You seem to have been confused about something and have referred a number of times that the budget that we first presented in February was a budget that included a $182 billion deficit for '83 and then increasing deficits beyond. Let me make something plain. The deficit figures are the figures if nothing is done. They were not -- in other words, our original budget proposal would have vastly reduced those deficits.

Q. Mr. President, could I ask a question, please, on the Falkland Islands situation? I wondered if you would comment and give us your assessment, sir, about whether the United States has a creditable role yet to play as an honest broker in that we've come down on the side very clearly of Great Britain rather than Argentina?

The President. Well, we stand willing, as we always have been, to achieve a peaceful settlement under the conditions of Security Council Resolution 502, which calls for both a ceasefire and a withdrawal. And I'm not going to single out any particular approach that we're pursuing, but we're open to every approach that can. We now have the help of the President of Peru who has involved himself in these negotiations.

Q.  --  -- I think there is some concern that the Falklands could escalate into a greater war and some concern even that it could involve, eventually, the United States and the Soviet Union. What steps have you taken, if any, to try to head that off from happening -- such as contacts, perhaps, directly or otherwise, with the Soviet Union?

The President. Frankly, I do not see the danger of this escalating to that extent. And the steps that we are taking are the steps that we've always been taking, and that is seeking within, as I say, the U.N. framework, this kind of a resolution that calls for ceasefire and calls for withdrawal of all forces, while this is done. Now, so far, there has not been agreement on that.

The President. Well, this is one -- no, I have to say, there, I'm on record, and I don't think they would do that. I don't think that the people who are dependent on social security should be frightened any more than they have been by the political demagoguery that's been going on about this issue. The people who are presently dependent on social security must be assured that they're going to continue to get their benefits.

The President. Well, it'll be rather difficult for them to explain how they did not want to be a party to a plan that was going to reduce the 3-year deficit by $416 billion and would give us deficits that would go down from $106 in this first year to 69 next year, and to 39 in 1984, with a continuing line downward that makes certain a balanced budget in the next several years.

The President. My goal from the very first, and the reason for ``The Gang of 17'' and everything else, was that I believe the American people, in this time of economic distress, should have had the assurance of seeing the Democrat and Republican leadership in the Congress and this administration stand before them together and say that we have agreed on a plan to help cure this recession and reduce these deficits. And so far we have not been able to bring that about. But we are going to continue to try.

Many of you are leaders in your faith; others are active in your communities, your professions, or are among our elected representatives. But all of us are here with a common purpose: to observe on National Day of Prayer, a tradition that was begun by the Continental Congress -- that the first Thursday of May would be such a day.

Prayer has sustained our people in crisis, strengthened us in times of challenge, and guided us through our daily lives since the first settlers came to this continent. Our forebearers came not for gold, but mainly in search of God and the freedom to worship in their own way.

We've been a free people living under the law, with faith in our Maker and in our future. I've said before that the most sublime picture in American history is of George Washington on his knees in the snow at Valley Forge. That image personifies a people who know that it's not enough to depend on our own courage and goodness; we must also seek help from God, our Father and Preserver.

Abraham Lincoln said once that he would be the most foolish man on this footstool we call Earth, if he thought for one minute he could fulfill the duties that faced him if he did not have the help of One who was wiser than all others.

The morality and values such faith implies are deeply embedded in our national character. Our country embraces those principles by design, and we abandon them at our peril. Yet in recent years, well-meaning Americans in the name of freedom have taken freedom away. For the sake of religious tolerance, they've forbidden religious practice in our public classrooms. The law of this land has effectively removed prayer from our classrooms.

Thomas Jefferson once said, ``Almighty God created the mind free.'' But current interpretation of our Constitution holds that the minds of our children cannot be free to pray to God in public schools. No one will ever convince me that a moment of voluntary prayer will harm a child or threaten a school or State. But I think it can strengthen our faith in a Creator who alone has the power to bless America.

Because of my faith in that promise, I'm particularly pleased to be able to tell you today that this administration will soon submit to the United States Congress a proposal to amend our Constitution to allow our children to pray in school. No one must ever be forced or coerced or pressured to take part in any religious exercise, but neither should the government forbid religious practice. The amendment we'll propose will restore the right to pray.

I thank you all for coming here today and for the good work that you do for our people, our country, and our God every day of the year. But I also hope that I can count on your help in the days and months ahead as we work for passage of this amendment.

Changing the Constitution is a mammoth task. It should never be easy. But in this case, I believe we can restore a freedom that our Constitution was always meant to protect. I have never believed that the oft-quoted amendment was supposed to protect us from religion. It was to protect religion from government tyranny.

The Department of State, with the assistance of the Departments of the Treasury and Justice and other concerned government agencies, is coordinating the United States response to the Iranian claims and is preparing to assist U.S. nationals with claims against Iran.

Netherlands Settlement Bank to pay Tribunal awards, which were not resolved in negotiations with Iran were referred to the Claims Tribunal. Written submissions have been made and oral arguments have been heard. The Tribunal may decide these issues within the next few weeks.

Netherlands Central Bank, as manager of the funds deposited with the Settlement Bank, against any claims relating to the Security Account; (3) payment of the administrative fees of the Settlement Bank; and (4) payment of settlements with U.S. claimants worked out directly between the U.S. claimants and Iran.

The amendment provides extra time for obtaining a license or for establishment of such substitute blocked accounts by account parties in cases involving court orders barring payments to Iran under standby letters of credit.

Undertakings of the Governments of Iran and the United States, primarily for the purpose of paying non-syndicated debt claims of U.S. banks against Iran. The list of banks that registered was provided to Iran to facilitate the settlement of those bank claims against Iran.

Finance Committee for the 1970 White House Conference on Children and Youth. He is a member of the Chief Executives Forum, an international group of senior executives; a member of the World Business Council; and past director, chapter chairman, education chairman, and leadership activities chairman of the Young Presidents' Organization.

The President. No, they can't blame it on our policies. And I can tell them how that they can turn that around. Remember, those are the seasonally adjusted figures that have been used for this percentage. But if they want to turn it around, let the Democrats in the House and the Senate join us in adopting the budget that was passed out of the Senate Budget Committee; let us get that spending down. They do that, and not only will unemployment turn around and come down but so will interest rates, and this economy will get moving again.

The President. Yeah, and the single word for that is ``demagoguery,'' because at no point have we ever cut the budget below what they were the previous year. And this one is not cut below the previous year. It represents a 5-percent increase over the previous year.

The President. I don't know. But I don't want violence to break out again. I'm hoping that we can have this ceasefire and the removal of all forces. So far I understand, that it is Argentina that is holding back on withdrawing their forces.

For openers, it's just a plain falsehood to say, as our opponents in Congress and much of the press are saying, that the budget the Senate Budget Committee approved last Wednesday night is going to reduce social security payments. It does nothing of the kind. That budget specifically states that the 7.4-percent cost-of-living increase in social security benefits due July 1st will be added to the checks beginning July 1st, and that increase will be the only change in those checks.

Those who've rushed to face the TV cameras or get their names in newsprint by frightening our social security recipients should be ashamed of themselves. Let me repeat what I've said before. I will protect the benefits of social security recipients now and in the future.

The second thing, not quite so urgent, that needs correcting is some misinformation about our original budget proposal, which I submitted in February, and the projected budget deficits for the next 3 years. For some reason or lack of reason, the news media and some Congressmen have repeatedly declared that my February budget proposal contained a $182 billion deficit. Budgets don't contain deficits. Deficits are the difference between expected tax revenues and proposed spending. A budget either adds to it or reduces it. We plan to do the latter.

In plain language, the budget which I worked out with the Republican members of the Senate committee reverses an ongoing increase in deficits and sets us on a sure road to a balanced budget in just a very few years.

You remember, of course, the great to-do and the hysteria about our budget a year ago, the talk of budget cuts that would punish the needy and helpless. You're hearing the same thing now about the new budget for 1983 and whether we can afford further budget cuts without doing harm to our social programs. Well, what budget cuts? Where do the cuts come from?

Now, I know it's hard hearing all these numbers to keep things straight, but the bottom line is that all the so-called budget cuts have been reductions only in the rate of increase usually in what Congress refers to as the ``uncontrollables.'' Our proposed budget for next year, the one passed by the Senate committee, is $122 billion more than was spent in 1981. Those who've been opposing our budgets -- this one and the one last year -- would have had an increase of more than 170 billion if they'd have their way.

There've been no cuts in the budgets. There have only been smaller increases than some of our big spenders would have preferred, coupled with what we've done, our tax cuts, to allow you to keep more of what you earn.

Maybe those of us who went through the Great Depression have some kind of complex, but to me as long as there is one single person able and willing to work but unable to find work, that is too high an unemployment rate. I wonder though if the news media couldn't serve us better if they would give us more of the statistical information on unemployment provided by the Bureau of Labor Statistics.

Let me explain. The rise in the unemployment rate from 9 to 9.4 percent is in what are called the seasonally adjusted figures. Now, I'm not sure that we live in a seasonally adjusted world. Every month, the Bureau also publishes the unadjusted figures. I feel these latter figures should not be buried or ignored by the press. If they weren't of some importance, the Bureau wouldn't release them along with the seasonally adjusted.

Now, what's this all about? Well, the adjusted figures are given for what should be the rate of unemployment and employment for each month, based on the figures for previous years. Now, I know I'm running the risk of oversimplifying, but I'm also running out of time. The unadjusted figures are simply the actual count of how many are employed and how many are unemployed in a certain month.

Regardless, the figures are sad. And something must be done and can be done about unemployment if Congress will get off the dime and adopt the deficit-reducing budget it now has before it. Interest rates will come down when it does, and so will unemployment.

In observing National Nursing Home Week, we call to mind the special needs of the frail and elderly men and women who live in nursing homes and acknowledge that we all can play a part in meeting those needs.

Pantagraph, who came up and wanted to talk all about memories, Illinois here and Eureka College and all. And then he said, ``Well now, there's a story going around about you scoring a touchdown against Normal in the last minutes of play.'' And that just goes to show you how stories can get stretched. [Laughter] I can tell you about that touchdown.

We were one point ahead, as I remember. And there was just seconds to go. I'd been in the entire game, and Normal was passing, throwing bombs all over. And I finally decided because -- you remember that no one in our backfield was over about five-nine or -ten in those days, so our pass defense wasn't all it should be if anyone on the other side was taller than they were. So, I used to charge against my man and then when I felt it was going to be a pass, duck back into the secondary and see if I could help cover for passes.

But I've spent the day in a warm flood of nostalgia, as I'm sure a great many of you have. You must be feeling the same way. Eureka is in all our hearts. And it gave me the greatest happiness today to be on the campus and to see today's students and to see that that same spirit and that same love is there among them every bit as great as it has been among us. They'll carry the memory of days at Eureka as abundantly and warm as we have carried them.

Day after day in those classrooms, those professors just as if they were getting paid on time -- I've thought about that sometimes when I see some teachers' strikes lately. But I believe that that spirit is still at Eureka -- in the town, the faculty, and the students.

And, Lee, I have to tell you a memory that I have of your father -- God bless him. It seems that the late Bud Cole -- God rest his soul -- and I were declared ineligible if we did not take a makeup exam, and it was the day before the homecoming game. So, we went over to the gym that afternoon, and we got into our football uniforms. And then we went up in the Burgess Hall to the classroom where your father was there. And he gave us each two questions and said, ``Take your choice of one.'' And he said, ``I'll be in the Administration Building if you need me.'' And we finished the exam in quick time and went out to the field, convinced that we had passed the exam -- and we had -- and were able to play the next day in the game. That spirit of Eureka lasts not only 4 years but a lifetime, and that's why there are so many of you gathered here this evening.

But I can't tell you how wonderful it has been. The only fly in the ointment -- the thing that's really wrong is that today is over, and now we turn back into pumpkins again because we can't even stay for dinner. This is the first time I've been a before-dinner speaker -- been an after-dinner speaker many times. But we have to go out and get in that airplane and be on our way. So, we have to leave. But to be here among you again -- everyone in Washington that's in government should have to, at regular intervals, have this kind of an experience, because there is a real difference between the real world and what's on the other side of the Potomac.

So, from one Red Devil to all the others -- [laughter] -- hail to maroon and gold, and hail to our alma mater, and I think all of us should pledge in our hearts that it will be there long after we're gone doing for young people what it did for all of us.

I have one little story I just want to tell before I go. [Laughter] I'm having a hard time getting away from here. For my graduation speech, we had decided in Washington that I should make a speech on the world situation and our plans for attempting disarmament, reduction of nuclear weapons and so forth. And they were talking about what would be a proper forum in which to make this speech before I go to Europe at the end of this month to meet with our allies and all.

And it has to do with when Brezhnev first became President. And he invited his elderly mother to come up and see his suite of offices in the Kremlin and then put her in his limousine and drove her to his fabulous apartment there in Moscow. And in both places, not a word. She looked; she said nothing. Then he put her in his helicopter and took her out to the country home outside Moscow in a forest. And, again, not a word. Finally, he put her in his private jet and down to the shores of the Black Sea to see that marble palace which is known as his beach home. And finally she spoke.

The President. Well, how do you do? I know that you've had a session of briefing already, and I don't know whether any of the others who've been here briefing you -- Secretary Block or Jim Baker or the others -- told you what this is all about.

But not too long ago, I met with a group of your colleagues from all over the country, and they brought up the subject that when I go out and, accompanied by the national press corps, that very often it's only the national press corps, the White House press corps accompanying us, that gets to ask any questions. And why didn't we do something with regard to the regional press? And it sounded like a very good idea, and so that's what we're doing and why we're here.

There have been a number of new initiatives, things that we have suggested -- a prayer-in-school amendment that I announced last week that I believe its time has come. As a matter of fact, I don't think there ever should have been a need for it.

Tuition tax credits, which we think are aimed at helping the middle and the lower income workers in this country who are sending their children to parochial schools, schools of that type -- some have tried to portray this as an effort to help the upper crust who are sending their children to the very expensive finishing schools and prep school academies in the country. There aren't too many of those, and that's not really who we're trying to help, because we have a ceiling on income as to who would be eligible for this tuition tax credit. Fifty-four percent of the families whose children are going to private or independent schools are with incomes of less than $25,000.

Those particular schools -- particularly parochial schools -- have been failing by the thousands under the inflation that we've been having in recent years. And it seems to us that since these families are actually paying to support two school systems -- the ones that they choose and prefer to send their children to and at the same time paying the full load that everyone else pays for public education -- that there is some justice in making allowance for this.

I know that the constitutional amendment for a balanced budget is causing some debate also. I think that it can be defended on every practical, commonsense ground there is. And the budget that we have worked out with the Republican members of the Senate Finance Committee will cut the projected deficits for the next 3 years by $416 billion and set us on a course that should within a year or two of that -- if those projections are correct, and I have never placed much faith in economic projections of that kind out that far ahead; I'm just not sure that anyone can do it. But it will put us on the road then to, in a very short time, a balanced budget.

We've used the term -- as I said in my radio 5 minutes last week -- ``budget cuts'' so much; and it is incorrect to say that, because a budget cut suggests that you have reduced the budget that you presently have for the coming year and that your budgets are growing smaller. That isn't true. Our budgets have been growing bigger. '82's budget is bigger than '81; '83's budget will be bigger than '82, even with the so-called cuts that -- these so-called cuts are cuts in the anticipated rate of increase based on past performance -- the idea that there is a line going up in which, from this budget, it must go up that far the next year and so on. That line was increasing at a rate of 17 percent when we took office. There's no way that our economy can continue to support a government that increases in cost by 17 percent a year.

So, what we've been doing is reducing that rate of increase. And the idea is to bring it down to the point that the budget doesn't increase any faster than the normal revenue from tax increases. And that will keep us with a balanced budget.

I can sum up our approach to the defense spending in a cartoon that I saw, and I just love it. It was Brezhnev talking to a Russian general, and he said, ``I liked the arms race better when we were the only ones in it.'' So, with that, with the things that have been said about the budget, let's fire away at questions.

Q. Mr. President, Governor Thompson's been drawing fire for his acceptance of many expensive gifts, including cash. In one case, he was handed an envelope from a Teamster's official, and inside was $500 in cash. What is your opinion of such conduct?

The President. Well, it depends on what was done with the money and whether it was accepted as a personal gift or used it for campaign funds or something of that kind. I have always been confident of the integrity of your Governor, and I would be very surprised if there was anything that he did that could be called malfeasance or improper conduct in that regard.

You know, in Washington, they now have a system whereby, not only myself as an officeholder but even staff members have to report and make public even the Christmas gifts that they get from people they've -- close friends they've been exchanging gifts with for years. And it's kind of embarrassing, because you're supposed to also put down an estimated cost. Now, how do you call someone that's given you a present for Christmas and say, ``How much did that sweater cost? I have to put it down and make it public.'' It's a little embarrassing.

The President. Well, I don't know who the individual was that made that statement. First of all, I think it's exaggerating very much where we have reduced in programs of that kind. HHS, Health and Human Services, which is in charge of most of the human programs in government, has a budget that is bigger -- the one we proposed for '83 -- is bigger than every national budget in the world except for two countries, the Soviet Union and the United States. It is $58 billion bigger than the budget for our own national defense, and it is 20-some billion dollars bigger than it was last year.

We are suggesting that over the years, as government has done more and more and invaded more fields that belong both to local or State government or to the private sector, that people have tended to go their way and just assume that government is taking care of all these things. And what our private sector initiative program, what our task force is finding -- they are canvassing and finding out how are various communities meeting certain problems in their communities and spreading this word to others, so that others can find out how to handle them, the programs that properly -- well, let me give you an example.

Now, the thing is it's not just money contributions; it is the service that people can render, the people, the executives who give of their time to be on hospital boards, on college or school boards, and so forth, the people who volunteer and help run the United Fund. Isn't it funny that in this time of recession, last year the United Fund broke all records for contributions?

It is just that we find churches, for example, only a few years ago, before we began with this big government drive, religion was the principle dispenser of charity in the United States. Today, it has fallen down to where it's only responsible for about 3 percent. And many churches, without us doing anything, have been disturbed about this and are finding things that they not only can do -- and not just in the contribution line but in their own people helping to serve, just human volunteers that are doing jobs -- that if government did it would call for a whole bureaucracy.

And so, we're not asking them to replace, but we think there is a vast field. And the funny thing is we are running into just waves of enthusiasm and volunteers. In fact, I just have a slip of paper in my pocket that was handed me a few years ago -- few years! -- a few minutes ago outside here from a young lady who wants to know and wants to be put in touch with where she can volunteer her services.

The President. Well, because that Supreme Court decision has been taken and interpreted by many who fear running counter to the law in such a way that we're finding it impossible to have Christmas ceremonies in schools anymore.

Christmas tree, yes, you can have a Christmas party or ceremony.'' But if you do anything with the creche or observe whose birthday it is, then that is against their taking of the Constitution. And then more recently, we have found in some of our larger cities that the school boards have decided that Santa Claus is so associated with the holy holiday that, therefore, we can't have Santa Claus anymore as part of the school services.

The first amendment is to protect not government from religion, but religion from government tyranny. It says that the government will neither respect nor obstruct -- or will neither institute nor obstruct religious practice. And the prayers, I think, would obviously have to be nonsectarian so that you are not showing favor to one particular religion or another. And I know that New York State had proposed a nonsectarian prayer that would meet all of the needs.

I think what most of the people in this country -- and the polls show that it is overwhelming, the percentage of people who want prayer restored -- is the idea that by doing away with it, it was almost as if there was an antireligious bias. It was as if saying to the children that this is no longer important. And yet we refer to ours as a country under God. It says ``In God We Trust'' on our coins. They open the Congress sessions with a chaplain. I've never been sure whether he prays for the Congress or for the Nation.

Q. The steel industry around -- [inaudible] -- in particular trouble, and there have been several suits filed to keep out the foreign imports of steel that's being sold below cost. And there are also steel executives who are calling for quotas similar to the auto quotas that were placed on the Japanese. I'm wondering what your plans are for helping the steel industry, and if you're going to try to expedite these suits that are -- [inaudible].

The President. Well, I believe in free trade. But it is true that in our country we have -- well, in every country for that matter, and our trade is probably freer than anyone else's. This is why the Third World sells more of its product in the United States than it does to all the rest of the world put together. But there are areas where we have recognized some things such as quotas.

In sugar, this farm bill, we had tried to rid ourselves of that particular quota -- sometime ago did, back in, I think, about 1979. Last year the Congress brought it up, and very frankly it was a price that had to be paid in order to get the budget program. But it is not totally without precedent in our international dealings and in the GATT arrangements with regard to trade with other countries. There are certain quotas that are recognized.

And in our own country our protection with regard to steel has to do not with just that kind of a protection but the fact that steel is being exported into the United States, produced in other countries and sold below the cost of production because of their subsidy of that industry. Well, free trade should be fair trade also. And we think that has to be stopped, and we've -- there is a provision whereby we can prevent the influx into this country of subsidized steel. We have some quotas with regard to meat imports from other great cattle-raising countries.

But we've held this down, I think, to a minimum and based it on what we believe is fair to defend our standard of living against those who could exploit their own low standard of living and their own workers to sell here. But basically we're striving constantly for free market, and most of these quotas there are compensating factors.

Now, what has been taking place -- we have been trying with -- because many of these are our allies and are friendly countries -- we've been trying at a government level to get them to voluntarily stop it.

The President. No, I haven't taken a stand one way or the other. And I certainly can understand why the black community would like to do that. I know that from some of the past -- I just have to confess with all that's been going on, I haven't been able to dig as deeply as I want to into it.

But one of the problems from those who have preceded me in this office with regard to that is the discovery of how many -- we're quite a mix in this country -- how many other people there are with -- people who just as sincerely want them also. We could have an awful lot of holidays if we start down that road.

Now, whether there's something that could be worked out that would protect against that, I don't know. But, as I say, I have the deepest sympathy for it. I know what he means and what he has meant to a movement that I think is important to all of us.

The President. Well, would you allow me to say here that I want to study more about the ramifications of all those other requests before I give an answer that definitely -- because it might be that there's no way that we could afford all of the holidays that we would have with people who are also revered figures in the history of many of the groups that make up our population here in America.

It is true that in this recession the unemployment rates are not uniform as they were pretty much in the Great Depression, when 25 percent of the workers in America were without jobs. But there are certain areas, due to certain industries, that have what could be called near-depression-rate unemployment. And sometimes it isn't even statewide. Sometimes it's a particular part of that State where a certain industry has slowed down.

We want to do something about that, and we think we're trying. The fact that we have brought inflation down to less than zero for the first time in 17 years is an indication that the one thing that we believe is bringing this about, causing this unemployment -- the high interest rates -- can no longer be justified on the basis of inflation.

High interest rates came about because of the need of a lender to get back the depreciated value of his dollar due to inflation, plus the return that you normally get for lending your money, a return on the money. Well, if you've got inflation down to where it's -- for all of last year, was only a little more than half of what it had been -- for 6 months or more it has been running at 3.2, and last month, as I say, dropped below zero for the first time in 17 years.

And that's why I said what I did the other day. If the Congress'll get off the dime and pass this budget proposal, it will be an indication that we're not going to go back to what we've done a dozen times since, in the last 20 or 30 years, and that is have a quick fix and artificially stimulate the market to where we temporarily solve or help to solve the unemployment problem, only to have an inflation 2 years later that is worse and unemployment is deeper and inflation is higher.

The other thing I might point out, differing from the Great Depression -- and I don't mean to minimize at all, because there's no one -- I'll challenge that there's no one in the world that has the feeling inside them that I have, having gone through the Great Depression and seen, as I've said, my father get his notice that he didn't have a job, sitting in our parlor on Christmas Eve -- opened an envelope that he thought was a Christmas greeting and it was the notice that he was now unemployed. I know the pain of unemployment, but I also know that there are mitigating things today that we have.

We have a built-in system, first of all, with unemployment insurance and our own welfare programs and so forth, but also the dual employment in families that today, according to Bureau of Labor Statistics, it is estimated that only about 30 percent of the families where there is unemployment are without some member of the family employed; 70 percent of the families, there is another member of the family where there is someone employed. Seventy percent of the families have a member of the family employed.

So, we're not back where we were in that Great Depression, where none of these things existed at the time when unemployment was total destitution -- and here in this city, there aren't very many around who remember that at one time Franklin Delano Roosevelt had the Illinois State National Guard parade down State Street -- not Michigan Boulevard -- State Street because of the number of unemployed that were living there, sleeping in doorways under newspapers at night and so forth.

Nancy and I -- I'm sure you know how thrilling this is for us to be back here in home territory. I once said that the roots go very deep in the blue-black soil of Illinois prairies. We're delighted to be here, and I thank you for that fine welcome.

Seriously, I recall those days with pleasure. Dixon, a small town and back then the entire community got behind projects like the YMCA Band. My family didn't have any extra money, so I've always been grateful for the wonderful time such programs provided me.

Something I didn't understand as a kid was the part our neighbors and other good folks in Dixon played in that band -- the mechanic down the street, the shopkeeper, the telephone man. They realized that they had to do their part if our little town was to be a decent place. So, they got involved, and they contributed the money. And when they didn't have that, they gave of their time so the kids in our town would have a YMCA band. The gentleman in the dark coat up there was the teacher, and he was the one who conceived the idea and literally, single-handedly brought it before the town. And there weren't school bands in those days, and so that was the band.

But that's the kind of spirit America stood for back in those days. It's the kind of spirit that all of you stand for today. Come to think of it, that band was my first real experience in entertainment.

I remember one day when we went to a nearby, even smaller town for Memorial Day to lead the parade, and a gentleman, who was the parade marshal on a white horse, as we started, galloped back down the line to make sure everyone was joining in and coming along. And we were leading.

But I might have been too young to express my appreciation to all my good neighbors back then, but not now. So, if you will, I hope you'll accept the thanks from me, not only for what the YMCA provided in Dixon but for all those many young people, most of whom you'll never know, but all of whom will live happier and healthier lives because of the efforts that you're putting forth to make this the kind of city, the kind of country that we believe it should be. And if one of the kids you're helping along grows up to be President some day, I can assure you that he'll think back and realize how much he owes to good people like you.

The character of the American people is our country's most precious asset, and, like any asset, it should never be taken for granted. In the months preceding the 1980 election the values of which I'm speaking and the viability of some of our most cherished institutions, I believe, were under attack as never before. Inflation, high taxes, and economic instability were taking a heavy toll on things which most Americans had always taken for granted.

Our savings rate slipped to the lowest level of any major industrialized nation. Instead of long-run, job-producing investment, money was being channeled into inflation hedges and tax shelters that made little contribution to the economic strength of the country. The quick deal and the fast buck were rapidly becoming the order of the day.

Inflation was ripping our country apart. Federal taxes were draining the potential for growth and progress out of the private sector. Interest rates, as we know, shot sky high to 21\1/2\ percent in December of 1980. This is what we confronted upon entering office 16 months ago.

Our people cried out for a change of direction. Above all, if we were to recapture the spirit of vigor, optimism, and brotherhood that was once the hallmark of our country, America needed to change attitudes.

One of the most damaging attitudes which had developed, one that may be at the heart of our other problems, was the habit of turning to government to solve every problem. It caused unprecedented government growth that threatened our very way of life and brought the harmful side-effects I've just described. Over the last decade Federal spending tripled at the same time that defense spending decreased in constant dollars. Federal social spending increased over the last three decades eight times more than prices.

Some of the programs established during that spending binge remind me of the preacher who had come to a small hamlet about a hundred miles from his own hometown to preach at a revival meeting. And driving into the village he noticed a man from his own community, a fellow that was rather known for his drinking, who was sitting on the front steps of the general store. And he stopped his car and he asked the drinker why he was so far from home and was told that beer was 5 cents a bottle cheaper there. Well, when the minister pointed out the cost of travel back and forth, the price for a hotel room, the beer drinker retorted, ``I'm not stupid, Reverend. I just sit here and drink till I show a profit.'' [Laughter] Well, some of the government programs of the last 20 years were ill-conceived, too costly, and turned out to be no better for the poor than that bargain beer.

Inflation and economic dislocation resulting from uncontrolled spending and the taxation needed to pay the bill hurt everyone. And the figures back this up. If inflation had kept running at the rate it was prior to -- or during 1980, a family of four on a fixed income of $15,000 would be over $1,000 poorer in purchasing power today. The effect would be the same as having that $15,000 income reduced to $14,000. Or put another way, by lowering inflation we gave them a thousand-dollar raise.

That would have more than doubled prices in 5 years and devastated our economy. Two years later, in January of 1982, the Consumer Price Index went up at a rate of only 3\1/2\ percent. And in March it actually fell for the first time in nearly 17 years. It would have been no favor to the poor, or anyone else, to permit inflation to continue ravaging our country.

How many of you remember that it wasn't so long ago that voices of gloom and doom were suggesting it would take a decade to bring inflation under control? There was an unprecedented feeling of pessimism sweeping across the country. For the first time you could hear the refrain that America's best days are behind us. Well, don't you believe it.

Fort Wayne, Indiana. And a few months ago they suffered the worst flooding in 69 years. And she writes, ``Like thousands of others I went downtown to help, and what did I see? Hundreds of students whom I'd written off as lazy, irresponsible. They had come as volunteers to work in the sandbag lines, haul rubble and trash, help evacuate the elderly and stranded, do whatever needed to be done. Some were even ready to risk their lives if necessary.'' All those kids had needed, the teacher concluded, was a sense of purpose, and now they had one.

The same is true of young people all across America, and not just the young people either. But I could tell you, a few years ago was something I wanted to see on a billboard. We were having a problem in California. Unnatural high tides abetted by storms were destroying beautiful beach homes along the beach, and the television was covering, around the clock, the battle to save these homes -- sandbag lines again. And it was about 2 o'clock in the morning, and there was a young teenager just in swimming trunks, and at 2 o'clock in the morning in California you can freeze to death. He was wet, he was obviously tired, and one of the commentators of the TV station stopped him as he's hauling another sandbag, asked him did he live in one. No, he didn't live in any of those homes. Why was he doing it? And the answer is what should have been on a billboard.

We ought to be able to do better for them than that. Anyone who writes off Americans is making a tragic error. More often than not our citizens are simply waiting to be asked. And that's one of the reasons why back in October we created a Presidential task force on private action -- on private sector initiatives. There are still too many people on the sidelines waiting for a chance to get into the game.

This task force is designed to serve as a catalyst for people-helping and community-building projects. It's not designed to replace government. The Federal Government will continue playing a significant role.

But while maintaining government's commitment to the poor, we want to see if it isn't possible to motivate our people as individuals, as members of churches and clubs, as representatives of corporations, as members of unions, and as concerned citizens, to do what they can to make this a better country. How? By working together in partnership to meet community needs.

Well, Franklin was more than a man of words. He was also a man of deeds. As early as 1727, with a small group of his Philadelphia friends, he formed a mutual improvement society called the Junto. And within a few years, they founded a subscription library for their community -- the first of many projects.

This was truly a New World, and with it came this new spirit of personal responsibility, unleashing creativity and energy that astounded the world. In the 1830's Alexis de Tocqueville, a young French intellectual, traveled through our new country recording his observations in his book, ``Democracy in America.'' The American way of life captured his imagination, especially the vitality with which our forefathers went about solving problems. You know, there's something strange in the United States, he wrote. He said, when individuals see a problem, they walk across the street to a friend or a neighbor, and they tell them of the problem. And they talk about it, and pretty soon a committee is formed. And the next thing you know, they're solving the problem.

De Tocqueville noted that ``wherever, at the head of some new undertaking, you see the government in France, or a man of rank in England, in the United States you will be sure to find an association.'' Well, the Young Men's Christian Association, although born in England, is exemplary of this tradition that has been so vital to our freedom and well-being.

The Y has played an indispensable role in this city. Your current undertaking demonstrates that the Y is ready to meet the challenges of the future. Aimed at strengthening your city's neighborhoods and offering much-needed services to Chicago's urban population, this program represents the kind of private-sector partnership our task force hopes to spread to other communities. I applaud your commitment and good citizenship. Your presence is testimony that Chicago can still show the rest of us how to make a large city work.

It's headed by Bill Verity, former chairman of the board of Armco Steel, and a man who knows how to get things done. We set out 6 months ago to systematically build upon the tradition of voluntary action that I've spoken about today. The progress, so far, has been impressive.

In the last few months I've met with more than a hundred leaders of the largest national business organizations and trade associations, leaders from a hundred of the largest religious organizations, and leaders from a hundred of the largest service and fraternal organizations to see what can be done to strengthen the efforts being made and to encourage others to get involved.

For our part we've instructed the head of every department and agency in the Federal Government to appoint a personal representative to determine what can be done to promote private-sector action and to report the findings to our task force and to the White House. I'm happy to say that we've had tremendous cooperation at the Federal level, and there's been significant progress made at the State level as well.

Over 20 Governors are working with our task force and have taken steps to establish private-sector task forces in their own States. And today Governor Thompson informed me that he is announcing today the creation of his own Illinois Statewide Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives.

AFL-CIO is a good example. They've demonstrated leadership not only during labor negotiations but also in organizing a host of worthwhile community projects. The AFL-CIO has a network of 310 full-time labor community service representatives working to address local needs in 196 cities. Some of these representatives are heavily involved in assisting those who've lost jobs because of the current recession.

Working people have always demonstrated tremendous responsibility. Approximately 68 percent of the United Way budget is contributed by individual workers. One third of all blood donated to the Red Cross comes from union members. And the Scouts tell me that union members represent 25 percent of the leadership of the Boy Scouts of America.

And business is doing its part, too. From all areas of the Nation our task force is collecting information about corporations taking the initiative. The success of this effort today is due in large degree to the contributions of numerous businesses large and small. To be safe, I'll refrain from naming names, because I know there just isn't time to acknowledge each of you. But if one person deserves applause for his efforts today, it's your chairman of the board of managers, Edward S.

And corporations don't necessarily have to contribute money. Of the 10 senior staff members on the task force, 9 of them are loaned executives whose time is being volunteered by their employers. And this summer, as in the past, many corporations will be taking the lead in providing summer jobs in the private sector for disadvantaged youths. John Filer, chairman of the National Alliance for Business and a member of the task force, tells me that private industry, despite our current economic problems, this summer will provide more jobs to needy kids than ever before.

Let me give you just one splendid example of management and union working together. Members of the International Union of Operating Engineers in Philadelphia heard that the Easter Seal Rehabilitation Center badly needed some specialized equipment for severely disabled children.

They went to their employer, the Rohm and Haas Company, and together they cranked out the needed devices professionally, built for strength and safety. It's estimated that 2,000 children will benefit from the efforts of these volunteers.

America's churches have also been in the forefront of service to the less fortunate. Christ told his disciples that ``as ye do unto the least of my brethren, so you do unto me.'' The message was clear; you serve God by serving those in need. As late as 1935, in the middle of the Great Depression, a substantial portion of all charity was sponsored by religious institutions.

Samaritan -- and I think this is the meaning -- didn't run into town to look for a government caseworker to help the injured pilgrim. He acted directly to do what he could to help, himself. We think it'll be good for the soul of this country to encourage people to help one another, to get involved, to take personal responsibility for the well-being of their community and neighbors, instead of always leaving this to the bureaucracy.

American churches demonstrated this as they rushed forward to aid the throng of refugees entering this country after the Vietnam tragedy. Five religious organizations were responsible for settling two-thirds of the Indochinese refugees who entered the United States.

Americans have always been ready to help those in need -- whatever country they come from. We can be proud that our citizens through private voluntary organizations like CARE, World Vision, and many other humanitarian associations, have helped eliminate suffering -- feeding the hungry and treating the sick in every corner of the world.

The list goes on and on. The service clubs -- Kiwanis, Lions, Rotary, Jaycees, and others -- all have a history of community support. And Bill Verity tells me that they're doing even more in response to the challenge of our task force, and they're doing it more efficiently and effectively than the Federal Government ever could.

I just wish those who are pessimistic about the future of America could see an overview of this surge of creative and humanitarian action. We believe it should be recognized, encouraged, and promoted. And that's why we established the President's Volunteer Action Awards and brought this year's recipients to the White House.

One of those given the award was a man named Bill Sample. Bill was a Philadelphia policeman assigned to a local children's hospital. He saw the desperation -- financial and emotional -- of those with seriously ill children. Originally he did what he could out of his own pocket, and then he established the Sunshine Foundation to get others involved. The Foundation helps with expenses and, whenever possible, fulfills the child's dream -- sending the little boy or girl to Disneyland or on a boat trip down the Mississippi. Today the Sunshine Foundation depends on 200 volunteers working in 7 chapters in 3 States. And whoever said that cops don't have a heart?

I recently met with representatives of 30 of the country's largest broadcasting groups and told them how one station, KAKE - TV, in Wichita, Kansas, was able to play a leading role in its own community. The news teams of KAKE focused in on some local problems and then called other cities to find ways that they were able, by enlisting support from private-sector and partnership efforts, to tackle those problems. And after hearing about what KAKE had accomplished, the broadcasters enthusiastically endorsed the concept and told me their stations would try to emulate the effort in their own communities.

I'd like to close with this thought. During the campaign I talked about family, neighborhood, work, peace, and freedom. And it wasn't just campaign rhetoric. And I say to you in utmost sincerity, it's time for us to return to some of these basic beliefs.

It won't be easy; it'll take commitment, hard work, and perseverance. But how great the results can be. And you in Chicago know the importance of neighborhoods. You were once known as the city of neighborhoods. Well, this project today is a wonderful display of community spirit and support for something that you believe in. Fundamentals like this, which have played such a significant role, cannot be replaced whole-horse by Federal programs and paid bureaucracy.

Thomas Jefferson, the author of liberty, the father of our freedom, once wrote, ``I deem it the duty of every man to devote a certain portion of his income for charitable purposes; and that it is his further duty to see it so applied as to do the most good of which it is capable.'' Jefferson knew well the relationship between the responsibility of which we speak today and the freedom of our people.

All of us are aware of the reservoir of goodness which lies waiting to be tapped. Let's make it our job -- everyone's job -- to encourage our fellow citizens to do those good works which need to be done. With the help of God we can and we will keep America the great and the free nation that it is.

And maybe I can illustrate what I'm trying to say was when I was Governor of California, every year they used to bring to the capital a group of students who'd come from other countries and who, on an exchange-student basis, would spend a year in our schools, usually in high school.

The other day, yesterday, about a hundred miles south of here at the little college I attended, I spoke at the graduation down there. And I used that occasion to talk to them about something that's very close to my heart and, I'm sure, must be to yours. And that is our intention to engage the Soviet Union in negotiations to reduce the nuclear weapons that are threatening the world and to reduce all of our military power on both sides and then get down to where we can begin to exchange ideas and convince them that the world doesn't mean them harm and that we can get along in the world together -- because there've been four wars in my lifetime. There's one dream I have; if I can do one thing with this job, it is to see that no other generation of young Americans will ever have to go out and bleed their lives into somebody's battlefield. And I hope that we can bring that peace about.

But I'm not going to go on talking other than to tell you that you have every reason to be proud, and I'm going to see that a lot of people find out about you and are proud themselves of what you've done. You have reason to be proud of your teachers who obviously are ready to double in brass and do whatever has to be done in order to keep this school going.

What we've been trying to do from even before the Argentines invaded the island, I was on the phone for quite a long time with President Galtieri of Argentina, begging him to turn that task force around that was headed for the islands and let us try to settle this issue peacefully. Well, they did land in the islands. And now we have something we cannot ignore in the world today, and that is someone, by aggression, by armed force, taking over a territory that claimed or belonged to someone else. That must not be allowed to succeed. At the same time, there is some legitimacy on the part of their claims as well as Great Britain. So, we have been trying to be a broker and arrange a peace between them.

So far, we have not been able to do that, and now blood has been shed on both sides. We're hoping there won't be any more of that. And the principal issue is the rights of the 2,000 -- the people that live on the island. And, so far, one country in the dispute has been willing to take into consideration what they want. Argentina has not yet given in to that, and the issue of difference now is will Argentina withdraw and then let the peacekeeping force from the United Nations or even from our own country -- we volunteered -- anyone to go down while they, then, continue to negotiate a settlement of whose flag should fly over those islands.

And we're continuing that, and we're still in those negotiations and still involved. And we now have the help of the President of Peru, who has also joined in. And that's what we're hoping will take place.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Shonda Parks. Mr. President, you've been President for a year and a half now, and since that time inflation has come under control, but unemployment is up greatly, approximately 9.4 percent nationally and double that among blacks. So, Mr. President, what can you do, what can Congress do, what can businesses do, what can citizens do to alleviate the problem of unemployment?

There's no question about that being the greatest tragedy of what we call a recession. It is true we have brought inflation down from 12.4 percent. That means that every year your dollar was worth 12.4 percent less than it was at the beginning of the year. We've brought that down to where, for the last 6 months, it has been averaging about 3.2 percent. And, last month, inflation actually went below zero to the point that, instead of it just being a reduction in the inflation rate, prices actually went down. Now, I don't know that we can hold that that steady, but we do have it under control.

The biggest thing that is causing unemployment today -- well, there are three factors involved, but the two principal ones out of the recession are -- or the one, high interest rates. High interest rates have -- people who normally buy automobiles buy them on time, but they can't pay the high interest rate today to buy them on time. People who build a house, they build it by taking a mortgage. They borrow money to build a house, and they pay it back every month, plus interest for, say, 20, 30 years. Well, they, again, can't afford 20 or 30 years of interest rates that -- while they have come down -- they were 21\1/2\ percent when we started -- they're down around 16 or 17 percent. That's still too high. We've got to get them down farther.

Now, what puts interests rates up, for one thing, is inflation. If a lender has money to lend and it's in an inflation time so that every year the money is getting worth less and less, he has to charge enough interest rate to not only get some earnings on the money he lends but to also compensate for that loss of value. He cannot afford 20 years later to be paid back in dollars that are worth less than half of the dollars that he loaned. So, this has added to the height of the interest rates.

We've had seven recessions before this one since World War II, and in every recession up until now the government has come in with what I call a quick fix. The government has come in with artificial stimulating of the economy, spending more money than we have, deficit spending and so forth, increasing the money supply. And for a little while, it's like taking a pill for a fever. The fever seems to go down, but then, when the pill wears off, the fever is right back. And we're not doing that this time. We put in place a program to reduce the increasing cost of government. And we have succeeded, so far, in cutting the increase in cost of government in half or better. We have brought inflation down and interest rates somewhat.

I believe the quickest way to get the unemployed back to work and to get our economy moving again is for the Congress to pass the budget which we have proposed, because I think this will send the signal to the money market that they can have confidence and lower the interest rates.

We've seen some of this happening from some bankers here and there. In Indiana, in Ohio, groups of bankers recently got together and decided to help particularly the automobile dealers. So, they took millions of dollars of bank money, and they lowered the interest rate on it if it was for loans to buy cars. And the result was almost an immediate upsurge in automobile buying once those interest rates are down. Now, we're trying to spread the word of that, too, and I'll be talking to some bankers myself next week. No, it's this week already. I'll be talking to them later this week to see if we can't convince them that our program shows the signs of working and will work and get them back to work.

In the meantime, we do have a job-training program that we have more confidence in -- that we have proposed in the budget -- than the past ones. We've had, in the Great Society programs, a lot of job-training programs that spent billions of dollars, and yet, unemployment kept growing worse. This unemployment didn't just start now. It's been coming on for several years.

A few years ago, before the Great Society, poverty was being reduced in this country, and the very figure that you mentioned, black unemployment, was decreasing faster than white unemployment. And then came the Great Society programs, and, strangely enough, with all that government spending, the poverty stopped being eliminated, in fact, started going up. And so did the unemployment rate and, particularly, in the minority communities.

We think that our program and this budget that we've introduced is the quickest answer to turning that around. The difference between our job-training program this time is that all of the money is going to be spent on job training. Those other Great Society programs, the biggest share of the money was spent hiring bureaucrats to manage the programs. I vetoed one such program when I was Governor. It was going to put 17 people to work helping keep the parks clean in a little rural county in California. But over half the budget was going for 11 administrators to see that the 17 got to work on time. And I thought that was a little out of balance, so I vetoed the program.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Michelle Stubblefield. Recently government-backed loans have been cut out for students who plan to enter into the field of nursing. My goal was to become a nurse, and without the help of a government-backed loan this is going to be very difficult.

The President. Bless you, and I'm glad you asked that question about the college loans and so forth and the educational help. Much has been made of this, and it's been badly distorted in the reporting.

We have found, for example, that many of these loans and much of this help was going to people whose family income was higher than it should have been. They really should not have been eligible for this help. And we're redirecting it to families of lower income, where it is needed.

It is true that one set of grants called the Pell Grants, we did reduce in order to spread them farther from $1,720 a grant to 1,600 a grant. But, as I say, this was to try and spread and make the help available to more people.

But with only 11 million full-time college students in the United States, 7 million loans and grants indicates that the Federal Government's not getting out of that business. So, we have not cut back. And this is true of a great many of the other programs that they've suggested that they be cut.

The Department of Health and Human Services, which handles the programs to help the needy, to help the disabled, to help the poor, their program will be 8 percent higher, their budget in '83, than it is in '82, and that's $20 billion more money being spent. And yet you don't hear that. That's been a well-kept secret. We haven't been able to get people aware that the only cuts we've made are really cuts in the increase in spending.

The President. Well, the -- [laughter] -- I think there are a number of decisions we've made. For example, I've -- and I know you won't find this out of the ordinary -- I have announced that I'm going to ask Congress to reinstitute prayer in schools. I don't think God should ever have been expelled from the classroom. But that has to be passed by Congress yet. I've asked also for an amendment to balance the budget.

I'm trying to think of programs -- well, the major program would be the economic program, the reform program that we passed, which did come in the budget sense of reducing the increase in cost and the tax cuts, to provide incentive to provide more work.

John F. Kennedy. And the same people mainly that are criticizing me for wanting tax cuts criticized him. And he wouldn't listen, and he went forward with his tax cuts. And the result was an immediate broadening of the base of the economy, an increase in employment, a decrease in unemployment, and business was just fine. And I think the same thing is going to happen.

So far, we only went into effect with a 5-percent cut last October. July 1st will be the first real cut, and that will be the 10-percent cut in the income tax, and then another one in 1983. I think we're going to see more improvement. Right now, farm prices, in spite of inflation going down, have gone up, and our farmers are getting a better price than they have been getting.

The inflation is the biggest single factor. That's the biggest difference. When we took office, the doomcriers were telling us that it'd take at least 10 years to cure inflation. Well, it's been a year and a half, and last month it was zero or less.

I think our program is working. And I think that those economists who have watched the scene for a long time are the ones that tell us that it is the proper program to have in place. So, I didn't know whether you were asking about some specific decision or just what I say about decisions.

I was under the impression -- and maybe I was wrong -- I didn't know there were any court cases pending -- but I was under the impression that the problem of segregated schools had been settled, that we have desegregation. But I was getting complaints -- and even before I got here as President, I was getting complaints that some of the Internal Revenue agents, the tax collectors that collect the income tax, were harassing some schools, even though they were desegregated -- but harassing them and threatening them with taking away their tax exemption -- which educational institutions have -- if they didn't oh, set up scholarship programs or go out actively recruiting and take steps to try and increase their efforts at desegregation. And I didn't think that this was the place of Treasury agents to be doing this. So, I told the Secretary at Treasury that I didn't think that. I think as individuals we get harassed enough by the Internal Revenue collectors.

And as it developed, this turned out that it was turned around and said that I was trying to provide tax exemptions for schools that still practiced segregation. Well, I didn't know there were any -- and that maybe I should have, but I didn't. And it was a total turnaround of what I had intended with what I said to the Secretary of the Treasury.

We have appointed a private initiatives task force. This is a group nationwide to try and find where we can get volunteer help for worthwhile efforts, for things that are going on that the people are doing for themselves, not just waiting for government to do it. And I just wanted to see this. And I also wanted to come here, very frankly, and meet your principal, because if ever there's an instance of what one person can bring into being and cause to happen, he's made it happen here.

You must be aware that there are millions and millions of parents all over this country terribly dissatisfied with the education their children are getting in schools -- the lack of discipline and everything else. And with that deterioration in so much of education you are such a shining light that, as I said in the beginning, I want to spread the word. This is the way it should be done.

The President. This question's being asked, I know, a lot, and this is why yesterday I made my speech about a reduction -- because nuclear weapons do exist and because the Soviet Union has built up such an arsenal of nuclear weapons.

Now, the Soviet Union has gone beyond us. It's reached the point that there's just no reason in it, and it is too dangerous to have these things pointed at the world. In Europe, for example, the Russians had a missile called the SS - 20, a nuclear missile. It was called an intermediate range, because it couldn't come across the ocean and hit us, but it was targeted on all the cities of Europe. And Europe had nothing to counter it. So, our NATO allies asked us if a weapon that we have designed, called the Pershing missile, could be made and installed in Europe to counter this threat of the SS - 20 so the Russians would know if they tried to use those, the Europeans had something to use back.

And right now we have a team in Geneva, Switzerland, negotiating with the Russians, and we have put on the table a treaty calling for a total elimination of their SS - 20's and no implanting of our Pershing missiles in all of Europe. And, so far, the Russians -- their first offer was back, they suggested that we freeze the weapons the way they were. Well now, you can figure out what that means. They wanted to freeze the weapons with 900 nuclear warheads aimed at Europe, and Europe has none aimed at them. I don't think that's a very fair freeze. So, we're trying to get those eliminated.

Can you imagine what would happen in the world if you left the Soviet Union, with its pattern of aggression, with the fact that what it's doing in Afghanistan, how it's shown that it wants to interfere in other countries -- if we did away with ours and left them with those thousands and thousands of missiles, that in 28 minutes from the time someone pushes the button could be hitting the targets in our country? So, we have said to them, ``All right. Let's both of us start reducing those weapons down, keeping -- and being equal, and get them down to where they don't constitute the threat. And of course the ultimate goal that we could all dream of is the same one that's in Geneva now, getting rid of them forever.

And believe it or not, you can be proud of your country. Under President Eisenhower, a number of years ago, this country, we had the weapon then, and the Soviet Union was just beginning to try and build them. But we had them, and President Eisenhower offered to the Soviets and to the world to turn all such weapons over to an international body like the United Nations and take all of them away as a threat between nations. And the Soviet Union refused. So, we're going to try again.

There probably are no stricter gun controls in the world than those in Washington, D.C. There are over 20,000 gun-control laws in the United States today. But the fellow that decided to use me for target practice a year ago last March, there he was on the street at 2 o'clock in the afternoon in spite of all those laws against it, and he had a gun.

Governor that said that anyone who commits a crime, if he had in his possession a gun at the time he committed the crime, whether he used the gun or not, add 5 to 15 years to the prison sentence -- and no probation, he had to go to prison. And I think that might take some of the guns out of the pockets of the criminals.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Matthew Hicks, and my question is if the United States is a democracy, why do we support and are allied to countries such as Argentina and South Africa which are dictatorships?

My belief is that we can do better with what I have called quiet diplomacy, that, no, we don't approve of the practices in some of those countries, but let us befriend them and then let us quietly and behind the scenes try to persuade them that there is a better way to live. In other words, our democracy.

Once to a political leader that you say out in the paper and make a big charge and say, ``You've got to do away with this'' or ``you've got to change this,'' you've made it almost impossible for him to do that. Being a politician, he can't in the eyes of his own people, give in to the demand of someone in another country. But if you go to them and say, ``Hey, look, we'd like to do business with you and we'd like to have trade with you and so forth, but it's kind of difficult. There are some political problems in our own country, in our democracy, because of things that you're doing that aren't democratic.'' But you say it to him quietly.

Union to move to Israel. But I happen to know the President who went to Mr. Brezhnev and told him of some of our political problems here in this country and how they interfered with our trying to get along better with them. And about a year later you woke up and realized that about 35- or 40,000 Jewish people a year were leaving Russia and going to Israel. And this is what we're practicing.

The President. The budget that we've submitted is just a classic example of that that I've already talked about. You see, when a budget is passed -- and I know we use the term ``budget cuts.'' We haven't cut any budget. If cutting a budget would mean that we've asked for a budget next year that's smaller than this year's -- we haven't. The budget next year is going to be considerably larger than this year's, as this year's is larger than last year's.

The difference is when a budget is established and the Congress builds in some program that they say, ``Okay. These are ongoing programs and they're automatic,'' the ones they call uncontrollable, meaning that every year, automatically, without Congress doing anything, the spending for these budget items goes up. And the result was that the 1980 budget to 1981 that we inherited was a built-in increase of 17 percent a year. Well, your tax revenues don't increase 17 percent a year, and that's why you have deficits. And we've been having them for 40 years now.

So, what we have done is trim that expected increase and say it doesn't have to go up that high, to get Congress to agree to set some controls on the so-called uncontrollables. And the result has been that next year's budget, if it is passed as we submitted it, will be bigger by 6.9 percent. But that's a lot different than 17 percent. And the projected deficits for the next 3 years, if we don't do anything, are $182 billion for 1983; 233 billion for 1984, and a figure higher than that -- I forget the exact figure -- for 1985. Well, this means deficits getting bigger and bigger, and already a hundred billion dollars of our annual budget is just for interest on the debt.

So, this is what -- this is the way, the only way to get at it. Now, our opponents, who are opposing us on this, have said, no, the only answer is to raise taxes to eliminate the deficit. But we raised taxes between 1976 and 1981 by $300 billion. And we had $318 billion in deficits in those same 5 years. So, we think that taxes can't keep up with deficits. You have to lower that increase in the government rate of spending.

I've had to answer some of your questions with some figures of what I claim are facts. Don't let me get away with it. Check me out. Make sure that what I told you checks out and is true. But do that to everyone else who also comes before you and sings a song and tries to tell you something.

Now, that doesn't just mean finding someone of the opposite viewpoint who says, ``Everything he told you is wrong.'' No, really check it out. Find out if our budget is going to reduce those deficits the way we said it would. And I know that all that information is available.

The President. You know that reminds me of when I was first in this job and some of those men in uniform would salute me as the Commander in Chief. Having been in the service, I knew that you don't salute when you're not in uniform. And it was bothering me. I'd try to nod to them, but they'd just stand there with that salute. And, finally, one day I said to the Commandant of the Marine Corps, I said, ``You know, there ought to be a regulation that if the President is the Commander in Chief, that he ought to be able to return those salutes.'' And the general said, ``Well, Mr. President, I think if you did it, no one would say anything about it.'' [Laughter] So, I now return the salute.

But the story that I want to tell you -- and I hope you'll appreciate -- it was in the Vietnamese war and a captain with a platoon of men and a typical American army platoon -- black, brown, white -- within a warehouse stored with ammunition. And they were unloading a new shipment of ammunition. And one man dropped from way up on the top of a -- stacks of ammunition, a crate of hand grenades. And the crate smashed, and they rolled all over the floor.

Now, only one of those in that whole warehouse was going to go up, and the captain ordered everyone out. And they got out, and they waited, and nothing happened. And then the captain said to the platoon, ``Wait here.'' And he went back in, and he picked up a grenade and -- he'd taken some adhesive tape with him -- and he taped the pin down so that it couldn't go off and detonate. And it worked. And he then went outside and told his men what he had done and got them all tape, and he said, ``Now we'll go in and pick up the grenades.'' And he showed them how to tape them.

I would say that in the traditions of an officer, the man in command who has to make sometimes some unhappy decisions, he had exemplified the highest standards of being an officer, in that he went in and he took the risk and did not endanger his men until he had proved that it would work.

And I think it exemplifies what so many of us dream today, that what lingering separations there are, what lingering divisions between our people -- and, sure, there are rednecks and bigots, and there are people that are prejudiced on all sides and for whatever reason, religion and everything else. But I think there was an example of what real America can be and what I think the overwhelming majority of us, regardless of our religion, our race, or our ethnic background, want America to be. And we must keep in mind at all times that all those other people are out there wanting the same thing, and we continue to work for that.

Affairs at the Department of State. Previously he was the national security affairs correspondent for the New York Times, covering foreign policy and defense issues in Washington, including the State Department, the Pentagon, the National Security Council, the Central Intelligence Agency, and Capitol Hill. Mr. Burt has served as assistant director of the International Institute for Strategic Studies in London; was a research associate at the International Institute for Strategic Studies; worked as an advanced research fellow at the U.S. Naval War College in Newport, R.I.; and was an adviser on defense and arms control to the House of Representatives Republican Wednesday Group.

Mr. Buckley has enjoyed a distinguished career in public service, as well as in the practice of law and private business. As the new Counselor of the Department of State, an Under Secretary-level position, Mr. Buckley will be a principal officer of the Department performing in a greatly expanded Counselor's role. Mr. Buckley will be charged with the performance of sensitive, high-level missions on behalf of the Secretary of State. Mr. Buckley will also deal with sensitive, functional foreign policy matters, as requested by the Secretary.

Catawba Corp., a privately owned firm providing a variety of services to a group of oil and gas exploration companies operating primarily outside the United States. During the next 17 years, he was actively engaged in business negotiations in a number of countries in such areas as Southeast Asia, Canada, Latin America, Europe, and Australia.

On May 22, 1882, representatives of the United States of America and the Kingdom of Korea concluded a Treaty of Peace, Amity, Commerce, and Navigation providing for the opening of diplomatic relations and the establishment of permanent resident missions in each capital. This Treaty marked a new chapter in the history of northeast Asia and was the auspicious beginning of an enduring partnership between the United States and Korea.

The intervening century has witnessed enormous change and progress in our two nations. Our relationship began when both of our nations were largely isolated from the main currents of world life. A century later, Korea and the United States are heavily engaged in all aspects of international endeavor. We have undergone remarkable social and economic transformations as well -- from largely rural agricultural societies 100 years ago to the urban industrial economies of today. And, in the process, we have come to enjoy unprecedented levels of prosperity.

Throughout this period, Americans and Koreans have enriched each other's cultures through the exchange of teachers, scholars and missionaries, and each other's economies through trade and scientific and technological cooperation. The United States applauds and welcomes the valuable contributions that citizens and residents of Korean ancestry have made and continue to make to our society.

Today Americans share many common values with the people of Korea. We believe that only in an atmosphere of freedom can full human potential be realized. We both have set high standards for education and achievement. We believe that an environment of free enterprise encourages initiative and innovation. And we both believe that hard work and diligence will lead to a better life and a better world for our children.

As we enter this second century of our relationship, we can look with satisfaction on our past accomplishments and with anticipation to the future. We will stand by our friends in Korea. In so doing we reaffirm our dedication to the principles of freedom and democracy as the basis of our continued strength and friendship. It is fitting then, that we now reflect upon our relations with this great nation and its people.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 10th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

U.S. fishing interests have urged prompt consideration of this agreement, and I therefore recommend that the Congress consider issuance of a joint resolution to bring this agreement into force, before the agreement expires on July 1, 1982.

Washington. Over our many years of friendship with Brazil, Mr. President, your country has often been described as the nation of the future. Well, the future is here. Brazil is increasingly looked to not for its potential, but for its capabilities; not for what it will accomplish, but for what it is accomplishing.

We in the United States rejoice with the people of Brazil for the progress that you have made economically, politically, and socially, and look forward to expanding on the mature relationship we've developed. The ties that bind us are firm, with mutual respect and trust reinforced by time and shared values.

World Wars, Brazil joined with us to confront the threat to freedom. Since the war years, our two countries have collaborated on many fronts to meet diverse challenges to the security and well-being of our peoples.

Brazil is an independent force for moderation and balance in this hemisphere. And while our two countries have had disagreements, which is only natural and to be expected among friends, we have never lost that mutual respect and admiration so characteristic of our relationship.

Your leadership, Mr. President, is built upon the qualities of which I've just spoken. During a state visit to Colombia last year, you explained in extreme situations, political wisdom requires utmost levels of tolerance. We learned that tolerance and moderation don't bring bitter fruits and are uncontestable demonstrations of fidelity to the true ideal of democracy. This and other statements you've made speak well of your ideals and those of your country.

Mr. President, the motto of Brazil is ``Order and Progress.'' And during these trying times, your country has proven that it takes these words seriously. Especially hard hit by rising energy prices, your government made an impressive commitment to do what was necessary to protect your people's standard of living and the Brazilian way of life. As a result of this commitment, your country is now a leader in the development of alternative energy resources, especially the use of alcohol as a fuel and the harnessing of hydroelectric energy.

Our two peoples are also similar in that they represent a meltingpot of cultures and ethnic backgrounds. But the most significant comparison remains the respect for individual enterprise and diversity that has developed in our two countries.

The Amazon River is, to many, synonymous with Brazil. Its grandeur, enormity, and power stagger the imagination. But so too does Brazil. Let us pledge that we shall always remember, and never take for granted, the good will between us.

President Figueiredo, it has been 11 years since a Brazilian President honored the United States with a state visit. This is too long a period for nations which have so much to contribute to one another. Let us confirm that the personal bonds we develop through this visit will reinforce the friendship between our peoples.

Vice President Bush visited your country and consulted with your government in October. He reported to me the constructive and amicable approach with which he was met. So today, I look forward to our discussion. I have much to learn from you and seek your counsel on matters of mutual concern.

In your annual message to the Brazilian Congress last year, you said of Brazil: ``We seek to understand and to be understood.'' Well, let this be the basis of our talks today. Two old friends in a period of change, honestly and with sincerity, seeking good will and understanding.

For over 150 years, Brazil and the United States have maintained balanced relations. Ours is a heritage of mutual esteem, understanding, and respect. My visit to this country is, therefore, only a natural development of our bilateral relations. Our relations with the United States play an important role in the framework of our foreign policy.

Brazil's progress is predicated upon the diversification and enhancement of its international presence. It is a Brazilian goal to better adapt our bilateral relations to the world of today. To this end, the exchange of information and ideas between our governments should be intensified.

Under the present difficult circumstances, I regard the opportunity of having an open discussion with you, Mr. President, as particularly positive. The harshest of realities demonstrate repeatedly that dialog is an invaluable diplomatic tool. I arrive in Washington willing to examine together with you the problems that concern us both in the political and economic fields. I'm willing to listen and to speak frankly and objectively.

We in Brazil wish to take a lasting and creative approach to the commonality of interests and values existing between us and your great country. The breadth and range of our relations encourage us to anticipate favorable results. As our countries have their own unique characteristics and play distinct roles in international as well as regional politics, it is only natural that differences of opinion should exist. We will endeavor to smooth them out through the exchange of ideas, views, and clarifications.

Mr. President, it is a known fact that in Brazil we are going through a specially significant chapter of our political history during which democratic institutions are being consolidated. From a diplomatic standpoint, we adopt a universalistic approach. Our foreign policy is diversified. Brazil is both a Western and a Third World country. It is a Latin American country with a strong African heritage, among others. Brazilian foreign policy endeavors to reflect this wealth of historical experience.

In a world where crises multiply, diplomacy must continue to build bridges between states. Even in times of despair and conflict, agreement, however difficult, has to be found. In the international sphere, some impasses still remain, such as the issue of nuclear disarmament, of vital importance for the destiny of mankind. The North-South negotiations do not progress. Forging links of cooperation among peoples has never been so vital and so urgent.

Americans and Brazilians have built a tradition of friendship throughout history. In times of crisis, we must resort to mutual inspiration and counsel. The purpose of Brazilian diplomacy is, in essence, to strengthen the ties of mutual confidence among the countries of this continent so that the spirit of conciliation and peace may prosper.

The timing of this visit gives us an unexpected opportunity. Yesterday was Mrs. Figueiredo's birthday. [Applause] I hope you'll -- well, you already have joined me in wishing her a very happy birthday.

Mr. President, our discussions this morning were satisfying and enjoyable. We spoke freely and frankly, expressing both agreement and disagreement in the same friendly candor. The personal contact we've made and the rapport that we've developed can only serve the interest of both our countries.

Mr. President, I have always maintained that when the job to be done is really rough, the horse cavalry can provide the man to do it. [Laughter] And your record bears me out. The President is of the third generation of horse cavalry in his country.

In your annual message to the Brazilian Congress this year, you restated your belief in those ideals that have guided your administration. ``The democracy I envision,'' you said, ``is dynamic and creative. In keeping with this -- basic principles, such as private property and free enterprise, which are the bases of freedom itself, will serve the individual society and the ideal of distributive justice.'' Well, Mr. President, your commitment to liberty is most encouraging in a world that's grown darker, made so by totalitarian forces.

During the welcoming ceremonies this morning, much was said about the long history of friendship between our people. For 158 years our peaceful and amicable relations have been maintained without serious disruption, a tribute to the common sense and common interests of both our peoples. I mentioned our camaraderie during the Second World War, but most significant has been our good will in times of peace.

Mr. President, your visit coincides with one of the most serious challenges to peace this hemisphere has known. I think you know how hard the United States, linked by friendship to both countries involved in the South Atlantic conflict, worked to prevent war and then to bring peace.

We don't long for days gone by, but instead look to the days ahead, because we see tremendous new opportunities unfolding every day. Let us remember the changing times have not altered the affection between us.

President Figueiredo. Mr. President, distinguished guests, thank you, Mr. President, for your kind words. I believe they convey appreciation for my country and underline the traditional friendship between our peoples.

Brazil is also a developing country. Thus, we share the problems, goals, and aspirations of those states, which today account for most of mankind. This consideration was equally present during our conversations. This is a moment of deterioration of the international political life and of economic crises. My government believes it essential that the West, in which your country plays such a vital role, deploy its best possible efforts to reinforce its ties of mutual trust with the developing world.

I am convinced that the industrialized West should avoid both the temptations of isolationism and of adopting measures geared to its unilateral interests alone. The West should, rather, join in the dialog both on a global level -- and I mean here the North-South negotiations -- and on more localized political and economic problems and crises.

Excellency and to receive high government officials has been extremely valuable. We have exchanged views about problems that are a matter of concern to us and to countries with which we have close and friendly relations. On the one hand, we have reviewed the concrete difficulties with which we are faced. An on the other, we have looked into the wide prospects for reinforcing and diversifying our mutual ties. We have thus given new impetus to our bilateral relations.

Government and people. I will return to Brazil convinced that we have laid the groundwork for the future development of relations that date back to the independence of our country. Such relations are guided by the principles of mutual understanding and respect, as well as by appreciation for the specific interests of each of our countries.

Section 1. A United States citizen who is a family member of a civilian employee or of a member of a uniformed service and who has completed a total of 24 months of fully satisfactory service under one or more overseas appointments in the excepted or competitive civil service, may be appointed noncompetitively to a competitive service position in the Executive branch within the United States (including Guam, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands) if he or she meets the qualifications and other requirements established by the Director of the Office of Personnel Management and the provisions of this Order.

Sec. 3. The Director of the Office of Personnel Management shall prescribe such regulations as may be necessary to implement this Order, including uniform local hire procedures to assure merit selection of overseas employees.

Over the generations, the protection of the individual and the pursuit of justice have been the responsibility of our police officers. They stand as the guardians of the fragile thread of order and civility that separate a civilized society from mankind's barbarous past. Police officers shoulder the trust of their fellow citizens in their daily effort to provide the protection and service that are increasingly important to our nation.

Those officers who have made the supreme sacrifice have demonstrated their devotion to the fundamental values of decency so essential to the well-being of American life. Those men and women who have carried the cause of justice to the grave deserve not only our respect but our heartfelt gratitude and affection. For without law and order, our society would soon crumble, dashing the dreams of our forebears and mocking the heroes and heroines whose sacrifices have made this great land a beacon of hope and a symbol of freedom for the world.

It is most fitting that all Americans pay tribute to police officers and that we join with them and the families of their fallen comrades in honoring the memory of those who have lost their lives while protecting their fellow citizens and communities.

Good morning, and welcome to the White House again. It's always an honor for this House to welcome those who so clearly represent America's values. I have said before that small business is the heart and soul of free enterprise, and today we are honoring the individuals who are the embodiment of that heart and soul -- the small businessperson. We are paying tribute to the people who are out there creating new jobs, inventing products, and expanding the economy -- and I think, in this recession that we're in, I could say, and who are hurting very much.

Teddy Roosevelt once pointed out that ``it ought to be evident to everyone that business has to prosper before anybody can benefit from it.'' Well, unfortunately, it's not evident to enough people in this town. Over the years, they've taxed and shackled and burdened small business. For many small business firms, just surviving in the business climate of the last 5 years has been a daily struggle.

The tax program also includes such provisions as accelerated depreciation and higher allowances for Keogh plans and IRAs, and the estate tax exemption is of special help to farmers and family-owned businesses. We cut the growth in Federal regulations by a third; plus we cut, from 10 years to 5, the deadline for Federal agencies to review existing regulations and spot those harmful to small business. I don't think it should take 10 years to find out that a regulation doesn't make sense.

Kenton Pattie, are with us today. You all deserve a tip-of-the-hat and congratulations in appreciation for your efforts. And I agree with you completely: Government contracts should be paid the same as any other business contracts -- on time.

You know, this was a terrible problem. As interest rates soared last year to over 20 percent, thousands of businesses had to borrow, while waiting for their own government to pay up. In effect, the Government was borrowing interest-free from small business. It wasn't fair, and with the coalition and its help, we're going to get things set straight.

We're also supporting policies that'll give small businesses a fairer chance to compete for Federal aid opportunities. Another priority is to get the Federal Government out of competition with private industry in providing goods and services to be used by the Federal Government. This is work that small business could be doing and could be doing profitably, and yet at lower costs to the taxpayers.

Now, in terms of the economy itself, the inflation rate is drastically down from when we took office. Interest rates are also down, but obviously that's not good enough, because they're still killing you. I think we'll see real progress on interest rates once the financial markets finally wake up to the fact that not only is inflation coming down, but this time we're going to keep it down.

You here today understand that it takes time to make an enterprise or an economic program work. Well, we spent our first year putting this business together, and we just opened the doors, really, in October. We've got a good product, and we're confident that this will be a successful venture. I'd be elated if it were anywhere near as successful as the three award winners that we have here today.

Seriously, these gentlemen represent not only the entrepreneurial spirit but the voluntary spirit as well, because you're each involved in your home communities. You not only have America's congratulations on what you've accomplished, you've got our thanks.

Richard Mystrom went to Alaska with his wife and 8-month-old baby with only $700 in his pocket, and today he is president of Mystrom Advertising, with revenues of $2\1/2\ million a year, and awards for creativity and innovation. And he also is very active in community and civic affairs.

Four times in my life, I have seen America plunged into war -- twice as part of tragic global conflicts that cost the lives of millions. Living through that experience has convinced me that America's highest mission is to stand as a leader among the free nations in the cause of peace. And that's why, hand in hand with our efforts to restore a credible national defense, my administration has been actively working for a reduction in nuclear and conventional forces that can help free the world from the threat of destruction.

In Geneva, the United States is now negotiating with the Soviet Union on a proposal I set forward last fall to reduce drastically the level of nuclear armament in Europe. In Vienna, we and our NATO allies are negotiating with the Warsaw Pact over ways to reduce conventional forces in Europe.

Last Sunday, I proposed a far-reaching approach to nuclear arms control -- a phased reduction in strategic weapons beginning with those that are most dangerous and destabilizing, the warheads on ballistic missiles and especially those on intercontinental ballistic missiles.

Today the United States and the Soviet Union each have about 7,500 nuclear warheads poised on missiles that can reach their targets in a matter of minutes. In the first phase of negotiations, we want to focus on lessening this imminent threat. We seek to reduce the number of ballistic missile warheads to about 5,000 -- one-third less than today's levels -- limit the number of warheads on land-based missiles to half that number, and cut the total number of all ballistic missiles to an equal level -- about one-half that of the current U.S. level.

In the second phase, we'll seek reductions to equal levels of throwweight, a critical indicator of overall destructive potential of missiles. To be acceptable, a new arms agreement with the Soviets must be balanced, equal, and verifiable. And most important, it must increase stability and the prospects of peace.

Government so that we can begin formal negotiations on the reduction of strategic nuclear arms -- the START talks -- at the earliest opportunity. And we hope that these negotiations can begin by the end of June and hope to hear from President Brezhnev in the near future.

Reaching an agreement with the Soviets will not be short or easy work. We know that from the past. But I believe that the Soviet people and their leaders understand the importance of preventing war. And I believe that a firm, forthright American position on arms reductions can bring us closer to a settlement.

Q. Mr. President, with business failures reaching the highest numbers in 40 years and no sign that your modified budget plan is making progress in Congress, what would you say to the Nation's 10 million unemployed about their prospects for finding work? And when will their situation improve?

The President. Their situation will improve -- again I say, as I've said so often, that if you look back at the history of recessions, unemployment, tragically, is the last thing to recover. But it will improve, I think in the latter half of this year.

I do believe that there is every indication that this recession is bottoming out. But the main thing is, there isn't going to be any real improvement for anyone until interest rates come down. And the quickest way to get interest rates down is for the Congress to prove that it will attempt to reduce government spending -- in other words, to pass that budget that has already been passed out of the Senate Budget Committee. And I think there's a very good chance of that. And I think that that will be the foremost step in answering their problem.

The President. Well, but we can't ignore that, the reason why it was refused ratification. SALT stands for strategic arms limitation. And the limitation in that agreement would allow in the life of the treaty for the Soviet Union to just about double their present nuclear capability. It would allow -- and does allow -- us to increase ours. In other words, it simply legitimizes an arms race.

Now, the parts that we're observing of that have to do with the monitoring of each other's weaponry, and so both sides are doing that. What we're striving for is to reduce the power, the number, and particularly those destabilizing missiles that can be touched off by the push of a button -- to reduce the number of those. And there just is no ratio between that and what SALT was attempting to do. I think SALT was the wrong course to follow.

The President. Well, I don't know that you could project a timeframe on that, when you look back at the history all the way back to the end of World War II with the Soviet Union on the negotiations. But I do think there is one thing present now that was not present before, and that is the determination of the United States to rebuild its national defenses. And the very fact that we have shown the will and are going forward on the rebuilding program is something that I think offers an inducement to the Soviet Union to come to that table and legitimately negotiate with us.

In the past several years, those negotiations took place with them having a superiority over us and us actually unilaterally disarming. Every time someone wanted a little money for another program, they took it away from defense. And that isn't true anymore.

Q. Mr. President, there have been calls in recent days for the United States to renounce the existing NATO treaty under which -- policy under which we would retaliate against the Soviets with nuclear weapons if they attack Western Europe with conventional arms. Under what conditions could we pledge that we will never be the first to introduce nuclear weapons in any conflict in Western Europe?

The President. I just don't think this proposal that has been made about to renounce the first use of weapons -- certainly, there's none of us that want to see them -- but I don't think that any useful purpose is served in making such a declaration. And our strategic nuclear weapons unfortunately are the only balance or deterrent that we have to the massive buildup of conventional arms that the Soviet Union has on the western front -- on the NATO front. Now, this is why in Vienna we're trying to negotiate with them on a reduction of conventional arms also, because they have an overpowering force there.

Q. Mr. President, what can you tell us about the progress or lack of progress concerning the negotiated settlement on the Falkland Islands? Could you explain a little bit what role the United States is playing and if you could elaborate a little bit about what our situation is now with respect to other allies in Latin America and in South America, since we have so firmly come down on the side of the British?

President Figueiredo of Brazil, he too is interested and has volunteered his good offices to try and help. And we -- all those of us who want to be brokers for a peaceful settlement can do is stand by and try to be helpful in that.

There are reports that some of the issues between the two have been agreed upon. There are still some -- basically, it is down to a situation of withdrawal, of what will be the interim administration on the island itself, and what will be the period of negotiations, then, of what the ultimate settlement is supposed to be.

Up until now the intransigence had been on one side, and that is in wanting a guarantee of sovereignty before the negotiations took place, which doesn't make much sense. I understand that there's been some agreement now on, awaiting negotiations on that. So, we'll continue to hope and pray.

Q. Mr. President, on the subject of the economy, the American people have heard two consecutive administrations promise to balance the Federal budget and then have to postpone that achievement. And your administration has had to postpone its predictions of when the economic recovery would occur. Even when next year's Federal budget is arrived at, how will the lenders, who are controlling the interest rates, and the American people be able to believe that any projected set of figures really will come to pass?

The President. I believe that if 2 years in a row we show that the course we embarked on last year is going to be followed until we have reduced the percentage of government spending, or government spending as a percentage of the gross national product, and that we're continuing along that line, plus a tax program which I think is designed to help the economy get back on its feet, I think we'll see the interest rates come down. I believe they'll come down if this budget that has been outlined right now in the Senate is passed.

And it's the -- you see, in the past -- and this is what has them pessimistic -- your're right, that the interest rates are up simply because the money market has so little confidence that government will stay the course. In the past seven or eight recessions since World War II, the normal pattern was to suddenly flood the money market with printed money, paper money, to artificially stimulate the economy. The main target always, then, was the reduction of the unemployed. That was believed to be the political problem that first had to be solved. The only trouble was, within 2 to 3 years after each one of those quick fixes, we went into another recession. And each time, if you look at a chart of those recessions, you'll see that each one was worse than the preceding one.

And once they are convinced that we mean it -- and I think that what we're doing right now 2 years in a row, I think could have that effect on them, because we have no intention of sending inflation skyrocketing again.

The President. With some minor flurries, our cease-fire has held for 9 months now. The word we get from both sides is that they want it to continue. And I could probably answer your question better when I get an assessment -- I'll be seeing Ambassador Habib [Ambassador Philip C. Habib, the President's emissary in consultations in the Middle East.] this, I think, Saturday it is.

Will you insist on that portion of the Senate plan, or will you agree to another plan that does not contain any savings from social security? And, second, what do you think of Representative Michel's idea that social security and other trust funds be separated from the unified budget?

The President. I think it's something to be looked at. Here's a fund that is not funded out of general funds; it's funded by its own tax. And it's something -- I can't give you commitment one way or the other. I can tell you that I think that it's an interesting idea and to be looked at.

I think what we have to understand is, in all of the demagoguery and all of the outright falsehoods that have been uttered about this, that the Senate put the number into the budget only because they believed that it was honest to call attention to the fact that that is the figure by which and the amount of which social security is insolvent -- that this must be corrected before the end of next year, or there isn't enough money in the trust fund to carry through.

Senate figure and, instead of admitting what it was, said that we were proposing to cut the beneficiaries of social security by all those billions of dollars -- and a betrayal of our trust. Well, I have made a pledge that the benefits due to the people now dependent on social security, they're going to continue to get. And on July 1st, they're going to get their 7.4-percent cost-of-living increase.

I think that the leadership -- Republican leadership in the House who said take it out simply were trying -- because it was becoming again a political football which was obscuring the main problem which is pass the budget -- and they thought, okay, set it aside, because the commission does not report till December 31st on a plan for making the program solvent -- and to get back to the business of the budget.

Q. Mr. President, as you know, there is widespread concern in the business community that the recovery from the recession which you expect will occur in the fall will be a short one and a shallow one -- not enough to create too many jobs and stimulate investment. I wonder, sir, whether you share those concerns and whether you have some long-term views or projects in mind to stimulate the economy to ensure that this recovery is a lasting one?

The thinking that simply beginning recovery means instant recovery and back to normal, I think, is asking too much. Remember that some of the things upon which that recovery is based, for example, the tax program, the real first installment that will have some effect begins on July 1st.

But just the fact that it begins does not mean that then there is this total effect that it's going to have. It is based on the idea that more money in the hands of the people for saving, for investing, for purchasing is going to have an effect on the economy. But you have to wait until they begin to have some of that money in their pockets and then the following installment that comes along as well.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to ask you two questions. First off, could you comment on the Braniff situation, a large American company going bankrupt. And secondly, Dun & Bradstreet says that 530 American companies were forced into bankruptcy in the first week of this month alone. Will you take any action to help all these companies that are going under, or will you just do nothing and wait for the interest rates to go up that will eventually help them?

The President. Well, Lesley, I don't see where government can put itself in the business of in some way bailing out, at the taxpayers' expense, companies that go bankrupt. And maybe part of the increase in the bankruptcies is due to the fact that there've been some changes in the bankruptcy laws.

Now, there's a little difference in a bankruptcy and, as Braniff itself has stated, and let's say the usual thing -- or the thing that we think of, of someone just going broke and being left flat and destitute. They have a great many assets that will be sold. There will be a reorganization, and Braniff expects to go back in business, back more in the pattern that it had followed before it went into the overwhelming expansion. And bankruptcy means that those assets then are used to pay the debt to the creditors and so forth.

So, I don't see a place for government. I think government's main thing that it can do is everything possible to create a better business climate and to bring the interest rates down, because companies now that -- some that are declaring bankruptcy in normal interest rates, a time of normal interest rates, they would be able to borrow the money to tide them over.

Q. Mr. President, for many years, your critics attacked you as being too bellicose and too hawkish on foreign affairs. Now you're getting criticism from some of your old friends that you're turning moderate and pragmatic. Human Events, a publication you've admired, wants you to fire your Secretary of State. Conservative Digest says Mr. Bush is taking over your administration. Mr.

I know that in the first press conference, I was asked a question, and you have, many of you, referred to it constantly as my attack on the Soviet Union. And I've tried over and over again to call your attention to the fact that I was quoting representatives of the Soviet Union in the fact that the Soviet Union openly states that the only morality it recognizes is anything that will further world socialism. And the only thing that is immoral in their eyes is anything that is counter to that -- that counters this. And so, this was made my own statement as if I were castigating them for lack of character. It's just that they don't think like we do.

But if you'll go back to the campaign, time after time in the campaign I said that my goal was going to be to try for an outright reduction, particularly of nuclear weapons. And I think I'm being consistent. It's taking me a little while to get there, but we have some other things to do. But that's what we're trying to do.

I have not changed my mind. I believe that it would be naive for us to go into any of these negotiations without complete protection with regard to verification, because I believe that there are two moral standards at issue there.

Q. Mr. President, do you have any position on the flat-rate tax proposal that's now kicking around up on the Hill that many of your economic advisers -- Milton Friedman and others -- are saying that they support? Do you have a position on that?

Q. Mr. President, in your arms proposal, you focus on a central intercontinental missile system to the two sides. If the Soviets were to come back and say they wanted to talk about bombers, about cruise missiles, about other weapon systems, would you be willing to include those, or are those excluded?

The President. No, nothing is excluded. But one of the reasons for going at the ballistic missile -- that is the one that is the most destabilizing. That one's the one that is the most frightening to most people. And let me just give you a little reasoning on that -- of my own on that score.

Those that are carried in bombers, those that are carried in ships of one kind or another, or submersibles, you are dealing there with a conventional type of weapon or instrument, and those instruments can be intercepted. They can be recalled if there has been a miscalculation. And so they don't have the same, I think, psychological effect that the presence of those other ones that, once launched, that's it; they're on their way, and there's no preventing, no stopping them.

Q. Mr. President, there are many arms specialists, however, who say that the multiplication of cruise missiles in particular -- those can be put on land, can be put on sea ships, submarines and so forth -- also have that same effect; you can't call them back once they're launched. They have very short flight time, and there will be thousands of them.

But this doesn't mean that we ignore anything. As I said, we're negotiating now on conventional weapons. But I think you start with first things first. You can't bite it all off in one bite. And so our decision was to start with the most destabilizing and the most destructive.

Q. Mr. President, during the past 10 days, black Americans have received a lot of your time -- specifically, your visit to Maryland to the home of the Butler family; your call to the woman with Hodgkins disease at the request of her husband; and then, of course, your visit to Providence-St.

Q. Mr. President, why did you tell the students in Chicago that when you made the decision about tax exemptions for segregated schools, you were unaware of court cases, since you had signed off on a memo which cited such cases? And secondly, can you explain why you said you did not know there still are segregated schools?

And the letter that you say I signed off on, that was the first knowledge that I had of the court case in the letter that came to me from Congressman Trent Lott -- and they come to me in great numbers. But I came into office bringing with me the question that I had about Internal Revenue agents harassing already desegregated schools just on their own as if they were somehow not doing right. And so, I had spoken to the Secretary of the Treasury long before that notation went on the letter.

The President. No, the decision that I'm talking about is, I said to the Secretary of the Treasury that he ought to look into the activities of Treasury agents who were going into desegregated schools and who were then, on their own, just in their own belief and what they thought ought to be done, harassing the schools and saying they ought to be doing better, they ought to be instituting scholarship programs and so forth. Well, many independent schools like the one I just addressed last weekend live in genteel poverty. There's a limit to how much they can do of that kind, and yet, they're totally desegregated and have no bias whatsoever.

Q. I understand that you have said that you'll guarantee for social security recipients that they will not only have their current benefits cut, but they'll get the July increase. But let me ask this as narrowly as I can. Will you support in the future any kind of freeze on the cost-of-living increases in social security benefits. And what about those down the road, those in their forties and fifties who've paid into the system? Will you guarantee them social security benefits that will keep pace with the cost of living?

The President. The whole matter is in the hands of the commission that I finally appointed when I discovered that the talk about social security led to it becoming a political football and a terrorizing experience for the people dependent on the program. I don't know what the commission is going to come up with, but the program has expanded to where it has a number of different facets that were never a part at the beginning and that are not associated with the benefit payments to senior citizens who have no other source of income.

Now, there are reorganization things that can be done. The one that we proposed last year, believe it or not, would have made the program solvent, and that was one which simply changed for a brief period -- or added a brief period of time to early retirement. Now, that's a new facet that was passed after the program was well underway -- I don't remember the exact year it was passed -- but suddenly saying that, well, people at 62 could retire on 80 percent of their full payment. We had proposed last year that in an effort to make the program solvent, that we extend that, that they could retire at 62, but they would not get 80 percent until a period later before they became 65. And that would have been enough of a change to make the program solvent.

There are other things. There is the program of social security disability and Social Security itself has admitted, and in 1980, under the previous administration, a law was passed to try and clean up what was believed to be a gigantic abuse of that program. So, there are things that can be done.

One of the problems with the two tax increases still scheduled in social security that were passed again under the previous administration, the possibility exists that young people today may find that their social security tax is so high that they could never expect to get from social security what they pay in. And they would be far better off if they had that money in their own hands to buy a retirement policy of some kind. So, there are all these things open.

All I know is that I told the people that I appointed to the commission that one thing had to be certain: That whatever plan was selected, those people now dependent on social security must not be deprived of their benefits or have their benefits cut back.

Now, with regard to your question about cost of living, here you're talking about -- I think there are times in which, in the temporary situation such as we are now, that you could temporarily put a ceiling on a cost of living adjustment. And remember you're not cutting them back there; you are simply reducing the amount of their increase if you did that. But we have no plans for that, because I'm kind of of the mind that once they get this 7.4, by the time next year rolls around, there maybe won't be any cost of living increase 'cause there won't be any increase in the cost of living.

You know, I'm delighted to be here, and I'm not going to take too much time on a monolog. You recognize, of course, I'm sure, in addition to our fine host here, Jack Block, the Secretary of Agriculture. I brought him along for the tough questions. [Laughter] But, you know, I have said many times in public addresses that in all of this recession time -- but in all of these past years of growing inflation, there's no part of our economy that's been caught harder in the cost-price squeeze than agriculture. And I even have a personal example of that.

Unemployment had been increasing; it had been going on, increasing since 1979. Today we know that continues to increase, and that is the one part of a recession that is the last and the slowest in turning up.

Now, if you look at the gap between inflation and where the interest rates are, you come down to the problem that I think is your biggest problem and is the biggest problem for the recovery of the economy.

I have been meeting in these last few days with leaders from every type of business and industry and of the financial world and the bankers and so forth on this interest question, and one answer keeps coming from every one of them. It is pessimism based on past experience that over the years we've had seven to eight recessions since World War II. And every time the government has gone for the quick fix, artificial stimulant of the money supply, artificial government spending, supposedly, programs that'll stimulate the economy. And the result has been that up goes inflation.

It does have a temporary effect on helping unemployment, but it's like trying to treat a fever by eating the thermometer. And the result is about 2 years later we're into another recession. And if you look at the chart back over the years, every recession is getting bigger, worse. And this one is the worst one of all.

Every one of these people that I have met with said the same thing that I feel myself. They're pessimistic, those who lend money. They fear that even with that low recession rate that the government will follow the old pattern, and up will go inflation again. Well, it's not going to follow the old pattern. We're battling to prevent that and to see that it doesn't happen.

We're supporting the bill that has come out of the Senate, has some tax increase there, but it's not going to interfere with the tax relief program that we put into effect last year. That's going to continue.

But the main thing is when we took office, the cost of government was increasing 17 percent a year. We have that down now to less than 7 percent a year, in view of next year's budget. And we believe that the answer, the main answer to your problems, to the automobile industries, to steel, to the construction industry, is the reduction of the interest rates.

When you stop to think that the deficit has built up over the years, that a hundred billion dollars or more of our annual budget -- that's enough to wipe out the deficits completely -- is just interest on the national debt. Our goal is to bring government down to the balanced budget.

It can't be done overnight. They didn't get this way overnight. And when we do that, then to work out a plan, no matter how small it is, but to begin making some installments on that national debt so our kids'll know that we don't intend to leave that as their inheritance of America.

Q. Mr. President, I have a question. I'm Bill Moore, a local dairy farmer. As you know, farmers need a lot of credit -- borrow billions of dollars collectively over this country. We're concerned with the national projected deficit, how we're going to be able to continue to get this supply of money that we need and at reasonable interest rates.

The projected deficits, if we do nothing -- and let me be honest with you and tell you that I am one who -- some -- I question the ability of even the best of economists to project more than a few months ahead. But even so, there is enough agreement that it would look like a deficit of $182 billion for next year. That goes up to 216 billion in '84, 233 billion in '85. The program that we're talking about would bring those down to 100 -- about 106 -- 69 and 39, which shows you that we're coming down. And you only have to go, at that point, a couple of years further, and you see that we reach the balanced budget.

But, as I say, even these bankers and these men from the finance firms and the investment firms and all, all said that interest rates will start coming down again when that budget is passed, and they know that the Congress is not going to obstruct our efforts to deal with those deficits.

Secretary Block. May I just add on this particular issue of credit for agriculture, a lot of people talk, ``Well, what are you doing for agriculture? Agriculture isn't getting any help.'' But I'll tell you the truth, the facts are that there is some $5 billion more money going into agriculture this year from commodity credit loans, which are part of our program. And the farmers are taking advantage of that to tide the farmers through these tough times, $5 billion more in commodity credit loans. We have some increases in the farmers home operating loans.

And just a little additional note: That money that is so badly needed and provides so much help in commodity credit loans is available only to the participants in the Farm Acreage Reduction program. And next year, those that do not participate, that have been used to farm commodity credit loans, they're not going to qualify if they choose not to participate, because those are the rules of the game.

So, there's ample credit; the credit's there. As the President points out, it's just too expensive for us in agriculture. We can't make ends meet at these prices. But we're looking for it to come down.

Secretary Block. Commodity credit loans? They're about 14 percent now. They change every month. So, that means -- you know, if you can get a loan on your corn -- and we hope they're coming down. And it looks like they are.

The President. Well, we're trying very hard with that. And, as a matter of fact, we recognize that that problem was created by government, not by the farmers. It is costing us about $2 billion a year. But what we're seeking is legislation that will allow the Secretary of Agriculture at his discretion to set the support level and to work with you, the dairy farmers, on this particular problem in getting rid of the present surplus.

Now, is there more that you'd like to add there? Also, we are looking at the situation of foreign exports to the United States -- our imports of casein that is subsidized by other governments, which, again, is something that is unfair and that we want to do something about.

Once again, there are some quick fixes floating around for the dairy problem, and you've seen them and read about them. But I'll tell you something. They are not in the long-range, best interests of the dairy industry. They are Mickey Mouse plans of two-price systems, higher price for domestic than we have for exports. And they are ridiculous. And they're going to destroy the whole dairy program if the industry doesn't see the light and adopt a plan that is sound, reasonable, and gives a future for the dairy industry and for the young people that were talked about here this morning that want to come into the dairy industry.

So, I urge you to look at this. And I sincerely pledge to you that I will work with the dairy industry, that we will appoint a board that will give us advice -- principally made up of producers -- to help us in attacking and solving this problem.

Q. Mr. President, I'm in the cattle business. I'd like to know what is being done to help cut down the barriers for foreign trade, especially in Japan. Now, they've sent all their products over in the area, and we do not put any restrictions on their products, and yet they put the restrictions on our products. And I feel that your administration, which I know is doing a lot, but I feel there should be a lot more done.

The President. This gentleman is talking about cattle farming and the restrictions that are put on our exported cattle, for example, to Japan, and yet the unlimited way in which they can come in here. He says he knows we're doing something but not sure that it's enough.

Well, maybe one of the reasons is because we believe in what I've called quiet diplomacy. Instead of putting some fellow on the other side on the spot, and holding him up to public view, we have been working very hard -- and both here, in their visits to us, and there with the Prime Minister and with others in his Cabinet, to change some of these and to tell them that the only alternative is start to go down the road of protectionism, which we don't want to do.

MacDonald of our U.S. trade office, met with the Japanese, met with officials in Geneva, and we're hammering away. We gave them a shopping list of what we're looking towards to open up that market. And it's only reasonable to think that it should be opened.

This idea that it's an advantage to have high beef prices in Japan, for melons to cost $30 apiece, for apples to cost to $4 dollars and beef $30 -- it doesn't make any sense. The Japanese people can profit, and certainly it helps our producers. And we need to work towards freer trade. That's the President's policy. Open up these trade channels.

Q. The United States farmer can produce their product at a lower price than any other nation, but yet we're not competitive in the world market. Is there a reason why? And I also understand that we have an agreement with some nations that we cannot sell them dried milk and dairy products.

The President. Here again, this is something that we promised in the campaign and that we're trying to do, and that is to -- with government's help -- instead of trying to run your farms for you, as they've done some years in the past, is to try and stimulate and open up the export market, because we're one of the few countries in the world that really is not only able to feed more people per farmer than anyone else in the world, but we have a surplus that can be sold and help a hungry world.

United States of America can produce grain and forage and everything else, virtually everything, competitive with any country in the world, but in dairy, we've got some problems in terms of exports. We're losing domestic markets, and we're losing export markets. And we have, like I said, the best of grains to feed the cows, the finest facilities, the best of management in the dairy industry that you can buy -- the finest cows in the world, people all over the world buying our cows, but we cannot compete with other countries. And one of the biggest problems is, in my opinion, is the rigidity of the government program. I think it has put the dairy industry into a hole the way it has been handled and managed in the past few years.

Now, if we are to talk about exporting the surplus dairy products that the government has bought up, we can export those at world prices or at our domestic prices, which are even higher than world prices. But we cannot undercut the world market by selling them at a discount. We have done that some, but we have to be very careful in doing it, because we are breaking international trading rules when we sell -- when we subsidize the exports of our dairy products into the world market.

Q. Mr. President -- [inaudible] -- my father's a mushroom grower, and it seems like year after year, it seems mushroom growers are just barely breaking even. Is there something the government's trying to do for that?

Q. I'm a young dairyman over at Kemp here. And I'm very concerned about the support program and the retention of the support program itself. It's been a very helpful tool over the years, and I don't think it was really out of hand. Even into '79, things were relatively under control. We had an increase in a parity to 80 percent, and it seems like everything has gone wrong. So, the stage has been set for increased production. And they just can't turn the spigot off.

Q. I'm totally behind you, but the thing is, I don't want anything to happen too fast here. I would like to see the retention of the support system, and if the support on milk were down to $12, I think we might be able to survive. But we have no -- that the bottom pulled completely out from under us, we're going to go under. And I'll tell you, it doesn't take long to go under. We can go under.

The President. Yes, all right. I think -- did you all hear that? Let me just say that I think the quarrel with the system the way it is, is that the government is too rigid. But no one -- we all recognize the problem. You can't take a system that has been going on -- whatever it may be, and the people have geared themselves and their activities to -- and then pull the rug out all at once.

First of all, nothing is going to be done before January 1st. But this is why we want the Secretary of Agriculture to have the flexibility, instead of this rigid system that is set by legislation. And that will be taken into account -- that you can't, as I say, pull the rug out all at once, and that you're going to have a more realistic and less rigid system that will take care of just what you're talking about.

Secretary Block. Part of the concern was, are we going to lose the whole program? How low is the support going to go? We don't intend to destroy the program. In fact, we tried to keep it basically as it is. And I do not foresee going below $12. I hope we don't have to lower the support at all.

Q. Mr. President, my name's Ginger Myers. My husband, John, and I, we're one of those young couples that are struggling over in Adams County. And we do it because we love the farm, and we think we're turning out a quality product. But I get a little discouraged listening today about ``tide over, tide over.'' Like that gentleman back there, my bank notes come regular, regardless of being tide over.

Our concern was, do you think on the dairy price support that by raising the minimum standards on the fluid price on the market, that we can dry up some of this surplus product and at the same time provide a better product for the consumers?

Now, we don't pretend to think that we can order all the States to do this. But we do think that it would be very useful to encourage it. The milk tastes better when it's that way, in my opinion. So, we will be doing this. And part of the package of straightening out the dairy program -- and just as important as the part of adjusting supply and demand -- is the disposal of the surplus.

Well, I guess we've run out of time. I'd like to get back to one thing, and it's -- you've mentioned it again -- on those notes at the bank. There is only one way to get that interest down, and that way is to continue on this program.

We think that -- I'm so tired of hearing from some of our opponents. They said that the program that they passed last summer -- they said it's failed. It hadn't started yet. [Laughter] The first part of it didn't go into effect until October 1st, and that was the smallest part.

But the continued tax cuts -- in July, when that money begins to hit the market -- but again, it isn't just the fact that July 1st you're now paying a lower tax. There has to be time for that money to begin to come into your pocket for it to then begin to have an effect. But even with that little tiny cut in October, we saw an increase in savings, the rate of savings.

Would it interest you to know that Americans, here in this great lush country of ours, have been saving at a lower percentage than any of the other industrial nations? And this means there isn't that capital pool that is needed for borrowing and investment and modernizing plants and equipment and so forth, research and development.

Other things have begun to happen now that -- I'm not going to tell you that now we've recovered. I am going to say that as they describe a recession of this kind, there is a trough and a bottoming out, and then you begin to rise. And there is every indication that that begin-to-rise is going to come in the latter half of this year. And the signs, the beginning signs are there in some instances.

We know that there has been an increase already in the hog market. We know that grain prices have shown the evidence that they're not continuing to do this now, that they're there at that trough and, maybe at the beginning of it, coming up. Cattle are showing the first sustainable profit since 1979. And even if you -- this morning's business news or yesterday morning's business news shows that even the automobile market is improving some, and for the last 3 months there has been a steady increase now in home construction. And all of these point to this fact.

But, again, you don't have to write to your Congressman. They've been here to hear. But if you know any others in any other States, lean on them, too. [Laughter] Or have your friends and neighbors lean on them. And that is to get this budget passed and get it passed quickly.

And now one more thing about that. You've heard all the horror stories, that you can't look at the screen without seeing them -- of that -- supposedly we're cutting the bottom out of all the help to the needy and the handicapped in our country. We have not cut a budget yet. We have only cut the proposed increase that the big spenders in Washington have set their eyes on. Each budget, including the one for next year, is bigger than the budget before -- and, of necessity. But it is not as much bigger as it was.

Services. This is the department that deals with all those programs that help the people who have to have our help as neighbors. In 1980, in the last year of the previous administration, the budget for Health and Human Services was about $195 billion. We have proposed for next year $274 billion in that program. The percentage of the budget in 1980 for HHS was 33 percent. It's going to be more than 36 percent when we get this '83 budget passed. And the budget for defense, which those same big spenders -- that's the only thing they ever seem to want to cut -- well, that is only 29 percent of the total budget. In the Kennedy years it was 46 percent. So, we think that we've got a well-balanced budget. But we also think that we are meeting the humane needs of those people who have to have help, and the figures reveal it.

As a matter of fact, Dick's budget is bigger than the total national budget of every other country in the world except the Soviet Union and the United States. So, we think that we're keeping the safety net for those people who have needs. And that's why I was so angry at Mr. Moyers' show the other night -- was because it wasn't true.

But this is a happy day. I am here to speak for a man of merit, a leader who certainly has earned my and, I know, your respect and the admiration of people across the political spectrum. He's a man of principle, impeccably honest, cool under pressure. He has a grip on Pennsylvania's problems, a solid program for her future, and the courage and wisdom to make that program work. No one is more qualified to be the next Governor of the great State of Pennsylvania than your current Governor, Dick Thornburgh.

And he has done a great job. He worked with your legislature to pass, I know, one of the toughest anticrime bills in the Nation -- and I don't know of anything that is more needed nationwide than that kind of legislation -- also a bill to get able-bodied individuals off the State welfare rolls. And he's reduced the State bureaucracy by nearly 5,000. Most impressively, he has balanced your State budget four consecutive times, and he's done it the right way, by holding down spending. And it's already been said -- and I have been told before -- the first Governor elected since 1946 to go a full term without raising State sales or income taxes.

Now, as you know, there are no strictures against unbalanced budgets in Washington. Spending other people's money has become an art form. The same people who sound so convincing when they denounce benefits [deficits] {White House correction.} on network television still have their hands in the Nation's cookie jars. The big spenders would have been right at home with Oscar Wilde. He's the one who said that he knew of only one way to get rid of temptation: Yield to it.

Over the years, policies of tax and spend have given us double-digit inflation, a trillion-dollar debt, the highest interest rates in more than a century, and the heaviest peacetime tax burden that we've ever known. But when you insist that we reduce the budget the right way -- the Dick Thornburgh way -- by reducing spending and holding down taxes, they act as if you've committed some kind of sacrilege. Proposing that in Washington is a little like getting between the hog and the bucket.

Well, I don't think we were put on this Earth to make government bigger. Our task is to restrain spending, create incentives, provide hope, opportunities, and help our economy grow again. Our loyalty will always be to the little taxpayers and never to the big tax spenders.

But even that won't be enough. We want to handcuff the big spenders once and for all. We need all the pressure we can get, all that you can bring to bear on this Congress to pass a constitutional amendment to mandate on the Federal Government balanced budgets. We must be able to do this just like Dick Thornburgh balances his State budget and all across America families balance their own budgets.

Now, of course, our opponents have a different strategy. You don't have to guess what it is. You hear it night after night on the evening news. Now, they also claim to be against deficits. But there's a catch. Defying all the lessons of history and plain common sense, they propose to reduce deficits by huge tax increases. They want to eliminate the third year of our tax cut and indexing, which they protest is excessive. And you've guessed it. They say that indexing is unfair because it favors the rich at the expense of everybody else. Now, you know that's as ridiculous as most of their other standard demagoguery.

First of all, the definition of rich -- most of us accept that that means people that have acquired or accumulated or possess wealth, but in their book it also means anyone who is in a certain level of income, regardless of whether they've accumulated anything or not. And the truth is, indexing, as we know, simply means taking our progressive tax structure and indexing it so that when a working man or woman gets a cost-of-living increase, they are not pushed by that into a higher percentage of tax -- into a higher tax bracket. Even though they've only kept pace with the cost of living, they have not improved their earnings. Well, the people that they call rich don't benefit by indexing. They're already in that top bracket. There isn't anything that they can get pushed into.

Let's go beyond propaganda and look at a few facts. First, there's nothing more unfair than what inflation and taxation have done to the pocketbooks of middle America. Not many years ago, only 3 percent of those who work and earn were in a 30-percent tax bracket. Today, 20 percent or more of the work force is paying that tax rate. And when social security, State taxes are included in the total tax burden, many families nationwide are facing a 40- to 44-percent tax rate.

I was pleased the other day to find out that already, just with our little 5-percent tax cut, and in spite of the built-in increase in the social security tax, that May 5th, that was the target day -- that's when the average American finishes -- from January 1st to May 5th -- working for the government, and from then on can keep the money he earns. And I was pleased to see that we've moved that up about 3 days. Now you don't have to work quite as long. And as soon as we get the other tax cuts in place, we'll move the date way up a ways at which you start working for yourself.

Without our tax cuts and indexing, more and more families will be pushed into the highest brackets, once reserved for the super rich. Now, where is the fairness in telling all those unsung heroes working to make ends meet that, no matter how hard they try, Uncle Sam will be waiting to get his hands in their pockets for more of their money? That's not the America I grew up to believe in. We're not trying to help the rich. We're trying to preserve one of the few systems left on Earth where people at the bottom of the ladder can still look forward to getting rich.

Here's one point that every American must understand: The third year of the tax cut is needed most by the very people that liberals would claim to protect by eliminating it. Doing away with that final 10-percent cut in 1983 and doing away with indexing means middle-income families would end up losing about 45 percent of their entire personal income tax reduction by 1985. And since our total tax cut barely offsets the huge tax increases already built into the system, eliminating that third year and indexing would translate into another punishing increase in their total tax burden. And that's what those who oppose our budget say would be fair.

Now, you've been hearing a lot about how our program is hurting the poor. And every day they try to dredge up things and show us the incidents that prove that this is true. Well, I'm here to tell you that most of those examples we can prove were not the result of anything that we've done with regard to budgeting or our economic program.

Now, yes, there are individual programs in there that have been changed. When you find a program, for example, in which thousands of people who've been dead for an average of 7 years are still collecting benefits from the government, I think it's proper to change that program.

Index fell three-tenths of 1 percent -- not just a decrease in the increase; it fell below zero. And that's the first such drop in 17 years. For half a year now, it's been averaging 3.2 percent. If inflation had kept running at the double-digit rate it was in 1980, a family of four on a fixed income of $15,000 would be over a thousand dollars poorer in purchasing power than they are today. So, simply by bringing down inflation, we've given them a $1,000 raise.

Do you remember the so-called misery index in the 1976 Presidential campaign? My predecessor invented that. He combined the rate of inflation and unemployment, just simply added them together, and then said that President Ford had no right to even ask to be President, again because adding inflation and unemployment at that time brought what he said was the misery index of 12.2. And so the decision was made. And in the last quarter of 1980, it wasn't 12.2; the misery index was 20.8.

Unemployment is too high. But unemployment is a lagging indicator, as we know. Tragically -- and that, I think, is the greatest tragedy of a recession, economic hardship -- it is the last to recover and to begin to climb, the employment rate, when the economy recovers. But there are beginning signs that -- we've been in the trough, we've been at the bottom -- the Labor Department recently reported that 189,000 permanent, full-time jobs were available at State-operated job banks in March -- the first monthly increase since last fall.

The skyrocketing interest rates we inherited devastated the housing industry. But now, as we've begun to bring those rates down, housing starts have been increasing steadily over the last 5 months. Retail sales jumped 1.4 percent last month, and automobile production is scheduled to increase in the second quarter of 1982. We're also seeing more predictions that the actual deficit for fiscal year 1982 will be significantly lower than the $119 billion predicted by the Congressional Budget Office.

Now, of course, I don't place much faith in those various deficit forecasts. I have found that, having gotten a degree in economics myself, it truly is a dismal science. And I don't think that when you start predicting out that far ahead they're going to be very solid projections. But you'll remember our opponents said that their last budget was going to be balanced. And it wasn't, by a long way. If it turns out that the Congressional Budget Office couldn't accurately predict the deficit for a fiscal year which only has 4\1/2\ months to run, why should they be any more accurate in their forecast of what the deficit will be 4 years from now, not 4 months?

Finally, Americans are beginning to save again. The savings pool is beginning to expand. In the 6 months since that first 5 percent of our tax cut took effect, the rate of personal savings rose to 5.7 percent from 5.1 percent the year before -- not great, but going up. And with inflation down, it pays to be a saver again. And it helps our country, because more savings means more capital to finance new investment, jobs, and economic growth. It also indicates lower interest rates ahead.

Atlantic. The crew had been told again and again that they would soon see land on the horizon, and they saw only water. They were tired, hungry, lonely, desperate, and ready to mutiny. But as Lowell wrote, ``Endurance is the crowning quality and patience all the passion of great hearts.

And I thank you for this very wonderful luncheon, this opportunity to be here with you all. And I just want to tell you, you do what you know in your hearts is right, because Washington would be an even lonelier place if Dick Thornburgh were not in the capital here in your State.

I had some remarks here, but John has just told me that possibly you'd rather have a dialog and maybe some questions and anwers than me standing here and giving a lecture on why we ought to have the budget passed immediately. And, if so, that's what I'll do. I'll be very happy to put this back in my pocket.

Let me just say now, though, that, seriously, the importance of this Senate race this year, I'm sure you must know, the few-vote margin that we have in the one House and for the first time in a quarter of a century that we have at least one House of the Congress Republican. There would be no budget cuts such as we've known them. There would be no tax cuts as we've had. I don't think there would be the necessary rebuilding of our national security if we did not have that majority.

And we have that majority in large part because a gentleman here on the platform was in charge of the committee that handled the election 2 years ago, congressional committee, John Heinz. And because of that, we're in that good position. But I'm going to lose a lot of sleep if I ever thought that -- I had 8 years in California of being up against both houses of the legislature, on the opposite side, and it almost got to be a habit. I vetoed 993 bills. [Laughter] So, I don't want a repeat of that kind of career.

But John did a great job in that for the Senate. And he's -- both of your Senators are doing a great job, and I know that we're going to have one back for sure. And I think I'm going to say we're going to have two back for sure, because I think you know how important that is.

When we took office, the interest rates were 21\1/2\ percent, inflation was 12.4 percent, and it was the second year in a row that we'd had back-to-back double-digit inflation. The unemployment, it is true, was not as deep as it is today. But there's no question it had started clear back in '79, and, as a matter of fact, I was campaigning about the tragedy of that unemployment in 1980. And all of these factors seemed to be worsening.

But while the inflation -- or the interest rates have not come down to where we want them, they're down about 20 percent. We reversed -- oh, incidentally, spending -- government spending was increasing at the rate of 17 percent a year. The budget we've presented for next year will only represent about a 6.8-percent increase in spending. And we're aiming at even a lower rate of increase, to where the budget will finally -- or the cost of government will be increasing no faster than the general increase that comes with growth in our tax revenues. And then we will be back where we should have been a lot of years ago.

The President. Well, we do have your Navy shipyard pretty busy right now. I couldn't tell you, with regard to all the defense contracts that can be let and will be let, where they're going to go. I must say that, however, the first priority is going to be where the job can be done the most economically and, at the same time, do it the way it's necessary for our national security. I also can say that if there's ever a place where everything else is equal, then I would -- and it was a choice, then I would think that you'd choose those places where it could also help the economy.

Senate just recently passed out of the Budget Committee, the Senate Republicans, passed out a budget program for 1983. I have been meeting in the last week or so with business leaders, chief executives, with the leaders of the small business community -- which is the one that produces about 80 percent of our new jobs -- heads of farm organizations, trade organizations, and with the money world -- bankers and financiers and investment trusts and so forth. All of them have one thing to say, and if I don't say it first, they say it back to me -- that is, interest rates, which are the big block to faster recovery, will come down if and when the Congress passes this budget and guarantees that for the second year in a row we're continuing on the path of reducing government spending, then the rates will come down.

And we now have inflation -- I didn't add this, with what we've done -- we have inflation down from that 12.4 percent to where for 6 months it's averaged 3.2 percent. And last month, for the first time in 17 years, it went below zero. The prices actually were going down, not just not increasing as fast in price. That is enough, if they have the confidence that we're going to continue and that we're not going to do that other quick-fix thing.

So, anything you can do to pressure and make sure that the Congress will give us those additional cuts -- and may I also say -- I'm taking too much time on this answer -- all this talk of budget cuts, all this talk of -- that we're doing something to the needy and the poor and we're not taking care of the people who must have help from the rest of us. There have been no budget cuts; all we've cut is the projected increase by the big spenders, the amount they want to increase the budget.

The '81 budget, which we inherited, which was already there -- and we managed to reduce by about $13 billion, even though we only had a few months left of the year to do it in -- that budget was bigger than the 1980, the present '82 budget is bigger than '81, and the '83 budget we've submitted will represent about a 6.8-percent increase over the present budget. But where it comes to the poor, the poor and the needy and all the people that, as I say, must have help -- and I've said that we'd preserve a safety net.

Q. Mr. President, you were elected President by the majority of people that cared enough to go out and vote. You said that you wanted to get government off the backs of the people and that you were a strong believer in free enterprise in the private sector. I also feel this way. So, my question to you is, what are you doing or what would you like to do in regards to breaking up some of the monopolistic structures in this country, whether they be private or governmental, so that the small guy could have an opportunity to break into the free enterprise system?

The President. Well, this is what we are doing with regard to monopolies and to give the smaller man a chance to get started. Actually, I think that our very tax program, for one thing, is of great benefit to independent business. The overwhelming majority of them pay the personal tax, not the corporate tax.

George Bush is heading up a task force aimed at something else we promised. And that is the blizzard of paperwork that is imposed on the private sector today and on local and State government today by excessive Federal regulations and unnecessary regulations. And he has made a tremendous cut. There are 23,000 fewer pages in the Federal Register, which lists the Federal regulations. The actual savings amounts to about -- I won't put it in cash -- amounts to a savings of about 200 million man-hours of work filling out government paper to comply with government regulations.

So, I think that the path is as open as it has ever been or better for the entrepreneur, small business. And we have, in addition to just the simple tax rates, income tax rates, we have done some other things in which we have increased, and it will be phased in even higher -- eventually the elimination of the inheritance tax, which will be a great salvation for family-owned businesses that in the past have had to sell the business in case of death in order to pay the inheritance taxes.

The President. Reducing the defense budget. The defense budget, incidentally, today is only 29 percent of our budget. Back in the days of President Kennedy, the defense budget was running about 46 percent of the national budget. But there've been a -- several -- we're trying to make up for a number of years of starvation.

When I became President, at any given day half of our airplanes couldn't get off the ground for lack of spare parts. Many of our ships couldn't leave harbor -- Navy vessels -- for the same reason. We only had a very limited supply of ammunition. And in one of those computerized war games where you see what would happen if, for example, there was an attack on the NATO line in Europe and so forth, we lost in 3 weeks.

Now, the bulk of our budget is for maintenance and pay. We also had a volunteer military that was based on wartime draft wages. And we were losing noncommissioned officers faster than we could promote them simply because they couldn't afford -- they were actually eligible for welfare at the time that they were serving in the noncommissioned ranks in our military. So, the bulk of our budget's going for that. But I do anticipate a time when it won't be as great.

We have asked the Soviet Union, as you know, to sit down with us with regard to not only the reduction -- reduction, not limitation -- reduction of nuclear arms, but in Vienna we're meeting, hoping to get reductions in conventional arms. And in Geneva right now we're meeting with regard to the strategic missiles that they have aimed at Europe from Eastern Europe, and we have nothing to counter that there -- or our allies don't -- and we're going to provide Pershing missiles.

What I think is that we have strengthened our case for getting arms reductions by going forward with a military buildup. For the last 10 years they've sat opposite us at any table discussing this -- and they're building the greatest military buildup in history -- but they saw us unilaterally disarming. There wasn't any reason for them to give up and meet us in any kind of disarmament.

The President. I think that we have a better relationship than we started out now and largely thanks to Don Regan, the Secretary of the Treasury. And I must say that the Fed is cooperating, and there is not, as some people suspect -- that the interest rates are where they are because they are going too deep in reducing the money supply. No, they are on a steady track that I think is proper with our growth today. And I believe that they, like those other people I quoted, will be the first to be willing to bring down the interest rates, the prime rate, the discount rate when we prove that we can get the Congress to adopt this budget.

Q. In light of our country's participation in and support of Camp David accords, how do you justify the projected sale of extremely advanced jet fighters to Jordan and the hand-held heat-seeking missiles?

The President. How do we justify selling weapons to Jordan, high-level fighters and so forth at the same time in our agreement with and our alliance with Israel. Well, first of all, there has been no request as yet -- there's been a lot of talk that I've read about it also -- there's been no formal request from Jordan. But, on the other hand, it is -- whatever is done, I want you to know what our policy is and what we're trying to accomplish. And Prime Minister Begin knows this.

Menachem and I exchange letters all the time on these subjects. [Laughter] We think one of the -- and, yes, we're on a first-name basis now. [Laughter] That's kind of a shock to the striped-pants fellows over in the State Department that we call each other by the first name, but we do. And he knows that I meant it when I pledged to him that we will never allow them to -- their qualitative and quantitative military advantage to be done away with, but that what we're trying to do with the more moderate Arab States is persuade them to become additional Egypts, to do as Egypt did.

The greatest thing that we can do for Israel is to bring peace to the Middle East. And if we're to be a believable broker, we can't impose that peace, of course. But if we are to be believable, then those moderate Arab States -- and I've met with King Hussein and must say that I was greatly impressed by his whole approach and his views toward the Middle East. If we can persuade them to acknowledge the right of Israel to exist as a nation and enter into negotiations in that Camp David framework as Egypt did, that will be the greatest thing we can do. And in order to do that we have to show them that we're willing to be a friend other than just talking about it.

Q. It's an historic pleasure to speak to you as President of the United States. I would like to have your response to this statement with reference to the Western Hemisphere. Now we are involved not only with a war in this hemisphere but with the South Central America. And it seems to me that we must now consider uniting with the Free Americas in order for us to have a more viable defense. And I'm wondering, is anything being done like you did to Jamaica, in helping them to develop their trade, so that they can be economically independent by exporting and importing?

The President. This is about our alliance with our neighbors to the south and the other continent and my statements about an accord, in which the full strength and the development can go forward, of North and South America. And we did -- I think we have established better relations on the North American continent now than we've ever had -- with Mexico and Canada. But -- and I have just seen the President of Brazil off, who has been visiting in Washington with us. And, as you know, there has been some -- quite some ill feeling between Brazil and the United States for some time. I think I can safely say they realize there's a whole new relationship now there.

The tragedy of the Falkland Islands -- the quarrel that's going on there -- I'm worried as perhaps -- and I hope only temporarily slowed what we intend to be a real relationship and an accord with our neighbors to the south. We've done our best and are continuing to do everything we can to, again, broker a peace down there.

And we've been trying, as I say, and it's been very frustrating. We sometimes come where it seems as if we're almost to agreement, and then there still seems to be one hitching point. But we're going to keep on trying to bring that peace.

We want freedom for ourselves, and I think the rest of the world would really have to look on in awe if they saw us with our democratic ideals, banded together here, not giving up our national sovereignty or our culture or our customs or languages, but friendly allies bound together in the Western Hemisphere. And this is our dream, and we'll have at it again if we can just finish off this little business that's going on down there right now.

And the ``thank you'' that I have just said several times for your warmth of welcome and your kindness is only a fraction of what the ``thank you'' will be if, in November, you've told me that you're sending John Heinz back to Washington.

Budget, Department of Education. Prior to that he was director of the general grants program for the Chicago-based MacArthur Foundation. He served the Reagan for President campaign as director of research and policy coordination during the initial phase of the campaign. Before joining the campaign, Dr. Jones was vice president for administration at the American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research. He also served as associate editor of two of AEI's periodical publications, Regulation and Public Opinion, and was active in AEI's academic outreach program.

Since 1776 we as a nation have lost thousands of lives and suffered thousands of injuries to guarantee our freedom. Preserving the peace also requires the daily toil of millions of men and women who, without fanfare and glory, serve to protect our freedom and security.

The soldier, the sailor, the airman, and the marine in the United States and around the world are the ultimate guardians of our freedom to say what we think, go where we will, choose who we want for our leaders, and pray as we wish.

It is sad that these rights, which should belong to all people, are not fully enjoyed by most of the human family. It is sadder still that some in the world view such freedom as a threat to their right to rule over their fellow citizens, and so long as that's true, we can't afford to take our freedom for granted. It cannot survive without protection. And for their role in protecting our freedoms, we honor the members of our volunteer Armed Forces today.

Their jobs are difficult, requiring judgment, technical know-how, endurance, and in many cases exposure to danger. We ask them to put in long hours under trying conditions. Many serve far from their homes and families, prepared, if need be, to make the ultimate sacrifice for our nation.

So, I would like to thank them today: the Army tank crewmember in Germany or Korea, responsible for maintaining a 55-ton machine so that it's ready at a moment's notice; the sailor in the Indian Ocean who's been away from home for 4 months and is working 18 hours a day in a hot engine room or carrying chocks for returning aircraft; the Air Force security policeman guarding our nuclear alert aircraft in the Texas heat or the North Dakota winter; the Marine squad leader on Okinawa working with his men to provide the most efficient combat team in the world.

There is another group which deserves special thanks -- the wives of our servicemen, wives who take care of the families and raise the children while their husbands are at sea or stationed far away, and wives who have left our shores to be in a faraway land with their husbands.

I had a letter the other day from one young wife describing what life was like where they were stationed. I could read homesickness between the lines, but not one word of complaint -- only great pride in what her husband is doing. Their contribution is critical; the separation, the long hours, the hard work, and, up until recently, the low pay -- all these have been burdens to them as well. The understanding and encouragement they give our servicemen is something we must all be grateful for.

So, on behalf of all you listening, I want to take these few minutes today to thank our men and women in uniform and their families and to ensure them their government and their fellow citizens are determined to provide them with the equipment, training, and, just as importantly, the respect they have so richly earned. With their help, the United States remains at peace.

Our allies enjoy the same benefit. Our national determination to defend freedom at the borders where it's threatened is fully matched by the quality and spirit of the more than 2 million soldiers, sailors, airmen, and marines who proudly wear the American uniform.

I have attached for your consideration a proposed constitutional amendment to restore the simple freedom of our citizens to offer prayer in our public schools and institutions. The public expression through prayer of our faith in God is a fundamental part of our American heritage and a privilege which should not be excluded by law from any American school, public or private.

Nearly every President since Washington has proclaimed a day of public prayer and thanksgiving to acknowledge the many favors of Almighty God. We have acknowledged God's guidance on our coinage, in our national anthem, and in the Pledge of Allegiance. As the Supreme Court has stated: ``We are a religious people whose institutions presuppose a Supreme Being.'' Zorach v.

The amendment I propose will remove the bar to school prayer established by the Supreme Court and allow prayer back in our schools. However, the amendment also expressly affirms the right of anyone to refrain from prayer. The amendment will allow communities to determine for themselves whether prayer should be permitted in their public schools and to allow individuals to decide for themselves whether they wish to participate in prayer.

I am confident that such an amendment will be quickly adopted, for the vast majority of our people believe there is a need for prayer in our public schools and institutions. I look forward to working with Congress to achieve the passage of this amendment.

Australia a few weeks ago. Australia and the United States have been partners, friends, and allies for more than 40 years. I've had the benefit today of the Prime Minister's views on matters that may arise at the Versailles and Bonn summit meetings, and we've discussed other matters of concern, such as the Falkland Island crisis and the East-West issues. Through consultations such as these, our individual efforts are made mutually supportive.

The Prime Minister will be in New York tomorrow before leaving for Seoul and Tokyo. We wish him a good trip. I've asked him to carry my greetings and those of the American people back home with him to the Australian people.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, I'd like to say how much I appreciate the opportunity for the kind of discussions and consultations that have been made possible through the period of your administration.

The discussions that we had only a short while ago with Vice President Bush were very useful, and we were delighted, indeed, to have the Vice President in Australia, especially for the time that he was there during Australia-American Week, which each year commemorates the Battle of the Coral Sea, which was the occasion which secured and made Australians understand that they'd be free from the threat and fear of invasion. And ever since then, that particular week has been celebrated in Australia, and to have Vice President Bush with us through those celebrations on this occasion was particularly appreciated. And the discussions that I and my colleagues had with the Vice President were obviously useful.

But those discussions set our minds at work, and we know, Mr. President, the importance of the meetings that you'll be participating in next month in Versailles and at Bonn -- the economic meetings and the meetings of the heads of government of the NATO powers. And while we're not a party principal to these discussions, as with other free societies we're obviously affected by the outcomes of those discussions. And we know that the role that you'll be playing at both meetings is going to be critical to their success.

And for that reason in particular, Mr. President, I value the opportunity for an exchange of views with you today which, I believe, have been very constructive and useful, and I'd like to thank you for the opportunity at relatively short notice when I know you must be preparing for those meetings in Europe.

Dr. Ellis Sandoz is professor of political science at Louisiana State University in Baton Rouge. He formerly served as chairman of the political science department and is a leading authority on the contributions of Eric Voegelin to political philosophy. He is married, has four children, and resides in Baton Rouge. He was born February 10, 1931. He would succeed Concha Ortiz y Prino de Kleven.

G. W. Hank McCullough is self-employed in real estate and communications. He was a founder of the Alcoholism Council of California and its president for the first 5 years. He resides in Woodside, Calif.

Much has been said over the years about the diversity of the American people and the vitality and resilience of the American character. Well, that character isn't centered around any one religious denomination -- for in our country there are many religions; everyone has a right to worship God as he or she chooses. It isn't based on any one ethnic group or race -- for our people come in all shades and shapes, and we remain dedicated to the proposition that all of them are created equal.

But our national character is based on a common identity with a single ideal, a shared value that overcomes our differences and unites us as a people. What has made us a nation is our love of liberty and our realization that we're part of a great historic venture, an experiment in freedom to test the ability of people to live together in freedom, respecting the rights of others and expecting that their rights, in turn, will be respected.

I've said on a number of occasions that I can't help but believe -- you can call it mysticism if you will -- that God must have placed this land here between the oceans to be found by a certain kind of people and a kind only in one thing: that whatever corner of the world they came from, they had the courage -- and the desire for freedom that went with it -- to uproot themselves and come to this strange land, beginning back when it was the most underdeveloped land in the world, and come here leaving family and come to a strange language and everything that went with that kind of a move.

I think our vision of liberty is reinforced by shared symbols and experiences. Perhaps the strongest image of them all is the one that for millions of Americans was their first glimpse of America -- that Statue of Liberty.

At the turn of the century, America was blessed with an influx of new immigrants who became citizens and played a significant role in building our country and protecting our freedom. Most of them entered under the shadow of the statue and were processed into the United States, as we know, through Ellis Island. Between 1892 and its closing in 1954, Ellis Island was the clearinghouse for millions of immigrants. Many who passed through the gates at Ellis Island had little more than what they carried with them, yet they possessed a determination that with hard work and freedom, they would live a better life and their children even more so.

They were captured by the American dream. And both they and their new country were the better for their efforts and their faith, because they not only came here for something but just as they came from every corner of the world, they brought something from every corner of the world to this great melting pot. And maybe in so doing, they proved how artificial are the prejudices and the hatreds that exist in the world, because we proved that we could all mix and, I don't know, to this day, one of the first questions you usually ask when you make friends with someone is what is their ancestry? What country? And it used to be that they'd say Irish or German or French or whatever, and now they have to say three of four names because they've mixed. In fact, I've got three in mine -- Irish, English, and Scotch -- and our children can add a fourth and have another country now. But today we declare that no longer functioning as it is, Ellis Island as a processing center, its contribution is not over. It remains a unifying memory for millions of our citizens.

Liberty, beginning on July 4th, 1984. I might add one note: The Statue of Liberty was built with funds contributed by people from all over France. Its base was constructed in part with contributions from American schoolchildren. And restoring Ellis Island, another monument to our freedom, is worthy of the same kind of heartfelt, voluntary effort. Both the Statue of Liberty and Ellis Island can help us all remember how grateful we should be to live in this land of freedom and good will.

When I introduced the other members of the Commission, I failed to have them stand up. Would you stand up? I'm not sure where you are -- the other members of the Commission that have been appointed. And if, Mr. President, if these men that have agreed to serve on the President's Commission would come forward, I'd like to introduce the President to you, and we'll catch him before he gets out. If I could ask you men to come over here. And Lee, if you'll join us.

The President. His Majesty, King Hassan II of Morocco. We met this morning, and he was my guest at a luncheon. He's a firm friend of the United States, and his working visit to Washington gives us an opportunity to build on two centuries of cordial diplomatic relations between our two countries.

It's a real personal privilege and pleasure to have His Majesty as our guest. King Hassan is the leader of a great nation at the crossroads of two continents, lying on NATO's southern flank at the entrance to the Mediterranean. It has deep ties to Africa, Europe, the Middle East, and the whole Islamic world. We therefore discussed not only bilateral relations but a wide range of regional and global issues.

I deeply value the depth of experience and breadth of vision that His Majesty brings to the issues of profound mutual concern. His Majesty briefed me on the latest developments in his efforts to reach a peaceful settlement of the conflict in the Western Sahara. And I expressed my admiration for his support of the OAU, Organization of African Unity, referendum.

Joint Military Commission that held its first meeting last month, and the agreement establishing a bi-national commission for a cultural and education exchange that Secretary Haig signed in Morocco in February.

We considered other opportunities for closer cooperation between our two countries in private investment, trade, and other areas. And I expressed to His Majesty the great value the United States places on cooperation with him and on friendship with Morocco, a country that stood with us at our independence, fought at our side during the Second World War, and joins with us today in the quest for world peace and security.

The King. Mr. President, I shall try to be understood against -- and in my very bad English. But I shall try to speak the language of the heart to thank you very deeply, you and your government and your people, for your hospitality. And I can assure you that from yesterday in the afternoon, still now, I really felt that I was between very strong and loyal friends.

Morocco, they have not the same volume and they are not at the same level. But the nature is the same. Our problems, like your problems, are to live in the dignity, in the freedom, and in the way of life which our people choose for themselves and for the future.

A big ocean is between the United States and Morocco. But we must, each day after each day, we must try to build a bridge of solidarity and understanding. We can -- or you could some time, you and I, have not the same analysis or the same position for one -- [inaudible] -- situation in the world. That is the sign of your independence and our independence and the sign of our free exercise of our sovereignty, as you are free to exercise your sovereignty.

But the importance is to see and to know that always, as before, Moroccan people and American people are ready and will be ready always to fight for the same ideal and to mix their blood for the dignity of man and the freedom of the countries.

It's a privilege to welcome the merchants of America to the White House. And you're the no-nonsense people who end every day by examining the bottom line. You understand the risks and the rewards of investment. Incentive is a tool of your trade, and you get ahead by banking on your faith in the American people.

You've been steadfast in your support of our program for economic recovery, and we in this administration understand that no plan can help our economy unless America's retailers are a part of that plan. And these gentlemen up here, who've just been in the office with me there before they came out here, have assured me of cooperation in continuing along the course that we started last year.

Last month retail sales rose by 1.4 percent. And I think the least we can say is that's a hopeful sign. But you also know, as I do, that the shot in the arm that our economy needs now is for responsible Members of the Congress to pass a budget that brings down the deficit.

This nation can no longer afford the big spending, big taxing policies that have held sway for the last 20 years. Deficit spending and strangling taxation created runaway inflation, sky-high interest rates, and these unacceptable rates of unemployment.

I think we've finally gotten through to the big spenders. Most of them now actually say out loud that deficits are bad. And -- [laughter] -- unfortunately they seem to think the American people caused the deficits by not paying enough taxes. Well, I've got another message for them from the heartland: We don't have a trillion-dollar debt because we don't tax enough; we have a trillion-dollar debt because government spends too much. Simply raising taxes won't do the trick.

You know, it's well for us to remember that in the last 5 years, taxes went up by more than 200 percent, and we still had in those 5 years the largest string of deficits in our history. I have every hope that soon the Congress will pass a budget resolution consistent with the goals that you and I embrace. And I still believe there are responsible members of both parties who place more importance on the economic health of this nation than on short-term political gain. If together we can both hold down taxes and cut spending, and if we can finally get control of that budget monster, then I believe a strong and lasting recovery isn't far away.

Watt of the Department of Interior just gave me a little display. I took it off before I came out here. It's a lapel button. And he pointed out the fact that since 1849, when the Department of Interior was started, there has been a logo that is an American buffalo on the Department of Interior logo. And it has been facing to the left. And he has decided that, because we came here to change things with regard to the deteriorating parks, the buffalo now faces the other way.

Well, I have to duck back in there for the rest of that other meeting. But I'm going to turn you over to Secretary of the Treasury Don Regan for your questions that I know you will have and for additional remarks that'll inspire you also to carry on with us with regard to getting this budget reduced.

Institute. He spent 13 years in India as a consultant to the American International Association and for the Cooperative League of the U.S.A., serving as director of the Cooperative League's office there for 8 years.

Nancy and I are very happy, delighted to be here with you tonight. I know the generosity and the feeling toward this school that has brought all of you here, and it wouldn't be possible to name all who have been so generous, but maybe I could say that Mr. Rawleigh Warner, I think, epitomizes the kind of spirit that is so supportive of this school. His contribution tonight was $25,000 and Rich Devoss, $20,000, and I know that there were others that, as I say, were worthy of mention, but I will just stop with those.

Nancy was lucky enough to get Dr. Cheek over to the White House for lunch last fall. Then he returned the favor and had her back here for a tour of the campus and the activities of the hospital center, which, being a doctor's daughter, she's very much interested in. And, of course, Mike Deaver's been personally involved in Howard's fundraising drive. So, we couldn't be more pleased than to be here, lending a hand, if that's possible, to all that you're doing.

This university has offered all Americans, and particularly our young black Americans, invaluable opportunities to develop their talents and skills, training them for service to their professions, their communities, and their nation. Howard is widely recognized as the largest and certainly one of the finest black universities in the world.

Our administration is committed to the future of Howard and to the other historically black colleges and universities throughout our land. We must never forget that when educational opportunities were denied elsewhere, these institutions offered hope to our fellow Americans -- young black Americans.

James Madison said that a well-instructed people alone can be permanently a free people. Well, it wasn't until 1867, in the aftermath of a tragic and violent war and Lincoln's Emancipation Proclamation, that America gave birth to a new era and to Howard University. This would be a center of learning to fulfill the promise of Lincoln, serving the people who had waited so long to enjoy what was theirs by birthright.

Lincoln was a simple man but he spoke great truths. He said, ``No man is good enough to govern another man without that other's consent. This expresses my idea of democracy. Whatever differs from this is no democracy.

But as the wrongs were gradually redressed and barriers broken down, more and more people began questioning whether big government could guarantee economic abundance. It's one thing to ensure everyone's right to buy a ticket on the train -- and that government must do. But that ticket isn't worth much if the train then can't leave the station.

Government has an essential role to protect those in need. But it's self-defeating to keep cutting smaller and smaller slices of pie from an ever shrinking pie. It is time now for all of us together to make a bigger pie for all our citizens and everyone having a bigger slice, and that's what we're determined to do.

Howard University, under Dr. Cheek's strong leadership, not only understands this need for a new direction, it has laid out a parallel mission of its own. It's called ``The New Direction Fund,'' and its goal is to raise $100 million in the private sector within the next 5 to 7 years. The funds will go for endowed shares and distinguished professorships, increased student aid and scholarships, research, library resources, and other capital projects not funded by the Federal Government.

Howard University seeks to excel, to be the best. There are so many potential areas for growth and development. I spoke a moment ago of Nancy's visit to the hospital center, and I can tell you she was impressed with what she saw being done there in pediatrics and other areas.

Some people see Howard fulfilling a unique role. They see this university as an ideal orientation center for citizens and leaders of Third World nations coming here to learn about democratic institutions and our enterprise system.

Governor of California. And this has to do with the traditional function of any educational institution. It was back in those riotous days when no one was bragging about only living a stone's throw from the campus -- [laughter] -- when the buildings were being burned down, rioting was the order of the day. And then the surveys began to come in that were taken on campuses of very distinguished, prestigious universities in our country. And the huge proportion of the students -- and it must have been disturbing to everyone in that generation gap period, anyone of another generation, to read of the huge numbers of students that denied there was anything good in America, that denied there was anything worth defending in America, and who pledged that they would not, if called upon, defend this country.

And then the surveyors got to Howard University. And suddenly there was great disappointment for those who had cheered the results on other campuses, but great joy for a lot of us on the shady side of the generation gap, because on this university campus the overwhelming majority said, yes, this is a country to believe in; yes, there are opportunities that we look forward to; and, yes, if need be, we would fight and die for this country because it's ours.

Each of you, I know, shares my belief in the principles of the free market -- personal initiative, competition, responsibility, reward, and stewardship. Your presence here and your generosity demonstrate how willing you are to live up to your beliefs. We can't thank you enough for that.

And let's remember that we're working as partners, the public and private sector together. Our administration, I like to think, is also doing its part. On September 15, 1981, I directed Federal agencies to increase the ability of historically black colleges and universities to participate in federally sponsored programs. We've made significant progress.

Administration for almost $800,000 to black institutions for important research projects. Two of these grants, for a total of $142,000, are being awarded to Howard University. This university also received a grant from the urban transit agency to conduct an extended seminar for 15 professors from black institutions to prepare them to undertake research projects on transportation problems.

American people with her daring exploits. She encouraged the development of commercial aviation, then a fledgling industry, and paved the way for women to enter the field of aviation. She set many speed and altitude records in airplanes and autogiros, the forerunner to the helicopter, and was the first woman to be awarded the Distingushed Flying Cross.

The President and this administration have been intensely involved in the search for peace since the beginning of the dispute in the South Atlantic. Our deep concern over the threat of conflict has been evident to the international community. We have made bilateral and multilateral efforts in support of that effort. We continue today to be in contact with those at the United Nations and elsewhere who are also striving for a peaceful solution under U.N. Security Council Resolution 502 and the U.N. Charter.

Let me emphasize, there will be no involvement whatsoever of U.S. military personnel in the conflict in the South Atlantic. As the President and Secretary Haig have said, we will meet our commitments to Great Britain. Any responses made to requests for assistance will be carefully evaluated on a case-by-case basis. We will, however, not address reports of specific requests for assistance or how we respond.

Our position throughout this dispute has been to do whatever we can to advance the chances for a peaceful resolution, and that remains our stance. Every step, every action of the President and the United States Government shall be taken with one thought in mind -- a peaceful solution. We stand ready to assist in any way we can.

Q. Mr. President, Mr. Mitterrand is the first French President who is a Socialist President in France, and he invites his fellow heads of states and governments to a king's palace. How do you feel about all that?

The President. Having been a visitor at Versailles myself once before, some years ago, I am looking forward to it, seeing all that beauty again. Wasn't Louis XIV known as the Sun King? Maybe we'll all go there for enlightenment.

The President. I don't know what the schedule has been for previous Presidents, but in this year and a half or so that I've been here, I have met several times with all the leaders that I will be meeting at Versailles. And we're all on a first-name basis, no titles. We have had, I think, a very friendly relationship, a very open relationship in the meetings that we've had in Ottawa and Cancun, here in Washington.

The President. We have to resort to interpreters, and I've learned to get along with that. Some of the others speak some English. I had a couple of years of schoolboy French many, many years ago, because it was compulsory in the school that I attended. But I couldn't rely on it myself now. I shouldn't be taking up all this time, but I told the President about an experience that I had with having to use French the first time that I ever went to France. I went with a couple from England, had been in London for the winter, and we went across the Channel in the spring to go down to the south of France. I didn't know that they had never crossed the Channel before, and they knew not one word of French, and we were going to drive in their car. I realized that if there was any communication it was going to be up to me. And we were coming to a town where we were going to have lunch. I was thinking and trying to dredge up all the words that I could remember on how to find the best cafe.

Q. Mr. President, if I can pick up again on your personal contact, you met 11 months ago in Ottawa with six Western European heads of state and governments, and you will all be meeting again together soon. What have you accomplished since then, not only on a personal level but also in terms of politics? What have you accomplished collectively, for instance, that you could not accomplish separately?

The President. I've always believed that a lot of problems are resolved if you are talking to each other, instead of about each other. And I think that there have been tensions in the past that have affected us as allies and friends. We all share a great many mutual problems. We're all having economic problems. Unemployment is a problem for us. And I think that the personal bond that we've established has created a relationship that is very close and that makes us able to discuss openly and freely those things that are of mutual interest to us, those problems where maybe we can solve them better together than we can by going our own ways.

Q. Last year you heard some complaints from the Europeans on the high rates of interest in the United States, and you told them that the United States was suffering from those high rates as well. Certainly your recession looks a little bit more credible now. Now the Europeans are complaining about unemployment, which does great damage to the socio-economic fabric of Western Europe. What will you tell them now, given the fact that unemployment is also a problem in this country, the slow recovery -- what will you be discussing with them in concrete ways to face this problem?

The President. I think that the answer has to be a correction. You can't correct unemployment unless you correct the problems that have caused a virtually worldwide recession. These have to do with trade, imports and exports. All the things that we can put on the table that may be restricting the free flow of trade, that could stimulate markets, are essential to that.

When I hear the feeling about the high interest rates, I believe there was an honest misunderstanding that they thought these were somehow a part of our economic policy; that we were using high interest rates because of our double-digit inflation. They weren't part of our policy, and I think the other leaders realize that we have here in the Federal Reserve System an autonomous body that is not subject to pressure of any kind from those of us who hold office. In addition, the interest rates are set by the marketplace itself, the money market. We believe that in our case the high interest rates were the result of inflation.

Now we have brought inflation down. The doomcriers were saying a year ago that it would take 10 years to get a handle on the inflation problem. Well, month before last inflation actually disappeared for a month in America, and we had deflation. This past month it came up just a fraction of a percentage point. For the last 6 months inflation has been around 3 percent. I think we're going to see even more improvement compared to 1980 - 1981 as we go on through the year.

We think this is a big factor in getting interest rates down, and if we and Congress can get the savings that we're asking for in the budget for 1983, we think it will send a signal to the money markets that will bring interest rates down further.

We don't believe that we were the causes of Europe's problems. We could point to Italy's own interest rates, which are twice and three times the interest rates of Germany and Japan, and I don't think they have had any effect on those countries. But I think that the leaders of Europe and Japan now understand that this was not a deliberate part of an economic policy. This was a problem that we're trying to lick.

Q. If I could follow up on that point, Mr. President, while inflation has come down, most of the other economic indicators are still fairly grim. They talk about the rate of corporation failures, savings that haven't really picked up, and unemployment, of course, is at more-or-less record levels. And then there is the record budget deficit as well.

The President. I don't believe that anything has gone wrong. I think that many people confuse the adoption by Congress of the first phase of our plan with the plan being in operation. We believe very much in the incentive tax package that we passed with its reducing of taxes. But that's to be spread over a 3-year period.

We had asked for, originally, three yearly 10-percent cuts. We got one 5-percent cut, and the other two were 10-percent, but they have not yet gone into effect. We had also asked those tax cuts be retroactive to January 1st, 1981. In the compromise that goes on in a parliament or a congress, we had to take the best that we could get.

The 5-percent cut, not 10, did not go into effect until last October. We did see an immediate increase in personal savings rates after that had happened because of some features of the tax program. But if there is an incentive to those tax cuts, as we believe there is, we have to wait until the people are actually getting those cuts and having that extra money in their pockets.

The next cut -- the 10-percent cut -- will go into effect July 1st and then the next one in July of 1983. I think we have to wait and see when the program is actually in operation, when the effects are felt, not just the fact that you could point to a piece of legislation and say it's been passed into law. Wait until it takes effect.

From the very first, getting our cuts in government spending, the billions of dollars in reductions, was a top priority. The annual rate of increase in government spending was 17 percent in 1980. We cut that in half in the first year that we were here.

With that action, the interest rates did come down about 20 percent -- not enough, but they did come down. But the unemployment had begun in 1979. We had a recession in 1980. And it continued along with this market dislocation and inflation. Unemployment and recession increase government costs quite considerably.

On the evidence of history, unemployment is the last thing that recovers when you're coming out of a recession. We think the indices are all there, that we are in the trough and have bottomed out in the recession. From the very first, we said that we could not hope for recovery until the last half of this year and we think in the last half we are going to see that recovery.

The President. I think it is very important. I think the money market is waiting to see if the Congress will -- since we don't dominate or have the majority of both Houses -- stay with its old-fashioned policies of artificial stimulation and quick fixes to cure things. All they ever did was temporarily reduce the fever, and then a couple of years later we had an even worse recession each time. But if the money markets see that Congress will do what it did last year and stay with us on our plan, making the further reductions that we're asking for in spending and stay with our tax program, I think that this will be the signal that will bring interest rates down.

There have been scattered signs in the money market that they want them down also. Those signs are in various areas -- our automobile industry, which is hard hit, and mainly because of the interest rates. Our people buy cars, as I'm sure they do elsewhere, on the installment plan. They have to pay interest such as the mortgage on a house. This has hurt the automobile market. Here and there in the country, groups of local bankers have come together and put up sums of money specified for automobile loans at a rate of interest about 4 points below the market. As long as that money lasted, they would lend it at that lower interest rate for those who want to buy automobiles.

The upsurge in automobile buying was instant. We have also seen some construction companies that evidently were able to liquidate their inventory of newly built houses by pulling down the interest rates themselves.

Q. Mr. President, there is another summit looming, the NATO summit at Bonn. It is almost like an Alpine assault. You scale one summit after another. As one talks about NATO nowadays, immediately you are into this crisis talk. We have had a year behind us where things did not all go smoothly. Relations between America and the European allies were somewhat strained. Indeed, there are cries right now in Congress for a withdrawal of American troops to show the Europeans how upset you are and how unsatisfied with their performance. How much do you think is true about this crisis talk? Do you view the alliance in a similar way? And if so, where would you say one can improve the performance?

The President. I think it has improved. The recent meeting of ministers in Luxembourg indicates this. When we came into office, there were some strains in the alliance. And there was some ill-feeling on both sides. We set out to resolve that. I think we have done it. I believe in the North Atlantic Treaty Alliance. The fact that we have had 37 years of peace in Europe is the greatest proof of NATO's effectiveness.

We have no intention of withdrawing troops. We recognize our responsibility there. We recognize that those troops are not there, as some have said in congressional debate, because we are generously doing something for someone else. Our own security is involved. We are there because that NATO line is our first line of defense as well.

I do not think that there is any crisis at all. I think that NATO is on a better footing than it has been for several years. Where there could be and have been some problems at the southern flank of NATO, we are working on them and have come to some better agreements there.

Q. Can you envisage a likely scenario or a constellation of political crises where America would have to look beyond NATO, because it had global commitments, and where the importance for you of NATO would be diminished and you would have to go back to your NATO allies and say they will have to pick up more for their own defenses, because you have global commitments which require a greater deployment of American forces?

The President. So far, in spite of the economic problems that beset Europe as well as the United States, I think that their defense spending level has been consistent. And I have no quarrel with it at all.

As evidence of the improved situation, could I point out that we have had cooperation from our NATO allies with regard to the multinational force in the Sinai. Yet when we came in a year ago, we had not been able to find a single country that wanted to participate in that. Now they have.

I think that a subject for discussion with NATO would be that we all, together, look at the Persian Gulf and the Middle East as an area of concern because of our energy dependence on this particular area.

Q. Part of the question of how well NATO is doing seems to be tied into the question of East-West relations in general. And we have heard that you now favor a summit with your Soviet counterpart. You used to tie this to the condition that some summit meetings should have a tangible outcome or result. Do you feel the time has come where such a meeting could accomplish something concrete?

The President. I would hope so, because I think that the Soviet Union also has some very real problems. Maybe it's time for someone to point out to them that their attitude of hostility, their worldwide aggression, their denial of human rights, whatever it's based on -- whether it is a concern that they are threatened by the Western world or whether it is just determination to pursue the Marxist-Leninist theory of world domination -- point out to them that the road to peace and giving up that aggressive attempt might be helpful to them with their own economic problems.

If there is any truth to the belief of some that the Soviet Union is motivated by fear of the West, that they think the West is going to threaten them -- I don't think there's anyone in the West who believes that for one minute. They could have a guarantee of peace tomorrow if they themselves would follow the words of Demosthenes 2,000 years ago in the Athenian marketplace when he said, ``What sane man would let another man's words rather than his deeds tell him who is at peace and who is at war with him.'' So far, it is the West that has to feel that the Soviet Union is at war with us on the basis of their great military buildup. I don't think they can point to anything from our side that indicates that.

What if back some years ago after World War II when our country was the only one with the nuclear weapon and really the only one left undamaged by war, in a position to do as we did, to go to the aid of our allies and even our former enemies; what if the situation had been reversed and the Soviet Union had had that bomb and not anyone in the West? If we had an aggressive intent wouldn't we have acted then when we could have done so easily? I think that's the greatest guarantee that it isn't the West that threatens the world with war.

The President. Sometimes I ask myself that question. There are limits, of course, great limits on the Presidency because the very nature of our government, and our Constitution has prescribed them to an extent beyond anything, I think, known in any other country.

Many countries have constitutions but most of them say in their constitution, ``We, the government, grant you, the people, these things.'' Our Constitution says, ``We, the people will allow government to do only these things that we permit in the Constitution.'' That's reflected in this supposed power of the Presidency.

The President can't dismiss a Congress, and, unlike the parliamentary system, you do not automatically have a majority in what constitutes our parliament, our Congress. In one of the two houses I have a majority of the opposition party. In the other house, the Senate, I have a bare majority of our party, and that's the first time that's been true for a Republican President in 25 years.

Q. Mr. President, in a few days you will be visiting the four major European partners of the United States in the Atlantic Alliance. Three of these, West Germany, Britain, and Italy, pledged to go ahead and modernize the nuclear weapons of NATO, a decision that was taken in December 1979. In fact, my country has already started work on our cruise missile bases. How do you assess the contribution of Italy and generally what's the prospect for productive negotiations in the area of intermediate nuclear forces?

We know why the missiles have been requested of us by NATO. There are 900 warheads on 300 SS - 20 missiles the Soviets have targeted on all of Europe and nothing comparable to counter them. The NATO decision came for Pershing missiles and cruise missiles as a deterrent to prevent the Soviets continuing that monopoly. I know that politically in Europe this was a great problem in a number of countries because of the peace movement. Some people can't quite see that unilateral disarmament is not the road to peace. But Italy was very forthright in coming forth on the preparations. We appreciate it very much. I must also salute the West German, the British, and the Belgian Governments for their leadership on this critical issue. President Mitterrand also shares our deep concern over the Soviet buildup.

The very fact that countries of Western Europe have said they were willing to base these missiles and we were willing to provide them is why the Soviets agreed to go to Geneva to meet when I proposed -- why don't we negotiate a total elimination of such weapons in Europe? We won't put in the Pershings and cruise missiles if they'll do away with the SS - 20's. I don't think they would have ever come to negotiate had it not been for the imminence of that proposal -- the fact that we are all going forward.

The President. We've completed our arrangements and proposals here to go forward with the START which has to do with the intercontinental missiles. Again, I believe that we're getting the evidence of willingness from the Soviet Union to at least negotiate, to talk, because we are going forward with the rebuilding of our own military and because our allies have shown their own determination on the intermediate weapons.

Q. Mr. President, your speech at Eureka on strategic arms, your administration's previous commitment to the concept of linkage, the concept whereby you link arms control negotiations, East-West trade, summitry with the Soviet Union with political progress by the Soviet Union on things like Poland and Afghanistan -- this was conspicuous by its absence. Does this mean that you've abandoned the principle of linkage?

The President. No, not at all. And let me point out that in the many times that I've spoken of that concept, I have never particularly linked it to something as specific as arms reductions talks. But it was done in the context of the summit meetings that have taken place with regard to trade and to features of detente. I view it in that context but that doesn't rule it out even for arms reduction talks. I could answer it very briefly. Much of what is concerned in that linkage, some of the very subjects you talked about, are not things that you headline in the paper. The fact that you do not proclaim such subjects or put them up there in the newspaper does not mean that they can't be brought up when you're sitting at a table. I think sometimes that politically to publicly discuss things of that kind makes it politically impossible to get them, where maybe in what I've called quiet diplomacy you secure them.

Q. I would like to ask you to expand a little bit on what you've said the Luxembourg meeting of NATO foreign ministers accomplished. There was a communique last week that says ``a more constructive East-West relationship aiming at genuine detente through dialog and negotiations and mutually advantageous exchanges should be aimed at.'' Now, that's a very positive, sort of upbeat approach. Yet we know we're going to discuss the pipeline, we're going to discuss credits' curtailment and so forth. Where are the limits of cooperation with the East? Where do you think we've gone beyond them?

The President. If I understand the question correctly, I think it gets back to something I was saying earlier. We've tried ever since World War II to simply persuade the Soviets. There have been our own efforts at arms reduction -- I think there have been 19 such efforts since World War II -- but in other things we've simply tried to persuade. It seems to me that now, with the Soviets having the economic problems I mentioned, that this is an opportunity for us to suggest to them that there might be a better path than they've been taking. And if so, we'd like to explore that better path.

The President. Our thought about the pipeline was that it was being given without the quid pro quo of some change in attitude and that there was a danger to Europe in making itself too dependent on the Soviet Union as an energy source. I think that is still something that Europe should look at and see if they want to be that dependent on someone who has 900 nuclear warheads aimed at them.

The President. A man who once sat at that desk, Theodore Roosevelt, said that the Presidency is a bully pulpit -- the pulpit where the clergyman preaches sermons. It is that. I think this office does offer an opportunity for mobilizing public sentiment behind worthwhile causes. To that extent, there is a power that should be used properly and for the right causes that goes with this office.

The President. This goes to some of the questions that you were asking about whether we've done anything in the last year and a half. Before I took office in 1980, in polls and surveys that were being taken all the time, there was one question that was frequently asked. Many answered that they saw no hope in the future. Not only were things bad, but they did not see any signs they were going to get better.

Now we're in this deep recession and the same question is being asked. Many American people are saying, yes, things are bad, but we expect them to get better; we know they're going to get better, and they talk about next year and the year beyond, that they will be better. It's a turnaround of what the public attitude was, just a year and a half ago.

Now, before you say, ``This is where I came in,'' there has been a new development. We're making some progress toward a budget agreement that will hold down your taxes and get government spending under control. This is the one sure way we can keep inflation coming down, bring interest rates down as well as deficit spending and, most important, get our factories working again.

I've said before, and let me say again, many of the spending proposals are motivated by sincere compassion, compassion we all feel. But pretty soon, if we aren't careful, we find ourselves inventing miracle cures for which there are no known diseases. That's what led to the situation in 1980, when Federal spending was increasing by 17 percent and the inflation rate was 12.4 percent. Interest rates reached a 100-year high of 21\1/2\ percent.

The 17 percent annual increase in government spending was cut almost in half. That 12.4 percent inflation rate has, for the last 6 months, been 2.8 percent. For the last 3 months, it has only been eight-tenths of 1 percent. Interest rates have come down some, but not enough yet to give the economy the boost it needs.

As you know, we put in place tax incentives to help industry retool and modernize. And we've provided tax reductions for individuals so families could keep more of the money they earn. It's the first broad-based program to help all American taxpayers since President Kennedy's tax cut nearly 20 years ago.

Even though we've only had the first installment, a 5-percent cut last October, we're seeing some signs of the incentives that a tax cut brings. Personal spending is up, and Americans are saving at a higher rate. Saving is one of the best ways people can help themselves and our country. As the pool of savings expands, interest rates come down and billions of dollars are made available for new investments, mortgages, and jobs.

Yesterday, the United States Senate took another step to get spending under control. It passed a budget resolution that will reduce projected deficits $358 billion over the next 3 years. I'll be honest with you: I would have liked more reductions in spending, but at least it's another step in the right direction -- the direction we started to go last year.

Representatives is trying to spend more and to eliminate $150 billion or so of your tax cut. Their idea for reducing the deficit, for example, is to eliminate the third year of the tax cut. They have another idea which somehow doesn't go with their claim of compassion. Once that final income tax cut is in place, we have one further step to go. We permanently index the income tax brackets against inflation. This, too, the spenders would take from you under the phony claim that it only benefits the rich.

Indexing prevents this from happening. Now, how can indexing hurt the workers and benefit the rich? It can't. And those who say it can are talking through their hats as usual. The rich and the high income earners are already in the top tax bracket. They also don't get cost-of-living increases. It's the wage earner who needs and, in our program, will get indexing.

Incidentally, to be fair, I must say those same individuals who would take indexing away from you also do want to cut spending -- defense spending, and really only defense spending. Eliminating about 73 percent of our planned increase in the defense budget is their goal. Fortunately, some responsible Republicans and Democrats in the House have proposed a better plan, somewhat similar to the one passed by the Senate. It will preserve your tax cuts, reduce spending, and keep America strong. They are calling their plan the bipartisan recovery budget, and it will be voted on the first of this coming week.

Good morning, and welcome. As you know, our administration has repeatedly expressed the intention to abolish the Department of Energy. Our goal was and remains increased energy independence for America. Through constant overregulation of energy producers and industries in the past, the Department of Energy shackled our drive to increase domestic production. Only as the heavy hand of government and government regulations has been lifted have our energy producers and consumers begun to reduce our dependence on imported oil.

The legislation that I'm sending to the Hill today will not dismantle the structure of government that we need to fulfill our energy goals. I am merging the critical defense, energy emergency, and research functions into the Department of Commerce. It will simply change the role of government from controlling the activities of energy industries to complementing them.

Baldrige and Jim Edwards, who all gave their time and their ideas and their effort to reach an agreement on this. And I'm hopeful that with their continued cooperation and skilled guidance, this legislation will move rapidly through the Congress.

On December 17, I announced my intention to propose a reorganization of Federal energy activities. The legislation I am submitting today reflects this Administration's commitment to the principle that the best way to meet the Nation's energy needs is to increase reliance on market decisions.

When the Department of Energy was formed, some of its functions, such as collection of energy information, selected international nuclear regulatory responsibilities, and energy preparedness planning, technology development, and energy-related business analysis paralleled activities conducted by the Department of Commerce for non-energy sectors of the economy. Combining these activities of the Departments of Commerce and Energy recognizes that the development of an assured energy supply is one of the most important domestic and international business activities in the United States today. Integrating these responsibilities in the Commerce Department will strengthen its ability to develop policy, evaluate trends and requirements, and be of service to industry in meeting our energy requirements.

Commerce. They will be kept intact in Commerce and closely associated with all energy research and development activities. The Secretaries of Commerce and Defense are working together to make sure that the revised structure will continue to meet the requirements of national security and strengthen the relationship where possible.

The reorganization I have proposed will preserve the valuable and time tested research and development work environment which has been so instrumental in achieving the objectives of long-range energy development. For example, integrated and comprehensive use of scarce technological management resources and multi-purpose national laboratories will continue with little or no disruption to key programs.

The transfer to the Department of the Interior of programs closely related to energy resource management such as the Power Marketing Administrations and coal mining research and development will consolidate energy resource mangement in the Department responsible for stewardship, preservation, and development of much of the Nation's public domain natural resources.

The Department of Energy was created at a time when serious problems were said to require government-designed solutions imposed by executive agencies especially created to deal with them. The results of this approach are clear. Ill-conceived regulations have impeded development of new energy sources, discouraged conservation, and distorted distribution. Subsidy programs created artificial demand for energy technologies that could not stand the market test. The drain on Federal resources grew almost beyond control.

I urge the Congress to enact promptly the Federal Energy Reorganization Act of 1982. Its enactment will reverse the recent trend of establishing huge, unwieldly governmental institutions to address problems of the sort which can best be met by permitting America's citizens and businesses to act wisely and responsibly in their own economic self interest.

Next week, I'll be leaving for important summit meetings in Europe with America's allies and trading partners. One major concern we know they'll raise is the high level of interest rates in the United States. We share their concern.

The key to bringing interest rates down and keeping them down is a commitment by this government to get spending under control once and for all. It's most important that I be able to communicate this commitment to our allies. I want to tell them that the United States is not just talking about reducing deficits, we're doing something about them.

Last week, the Senate took an important step in that direction. It passed a budget resolution with deficit reduction measures totaling $358 billion. As I said over the weekend, the resolution isn't perfect. It won't lead us into the promised land. But the next key thing is it'll take us further down the road that we began last year.

Now we look to the House of Representatives for courage and leadership as we enter a crucial week of budget deliberations. Many variations will be discussed, but the final vote in the House may boil down to two main alternatives -- the bipartisan recovery budget, or the coalition budget proposed by the liberal Democratic leadership.

There are three key advantages to the bipartisan plan. It keeps taxes down and does not break faith with American families by seeking new tax increases that would destroy the recovery. It makes savings on defense while still preserving our security so we can maintain peace through strength. And it contains a real determination to begin holding down spending on the so-called uncontrollables.

Over the weekend, I made several calls to Congressmen. I'll be making more in the next few days, and I'm encouraged by my conversations. I believe the bipartisan recovery budget has a fighting chance to win if responsible Members of the House will rally to support it.

William French Smith has enjoyed? Do you think those stories are embarrassing to the administration? And, secondly, regarding Secretary Donovan, are you concerned that the problems that have grown up between him and the Republican members on the Senate Labor Committee will mean permanent damage to relations to the Hill if he remains in office?

The President. Well, it's very difficult for me, taking the last one first, to comment on that because it is now in the hands of a special prosecutor, as Secretary Donovan himself requested some time ago. And so there isn't much that I can say in commenting on that. But nothing I've heard has reduced my confidence in Secretary Donovan.

With regard to the Attorney General's problems there, I don't think the point's been made by anyone that the so-called tax shelters are things passed by Congress to encourage investment or speculation in certain undertakings, and a tax shelter is only a shelter if you lose your investment.

The President. Well, I think the objective -- I can't speak for military strategy or what they might have in mind with that, but I think the objective still is to bring this to a point where it can be resolved peacefully and without any further loss of life. And I'm sure that this is probably what is going to guide their strategy and what they're doing.

The President. Well, we're not thinking of military support in the sense of troops or anything involved in the fighting. There are certain agreements that we have. There are no new agreements that have come out of this at all. There are certain bilateral agreements and our relationship in the North Atlantic Alliance that we fulfill regardless of what's going on there. But nothing new has come out of this.

The President. Well, it simply was a letter that expressed his willingness to meet, and that's about all that I can comment on. I was delighted to get that, but I can't comment, then, on further details in a communication.

The President. Well, the START talks are based on reducing a danger to the whole world, to both sides. And I talked for months during the campaign about this, about trying to arrive not at the so-called limitation talks, but at actual and outright reductions of weapons. Now, this does not outlaw discussing these other things that are causing tensions between us and between them and the Western World at those talks. But I don't think that those are things that you headline and blatantly advertise that you're going to go there and demand this or that, because I think when you do that you foreclose the possibility of doing any of those things.

Q. Mr. President, on the Falklands, sir. You're going to Europe, as you say, for this meeting with various European allied leaders. Is it possible that with the Falklands heating up you might be considering some changes in your plans to perhaps curtail or eliminate your visit to England?

The President. I haven't seen anything as yet that would suggest that. Obviously, if something unforeseen happens, we would have to consider whether we should go or not. But, no, I see no reason not to go.

President, some direction on interest rates. Five former Cabinet Secretaries, Treasury Secretaries, and a former Commerce Secretary, from two parties, several administrations, have suggested much deeper defense cuts and much bigger tax increases than you have been willing to embrace.

The President. I have only had a chance to read one wire story that came off the line about the interviews with those various former Secretaries. I'm gratified by one thing, that they support, in general, the approach that we have taken, that it must be based on reduced cost of government, reduced spending. And we may differ on some details or amounts or percentages with them. In general, we are in that agreement.

Q. But, sir, just to follow up, what they are saying is that by putting certain things off limits -- social security, some big defense cuts and big tax increases, such as a windfall profits tax on natural gas or other oil and gas tax increases -- that you have eliminated the real possibility of doing something about interest rates.

The President. Well, I don't think they quite understand all that's been going on. With all due respect to those gentlemen, they're not in a position now where they have access, for example, in discussing defense budgets, to all the information that is necessary to make the decisions.

We have agreed to cuts providing they will not have us retreat from what we feel is the minimum necessity for restoring our national security. And as I say, they don't have that information. Maybe if they did, they would see our point and what it is we're asking for.

Q. Mr. President, some Members of Congress say that there are so many divisions in the House over the budget that there is a danger that the House would wind up in a deadlock and not pass any budget at all. In view of the fact that Speaker O'Neill and the Democrats have the majority there, who would be to blame if there was any effort by the House not to have any budget at all at this time?

The President. I think you've more or less answered your own question yourself as to who would be to blame. [Laughter] I just have to believe that there is more responsibility in the House than that. And I think that we will have -- and I do believe that the bipartisan bill, which preserves or calls for 87 percent of the -- wait a minute; no -- it preserves 87 percent of the tax cuts that we wanted for our people, and it gets 75 percent of what we asked for in February in budget cuts.

The President. Well, I wouldn't feel that way. I've never had any reading from the communication from President Brezhnev that he was not looking forward -- and he publicly has made statements to that effect, also.

Q. Going back to the Soviets question. On Friday, your administration released a new national security policy that many interpreted as being kind of a return to the cold war. Yet over the weekend, there were reports there may be increased grain sales to the Soviets. How would you today describe your administration's relationship with the Soviet Union?

The President. I think it's a very realistic relationship. We know that there is an adversary relationship there that has been brought about by the Soviets policy of expansionism, and we're not so naive as to ignore that in any dealings that we have. And yet, at the same time, we ourselves are proposing such things as arms reductions in trying to improve the chances for peace in the world, or reduce the possibility of war.

The President. I wouldn't know whether I could apply either one of those words to it. It is just that we are willing, realistically, to sit down with the Soviet Union and try to eliminate some of the friction points that are there.

But basically, the primary problem today is reducing the store of nuclear arms that threaten the peace of mind, certainly, of all the people of the world and that do pose a threat to all of us physically.

I could answer that in about three phases and very briefly. And the first one is, how would I respond to the Speaker about that? I think it is very obvious after last year and this year that the Speaker is obsessed with the idea of trying to create a social security issue for the coming election. And I think that's pretty irresponsible with a program now that is actuarially out of balance, that, as we pointed out a year ago, is going to be unable to get through the 1983 year unless something is done about that program.

The proposed cuts in the bipartisan plan, in Medicare, are almost entirely aimed at limitations on the providers of health care, not a reduction of services for the beneficiaries, the recipients of social security. Those are the two.

The third one is this, even this talk in the budget, in a way I find -- I hope that they don't waste too much time debating it, because with the Speaker's cooperation we have a bipartisan task force that has been at work for months and is to report in December with a plan for solving both the short- and the long-range problems of social security. And the only thing that I have said in my own mind with regard to that plan and that I have said to those representatives that I appointed to the task force is that it must not undercut or pull the rug out from under the people who are presently dependent on social security. They must be assured that they are going to continue to get their benefits.

But there are any number of ways that that task force can go, based on the future of social security for people presently paying into the program who are not yet retired that can meet the financial problems. Indeed, the plan that we posed last year could have done that and even reduced the two built-in increases in payroll tax that are still hanging over the workers of America today.

So, to make an issue out of this when this task force is -- we're awaiting its report -- and he has appointed his own representatives to that task force, too -- I think is just, again, sheer political demagoguery.

Q. Yes, sir, I want to tell you something. I just got back from the Hill. [Laughter] Mr. President, there is a mild revolt against your administration going on by communications today with Capitol Hill. People all over the country are calling in and saying that they cannot stand the cuts in Medicare and Medicaid because -- I realize you've cut off the providers, but the providers are the hospitals, and the hospitals, they say, 75 percent of them will go broke and that they will then have to ration what people they take in and which ones they cut out and that the old people will not be admitted and, therefore, the old people will die.

The President. I can't answer a question. He's just shut me off. But I would say that all of you have the means to reduce the fears of the social security recipients, fears that have been aroused by the demagoguery from those guys on the Hill.

Behind the headlines of today, steadily chipping away at the obstacles to peace, is another and less sensational dimension to foreign affairs. It is the network of human relations between our country and other nations around the globe. This network is more than government-to-government relations, tourism, or commerce. It also has been built on the experiences of young people who've lived with families and attended schools or universities in other countries.

I am convinced that one of the best ways to develop more accurate perspectives on other nations and on ourselves is for more Americans to join, for a time, a family and a community in another land. And we can't hope that other nations will appreciate our country unless more of their future leaders have had the same chance to feel the warmth of the American family, the vitality of an American community, the diversity of our educational system.

But there's a flickering spark in us all which, if struck at just the right age, I think, can light the rest of our lives, elevating our ideals, deepening our tolerance, and sharpening our appetite for knowledge about the rest of the world. Education and cultural exchanges, especially among our young, provide a perfect opportunity for this precious spark to grow, making us more sensitive and wiser international citizens through our careers.

Twenty-two years ago, President Eisenhower, father of the People-to-People program, as you know, said that ``The beginning point of all cooperation between individuals, between groups, within a single society, or between nations is genuine, human understanding.'' Well, never have we needed this vital ingredient to peace more than in today's world.

Since World War II, the United States has developed many excellent programs for students, scholars, youth, farm, and labor groups. They depend on the cooperation of thousands of American families and hundreds of schools, universities, and volunteer community organizations.

And many of these are represented here today. Still, the total number of young people sponsored by our government is relatively small, especially when compared to sponsored programs of the Soviet Union or even of our allies, West Germany and France.

Early next month I'll go to Versailles to meet with our six major allies. Among both their young people and ours, there's perhaps less appreciation of the values we share than there was 20 or 30 years ago. The successor generations didn't experience our remarkable postwar cooperation and are less familiar with the ideals which motivated America then and which motivate us now. I believe that today we have a great opportunity to form new bonds through expanded exchanges among our youth, from all sections of our society. If we're to succeed, if we're to build human bridges across the seas and into the future as an investment for peace, we'll need more private support and cooperation than ever before.

And that, ladies and gentlemen, is why I invited you here today -- to forge with me a new kind of cooperation between government and the private sector, between profit and nonprofit organizations, between families across our land and those abroad in an exciting exchange of our young people.

Based on an expanded American program, I plan to discuss with our allies at Versailles greater emphasis on these programs by all our countries. An ancient Chinese proverb says, ``If you tell a man, he will forget. If you show a man, he may remember. But if you involve him, he will understand.'' I hope we can make a beginning by involving all of you and wonderful families like the Frys and the Gozays here, who are with us today, in a vast network providing home-stay experience and other support for thousands of young people from abroad over the years to come.

I plan to form a Presidential committee to advise me and to help Charlie Wick, who is my personal representative for this effort, help them find ways to stimulate greater private involvement across the country. I hope that today's meeting will open a new chapter in our efforts to build the broadest possible base for peace. I look forward to hearing -- or receiving a report from Charlie on the results of this meeting and the followup work. You have my strong support, my sincere best wishes in this new endeavor.

Well, right then I fell in love all over again with ``those big strappin' lads from Ioway'' and from wherever in America. And you think about them, over there. I think they'd do a lot more than a lot of public relations programs to correct false impressions about the United States.

Jaime Oaxaca would succeed Joseph Lane Kirkland. He is vice president and assistant general manager, Northrup Corp., electro-mechanical division. He was vice president of missile programs and vice president and assistant general manager with the corporation. He resides in Ranchos Palos Verdes, Calif., and was born February 20, 1931.

Section 1. There is hereby reconstituted the Presidential Management Intern Program. The purpose of the Program is to attract to the Federal service outstanding men and women from a variety of academic disciplines who have a clear interest in, and commitment to, a career in the analysis and management of public policies and programs. Individuals selected for the Program will be known as Presidential Management Interns.

Sec. 2. Eligible individuals are those who have pursued a course of study at the graduate level which demonstrates both an exceptional ability and the commitment stated above. Such individuals at the time of application must have recently received or must expect to receive soon an appropriate advanced degree.

Sec. 4. (a) Successful candidates shall be appointed as Presidential Management Interns to positions in Schedule A of the excepted service. The appointment shall not exceed two years unless extended by the Federal department or agency, with the concurrence of the Office of Personnel Management, for up to one additional year.

Sec. 5. Those individuals who are currently undergoing the process of selection, or who were selected or appointed under the provisions of Executive Order No. 12008 and who have not at this time completed their scheduled period of excepted service, may continue their internships under the terms of this Order.

No, I want to say, seriously, I'm a little in awe being in this place and knowing all that has been produced here and thinking back over the years as we waited and watched, as you have waited and watched for the results, for that first step on the Moon. You left your fingerprints on that, and then a gentleman left his footprints on the Moon because of you. The space shuttles, the Apollo, the Space Lab and who knows what more to come.

And I'm here to talk to you about a few little problems we have in Washington just for a few minutes, and then we'll have a dialog instead of a monolog. I understand there's a couple of microphones, and I can take some questions. And I'd rather do that than make a speech, and you'd rather have me do that than my make a speech.

But this is a -- well, it's always great to get back here to California. As a matter of fact, I keep looking for excuses to get here. California is a hard place to leave. And there are some days in Washington when I want to get here more than others. [Laughter] And right now you've probably heard a rumor to the effect that they're discussing a budget up on the Hill. And we've been trying to keep it a secret. [Laughter] No, it's very serious and I think for all of us.

Just as you represent something in a great, new development for all of mankind, we're trying to do something new, we think, in Washington, D.C. We think it's time -- has been high time for a long time -- that we got government back to the place where it didn't spend any more than it took in and it didn't take anymore than it had to out of your pockets. And we think we've made some progress.

Government was increasing spending by 17 percent a year, and inflation was 12.4 percent. And that was the second back-to-back year of double-digit inflation, the only time it had ever happened, I think, in peacetime history. And, of course unemployment was climbing -- and it's continued to climb -- and we've continued on to the point that we now have a recession. But as of this present year's budget, we've cut that 17 percent rate of increase in half.

The inflation figure for the last year, if you take 12 months back, would run at 6.6 percent. But to show you that we're making progress, if you take it for the last 3 months, for 3 months now inflation has run at less than 1 percent. And you've had that first little bitty installment of it on the tax cuts. But that's one of the things in the budget battle that's going on.

I've insisted on two things for sure, that -- well, in addition to reducing unnecessary government spending, the other is that we must stay with our defense budget as closely as we can so that we don't send any more of the wrong signals to the rest of the world. They must know that we are prepared to do whatever is necessary.

The other thing is there is a 10-percent income tax cut scheduled for July 1st and another one scheduled for July 1st, 1983. And then we index the income tax brackets. And just to explain, if someone hasn't heard that term before, what it is we're trying to do -- you've gotten down through the years cost-of-living pay raises to try and keep even with the increased cost of living with inflation. But because of the number of dollars that you increased your earnings, very often that pushed you into the next tax bracket up and you found yourself paying more, a higher percentage in tax, and the result was that you were worse off, not better off, after having gotten that cost-of-living raise. Indexing means that we index -- that from there on, the tax bracket's the same as the cost of living is indexed, and you don't move up into another bracket. They also are at the same level.

Last year we got that program and we got the cuts that we thought were necessary in spending for that one year. Now, the budget for 1983 that goes into effect October 3d is there, and the Congress is debating seven versions of the budget. I only like one. [Laughter] I've got a favorite in there. And it's a favorite that will reduce the projected deficits for the next 3 years by some $390 billion. And it won't -- as some have suggested -- take away those already scheduled tax cuts. And, while there will be some minor trims in defense, they're trims that the Secretary of Defense, another Californian, Cap Weinberger, tells me they can take without setting us back in our plans for rebuilding our defenses.

I think you people here know better than probably most groups that I would talk to that about a year and a half ago, when we got in there, we found out that on any given day half our airplanes couldn't fly because of a lack of spare parts. Ships couldn't leave harbor. And we had a morale problem among our men and women who were in service. And I'm happy to tell you, not only have all those things been corrected, but so has that. You'd be very proud, as I am, if you could hear from and talk to and see the young men and women in our service and the pride that they now have in wearing the uniform and how willing they are to serve.

The President. Yes, I would, but I think maybe I've started something here. All right. You come on and I will. But somebody ask a question while this is happening, because this can't be of much interest to those who can't see.

We have budgetary restraints, but we are going forward with four of the space shuttles, as you know. And in that defense budget, as you also know, is the B - 1. That isn't space; that's another part of the program. I know that there is talk for a fifth, and that is under consideration. But we'll have to wait now as -- to see whether that can be added on or not.

The President. Do I think I'll meet with the Russians? Yes, I do, because I've received a message from President Brezhnev and suggesting a meeting, and we are now -- our people at the Secretary of State's level and the Foreign Minister and so forth -- they're getting together to try and arrange the exact place and date for that. And we will be talking about what we called the START program.

You know, SALT was strategic arms limitation, except that they could double under the life of the treaty just about what they've got now. We call ours START. It is strategic arms reduction talks. We think we ought to have fewer nuclear missiles than there are in the world.

That was to -- out in the Utah desert, they were going to build a whole lot of holes connected by a track, and then they were going to keep moving the MX around. Supposedly the Soviets wouldn't know which one of those holes it was in at any given time. Well, it was a tremendously costly operation, and we didn't think that it actually offered that much protection. Granted, it would force the Soviet Union to build more warheads, put more warheads on, but all they had to do was just increase the number of warheads in the event of trying to bomb our missiles or destroy them -- just hit every hole, whether it had an MX in it or not.

Right now -- the last part of the question is, what are we thinking about doing about that? Well, the first ones -- we have asked and we're talking to the Congress about it now -- as the first ones come off the line, we're researching several methods of placing them that have been considered -- but in the interim of putting them in some of the existing Minuteman III missiles.

And now there has been a new plan that has been advanced and that is getting a lot of attention -- the military people -- and that is what's called a cluster plan -- that you actually, instead of scattering them to hide them, you pick an area and put them all in that limited area -- and the idea being that the oncoming missiles would have to come in to such a point that they could very probably detonate their own missiles before they got there as they had to funnel in to hit this very small target -- plus which in any form of an antiballistic defense, it would give us a better targeting chance at them. But what we have is an agreement with the Congress that we're going to come back with a recommendation on one of the plans that's being considered later this fall.

California? Well, no, the plan that we had tried to get in in the State of California my last year -- and we lost -- and now about 16 other States have done it; we were just ahead of our time. No, that was one which would have set a limit on how much percentage of the total earnings of the people that the State could take in taxes. It would set a limit beyond which the State could not go.

And the closest thing now in Washington to that is the thing that I have advocated and intend to support, and that is that we set a date down the road as we begin to reduce the deficits -- we set a date down the road that we can make and have a constitutional amendment that says the Federal Government has to balance the budget.

The President. This one is that on TV they've seen so much about an evacuation plan in the event of a nuclear disaster and wanted to know are we getting that close? No, I think we still have a deterrent. There's no question but that they have a superior military force than we do now. It's been built up while we've let ours lag over the years. But I think we still have enough of a deterrent for protection.

But as a part of the defense buildup to make sure that we have a deterrent, we had to face a thing that our country over-looked for a number of years. You know, we had what was called the MAD program -- mutual assured destruction -- that we could have peace if both sides knew that they could blow the other side up. And part of that was that we would do nothing to protect our people. And then we found out that the Soviet Union for years has had a very expensive and a very efficient civil defense program -- shelters, evacuation plans, everything. In other words, they have set out to protect their people. We feel that as a part of our defense, in order to let them know that we have a deterrent, because we've got to show that -- and we've got to go forward with some plans for the protection of our own people.

Now, so far the -- and the budget constraints and all, we've only gone through with studying a plan of evacuating our cities. That, of course, would mean that you would have to -- there'd have to be enough strain in advance that you would think -- you'd have some warning that you better get the people out. There wouldn't be any protection in that for a surprise attack if they just push the button, because you've only got about 28 minutes, and that's all she wrote.

Q. Mr. President, it has been reported in the paper there that the Soviet Union has satellites over the Falkland Islands down there. I would like to know, does the United States of America have any satellites in the same area watching the Soviets and the Argentines?

The President. Well, this question is one that I just don't think I can comment on. [Laughter] This question is that we've read that the Soviets -- in the papers that the Soviet Union has satellites, communication satellites, or surveillance satellites, down over the Falkland area, and do we have anything there watching them. And I have to stick with my first answer there; I just can't comment on matters of that kind.

Houston Mission Control during a mission on STS - 2. And you're the first President that has ever visited this home of the Rockwell men and women that made the Apollo and now the shuttle spacecraft. You're the first President that's ever had a miraculous technological feat, such as the shuttle, performed for the first time and the only President that had three flights on such a reusable machine. We expect there are going to be a lot of space firsts in your administration, and we at Rockwell are going to try very hard to make that happen.

I will add just one thing to those nice things that you were saying about me and the space program. Also -- and I suppose this is true of other Presidents, so I can't claim a first, but I also assure you that this President believes in the space program and its importance to this nation.

President Kyprianou and in Geneva on April 9 with Turkish Cypriot leader Denktash. These meetings provided a thorough review of the status of the negotiations and both sides agreed to accelerate the pace of the talks and hold two meetings per week. The negotiating parties also agreed to meet again with the Secretary General in New York in June for a further review of the negotiating process.

We believe that the intercommunal negotiations are firmly established as a strong and effective tool to promote progress toward resolving the Cyprus problem. I wish to congratulate both the United Nations Secretary General and his Special Representative on Cyprus, Ambassador Hugo Gobbi, for their commitment to bringing the Cyprus problem to a just and lasting settlement. They have my full support for their efforts. We hope that the negotiators will seize the opportunities offered by the United Nations ``evaluation'' to make progress toward resolving outstanding differences between the communities.

Nancy and I thank you for a very great and warm California welcome. You know, it's always a pleasure to get home, if only for a short visit. And one of the best things about getting home is seeing old friends, and we've been doing that tonight.

Many of us in this room have been toiling together in the political vineyards for more than 20 years. We've shared victories and defeats, good times and bad. I made it 20 years and not more than that, because any more than that I wasn't a Republican. [Laughter] But we've shared the good times and bad and, what's most important, I guess, is that we've never become complacent.

This magnificent display of unity and commitment will undoubtedly be remembered as one of the good times. And I think we all owe a round of applause to David Murdock and the others for what they've done to make this evening the success that it is.

Thomas Edison once said, ``I never did anything worth doing by accident, nor did any of my inventions come by accident; they came by work.'' Well, the current strength and vitality of our party didn't happen by accident, either. It took work. And each of you should be congratulated for what you've done. Obviously, many of you have been working extra hard. But accomplishments also require leadership, and tonight I'd like to take this opportunity to thank Tirso del Junco for the fine job that he's doing here in California.

But in a few days, Californians will be going to the polls and, along with determining the party nominations, you'll be given a chance to register your opposition to a blatantly unfair redistricting plan. The way to vote against backroom political manipulation is to vote no on Propositions 10, 11, and 12.

America during the last 20 years has been poised at a crossroads. A number of political forces, as we should expect in a free society, are trying to direct our country down whichever path most closely conforms to their philosophy and world view. It will be the activists -- those who organize and vote -- who determine what America will be like two decades from now. It's our job to muster the forces of hope, to inspire them with a positive program that will ensure that America remains a prosperous and a free country.

We're engaged in an epic conflict with the proponents of negativism, the advocates of ``no.'' They offer the politics of no growth, no take-home pay, no neighborhood schools, no incentives to work, no incentives to save, no protections for the family, and no security for our nation or safety at home.

We are and must remain the bold proponents of ``yes.'' Yes, we can have a brighter future. Yes, we can make America work. Yes, we can solve our problems and, yes, we can have a safe and strong America. Yes, we can live together in harmony no matter what our race or religion.

We say this because when it comes to our country, yes is the only word we understand. And I'm not just talking about Republicans. The American people -- Republicans, Independents, and Democrats alike -- want a positive alternative, something our opponents with all their criticism have yet to offer. The Washington establishment may think it sounds corny, but we still believe in the people, and so do Americans.

A study conducted by the Gallup organization has recently found that among all the industrialized nations, Americans are the most willing to fight for their country, the proudest of their national identity, the most likely to find achievement in their work. They are also deeply religious and behind only the Irish and the English in viewing themselves as happy. Do you suppose that makes us Irish-Americans the happiest of all? [Laughter] It does tonight.

Government can do it for them. You can count on them to spend their money more wisely than government can spend it for them. You can count on their courage when the cause is just, and you can count on them to do what is right when they are given the facts. And that's our responsibility. We've got to work with all the energy we possess to let the people know about the choices we face as a nation. We've got to make sure that our people have the opportunity to hear our message. We'll also do our utmost to see that they won't have to be called on to fight for their country, because our goal is peace.

Now recently, I've been through some serious negotiations with a gentleman named Tip O'Neill, a man whose concern about deficits is legendary. [Laughter] I tried to meet him halfway and on his own turf. We did our best to reach a compromise that would have started the budget process moving again and reassuring the Nation. Instead of compromise, he wanted surrender; instead of progress, he wanted to cancel the election of 1980.

The people have spoken. The old days of ever bigger taxes and uncontrolled government spending are over. The Speaker told reporters after our negotiations that philosophical differences separated us. Well, he's absolutely right. I just don't believe the philosophy of ``no.'' The profligate spending by liberal kingpins in Washington represents the aspirations of many Democrat Members of Congress and the rank-and-file of their party.

Every demand they made in that meeting was based on increased spending and higher taxes. Now, we tried our best to reach a reasonable understanding. Now it's time for responsible activists in both parties to get on with the business at hand, and that's exactly what we intend to do. That's why the Members of the House aren't here tonight that were supposed to be here, because they're facing right now on the floor of the Congress -- and they've been up for late hours on this -- having eliminated five of the budget proposals already, they're facing 68 amendments to the two remaining budget proposals.

During the coming election, we cannot let the legacy of the big spenders and big taxers be forgotten. Will you forgive me if I offer some reminders? In the years prior to the 1980 election, our economy was on the skids, our people were demoralized. Indeed, a voice from the White House told them they suffered a malaise. Overseas, our friends and allies alike saw us as a nation in decline. Government spending was out of control, growing at an annual rate of 17 percent in the year 1980 alone. Taxation was strangling any chance of progress. Dollars that could have been used for business expansion, individual savings, or consumer spending were spent on government expansion.

Taxes actually doubled between 1976 and 1981. They went up $300 billion, and there were $318 billion in that same period in deficits. For all their talk about compassion, they created one of the most brutal inflations in our nation's history. In 1980, it was running at double-digit levels for the second year in a row, robbing from those on fixed incomes, attacking the well-being of the poor and the middle class, stifling savings, and shooting interest rates sky high.

My predecessor and the liberal hierarchy in the Congress started in '76 with an inflation rate of 4.8 percent. By 1980, they had run it up to 12.4 percent. Now, some of you may have heard Senator Kennedy and others in the liberal hierarchy complain about interest rates recently. Well, this is going to make you cry.

In December of 1976, the last full month of the last Republican administration, the prime interest rate averaged 6.4 percent. By December of 1980, interest rates were 21.5 percent. Prior to the 1980 election, productivity was down for the third year in a row, and unemployment was heading up again. I remember campaigning in the Midwest during the 1980 election in towns with 18 and 20 percent unemployment then, where the collapse of several important industries had already begun.

Do any of you remember the misery index? That goes back to '76. My predecessor invented that as a candidate. He added the rates of unemployment and inflation together and then said of the incumbent President that, ``No man had the right to seek reelection as a President who had a misery index of 12.5.'' And he won. He was in office, and after 4 years with a Democratic majority in both Houses of the Congress, the misery index stood at 19\1/2\. But he ran for reelection.

Well, in this election year, they haven't mentioned the misery index. Yes, we have a recession; they've mentioned that. And we have an unemployment rate which I'm as concerned about as anyone could be. But that 19.5 misery index we inherited is, for the first quarter of 1982, only 9.8 percent.

We figured that what America needed was a commitment to tackle the basic problems holding our country back and a willingness to stick with it until the job was done. And that's what we've set out to do. Our program has four basic points. Most of you can probably recite them with me, because it's not my program, it's our program, and together we've accomplished much of it.

First, we called for getting government spending under control. Well, we've cut the rate of growth in that spending nearly in half in the first year. Our programs called for a tax rate reduction. We've set in place a tax program that will leave hundreds of billions of dollars in the pockets of working people that would have been grabbed away by built-in tax increases. Indeed, the biggest single tax increase in our nation's history was passed in 1977. And for the first time ever, we have managed to eliminate government's hidden tax increase -- caused by inflation -- by indexing, which will start in 1985.

Bush has been leading this fight, heading a task force with spectacular results. By the end of this fiscal year, the American people will be spared the expense of 200 million man-hours of nonproductive paperwork required under those previous regulations. Now that savings can go into investments which create new jobs. The Federal Register, the book which lists new regulations, was 23,000 pages smaller last year due to the efforts of that task force.

The last part of our program is a commitment to work with the Federal Reserve System to ensure a stable monetary policy. And we've done that. And along with the rest of our program, it's brought a drop in the inflation rate -- totally unpredicated, by the way. If you remember, our critics, just a short time ago, and some of the so-called experts were telling us it would take a decade to wring inflation out of the economy. Well, inflation for the past 12 months hasn't been running at 12.4; it's been running at an annual rate of 6.6 percent. But for the last 3 months, the Consumer Price Index has been running at less than 1 percent.

Very early in the administration, over shrill voices that predicted skyrocketing prices, we decontrolled the price of oil. And decontrol unleashed a stampede of exploration, promoted conservation, contributed to the oil glut, and reduced prices. Here again, our policies are pumping vast resources into our economy which were evaporating under the previous administration.

There was one problem we met head on in the early months of the administration which could have brought havoc had it not been dealt with quickly and firmly. I think everyone who depends on government -- from social security recipients to businessmen -- can rest easier now that we've reaffirmed that Federal employees do not and will not have the right to strike.

We've brought tough professionals into this administration who are taking our goals of efficiency seriously. The campaign against fraud, waste, and mismanagement is showing results. For example, calls and letters to hotlines -- where someone is to call in with some tip that they can give us that's a saving -- has more than doubled in some of the Federal agencies last year, and one phone call alone last September to the Department of Labor resulted in a $10,000 savings.

I'm convinced that the American people will respond if dealt with maturely and honestly. They're willing, if we tell them the facts, to give our program a chance. This recession has made our task difficult, but gloom and doomers notwithstanding, I believe we're on the verge of a tangible and lasting recovery.

The savings rate is up. The preliminary figures suggest the savings rate has jumped from 4.9 percent of the people's earnings to 6.3 percent under the new incentives of our program. And remember, you've only received the first installment of our tax cuts. This is providing a vast new pool of capital for investment and is a tangible indicator that interest rates should be coming down soon. Auto production will be up for the second quarter and some laid-off employees are already being rehired. Construction of office buildings is up. Business travel is up. Home mortgage rates are declining. We still have a long way to go, but we're on our way back.

Our allies and our adversaries alike thought of us as weak and indecisive. The dedicated men and women in our Armed Forces reacted as one might predict. Professionals whose skills were badly needed left the service in droves.

I say to you tonight, we can be proud that aside from everything else in these last 16 months, we have restored the confidence of the United States of America. Today our allies know that we're not afraid to lead. Our adversaries are beginning to get the idea that we're a force with which to be reckoned. The men and women of our Armed Forces know now that we're proud of them.

Our Ambassador to Luxembourg wrote me a letter. He had just returned from a visit to one of our armored cavalry regiments up along the East German border. And as he was leaving, went over to his helicopter, a 19-year-old trooper stopped him, and he asked the Ambassador if he, by any chance, could ever get a message to me. And being an Ambassador, of course he could, and he said so. And the young fellow said, ``Well, will you just tell the President we're proud to be here, and we ain't scared o'nothin'.'' We may not have taught him much in English, but I sure like his attitude.

In just 1 week, I'll be leaving for my first trip to Europe as President of the United States. My utmost goal, second only to the preservation of our freedom, is, as I said, maintaining world peace. Our nation is in a much better position today to negotiate and achieve meaningful arms reduction because of the commitments that we've made.

Permitting our defense posture to erode did nothing to further the cause of peace. We have two arms reductions proposals on the table, proposals which will bring both sides into balance, rather than freezing either side into a position of inferiority and vulnerability. But like prosperity, peace comes from commitment and hard work. And in any forthcoming arms reduction talks, the Soviets know this time the alternative to reducing their arms strength is to try and match our industrial capacity.

The Congress appropriated $5 million for the conclusion of the Sinai Support Mission's activities in Fiscal Year 1982. By careful financial and technical planning to minimize its phase-out costs, the Mission expects to complete its activities at this minimal funding level. No funds are being requested for Fiscal Year 1983.

The Congress and the American people can take pride in the successful completion of this unique peacekeeping initiative that combined Government and private sector talents to carry out on very short notice a sensitive and complex series of missions in an isolated and distant environment. In meeting these challenges, the men and women of the Sinai Support and Field Missions have made a major contribution to our continuing efforts to bring a just and lasting peace to the troubled Middle East.

Last fall, I spoke to the Nation's chiefs of police about crime and what the Federal Government can do to help them fight it. Today, I am happy to report that Senator Strom Thurmond, chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee, Senator Joseph Biden, and others have introduced a comprehensive, bipartisan package of anticrime proposals. I urge the Congress to give it prompt and favorable consideration.

We all know that the Federal Government cannot, by itself, end violent, organized or drug-related crime. Our first line of defense against the criminal predators in our midst will continue to be the State and local law enforcement officers who risk their lives each day in communities across the Nation.

The primary responsibility for prosecuting and punishing criminals lies with the States, whose courts handle 97 percent of all criminal cases. However, the Federal Government can set an example for the States by establishing a modern, effective criminal justice system, including laws that will correct the imbalance that has developed between the forces of crime and their victims.

This legislation contains several statutory reforms that are long overdue. It includes reform of our bail laws so that a judge, after a hearing with full due process protections, can prevent a dangerous defendant from returning to the streets to prey once again on innocent citizens. It would permit a judge to set reasonable conditions for pretrial release and to lock up any defendant who is rearrested while out on bail.

The legislation also provides for comprehensive sentencing reform, replacing our unpredictable and discredited parole system with fixed sentences. A judge would be required to sentence an offender within specific guidelines, or explain in writing his failure to do so. Moreover, in contrast to the current situation, once a sentence is given, it would actually be served.

Penalties for those trafficking in dangerous drugs are also strengthened. All property used in drug trafficking or racketeering activities, along with all proceeds received from such illicit enterprises, would be subject to forfeiture to the Federal Government upon the criminal convictions of the ringleaders. Drug trafficking is a $79 billion a year industry in this country, and the penalties now on the books are viewed by drug dealers as an insignificant cost of doing business. The forfeiture provisions and increased fines provided by this bill are essential if we are to take the profit out of these destructive activities.

I am particularly pleased to note that this legislation would help the forgotten people in the criminal justice system -- the victims and witnesses whose assistance is vital to every criminal prosecution. This bill provides for the use of criminal sanctions and civil injunctions to protect victims and witnesses from harassment and retaliation. I hope that this will be only the first in a series of measures to protect the victims rather than the perpetrators of crime. The Task Force on Victims of Crime, which I recently established, will report to me later this year with recommendations in this crucial field.

On the occasion May 25 of the 19th anniversary of the signing of the charter of the Organization of African Unity I take great pleasure in extending to you, and through you to the people of Africa, the best wishes of the American people and myself.

Namibia to independence via free and fair elections based on United Nations Security Council resolution 435 and to bring peace to the Southern Africa region will be unceasing. We will continue to cooperate with the OAU in your peacekeeping efforts in Chad.

I'm temporarily down here, and to show my simpatico with all of you, I am looking forward to returning to Rancho del Cielo. We can't helicopter because the California sunshine is shut out today. But awaiting me up there is a wonderful gift from south of the border, from President Portillo, an Anglo-Arab horse that's waiting for me, and I'll be riding as soon as I get back up there on him.

But Senators, the Representatives, the delegates, excellencies, ambassadors, you ladies and gentlemen: I've always had a great regret that in that little school in Illinois, where I was compelled to study for a couple of years a foreign language, they did not offer Spanish. I find a great beauty in it and a great desire in that language. And my desire to speak in that was heightened several years ago when I was Governor of California, and I went on a mission to Mexico City representing the President of the United States.

Mexico. And you've often enticed each other to meet outside of the capital cities, and I applaud that practice. I'm especially pleased that this year's conference is being held in my now home State of California, in this beautiful place by the Pacific Ocean. Santa Barbara is very much a part of the historic relationship between our two peoples.

As you know, we value, as the Senator said, our candid and friendly relations with our closest neighbors. And I appreciate the efforts that you're making in this conference to build upon our good will.

During my 16 months in office, we've developed a rapport fitting good neighbors and good friends. President Lopez Portillo and I have met a total of four times last year. Mexican and United States Cabinet members have exchanged frequent visits, and Secretaries Haig and Castaneda are on such cordial terms that they call each other ``Al'' and ``Jorge,'' even when debating fine points on our respective approaches to Central America's problems. You know, in the world of diplomacy, most diplomats forget they have first names.

And while occasionally there are differences in approach between our two countries, the honest good will which exists between us has ensured the maintenance of dialog and created new opportunities for cooperation. After all, we strive to achieve the same goal: a free and prosperous America -- North, South, and Central.

Mexico, along with Venezuela, took the lead in furthering economic and social development among the Caribbean Basin States. Your use of oil has demonstrated a tangible commitment to this end. We're pleased to be working together with you and other nations in this area toward a more prosperous and politically stable hemisphere.

Secretaries, and a cabinet-level joint trade commission. No miracle cures were expected on the issues which these two bodies have addressed, but their deliberations have helped us to focus more clearly on the issues and the opportunities before us.

Apart from some technical impediments being addressed in the Joint Trade Commission, trade moves largely unhindered. In fact, it is at an all-time high. Mexico now ranks as the United States third largest trading partner; total two-way trade should reach $35 billion in 1982.

As is inevitable between two close neighbors, there are problems to be worked out. But by dealing with each other in good faith, by working together and consulting on these problems, we have demonstrated that they are opportunities as much as they are obstacles.

The friendship between our peoples is excellent. Our national legislatures have a significant role to play in our relations. I look forward to working with all of you for the benefit of both our peoples and for the peace and progress of this hemisphere.

I know the bloodshed that is taking place around the Falkland Islands is of deep concern to every nation in this hemisphere. We understand and are sensitive to Latin American sympathies in this crisis, something which made our own decisions more painful and difficult. I hope you will also, as neighbors and friends, do your utmost to understand the importance we attach to the principle that armed force should not be used to assert claims in an international dispute, as contained in Resolution 502 of the U.N. Security Council.

Let's make certain that emotions don't blur the truth of how close we really are during this tragic conflict. We all did our best to prevent bloodshed. Now that hostilities have started, we are united in the desire for a negotiated settlement and a peaceful resolution of the dispute under the guidelines set down in U.N. Security Council Resolution 502.

For our part, we'll continue to push for the resumption of negotiations. The essential issues of sovereignty must be addressed, but this is a matter for the British and the Argentinians to decide for themselves, peacefully.

The President. Well, I have to say that the leadership of the House has made it plain. We're halfway there. The Senate did adopt a budget that contained, probably, the bulk of the features that we had asked for in our worked-on budget. But look at the comparison.

Congress. And they spent 6 days going at not our budget but at a half a dozen or more budgets and 68 amendments and finally came up with nothing. And I think that it is an irresponsible action that the American people will condemn, and I think the American people are demanding a budget.

The President. Well, there was a little handful that voted against me. But I'd like to point out the budget I supported, the Latta budget that had been worked out by the -- in cooperation with responsible Democrats and the leadership, minority leadership, the Republican leadership, that plus even the Rousselot balance-the-budget measure that he proposed -- both of those received more votes than any of the Democratic proposals in this recent session.

The President. No, I don't think so. But I will tell you one thing that I think has been made very clear, and I've been aware of since before I became President: The United States Government's program for presenting a budget, or arriving at a budget, is about the most irresponsible, Mickey Mouse arrangement that any governmental body has ever practiced. It's called the President's budget, and yet there is nothing binding about it. It is submitted to the Congress, and they don't even have to consider it. Then, when they finally come up with a budget resolution -- which the President has no ability to veto if he isn't approving of it -- it is not binding on them. And then they go back to the committee process through the year of introducing appropriation measures which will or will not pass and which will or will not be signed by the President.

Q. Mr. President, could we ask you a little bit about the Falkland Islands? There are reports that the British, once they have taken the Falkland Islands, would like us to establish a military air base on the Falklands. How do you respond to that? Do you think it's a good idea for the United States to have that kind of presence?

The President. I don't know of any such proposal. I do know that in a proposal being considered for a cease-fire, that there has been a suggestion of a neutral peace-keeping force there while both sides withdraw and continue to negotiate, of which one of the participants would be the United States, just as we're one of the participants in the Sinai border force now.

The President. The only thing that we have to face here is the issue, and the issue is not really those lonely little islands down there. The issue is whether we can allow armed aggression to succeed with regard to such territorial claims. There are 50 places in the world right now where, if this succeeds, could be opened to the same thing happening. And the armed aggression, I'm sorry, did start by the action of one of our neighbors here in the Americas. That principle must not be allowed to fail.

The President. Well, I think there are signs, indices that the economy is recovering, that it has bottomed out. I think some of them are due for release today, but I've come down from the mountaintop; I haven't seen them as yet. Maybe I'll get to them before the day is over.

But you only have to look at inflation -- where it has come down to. You have to look at the drop in the interest rates, and there's been some, again, instability of dropping with those a little more just recently, the last few days. But I think that the thing that now is delaying further definite recovery is the action of the House with regard to the budget.

In contrast to the Senate, which has passed a responsible budget resolution calling for reductions in the projected deficits for the next 3 years of $358 billion, the majority leadership of the House of Representatives preferred to play politics. In a wild 5 or 6 days, they battled over which of half a dozen or so budgets we should have, plus 68 amendments, and then came up empty. They will now recess for a vacation and come back to start all over again.

Believing that a budget resolution calling for substantial savings could have an effect on the now unnecessarily high interest rates, I had hoped for cooperation with the Democratic leadership of the House. I thought if we could appear together before the cameras and announce that we had arrived at agreement on a deficit-reducing budget, it would serve notice to the money markets that we were united in an effort to keep inflation and, thus, interest rates down.

A number of responsible Democrat Congressmen did share that hope. And with their help, we'll keep on fighting to get a responsible budget which protects your tax cuts and provides for a sound defense program.

I'm in France, we'll commemorate the 35th anniversary of the Marshall plan, one of the greatest humanitarian ventures ever undertaken. America helped to rebuild the shattered economies of Western Europe and create a sense of community among Western nations which remains vital today.

We must recognize that, whether in defense, political, or economic affairs, building successful foreign policy begins at home. It's for that reason we put in place an economic recovery program that, at long last, addresses the problems and abuses that have been undermining our economic health for decades.

Washington. Interest rates are heading down -- not enough, but it's a start. Inflation is substantially down, and real consumer incomes are rising. And on July 1st, thanks to the second installment of your tax cut, Uncle Sam's bite on your paycheck will be smaller, leaving you more to spend and save as you see fit.

Serious problems remain, such as the need for a sound budget and, above all, unemployment, here and in Europe where it's at record levels. But we're making economic headway, and our common security requires that we continue to work together as friends and allies. That will be my main theme at the seven-nation economic summit in France next week.

But prosperity has little meaning unless we also act to maintain our freedom and protect the peace. The remarkable strength and success of the Western Alliance in preserving the peace for over three decades lies in the fact that we're a voluntary grouping of free peoples, soon to be joined by still another new democracy -- Spain. The overriding success of NATO is that for almost 40 years, Europe has been at peace.

Our allies know that America has both the will and the resources to defend itself and to live up to its commitments. Last November 18th, we offered to eliminate all of our Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles if the Soviets eliminate their SS - 4, 5, and 20 missiles, now targeted on our allies. This offer has the strong support of our NATO allies and has been spelled out in detail at the U.S.-Soviet negotiating table in Geneva.

In my recent speech at Eureka College, I presented a proposal for substantial reductions in strategic arms. We and our allies hope the Soviets will respond positively, and we're prepared to begin START -- that's Strategic Arms Reduction Talks -- immediately. But arms control can't happen in a vacuum. Over the past decade, the Soviet Union has engaged in a pattern of direct and indirect aggression and suppression in places as varied as Afghanistan, Poland, and Latin America, and that's made it harder for progress in arms control.

We must always remember that, in dealing with the condition in the world today, Western solidarity and defense preparedness are essential to meaningful arms control negotiations. That's the message I'll take with me -- the message of a strong, free alliance, working together to protect its freedom and seek meaningful negotiations to build a more peaceful world.

I'm optimistic for the future of our partnerships and the future of freedom. The values for which we and our fellow democracies stand are of enduring and universal worth. Ours is a mission for peace and freedom through Western unity and strength, and with your prayers, it will succeed.

Well, we know now that Lincoln was wrong about that particular occasion. His remarks commemorating those who gave their ``last full measure of devotion'' were long remembered. But since that moment at Gettysburg, few other such addresses have become part of our national heritage -- not because of the inadequacy of the speakers, but because of the inadequacy of words.

I have no illusions about what little I can add now to the silent testimony of those who gave their lives willingly for their country. Words are even more feeble on this Memorial Day, for the sight before us is that of a strong and good nation that stands in silence and remembers those who were loved and who, in return, loved their countrymen enough to die for them.

Yet, we must try to honor them -- not for their sakes alone, but for our own. And if words cannot repay the debt we owe these men, surely with our actions we must strive to keep faith with them and with the vision that led them to battle and to final sacrifice.

Our first obligation to them and ourselves is plain enough: The United States and the freedom for which it stands, the freedom for which they died, must endure and prosper. Their lives remind us that freedom is not bought cheaply. It has a cost; it imposes a burden. And just as they whom we commemorate were willing to sacrifice, so too must we -- in a less final, less heroic way -- be willing to give of ourselves.

It is this, beyond the controversy and the congressional debate, beyond the blizzard of budget numbers and the complexity of modern weapons systems, that motivates us in our search for security and peace. War will not come again, other young men will not have to die, if we will speak honestly of the dangers that confront us and remain strong enough to meet those dangers.

It's not just strength or courage that we need, but understanding and a measure of wisdom as well. We must understand enough about our world to see the value of our alliances. We must be wise enough about ourselves to listen to our allies, to work with them, to build and strengthen the bonds between us.

Our understanding must also extend to potential adversaries. We must strive to speak of them not belligerently, but firmly and frankly. And that's why we must never fail to note, as frequently as necessary, the wide gulf between our codes of morality. And that's why we must never hesitate to acknowledge the irrefutable difference between our view of man as master of the state and their view of man as servant of the state. Nor must we ever underestimate the seriousness of their aspirations to global expansion. The risk is the very freedom that has been so dearly won.

It is this honesty of mind that can open paths to peace, that can lead to fruitful negotiation, that can build a foundation upon which treaties between our nations can stand and last -- treaties that can someday bring about a reduction in the terrible arms of destruction, arms that threaten us with war even more terrible than those that have taken the lives of the Americans we honor today.

As for existing strategic arms agreements, we will refrain from actions which undercut them so long as the Soviet Union shows equal restraint. With good will and dedication on both sides, I pray that we will achieve a safer world.

Our goal is peace. We can gain that peace by strengthening our alliances, by speaking candidly of the dangers before us, by assuring potential adversaries of our seriousness, by actively pursuing every chance of honest and fruitful negotiation.

It is with these goals in mind that I will depart Wednesday for Europe, and it's altogether fitting that we have this moment to reflect on the price of freedom and those who have so willingly paid it. For however important the matters of state before us this next week, they must not disturb the solemnity of this occasion. Nor must they dilute our sense of reverence and the silent gratitude we hold for those who are buried here.

The willingness of some to give their lives so that others might live never fails to evoke in us a sense of wonder and mystery. One gets that feeling here on this hallowed ground, and I have known that same poignant feeling as I looked out across the rows of white crosses and Stars of David in Europe, in the Philippines, and the military cemeteries here in our own land. Each one marks the resting place of an American hero and, in my lifetime, the heroes of World War I, the Doughboys, the GI's of World War II or Korea or Vietnam. They span several generations of young Americans, all different and yet all alike, like the markers above their resting places, all alike in a truly meaningful way.

Winston Churchill said of those he knew in World War II they seemed to be the only young men who could laugh and fight at the same time. A great general in that war called them our secret weapon, ``just the best darn kids in the world.'' Each died for a cause he considered more important than his own life. Well, they didn't volunteer to die; they volunteered to defend values for which men have always been willing to die if need be, the values which make up what we call civilization. And how they must have wished, in all the ugliness that war brings, that no other generation of young men to follow would have to undergo that same experience.

As we honor their memory today, let us pledge that their lives, their sacrifices, their valor shall be justified and remembered for as long as God gives life to this nation. And let us also pledge to do our utmost to carry out what must have been their wish: that no other generation of young men will every have to share their experiences and repeat their sacrifice.

Earlier today, with the music that we have heard and that of our National Anthem -- I can't claim to know the words of all the national anthems in the world, but I don't know of any other that ends with a question and a challenge as ours does: Does that flag still wave o'er the land of the free and the home of the brave? That is what we must all ask.

The United States of America and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics have agreed to begin formal negotiations on the limitation and reduction of strategic arms on June 29, 1982, in Geneva, Switzerland. The U.S. delegation will be led by Ambassador Edward Rowny and the Soviet delegation will be led by Ambassador V. P. Karpov. Both sides attach great importance to these negotiations.

There remain pending 18 United States Government claims against Iran arising out of contracts for the provision of goods and services. Last October, Iran filed a major interpretive claim against the United States, alleging 18 separate violations of the Algiers Accords. On March 21, the United States filed the first in a series of responses to these allegations. It has also responded to all of the 60 official contract claims filed by Iran. While the Tribunal has now received pleadings from both sides in a large number of official claims, it does not appear to be close to deciding any of them on the merits.

December 31, 1983, the revocation of any authorization for the permanent disposition, by means of a final judicial judgment or order, of interests of Iran in any standby letter of credit or similar instrument. The Federal Register notice of this extension dated December 10, 1982 is attached.

The Task Force will serve as a forum through which the Agency for International Development and the U.S. business and financial community can exchange information, review strategies, and explore areas of mutual interest, with the overall objective of fostering a fuller partnership between AID and U.S. private enterprise in meeting national objectives in foreign assistance programs.

York; member of the board of directors of William Woods College; member of the board of directors and past chairman of the State Committee for the National Endowment for the Humanities; and member of the board of directors of Junior Achievement of Middle America.

Battle of Puebla, that General Ignacio Zaragoza led two thousand Mexicans against an invasion force of six thousand French troops who were on the march toward the capital of Mexico. After a long day of fighting against overwhelming odds, the Mexican patriots emerged victorious.

In Mexico and throughout the Hemisphere we recall the historic victory of the Cinco de Mayo with pride. It demonstrates not only the determination and love of country felt by the Mexican people, but also the heartfelt longing of people everywhere to live in freedom.

The ties of respect and friendship between Mexico and this country make it especially meaningful for us to extend congratulations on this Cinco de Mayo. May the legacy of General Zaragoza's victory be forever cherished by the people of the Americas.

America.'' And it marks quite a few firsts, and we hope one yet to be, and that is the first appearance in the World Cup series of an American team. And what we're hoping for is that maybe this would lead to the World Cup, for the first time in its history, being held in the United States.

That's why we turned the water on out there. [Laughter] But they will be playing, and we'll have an opportunity to see them, because they will be playing in the North American League. And in your first game 2 weeks ago, you defeated Seattle in that league.

Mr. Lifton. We have some presentations, Mr. President: the Team America soccer ball, signed by all the members of Team America, as well as the coach and the staff. So, we'd like you to have that. And when we win the World Cup, we would like you to hold on to that.

Q. Mr. President, the Roman Catholic Bishops, as you know, voted overwhelmingly yesterday in favor of a resolution calling for a halt in the nuclear arms race. Is that going to complicate your administration's efforts in trying to head off the nuclear freeze movement?

We haven't received it yet. I have had some information in advance about it which indicates that it really is a legitimate effort to do exactly what we're doing, and that is to try to find ways toward world peace. And if so, then we're both doing the same thing.

Q. But isn't it true that if a number of leading Catholic bishops, archbishops, cardinals, such as we've seen during this debate, go around the country, either to their parishes or in other forums, and say, as they are saying, that ``we think use of nuclear weapons is wrong'' -- and some of them are saying, in fact, ``we see no way that nuclear weapons should ever be used'' -- isn't that going to have an influence on the debate?

The President. Well, is it really? Is there anyone that really favors using those weapons or that wants to see them? Our own proposals in START and INF are aimed at starting to reduce those weapons. And my own hope is that maybe once we start, that we can completely eliminate them.

What we're talking about is a weapon that is so contrary to what used to be, before Hitler invented total war -- what used to be the policy of all nations by way of the Geneva rules and regulations concerning warfare. And that is that you did not make civilians targets of war. We used to have very specific rules about that in the rules of warfare. And then came total war in World War II, and, yes, all of the nations finally were doing it with the conventional weapons, bombing and so forth.

But this now -- can anyone -- granted that your weapons are targeted on weapons, but this kind of weapon can't help but have an effect on the population as a whole. So, they're not saying anything we don't say, that, God forbid, those weapons should ever be used.

The President. Well, as I say, I have not seen it yet, and 45,000 words are a lot to digest. But what I'm saying is that I think their purpose is the same as ours. They're looking for a way toward peace and promoting world peace, and that's what we're also looking for. And I think that to just deal in the specifics, and so far all of the accounts of this and all of the reporting has dealt on that one word, as if the difference between ``curb'' and ``halt'' -- we've had some indications that, in reality, there are many things in there that we'll have no quarrel with at all.

The President. Well, this is, as I say, this is going to take careful consideration to see where it figures in with what we're trying to accomplish in those meetings. And I can't go beyond it, because then you get into the very area of talking about negotiations, and you can't do that in advance.

Andropov said as less than sweeping in terms of the changes that he's offered. But I was wondering whether you felt, based on what you've seen, read, and heard, whether this seemed to you like a sincere effort on his part to break the impasse or whether it was just another chapter in the propaganda back and forth.

The President. Well, this'll be determined, I think, when the negotiators get back there and are actually at the meetings. But as I say, the encouraging thing was that he made a proposal. And it was a proposal that aimed at something that has been a consideration of ours, and that is that we should be negotiating warheads and not just missiles. Now, you won't know until you really sit across the table from them whether this was just propaganda or a proposal.

The President. I can't put a time limit on it. Remember, it took 7 years to get the SALT agreement. I can only say that the very fact that they're at the table and returning to the table is encouraging to me, when you look back at the history all the way to the end of World War II in attempting to get negotiations of this kind with them. But we're encouraged by the fact that they are there at the table and willing to discuss and have actually made a proposal of their own.

Actually, we're all talking a freeze, but we're talking something that is practical -- that, if you once get down to a verifiable balance -- they are talking, and have been talking, of a freeze even though there is a great imbalance, which we think would increase the possibility of war if one side has too much of an advantage over the other.

And so, what we have said is, reduce first, and then freeze. And we've always thought the fallacy in the freeze movement was they wanted to freeze first, and then see if you could reduce. But there wouldn't be any incentive for the Soviets with the margin of superiority they have to, once they had a freeze, to then go for reductions.

Q. Mr. President, moving on to another topic, before this session began, you asked why you shouldn't be scolding members of the House committee that voted yesterday to stop funding for overt operations against Nicaragua. Do you really see any consequences of that action? Does that vote stop you from doing anything or hinder anything your administration is doing?

The President. Well, that's in a committee. And there is the Senate yet to go on this. And I would hope that maybe we could do better there. It also had an element in it that looked at partisanship, since the vote was on straight party lines. And I don't believe that that reflects the thinking of a great many Democrats, because many of them spoke up right after my speech.

The President. No, as I say, because I know that there are still a great many Democrats who've been quite outspoken, including some of the leadership in the House of their party, in support of what I had proposed -- of making this a bipartisan approach, and even being critical of some of their Members who did seem to sound partisan.

The thing that needs telling about this whole situation in Nicaragua -- I thought I had covered this subject, but maybe I didn't cover it enough the other night -- and that is that, right now, these forces that have risen up in opposition to the Sandinista government are under what you might say is a sort of a group, a controlling body that formed in the northern part of Nicaragua. There are about seven leading members to this kind of committee. Most of them were former anti-Somoza people. They are people who simply want this Government of Nicaragua to keep its promises.

Somoza, his reply to them was that if it would benefit his country, Nicaragua, he would. And he did resign. The Organization of American States also gave four points to the Sandinistas that they, the Organization of American States, would support them if their goal was these four things: of promoting democracy, of immediate elections, of a concern for human rights. And the Sandinistas acceded to that and said yes, those were their goals, and they would keep those four provisions or promises. And they haven't. They never made an effort to keep them. They violated all of them.

Now, this is what makes me say that there's a great hypocrisy there of the Sandinista government protesting what is happening in its own country and from people who were once part of its own revolution at the same time that they are supporting people in another country who are seeking to overthrow a duly elected government of the people.

Q. Mr. President, in referring to these groups, you seem to suggest that these groups are seeking a change in Nicaragua itself. And how does that statement square with your saying that we're not violating the law in aiding groups who seek the overthrow of the Nicaraguan Government?

The President. Well, do they? Or are they asking that government -- or that revolution of which they themselves were a part -- asking it to go back to its revolutionary promises and keep faith with the revolution that the people of Nicaragua supported?

Many of these people are businessmen whose businesses have been taken over. They are farmers whose land was seized by this government, farmers whose crops were -- they were forced to sell them to the government at less than the cost of production. And they're protesting this violation of what had made them support the revolution to begin with.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to go back to what the committee actually did yesterday in voting the cutoff. CIA Director Casey is reported to have said it would lead to a bloodbath for the guerrillas inside the country. Do you agree with that? And how seriously do you take what the committee does? How bad would it be if that cutoff of covert aid went through?

The President. Well, I'm saying if -- well, if that became the policy, I think it would set a very dangerous precedent. The executive branch of government and the Congress has a shared responsibility, as I pointed out in my speech, for foreign policy. And we each have a place in formulating foreign policy, but we each have a responsibility also. And I think that what I said about this was that it was very irresponsible. And it literally was taking away the ability of the executive branch to carry out its constitutional responsibilities.

I once used a bloodbath term as Governor of California, and one individual reversed it in the press and had it saying the opposite of what I had intended it to say, and I never did quite get the situation cleared up.

Q. Well, what -- I don't understand. What's wrong with the committee's position? What difference does it make if instead of giving covert aid to the guerrillas in Nicaragua, you give overt aid to the countries of El Salvador and Honduras to stop the flow of weapons through their countries, which is what you say you want in the first place? What's wrong with that?

The President. Well, except that then the only help that you can give is through other governments, and I don't think that -- that's an effective thing to do. And how do you know that the other governments would want to, themselves, then, participate in helping the people that need the help? In other words, we'd be asking some other government to do what our own Congress has said that we can't do.

Q. Let me ask you a broader foreign policy question that comes up with all this -- some of these other negotiations. You've been in office now more than 2 years, more than half of the term for which you were elected. And the arms talks are going along with no clear end in sight. The Middle East situation, if anything, has gotten worse, that we're trying to get an agreement now to get the Israelis out of Lebanon, where a year ago they hadn't even gone into Lebanon yet. And then our relations with China have deteriorated. We've had a lot of problems in Western Europe.

Beirut is no longer being shelled on a daily basis round the clock, 15 hours of bombardment in 1 day. Yes, we're down to negotiating -- sure, there are incidents -- but we're down to negotiating the withdrawal of foreign forces after 8 years of combat and invasion and harassment from outside as well as inside in Lebanon.

With regard to Western Europe, I don't believe that the NATO alliance has ever been any more solid than it is now or that there's been a better relationship between us and our NATO allies. The same thing is true in Asia and Japan with the ASEAN nations. I could wish that we could move faster in some of these things. And when you say the arms talks, as I said before, it took 7 years for the SALT talks.

Camp David agreement and the treaty from that; the SALT treaty was about to be negotiated; normalization with China had taken place; and the Panama Canal treaty had been approved. So, they had some tangible things which they had achieved. Can you name several, besides the opening up of Beirut, that you've achieved?

The President. Well, in the first place, China relations had been normalized by the visits of a previous President to the previous administration. And he carried on from there. And I'm not at all sure that added anything to what had already been accomplished.

And it was after we got in that the principal step between Egypt and Israel was carried out, which was the return of the Sinai. And what we're actually doing now is trying to bring about the negotiations that had been proposed and apparently, then, accepted -- which was to negotiate the West Bank and try to bring peace in the Middle East.

The President. Well, this would require, of course, the agreement of the other Arab States -- of the Arab States. And, since the negotiations we're trying to bring about are between the Arab States and Israel for peace in the region, we have to recognize their position with regard to this. It would take them agreeing to go forward in negotiations without the PLO.

I must say that the contact we had with the heads of many Arab States after the change in the supposed agreement between King Hussein and Arafat when the council overrode Arafat and then demanded things that Hussein could not accept, that none of the others could accept -- I talked to all of them and none of them wanted to back the PLO in that new proposal. They felt about it the same as we did and the same as King Hussein did.

Now, they continue in their talks with Arafat, and I have been told that Arafat, himself, did oppose the council on that change but was overruled by the council. Now, the thing that we must see is, do we let that council, which certainly was never elected by the Palestinian people -- there are millions of Palestinians -- and are they going to stand still for their interests being neglected on the basis of an action taken by this group, the PLO, which, as I say, was never elected by the Palestinian people? These are some of the things that we're trying to work out.

The President. If such a thing were practical and could be worked out -- I don't know, in the scattered nature of them, there are Palestinians in virtually every country in the Middle East -- I don't know whether you could ever get them together and bring about what -- or even do the educating of them. That's -- I don't mean that word to sound demeaning or degrading to them, but I mean the informing them so that they could go in with some concept of what it was they were voting on. And so, I don't know. But I do know that the Arab nations are very serious about wanting the continuation of the peace talks.

The President. As to where -- no, no, I've never discussed that. But we're in communication with them all the time about how we proceed. And, as I say, I think that for a time there and the way that was portrayed to think that all of this could be blocked by just this decision by that council was giving them too much importance.

Q. Mr. President, on another topic, once again there have been another rash of stories about feuding among your senior staff -- some of the stories relating to various issues that have run into trouble in Congress, have indicated this is not just a matter of internal rivalry, but it's affected strategy, has caused you some setbacks and defeat. Sometimes from some of your remarks about this in interviews, you seem like the only one in Washington who doesn't believe that some of your top aides are at each other's throats. And some of us wonder, do you -- when you read these stories, do you call people in and ask them about it? Do you not believe them? Do you think they just should be dismissed out of hand? Is it not a problem in your administration?

The President. Well, I have to say that I think there's been great exaggeration. And I think to portray that there are factions trying to win over my mind probably, as I've said before, springs from the fact that the manner in which I ask the Cabinet to operate, my administration to operate, is one of that I want all options and I want them debated in front of me. So, it is true, and this is very upsetting and disturbing then, for someone to go out and leak some information that makes it look as if, well, there was a loser. Now, this bothers me from the standpoint that in Cabinet this could inhibit the process that I want.

What we have is -- because most issues don't just concern one Cabinet agency, they do spread across a lot -- and so here you have this debate going. And, yes, there will be disagreement. But finally, in the basis of the information that has come out of the debate, I make a decision. Well, in that decision then there's got to be some who were on the wrong side and some on the right side.

But when you pick up the paper and then read, ``Well, Secretary So-and-so was a loser in this. He was opposed to this.'' And then it makes it sound like this is all some kind of feuding. It isn't. It's what I have asked for.

Q. Well, why do you state -- the impression is that you stay aloof from the fray when there's criticism -- following up on Carl's question -- that your foreign policy conduct is being affected by the continual criticism from this building of Judge Clark -- and now on Capitol Hill, too. Why do you not get involved in that?

The President. Yes, I am. And I think what happens sometimes is people at a different level go out with stories because they think that they're speaking in behalf of their side of the fence or their superior. And, they're causing a lot of needless trouble.

Q. Many members of the administration say that our commitment there must be, in El Salvador, must be a sustained one and that it could take 7 to 10 years to turn things around. I think Ambassador Hinton suggested as much recently. Is that your view?

The President. Well, I think that he -- I may be wrong, but I think that when he made that statement, he was talking with regard to the limited way that we have been trying to perform there. I know that guerrilla wars -- time is on the side of the guerrillas and they aren't something that is instantly resolved, just as terrorism isn't something that can be curbed just by normal police actions. These are very difficult things. The hit-and-run tactics of guerrillas are similar to terrorist activities. It's, I suppose, based on an extension of the same principle that you can't ever totally eliminate crime.

Q. But do you think if this aid package were approved by Congress, that it would be sufficient to turn things around there this year? Your own proposal calls for less aid next year, and it seems to suggest that this surge of aid would do the trick.

The problem with a country like El Salvador and what its problems are right now that requires military aid in the sense of more training, so far only having trained a tenth of the army -- more training that we could offer, more military supplies and ammunition and so forth -- we must do is, when you've got a government that is trying to reverse the course, the history of the country and bring about democracy and human rights and the things of that kind, and you have guerrillas that are making it impossible to function or for those programs to function, what good does it do to have a land reform program and give land to the peasants if the peasants can't go out and work the land for fear of being shot by the guerrillas? What good does it do to try and improve the economic standards of a people if they're out of work simply because someone has shut off the power and the factory can't operate or transportation has broken down so that the supplies that are needed and the products from whatever they're working on cannot be transported, because of the bridges and so forth that are blown up.

When a third of one area of the country -- a third of the year, they were totally without power, well, then you have to say, ``If we're going to make this economic improvement work, we've got to stop that conflict.'' We have to stop those people that are preventing the economy from moving with their firearms and their murders and so forth. And this is what, it seems, that sometimes the debate in the Congress, they seem to be ignoring.

Q. Mr. President, can I follow up on something you said earlier? Did I understand you to say that if you were forced to stop aid to the Nicaraguan guerrillas, that you would try to funnel it through other countries?

The President. No, I was saying that's what the committee said, that the committee said we would have to go overt, and, then, in going overt, you can only give money to another government. And, if you did that, then you would have to be depending on -- well, maybe those other governments in Central America would give that money to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua.

Now, if they want to tell us that we can give money and do the same things we've been doing -- money, giving, providing subsistence and so forth to these people directly and making it overt instead of covert -- that's all right with me. I just don't want the restrictions put on it that they might put on.

Hill -- that they would do it, and then, we would have to enforce restrictions on the freedom fighters as to what tactics they could use. And I have said that if we were to do that, then I would expect that the only fair thing would be that the Nicaraguan Government would itself impose the same restrictions on the freedom fighter, in El Salvador -- only I don't call them freedom fighters, because they've got freedom and they're fighting for something else. They're fighting for a restraint on freedom.

The President. I just used the word, I guess, ``freedom fighters,'' because the fact that we know that the thing that brought those people together is the desire, as I said, for the same revolutionary principles that they once fought and have been betrayed in. As I say, they've made it plain: They want what they once fought beside the Sandinistas to get. And they've been betrayed. And I thought that the use of freedom fighters was because -- I found out that it seems as if there's a kind of a bias in the treatment of guerrilla fighters. It depends on what kind of a government they're opposing. And some are treated more kindly than others.

Now, I think the ones in El Salvador who are fighting against an elected government, they're guerrillas. But in reality, when we talk about Nicaragua and everyone says, ``the government in Nicaragua,'' well, it was a government out of the barrel of a gun. And, true, we favored it before I got here. We did not lift a hand for the existing government of Nicaragua, because we did not believe that it was treating its people fairly. And here was a revolution that took place that seemed to express all the things that we all believe in.

Well now, they have not carried out those things. And they are there by force. And what really -- other than being in control of the capital, you might say, and having a handle on all the levers -- what makes them any more a legitimate government than the people of Nicaragua who are asking for a chance to vote for the kind of government they want?

International Coffee Agreement 1983. This Agreement would enter into force October 1, 1983, for a period of six years. I am the fifth President since 1962 to seek favorable Senate consideration of a new or extended International Coffee Agreement. The 1983 Agreement is similar in many respects to those of 1962, 1968 and 1976, but it contains several improvements of importance to the United States. I strongly urge that the Senate give advice and consent to ratification of this Agreement, thus signaling that the spirit of cooperation which has characterized the international coffee community these past 20 years will be continued and strengthened.

Africa and Asia. In terms of value, it is the most important agricultural commodity exported by developing countries. In 1981, coffee exports by these nations amounted to $8 billion. Eighteen countries obtained more than 20 percent of their total export earnings from coffee. Altogether 71 countries participated in the negotiation of the International Coffee Agreement 1983 and are expected to join it. In 1982 the United States imported $2.7 billion worth of coffee, 30 percent of the amount traded internationally.

Agreement, successfully negotiated in a difficult period immediately following the disastrous 1975 frost in Brazil, has been generally successful in keeping coffee prices within the agreed range once quotas came into effect in late 1980.

International Coffee Agreements have aimed at balancing the economic interests of producers and consumers, and each has been an improvement over the predecessor in this regard. Like the previous Agreements, the 1983 Agreement is intended to stabilize coffee prices for short-run periods along long-term market trends. The Agreement itself contains no fixed price objective; rather, each year the members of the Agreement will establish a price range based on current production and consumption trends, inventory levels, and other factors that influence the market.

I believe that the International Coffee Agreement 1983 represents an important element in the continuation of the cooperation between coffee-producing and consuming countries. It provides the framework and the flexibility for the United States to continue the special relationship we have fostered with the coffee countries since 1962.

I recommend that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to this Agreement and its advice and consent to ratification. The United States Trade Representative will separately submit proposed legislation to implement the Agreement through September 30, 1989.

As the 1983 theme declares, ``Memories Are Made To Be Shared.'' From our older citizens we learn about the roots of our families and communities. We share valued memories, and through sharing our seniors refresh their lives and we gain precious new understanding and insights about ours.

In observing this week, I urge each of you to reach out to share time and compassion with the men and women who live in nursing homes in your communities. We all will be richer for the effort we make.

Nearly 2 months ago, the House of Representatives began a serious debate about alternative approaches to arms control. This debate, one of the longest in the history of the House, not only elevated understanding of the issues, but made it clear that the issues themselves are enormously complex. There are no easy answers to arms control.

During this debate, it became apparent to more and more Members of the House that an immediate freeze, while superficially appealing, is fundamentally flawed. For more than 30 years, we have maintained world peace because the United States maintained effective forces of deterrence; we must not jeopardize our ability to keep the peace. Nor can we lock the United States into a position of inferiority. And we must not take any steps that would disrupt the highly sensitive arms reduction negotiations underway in Geneva.

The balance of the resolution that was passed last night is ambiguous and, indeed, so internally inconsistent that interpretation is difficult. For example, the resolution calls for a freeze while also expressing the need for maintaining equivalence and a stable international balance. As stated many times before, this administration agrees that the maintenance of an arms balance is essential. But an immediate freeze would prevent us from having it. In sum, the resolution finally adopted by the House, while greatly improved, is not an answer to arms control that I can responsibly support.

Should this debate now move on to the Senate, I am confident that the doubts and opposition to a simple freeze now will continue to grow. In the meantime, this administration will continue to press forward vigorously at the negotiating table for arms reductions that I believe remain the best, true hope for peace and stability.

We're just about to land in your city of San Antonio there. I'm up here in Air Force One. We're on our way in. And I know that San Antonio just recently received the All American Cities award. I was pleased to present it to your Mayor Cisneros there in the Oval Office. And I'm looking forward, today, to taking part in the Cinco de Mayo celebrations there at Plaza Nueva, and to emphasize our close ties with Mexico. I'll be talking about the ways that we are going to be working with the Mexican Government to help solve a number of economic problems.

The President. Well, I didn't know that. And I'm glad to know that, because, you know, I'm asking for bipartisan support there in Congress in helping our friends in Central America develop their economies and democratic institutions, and protect themselves against the enemies of democracy and against aggression from Cuba and Nicaragua and, yes, the Soviet Union. Well, I'm glad to hear that.

The President. I think they've been taken in by, maybe, some careless reporting, maybe by what's been quite a concerted propaganda campaign. But I can tell you that we have polls that show that an awful lot of people in the country just aren't quite sure, to tell you the truth, where Nicaragua and El Salvador are or which side we're on. They just don't have the information. And this is one of the reasons I went on the air with the speech the other night. And it did have some effect on them.

I might tell you that we got the biggest response in telegrams and things of that kind and phone calls that I've gotten on any speech that went on the air since I've been President, and the biggest -- [inaudible] -- Texas and Florida -- [inaudible].

The President. And that has to be the ultimate goal of the people who are trying to subvert those countries and get a foothold here on the mainland. North, South America, Central America, we are all Americans -- from the South Pole to the North Pole. And we have to remember that we're kin to each other.

The President. If it is a real offer, I could approve it, because we believe that warheads rather than missile launchers is the thing we should be dealing with, reducing the number of actual warheads that each country has aimed at the other. If, again, it's just a propaganda ploy to try and headoff our trying to curb the spread of intermediate-range weapons in Europe, then we'll have to deal with that, also.

I don't know how long you plan to be on the air with me. And there's one -- there are several questions I would like to ask you. So, you'll have to alert me when you're going to land and you'll have to leave. Would you do so?

The President. Well, I think right now -- and, of course, it's looking better -- the economy. We know it's turned around. That has been our problem: this great, worldwide economic slump. And I have to say that we're happy about the signs of recovery.

But we also know that the last to come back in an economic recovery is the problem of unemployment. And those people out there who have been laid off and who are still waiting for an opportunity to work, we all have to pitch in and do everything we can to see that, as quickly as possible, they can get employed.

The work force -- normally, they say that the potential work force in our country is everyone from age 16 to 65. Today, with all of our unemployment, we have the highest percentage of that overall work force employed than we've ever had in our history. And that means that a great many more people have entered the work force that, once upon a time, didn't. Probably, this is due to more women in the work force, which we're all in favor of, and it's probably more young people.

The President. Allan, I've been quite critical of that. I think that sometimes there's a -- particularly on TV news -- there's an attempt to be entertainment as well as news. And these emotional scenes of people that we can all feel sorry for and that we all want to help, I think they just -- they're tempted into doing more of that.

Let me give you an example. They have, repeatedly on the news, given the figures of how many businesses went bankrupt last year in America: somewhere around ten or eleven thousand. Why didn't they add that at the same time last year more than 600,000 new businesses started up in America?

The President. Yeah, and we could take some relief or some pleasure out of that because, if the good news is so ordinary, if there's so much more of it than bad news -- that it isn't ``man bites dog,'' well, then maybe we ought to be a little pleased with that -- that it is still considered sensational when there's something bad or wrong to report.

Mr. Dale. Having had you on several times, I know you're a sensitive man. You have a good humor. But how does the President of the United States and his First Lady cope with some of the bad news and the people marching against you, some of the things said?

But, also, I don't believe those that are taking to the street in these demonstrations represent a sizable majority of Americans at all. We've got a country in which every safeguard in the world is provided legally for people to register their complaints, their differences, and their problems with the government, and attempt to get a legitimate change through legislative channels. And those who take to the streets -- this just isn't in keeping with what this country's all about.

The President. That's not bad. You know, I guess every President has had this. I've seen some interesting -- oh, things that have appeared sometimes with writers writing some diatribe that sounds as if they're talking about a current President like myself, and then just for surprise they will then reveal at the end that this was what was said about Abraham Lincoln or some other great hero of ours. So, maybe we have to wait for history to straighten everything out.

We're not playing any games or anything. I know that it has to be done, but I don't think this is the time to do it. If the answer would be one thing, I would become a lameduck. And if the answer was the other way, yes, then everything I tried to do would be viewed by the opposition as part of a political campaign and maybe we couldn't get as much bipartisan cooperation as we need.

And I can tell you, there hasn't been in the White House any discussion of this. That's something that isn't going to happen, and we probably don't have to meet till later in the summer. We haven't had any discussion about it at all.

Mr. Dale. You know, this has been one of the things I've noticed about the media. They are always accusing you of shooting from the hip, Mr. President, but I find that you always kind of hold off and choose your words rather carefully until you're ready to say what you want to say, and then you say it.

Mr. Dale. Okay. One of the other questions that bothered a lot of people down here has been this withholding deal on interest and dividends. And I've got to tell you that 95 percent of the people are not in favor of this, and it's almost a popular idea, rather than a bank idea.

Congress passed that without a murmur -- on the basis to which it was presented, and that was before the '82 election. It was never brought up as any kind of an issue in the '82 election; no one said anything about it. And suddenly this great wave of protest, which, we had to assume, was brought about by the lobbying groups, brought this up. But it seems to me that a great many people might not understand exactly what we were proposing and why.

First of all, it isn't a new tax. The people are presently paying a tax on their earnings and their dividends. And, the only difference was, just like we do with wages, we were going to withhold, because we found that this is one of the big areas where the cheaters, who are not paying their tax, have been getting away with it -- billions of dollars not being paid. We thought that it didn't make sense to ask the people who are paying their taxes to pay more tax and let these people go without some effort to get that money back. And I realize that we're faced now with a perception on the part of the people that it somehow is unfair to them. And we're just -- I know the Congress is dealing with that right now.

I am kind of sorry about it, because there is so much of our income tax that is based on people's honesty and their willingness to support their government. And to know that there are people out there that are cheating their neighbors and friends by not paying their tax, and that it would be billions of dollars that we could use to help reduce the deficits, I'm kind of sorry that there is so much opposition to this, which was just one of the ways that we're trying to collect that unpaid tax.

The President. I just had called to my attention here that I had simply said that we approved of what Andropov said in Russia on the warheads and the arms limitation on those. And I think what I should have said is that we're looking seriously at this to see whether it's for real or whether it is -- whether it's just propaganda. And I maybe have given people the wrong impression by using the word ``approve.'' We -- let us put it this way -- we are happy if he really means it, the fact that they have switched to warheads, which is what we have always wanted to discuss.

Today we gather to celebrate a holiday, as you've been so eloquently told by your mayor, that exemplifies the rich cultural diversity that is so much a part of our country. Having spent most of my life in California, I've almost forgotten when I didn't celebrate Cinco de Mayo. This holiday draws our attention, especially those of us from the Southwest, to neighbors and friends who've added so much to our way of life.

States in functions across the border in Mexico. And at one of these at which I spoke to a rather large audience, I made my speech, and then I sat down to rather unenthusiastic and scattered applause. And I was a little embarrassed. In fact, I was very self-conscious. I thought maybe I'd said something wrong. I was doubly embarrassed when the next speaker got up and, speaking in Spanish, which I didn't understand, he was getting enthusiastic applause almost every other line.

But on that occasion, just as on my other visits to Mexico, I've always been struck by our remarkable ties -- a cherished possession that we should never take lightly. Understanding this, one of my first priorities as President was to reestablish and solidify our relationship with our neighbor to the south which had been permitted to erode in prior years.

There is a bust here in San Antonio of that great man Benito Juarez, one of the heroes of the battle that had gone on for Mexican independence. And on it are inscribed his words: ``Among men, as among nations, respect for the rights of others is peace.'' Juarez, a contemporary of Lincoln, embodied courage, idealism, and tenacity.

These traits not only helped him during the struggle for independence but also through his many years of political leadership in his country. And I know the mayor will agree that coping with the frustrations of government, while not as acclaimed as struggling for independence, takes all the inner strength and hard work an individual can muster.

The last time I say Mayor Cisneros was in the Oval Office during a ceremony in which he received, on your behalf, the All American Cities award. Now, over the years I've been in this city on many occasions. I know this city, its rich heritage, its pride, and its optimism. And I can think of no better recipient of that award, because you surely represent the all-American spirit.

One of America's finest traditions is voluntarism -- the belief that instead of expecting government to do it, we should ourselves get involved and do what we can to help our neighbors and community. And here in San Antonio, your ``Teach the Children'' program is a fine example of this cherished tradition. With government meeting only the administrative costs, the people of this city are supplying -- through voluntary contributions -- 16,000 children of needy families with clothing and school supplies, so they can attend their classes with dignity.

One of the earliest structures built in this city was a Catholic mission, followed by cathedrals and churches of many faiths. Today, a number of these precious landmarks of our heritage, like the San Jose Mission, are still functioning as places of worship, living testimony that San Antonio is keeping faith with those who came before. I can think of no greater tribute to our forefathers than the respect of God so evident in your community.

And, similarly, this city continues to be a beacon of enterprise. We all recognize that for many years there was opportunity in our land, but not equal opportunity. It's a tribute to the character of Americans of Mexican descent that during this dark time of discrimination they not only maintained their dignity but triumphed over that adversity.

Today, dramatic advances are being made. Americans of Mexican descent are taking their places throughout the professions as doctors and lawyers and teachers and business executives. San Antonio has spawned a whole new flock of entrepreneurs who are making their mark in the business world.

In government, you're shouldering an ever-increasing responsibility. I am proud that our administration has been able to appoint so far 130 Hispanics to high-level positions in our government. I know that you have already met two of those. And one, of course, our Deputy Administrator of the Small Business Administration, Eddie Herrera, is from San Antonio. And Joe Salgado is our Associate Director of Education.

We've tried to respond to the needs of small business, understanding the relationship between the small business ownership and personal advancement for those climbing the economic ladder. And that's why we've ensured that a higher portion of Federal purchases will be made from minority-owned businesses and why we remain determined that all groups share in this opportunity.

Rights Act, the longest period since its enactment. The Voting Rights Act places a ban on literacy tests and other devices that in the past had been used to discourage minority participation, and it requires that certain State and local jurisdictions provide assistance to voters who are not literate in English. Both before and after the signing, this administration has worked vigorously to enforce the provisions of that Act. And we're pledged to ensure the political rights of all our citizens.

Ultimately, of course, the upward mobility of all Americans depends on the vitality of our economy. And during the last decade, some thought that America's best days were behind her, that we'd lost our will to excel and that we should resign ourselves to a lower standard of living.

I know that your city, instead of sitting back and complaining and waiting for someone else to do it for you, has been preparing for the opportunities ahead. You've been attracting high-tech companies and other corporations by cutting redtape and removing regulatory roadblocks. Last year we were pleased to approve your city's designation as a foreign trade zone, greatly increasing your potential. You've embarked on extensive renovation projects like Avenida Guadalupe, and this will revitalize San Antonio while still preserving its heritage. City government, business, and community groups have been working closely together to keep San Antonio moving forward.

We've cut more than in half the prime interest rate, that not only helps you as individuals but also helps your city by lowering its costs. And while waiting for our policies to take hold, we replaced the old, inefficient CETA program, where only 18 percent of the money was used for training, with new, cost-effective programs. We're channeling resources into preparing workers with the skills that will be needed in tomorrow's job market.

I've always believed that the best thing the Federal Government can do to enhance progress in this country is to get out of the way and let the people get on with it. And consistent with this philosophy, we're trying to return authority back to levels of government closer to the people.

And I'd like to take this opportunity to thank your mayor for all that he's done to support a new approach that we've proposed for community development. It's called enterprise zones. And the enterprise zone concept doesn't rely on more Federal taxing and spending; that approach has failed. Instead, it harnesses the energy of the private sector, pumping new life into depressed areas. Rather than creating jobs in Washington, enterprise zones will produce results where they're needed, right in our local communities. And although we haven't managed to get the legislation through that puzzle palace up on Capitol Hill yet, with the help of Mayor Cisneros and other aggressive local leaders, we hope to attract enough support in the present Congress to give this new idea a chance.

New signs of recovery are seen every day, but I want you to know that I am very deeply concerned about those many people who are still waiting for the upturn to reach them. Many of these people have always worked, and what they've had to endure has been a shattering experience. Well, we're not forgetting them.

As I mentioned, we've provided funds for retraining. I also signed into law an emergency jobs bill that makes $4.6 billion available to provide the hardest hit with a chance to earn a decent living until full recovery takes hold. In the meantime, we're working with Congress to develop a responsible method to meet the health needs of those out of work and also the needs of their families.

Tower has been in close consultation with the White House in recent months. We're concerned about the impact that the peso devaluation and the financial crisis in Mexico is having on the people of south Texas -- and in the border areas of other States. And today I'm pleased to announce that I will soon be appointing a special interagency working group to not only investigate but to recommend specific actions to alleviate some of the hardship caused by economic uncertainty on the other side of the border. This is not just your problem; it's our problem, and we'll meet it together.

We've offered the government there our assistance. Secretaries Shultz and Regan have been personally involved, and every member of my administration now understands that now is the time to reaffirm to the people of Mexico that we're not just neighbors; we're friends, and we mean to be good friends.

You in San Antonio have long realized this kind of interdependence. Back in 1968, when you commemorated your 250th birthday, you did it with HemisFair -- celebrating the community of nations which stretches from the Arctic regions of Canada to the tip of Cape Horn. Your ``Tower of the Americas'' still stands as a symbol of your hemispheric commitment.

We in the many countries of the Americas have a potential limited only by our good will and our imagination. We have two great continents, rich in resources, inhabited by more than 600 million hardy souls -- people from every corner of the world, people descended from pioneers with courage enough to leave the safety of the familiar and start fresh in a new world. We are, by and large, people who share the same fundamental values of God, family, work, freedom, democracy, and justice.

You know, if you stopped to think of something so unique in this hemisphere of ours, and we've stayed separated from each other too long, all of us from the South Pole to the North Pole in this hemisphere -- and no other place on Earth can say this -- we can cross national lines from one of the many countries we have here in these two Americas and Central America and cross into another country, but we're still among Americans, because we're all Americans.

When I visited Latin America a few months ago, I told the leaders that I met of the several countries I visited of that vision of the Americas -- building on our shared values; respecting our differences, but moving forward together to meet the challenges of the future as equal partners here in this hemisphere -- what 600 million Americans from North Pole to South Pole can do, what a force for good we can be in the world if we realize and understand all that we have in common.

America last week. I hope you agree with me -- agree that the United States can no longer remain complacent about what's happening to our neighbors and to our friends to the south of us. We can no longer find excuses for doing nothing and then hope for the best, when the enemies of democracy -- Cuba, the U.S.S.R., and Nicaragua -- are actively working to subvert these nations.

That's why I asked for bipartisan support in helping our Central American friends develop their economies and democratic institutions and protect themselves against aggression. What's going on in Central America relates directly to the security of the United States, and when it comes to that, we aren't Republicans and Democrats; we're Americans.

You know, it's long been recognized that few of our fellow citizens can claim any better record, a more honorable record in defending their country as can the Americans of Mexican descent. San Antonio and south Texas have produced a number of true American heroes. One of them, who I understand still lives here, and I understand is here on the platform, is Cleto Rodriguez.

World War, he was in the Army then, in the battle to recapture the Philippines. And his unit was halted by severe enemy fire. On his own initiative he left his platoon, accompanied by one man, a comrade, and moved forward to do battle. In 2\1/2\ hours of fierce fighting, these two brave men killed more than 82 of the enemy, completely disorganized the enemy defenses, and paved the way for the overwhelming defeat of the enemy stronghold.

Tragically, his comrade did not live through the engagement. But Mr. Rodriguez lives, a personification of courage and inspiration to us all, and the holder of the highest award that we can give, the Congressional Medal of Honor.

When I first got to Washington, I learned of another citizen of Texas, Sergeant Roy Benavidez who deserved our country's highest award and, in fact, had been cited for that award for his bravery and devotion to duty while in Vietnam. But he'd been kept waiting in limbo. No one had given him the award. Evidently, there were those who felt that recognizing this hero, this gallant soldier, might stir up bad memories of the Southeast Asian conflict. Well, we're proud of those who defend this country. And if they place their lives on the line for us, we must make sure that they know that we're behind them and appreciate what they're doing. So, Sergeant Benavidez was given the Medal of Honor that he had earned.

What we have in America -- perhaps San Antonio is a microcosm of this -- is a noble, truly noble experiment. Our forefathers, all up and down these two continents, came to the New World to become part of a new way of life, to a place where they could better themselves, but still be free to preserve their heritage and values.

So, today, when you celebrate this holiday, all of your friends and neighbors join with you because we recognize this is part of our heritage as Americans as well. So, I thank you for letting me be with you today and vaya con Dios [May God be with you].

Secretary of the Department in which the Coast Guard is operating. The Secretary shall be responsible, in accordance with Section 109 of the Act, for the enforcement of civil penalties for violations of the regulations issued under Section 108(a) of the Act.''.

Sec. 5. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall make such determinations, issue such Orders, and take all steps necessary or appropriate to effectuate the transfer of records, property, personnel, and positions and unexpended balances of appropriations, available or to be made available, which relate to the functions transferred, as provided in this Order, from the Federal Maritime Commission to the Secretary of the Department in which the Coast Guard is operating.

Sec. 6. Any rules, regulations, orders, directives, circulars, or other actions taken pursuant to the functions transferred from the Federal Maritime Commission to the Secretary of the Department in which the Coast Guard is operating by the delegation made in this Order shall remain in effect until amended, modified, or revoked.

Sec. 2.  The Secretary of the Department in which the Coast Guard is operating may authorize one or more United States corporations or associations to admeasure vessels and issue International Tonnage Certificates, pursuant to the provisions of the Convention.

Well, I know that the residents here are very grateful that you are out there on the streets keeping the crime rate low. And I've just had a demonstration from the sheriff on that also and some figures that show that probably this is the lowest crime rate spot in the United States. I think that the people are grateful that you've made Sun City a safer and more reassuring place to live. And, of course, all this is a volunteer effort, which makes it even more admirable.

America's citizens are more involved today in the safety of their communities than they've been since the days when it was a necessity for us to look after each other. And you are following in that tradition. You are willing to avail yourself or give of yourselves to help others. And that truly is the volunteer spirit, which is another way of saying that's the American spirit.

We all know how frightening crime is to the old and the young. Yet older Americans also require protection from other aspects of modern life. Remember the terrifying bully called inflation, that ate away at pensions and savings -- and that was a form of robbery also. Inflation was running in double digits in 1980. And right now it's running at -- just about for the last 6 months less than one-half of 1 percent. And it showed its first actual decline, below zero level -- quarter decline, just recently, in nearly 25 years.

Just a few short years ago, who would have thought -- and certainly no one was saying that we could ever return to the low inflation of the 1950's and the '60's. Well, this morning, just before coming here, I got some figures that are going to be made public and released today, probably already have in the East, and that is the figures on the other part of this recession that is the one that bothers all of us the most -- unemployment.

Now, I have to confess to you, there are things about the unemployment statistics that still baffle me, because they say there's no change in the unemployment percentage rate; but there are 250,000 more people working in April than were working the month before. And since December, there have been 650,000 added to the list of those employed.

Americans. This legislation guarantees social security will provide a secure and a stable base so that the retired can live in dignity. It assures them that America will keep the promises made in troubled times a half a century ago. And it also protects those who are still working. Their basic human needs must be met with compassion as well as efficiency.

This administration is dedicated to the kinds of programs and policies that will allow the vast majority of senior citizens, older Americans, to continue to live independent lives. This is not just a matter of economic common sense, it's a matter of basic human dignity.

From this Nation's earliest days, when the wisdom and eloquence of our elder statesmen played such an important role in the creation of our Republic, to this era of renewed private sector initiative, where so many of our senior citizens toil in volunteer armies of community service across the land, older Americans remain a vital force in our national life.

We recognize that no single group in our society has done more to build America and to shape our national character than our nearly thirty-three million older citizens. We treasure their continuing involvement and the unique understanding they bring to us. Their wisdom, experience, insights, and accomplishments merit an invaluable place in our culture and economy.

Of particular importance to our older citizens is the integrity of their pension funds. The recent rise in business confidence and the resulting surge in the net worth of investments have significantly increased the value of America's pension funds. These developments remind us that the most important step we can take for all Americans, but especially our senior citizens, is to follow economic policies that will create noninflationary growth.

It is also our responsibility to keep faith with our older citizens by guaranteeing a secure and stable social security system so they might live in dignity. The recent amendments to the Social Security Act assure the elderly that America will always uphold the promises made in troubled times a half-century ago.

The future of our older Americans should be as sweet as the memories of their youth. I believe the future for our older citizens holds as much promise as the achievements of their past. In this twenty-first annual observance of Older Americans Month, we celebrate that potential.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

I'm delighted to be here in Phoenix in this great, good neighbor State of Arizona, and I'm delighted to be with all of you. It does my spirit good to be with people who never lose faith in America, who never stop believing in her future, and who never back down one inch from defending the constitutional freedoms that are every American's birthright.

For the past 2 months, I and others in our administration have been closely involved in negotiations in the Middle East. And this morning I had the pleasure of speaking with Secretary Shultz, who is there in the Middle East, Defense Minister Moshe Arens of Israel, and then I talked to Prime Minister Begin. And they reported to me on the decision of the Israeli Cabinet to accept in principle the agreement worked out by Secretary Shultz for the withdrawal of Israeli forces from Lebanon.

This agreement is a step forward. It can lead to the restoration of Lebanon's sovereignty throughout its territory while also ensuring that southern Lebanon will not again become a base for hostile actions against Israel. Through diligent and patient diplomacy, we're proving once again that direct negotiations are the best path to peace between Israel and her neighbors. I'm sure that all those who seek peace and stability in Lebanon will welcome this decision by the Israeli Cabinet and will join us in seeking wider support.

At times the challenge of resolving the problems of the Middle East and the world may seem long and difficult, but the alternative is chaos, conflict, and more humane suffering -- human suffering, I should say. The United States is committed to peaceful progress. Ours is the way of reason and negotiation, and we will never swerve from that path.

George Shultz and our Ambassador Phil Habib, whose tireless efforts and dedication to reason have done so much to make this possible. Today we have crossed an important threshold on the path to peace.

Office with some members of the ``F'' troop of the Texas army. Now, when I saw how those fellows were dressed, and what they were packing, I didn't know whether to stretch out my hand, or make a run for it through the Rose Garden. [Laughter] Well, it turned out they wanted to induct me into the Texas army and to give me a beautiful, hand-crafted flintlock rifle. And I thank you for taking such good care of it, because it's in your museum now.

Being a part of this group, you know that good organizations don't just happen. They take root in a body of shared beliefs. They grow strong from leadership with vision, initiative, and determination to reach great goals. And what you've accomplished speaks for itself -- more than 2\1/2\ million members, and NRA's getting stronger every day.

No group does more to promote gun safety and respect for the laws of this land than the NRA, and I thank you. Still, we've both heard the charge that supporting gun-owners rights encourages a violent, shoot-em-up society. But just a minute. Don't they understand that most violent crimes are not committed by decent, law-abiding citizens? They're committed by career criminals. Guns don't make criminals. Hard-core criminals use guns. And locking them up, the hard-core criminals up, and throwing away the key is the best gun-control law we could ever have.

When I was Governor of California, we dealt with gun control -- we added 5 to 15 years to the sentence of any criminal who, while committing a crime, had a gun in his possession, whether he used that gun or not. Now, I'm even more convinced than ever that this is the right approach if they're going to talk about something to do with guns and crime.

I've said many times that our administration didn't come to Washington to continue business as usual. Either we make fundamental reforms that change things for the better, or we aren't doing our job. We think it's time for our loved ones to walk the streets of America without being afraid.

So, we have declared war on organized crime and the career criminal element in America. More than a hundred prosecutors' offices are working with special teams around the country to throw the book at career criminals in court. And we're determined to cripple the drug-pushers who are poisoning the minds and bodies of our children. We want mandatory sentences. We want firm and speedy application of penalties. And we want to abolish parole for Federal offenses. But there's one thing we do not want: We will never disarm any American who seeks to protect his or her family from fear and harm.

You know, I have to interject something I hadn't planned to say here -- but having mentioned being the Governor of California, during a time when they were talking gun control there in our State, I received a letter, a most unusual letter, from a convicted burglar serving time in San Quentin Prison. And he wrote and told me that he just thought from his vantage point, where he was, he'd like to tell me how happy it would make all of them if we would adopt gun control. And then he explained the inside of his profession. He said, ``We can case a place, a home. We can watch and learn the habits of the people that live there when they're in and out and all of that.

Longer prison sentences and tougher treatment are beginning to pay dividends. And make no mistake: This is happening because you, the people, are fed up with crime. You're the ones who are organizing neighborhood patrols, supporting your local police, insisting that justice be carried out -- and every time you do that, you keep the spirit of democracy strong in America.

This morning I had the pleasure of meeting Arizona's Sun City Posse, a group which has had great success roping in the bad guys. They're not a posse in the old-time sense, just individuals who patrol their neighborhoods in their cars, wearing hard hats and carrying whistles and flashlights.

May 15th marks the beginning of National Police Week. I urge you and every citizen to let our men and women in blue across America know we stand with them this week and every week of the year. Another way NRA can help police is to support our efforts for a minimum mandatory term of 57 years imprisonment--and perhaps there'll be some disagreement in this, but I have to say it: for the use of armor-piercing bullets during a Federal crime of violence. These are designed to truly be a threat to law enforcement officers who, so many times, have to depend on bulletproof vests.

We can't solve the problems overnight. But since we established our Florida task force against drugs, drug-related arrests have risen sharply. Just last week, our agents trailed, and then landed behind a suspicious plane near LaBelle, Florida. Two drug smugglers jumped out of the plane and ran away. One of them swam across a canal and hid in the bushes. The alligators didn't get him, but our enforcement people did. They seized 625 pounds of cocaine valued at $187\1/2\ million.

We have strong evidence that high-level Cuban Government officials have been involved in smuggling drugs into the United States. Attorney General Smith and FBI Director Webster have assured me that they will use every resource they have to combat this menace. And as we crack down on criminals, we're trying to move forward on another front: to reform the firearms laws which needlessly interfere with the rights of legitimate gun owners like yourselves.

We're working closely with your leadership and congressional sponsors of firearms legislation, such as Senators McClure and Hatch and Congressman Volkmer. I look forward to signing a bill that truly protects the rights of law-abiding citizens, without diminishing the effectiveness of criminal law enforcement against the misuse of firearms.

And I want you to know that I'm in favor of the Civilian Marksmanship program. I support this idea because clear back to the Revolutionary War, one of the great talents of American soldiers has been their marksmanship. And it turned out they developed this shooting at targets and plinking as young boys. So, I'm asking Secretary Weinberger to study ways in which the marksmanship program can be improved.

Well, unfortunately, there's been a kind of elitist attitude in Washington that vast natural resource areas must be locked up to save the planet from mankind. Well, we have a different philosophy, one based on respect for both man and nature. Our administration believes in the concept of stewardship, caring for the resources we have for the benefit of mankind.

Now, let me be clear about those words -- ``stewardship for the benefit of mankind.'' We favor economic development, but not within our national parks or within our wilderness areas. We have not and never will propose that. What we do say is when the last administration arbitrarily closed tens of millions of acres of Alaskan land, telling sports hunters to stay out, then, yes, we think that was wrong, and we're trying to correct it.

We're trying to correct something else, too. A 1980 General Accounting Office report warned of health and safety hazards in our national parks. During the previous administration, the National Park Service budget for restoration and improvement had been cut. Now, I don't usually brag about spending money; but we have doubled it. We have the active support of NRA. We've also addressed one of America's most neglected and serious environmental problems, the destruction of our wetlands.

Our national parks, national wildlife refuges and coastal barriers, wetlands, national forests, and public lands are better managed today than they were just a few years ago. And I think that story merits more attention than it's received.

Another point which should be better understood: The backbone of our conservation efforts begins with American sportsmen. For over 40 years, hunters have been paying a special excise tax on sporting arms and ammunition through the Pittman-Robertson Act, nearly $1.2 billion since 1939. State wildlife managers have used these funds to preserve and enhance valuable wildlife habitats. Such wild creatures as the whitetail deer, the ruffed grouse, wild turkey and pronghorn antelope, which were threatened with extinction in many areas have been brought back, in some cases, to great abundance.

This past year alone, American hunters have paid more than $107 million toward these conservation efforts. The money will fund important studies of game and their habitat. It'll provide food and habitat projects for wildlife. And portions will go for hunter safety and education courses where our youngsters will be taught marksmanship, firearms safety, and some of the values and ethics of hunting and the outdoors. I deeply appreciate your contributions to preserving our national treasures for the benefit of our people and future generations.

This idea of stewardship, of preserving and caring for what we have, bringing our economy back to health so you, the people, can make us great again, that's a crucial part of keeping America free and making her secure. Now, I know that the road to recovery has been long and hard. Too many people are still out of work. But I believe with all my heart that we have turned the corner. We are on our way back. And like that fighter, Rocky Balboa, America is getting stronger now.

You know, when I see inflation down, interest rates down, tax rates being cut, industrial production and productivity up, housing starts and auto sales up, and workers being called back, 250,000 more people put to work last month -- now that our program is doing what we said it would, I have to ask of our critics, how come they're not calling it Reaganomics anymore?

Despite the calamity they created, they continue to resist reform. Their attitude reminds me of a comment a great American made about a similar situation. ``Those who are frightened,'' he said, ``by boldness and cowed by the necessity for making decisions complain that all we have done is unnecessary and subject to great risks. Now that these people are coming out of their storm cellars, they forget that there ever was a storm.'' Well, now those words were spoken by President Franklin Delano Roosevelt in 1934.

Well, I haven't forgotten the storm that was raging around every family in 1980. With all due respect, may I remind our critics: Those who saddled this nation with double-digit inflation, 21\1/2\- percent interest rates -- the highest in more than a hundred years -- the worst tax burden in our peacetime history, are the last people who should be giving sermons on fairness and compassion.

President John F. Kennedy said in 1963, ``. . . the largest single barrier to full employment . . . and to a higher rate of economic growth is the . . . heavy drag of Federal income taxes on private purchasing power, initiative, and incentive.'' Those wise words are just as true today. I will veto any attempt to tamper with the third year of our tax cut, or the indexing provision.

And the other day I had a very exciting experience when a Member of the Senate and a Member of the House walked into my office, each presented me a letter; each letter signed by enough men in the House -- men and women in the House and enough Senators to guarantee the upholding of any vetoes that I might take with regard to the taxing matters.

Indexing is the best security middle-income families have against bracket creep -- inflation pushing you into higher and higher tax brackets when you get cost-of-living pay raises and so forth. Those who would strip you of this protection are tax-grabbers, pure and simple.

The United States didn't run up a trillion-dollar debt because you aren't taxed enough. We've got that debt because government spends too much. We need spending restraint, not tax increases. I want to work with the Congress, but not at your expense and not at the risk of sabotaging this recovery that we worked so hard to achieve.

Nor must we gamble, ever again, with the security of this country by neglecting our defense readiness. The day I took office, our Armed Forces were in a shocking state of neglect. I was surprised even though I thought I'd known something about it. We had shortages of skilled manpower, faulty equipment, lack of spare parts, and insufficient fuel and ammunition for proper training. We had planes that couldn't fly for lack of spare parts, ships that couldn't leave port, and helicopters that couldn't stay aloft.

I believe it's immoral to ask the sons and daughters of America to protect this land with second-rate equipment and bargain-basement weapons. If they can put their lives on the line to protect our way of life, then, by golly, we can give them the weapons, the training, and the money they need to do the job right. And when it comes to keeping America safe and strong, when it comes to keeping America free, there should be no Republicans or Democrats, only patriotic Americans working together.

We've begun to pay our military personnel a decent wage. We've increased pilot flying time, extended basic training inventories. The level and quality of recruits are up sharply with the highest levels they've ever been. By providing adequate compensation for our soldiers, by giving them the tools they need to do their jobs, we're restoring dignity, honor, and pride to the uniform of the United States military, and we must not -- we dare not -- sacrifice that.

Our side is the only side where people are permitted to disagree -- and that should make them nervous. It isn't America that attacks and occupies other countries; we conduct no worldwide campaign of subversion and terrorism; we don't have to build walls to keep our people in, or use armies of secret police and gulag prison camps to keep them quiet. We're a free people, a democratic people; we believe in God and we love peace. But let us remember what George Washington warned in 1790 -- that to be prepared for war is one of the best means of preserving the peace.

There's nothing I want more than a verifiable agreement with the Soviet Union to reduce the levels of strategic weapons. In the long run, that's the best way to lower the growth in defense spending. But the Soviets will only bargain in good faith if they understand we're determined to defend freedom. And I'm determined that they will understand that.

States has fundamental and far-reaching interests. We must never forget that two-thirds of all our foreign trade and petroleum pass through the sea-lanes of that region. Nor can we forget that a country like El Salvador is approximately 10 miles closer to Phoenix, Arizona, than Phoenix is to Washington, D.C.

The people of El Salvador are not perfect. They're made mistakes as we have made mistakes. But they're trying, with great bravery and against tremendous odds, to build the dream of a society like ours. They understand that government must depend and rest on the consent of the governed; that only when people are free to worship, create, and build, only when they are given a personal stake in deciding their destiny, and benefiting from their own risks -- only then will their society become dynamic, prosperous, progressive, and free.

But El Salvador is under attack. Guerrillas with contempt for democracy and armed to the teeth by Nicaragua, Cuba, and the Soviets are determined to shoot their way into power. We have asked the Congress for a modest package of assistance for the region, with three times as much economic aid as military aid.

But military aid is essential, because the guerrillas are deliberately destroying El Salvador's economy -- blowing up bridges, railroads, water facilities, telephone, and electrical systems. These are not the actions of a people who love the common man and who seek to reform their system.

America faces a choice: Will we give El Salvador her chance to walk beside us in the sunlight of democracy, or will we turn our backs on a friend, letting her slide into a dark night of tyranny, rationalizing our inaction with detached lectures on morality.

Running away from this clear-cut responsibility would reward aggression and bring dishonor on the good name of the United States. It would swell the tide of political and economic instability in Central America, creating a new army of refugees, and bringing danger closer and closer to home.

Standing up for America also means standing up for the God who has so blessed this land. If we could just keep remembering that Moses brought down from the mountain 10 Commandments, not 10 suggestions -- [laughter] -- and if those of us who live for the Lord could remember that He wants us to love our Lord and our neighbor, then there's no limit to the problems we could solve or the mountains we could climb together as a mighty force for good.

This is a very special weekend in American life, a time specially set aside to honor our mothers and the mothers of our children. As we do, we acknowledge their role as the heart of our families and reinforce our families as the cornerstone of our society.

In our families, and often from our mothers, we first learn about values and caring and the difference between right and wrong. Those of us blessed with loving families draw our confidence from them and the strength we need to face the world. We also first learn at home, and, again, often from our mothers, about the God who will guide us through life.

The mothers we honor this weekend, young or not so young, partners or alone, well-to-do or sometimes agonizingly poor, are as diverse as our varied population. But they share a commitment to future generations and a yearning to improve the world their children will inherit.

Since men seem to have written most of our history books, the role of women and mothers in our communities and families has not always been given its due. But the truth is the wild west could never have been tamed, the vast prairies never plowed, nor God and learning brought to the corners of our continent without the strength, bravery, and influence of our grandmothers, great-grandmothers, and the women who came before them.

Living through blizzards, plagues, prairie fires, and floods, these women made homes and started families, organized churches, and built schools. They served as teachers, field hands, physicians, and the center of the family.

I was reading a book recently about Kansas frontier women and came across a passage that seemed to sum it all up. Esther Clark wrote, ``Mother has always been the gamest one of us. I can remember her hanging onto the reins of a runaway mule team, her black hair tumbling out of its pins and over her shoulders, her face set and white while one small girl clung with chattering teeth to the sides of the rocking wagon and a baby sister bounced about on the floor in paralyzed wonder.

Of course, Leny's nerve and strength are echoed in modern-day women and mothers who face different but equally trying tests of their courage. There are mothers like Rachel Rossow of Connecticut, for example, and Dorothy DeBolt of California, who with their husbands have adopted between them 25 handicapped boys and girls in addition to their own children.

I had a chance to visit with Rachel and her family last month, and I can tell you I've never seen a happier group. I know the strains on them must be great, emotionally and financially, but not as great as the love they feel for each other.

Of course, many millions of American mothers are quiet, everyday heroes struggling to stretch budgets and too often maintaining their families alone. Many also contribute to society through full-time careers, and others are forced to work just to make ends meet. They're raising children in a fast-paced world where basic values are constantly questioned. Their monumental challenge is to bring their children into adulthood, healthy and whole, nurturing their physical and emotional growth while avoiding the pitfalls of drug abuse and crime.

The lives of American mothers today are far removed from the prairies, and yet they have a nobility about them, too. Government should help, not hinder parents in this task. And that's why our policies have been designed to restore the family to its rightful place in our society, combat the inflation that stole from family budgets, expand opportunity through a renewed economy and hasten the return of values and principles that made America both great and good.

On the economic front, I think we've made some solid progress in bringing relief to your financially strapped families. When we took office, inflation was at 12.4 percent, but it's only been one-half of 1 percent for the last 6 months. You can see a difference on the grocery shelves. A loaf of bread, for example, costs only 2 cents more now than it did in 1980. If we'd continued with the old rate of inflation, by now it would have cost 11 cents more. Milk is about 16 cents cheaper than it would have been, hamburger about 18 cents cheaper per pound, and the savings on a dozen eggs is as much as 50 cents. I don't have to tell the people who do the shopping how these savings add up. But for those of you who don't, we estimate that a family of four on a fixed income of $20,000 has $1,700 more in purchasing power this year than they would have had under the old inflation rate.

The progress we're making with the economy, just like the national renewal we're seeing spring up all around us, is the product of our reliance again on good old-fashioned common sense, renewed belief in ourselves, and faith in God.

Now and then I find guidance and direction in the worn brown Bible I used to take the oath of office. It's been the Reagan family Bible and, like many of yours, has its flyleaf filled with important events, its margins are scrawled with insights and passages underlined for emphasis. My mother, Nelle, made all those marks in that book. She used it to instruct her two young sons, and I look to it still.

Well, that passage calls for us to recognize the enormous strengths and contributions of women, wives, and mothers and indicates to me that society always needs a little reminding. Well, let us use this weekend as a symbol that we will always remember, reward, and recognize them and use their examples of love and courage as inspiration to be better than we are.

When the military took power in Turkey under conditions of near anarchy in 1980, they committed themselves to restoring democratic government as soon as possible. The United States welcomed the timetable they set for carrying out that promise, and we have expressed our support for each step along the way. I warmly welcome President Evren's recent announcement that parliamentary elections will be held on November 6, thus completing the process of restoring democracy. I congratulate the Turkish people for this remarkable achievement and assure them of the continued support and friendship of the United States Government and people.

We are here this evening to honor a man who, though he died at a tragically young age, garnered for himself a remarkable record of public service as a State assemblyman, a distinguished Congressman, a candidate for the United States Senate, and, for a brief time, a candidate for the Presidency of the United States.

John Ashbrook remember him for his youthful and vigorous advocacy of traditional American principles. When he entered the State legislature, he was 28, the second youngest member at that time of that body. When he went to Congress, he was 32, the second youngest member of that body. And when he died, a candidate for the United States Senate, he was only 53.

It was never quite possible to say of John Ashbrook that he was typical -- even though he was very much one of a breed of midwestern Congressmen, those who over the course of several decades fought a long, hard, and frequently losing battle against the encroachments and intrusions of big government. As early as 1960, John Ashbrook warned against ``unbridled national power with a resultant loss of individual freedom and local autonomy.'' He warned against ``the state planners, the economy wreckers, the spenders and the destroyers of local government.'' He was a founder and chairman of distinguished conservative organizations including the American Conservative Union. In standing up for these views, he was remarkably consistent -- his lifetime voting record garnered him a 97 out of a possible 100 percent on the conservative voting scale.

Yes, John Ashbrook was one of those honored few, those officeholders in the fifties and sixties who warned against the current trends and fashions, who predicted that someday the massive spending schemes and higher and higher taxes of the Federal Government would stall and depress the American economy, immobilize State and local government, and endanger personal freedom.

But if John Ashbrook was a rock-solid conservative, he was also a conservative who broke the mold. He hardly fit the image of the stuffy or parochial reactionary some tried to attach to him. A graduate of Harvard, an adept and effective public speaker, the concise eloquence he brought to his views made the liberal establishment take notice. And, most important, he was willing to take the kind of chances that few older and more traditional members of his party would ever have dared. He even challenged an incumbent President of his own party when he felt that President needed to be reminded of his original mandate.

In John Ashbrook's youth, his erudition and his willingness to challenge long-established political precedents, we saw a new kind of Republican, a new kind of conservative. It was in this sense that he was ahead of his time, a forerunner of many conservative officeholders to come. And the voters of Ohio, even those who didn't agree with him on every point, saw in him a man to be trusted, a leader who had clearly charted out the future and knew the direction he wanted it to go.

Even those who view the world from a different political perspective can honor this man's utter devotion to principle and his understanding of the essence of political leadership. John Ashbrook knew that the first duty of public life is to responsibly speak the truth -- even if the moment's fashion is against that truth -- for it's through such consistency and coherence, such constant attention to principle, that the public trust is eventually won and a political consensus mobilized.

We mourn John Ashbrook's loss to this movement and to his country. But as his longtime friend and fellow activist in that movement, William Rusher, reminded us: Surely our highest consolation is knowing that John Ashbrook did live to see his political principles victorious and his public career vindicated.

Yet we do his memory and ourselves a disservice if we too exclusively identify John Ashbrook's political principles with one man, one party, or one political movement. Through all of his writings and speeches, it was John Ashbrook's insistent claim that opposition to the cult of state power -- the cult that has so badly infected our century -- was deeply and irrevocably part of America's past, and that the principle of limited government was America's greatest contribution to constitutional and political history.

He spoke movingly of America's traditional values and how too often in recent years we as a nation had drifted from those values. At the beginning of his second term in 1963, John was one of the senior members of a special five-man committee investigating the Ku Klux Klan and its involvement in the murder of civil rights workers in the South.

And in searching for the solution of our social or economic problems today, we can speak of a matrix, a formula that unlocks the solutions to many different problems. And I believe it is in the political wisdom and the social consensus that began this country, the consensus that still abides here in the heartland of America and was so evident in the career of a John Ashbrook, it is this consensus that holds the key to our modern dilemmas.

From their own harsh experience with intrusive, overbearing government, the Founding Fathers made a great breakthrough in political understanding: They understood that it is the excesses of government, the will to power of one man over another, that has been a principle source of injustice and human suffering through the ages. The Founding Fathers understood that only by making government the servant, not the master, only by positing sovereignty in the people and not the state can we hope to protect freedom and see the political commonwealth prosper.

In 1776 the source of government excess was the crown's abuse of power and its attempt to suffocate the colonists with its overbearing demands. In our own day, the danger of too much state power has taken a subtler but no less dangerous form. Out of the best of intentions, government has intervened in areas where it is neither competent nor needed nor wanted by the mass of Americans.

There is no better example of the wisdom of limited government and the price paid by societies that forgot that wisdom than the economic problems we've encountered in recent years. The notion that government planners could fine-tune the economy from Washington led to a vicious cycle of boom and bust, periods of high inflation followed by periods of high unemployment.

Now, all of us hope, of course, that the unemployment situation will ease much more quickly than current predictions suggest. But if past recessions were the rule, unemployment will remain a lagging indicator in an otherwise brightening economy so the unemployed will be among the last to feel the benefits of the recovery. But those who have for so long preached the benefits of bigger government should be asked to acknowledge that the economic conditions that led to recession and unemployment were created by years of growth in government and the climate of government expansion and interference.

When this administration took office, Federal spending had tripled in the preceding 10 years and taxes had doubled in the preceding 5 years. The national debt was hitting a trillion dollars -- social spending had quadrupled in one decade. The budget for the Department of Health and Human Services became the third largest entity in the world, just behind the national budgets of the United States and the Soviet Union. One social program, food stamps, had grown from a $70 million experimental program in 1965 to an $11\1/4\ billion program in 1981 -- an incredible 16,000-percent increase.

The government was draining off America's productivity and placing an enormous drag on the economy. Higher and higher taxes and inflation were discouraging work, risk, and the willingness of business and labor to invest time or money in economic expansion.

Now this tremendous slowdown in the economy was more than a statistical event. It hurt those who could least afford to be hurt. Particularly hard hit were those traditionally lower income groups that make up such a high percentage of the unemployed. Minimum wage laws -- with no allocation made or allowance made for young people doing marginal work -- kept many young people from gaining the entry-level positions that mean invaluable job training and eventually full-time careers.

Or take the slowdown in economic progress made by those with low incomes. As pointed out in a recent article by Charles Murray in the Public Interest magazine, the great expansion of government programs that took place under the aegis of the Great Society coincided with an end to economic progress for America's poor people. From 1949 until just before the Great Society got underway in 1964, the percentage of American families in poverty fell dramatically -- from nearly 33 percent to only 18 percent. But by 1980, with the full impact of the Great Society's programs being felt, the trend had reversed itself, and there was an even higher proportion of people living in poverty than in 1969.

Society meant enormous social and economic progress for the poor of America. But after the gigantic increases in government spending and taxation, that economic progress slowed dramatically. If we had maintained the economic progress made from 1950 through 1965, black family income in 1980 would have been nearly $3,000 higher than it was.

The great social spending schemes failed for the vast majority of poor Americans. They remain trapped in economic conditions no better than those of a decade-and-a-half ago. The poverty programs failed precisely because they grew without regard for the burden they and other social programs were imposing on the overall economy. As social spending multiplied, economic growth slowed, and the economy became less and less able to generate the jobs and incomes needed to lift the poor out of poverty, not to mention the fact that inflation stimulated by government growth hit the poor the hardest, especially by devaluating the payments of those on welfare.

The growth of government programs did little for the poor; they were sometimes even counterproductive. From 1965 to '74, for example, the Federal Urban Renewal program spent more than $7 billion and ended a total failure, destroying more housing units than it replaced. The Federal regulations and grants of the Model Cities program in the late 1960's spent more than $2\1/2\ billion and didn't halt urban decay. But all of these programs -- while they did fund jobs for an army of Federal bureaucrats and consultants -- put a huge burden on the productive sector of the American society. It was the working people who had to pay the taxes, carry the burden of inflation, and get thrown out of work when the inevitable economic slowdown occurred.

Today, because of our attempts to restrict and cut back on government expansion and to retarget aid toward those most in need, and away from those who can manage without Federal help, the working people of America are directly benefiting. We have brought inflation down from duggle -- douba -- I can't get that out -- double-digit -- [laughter] -- I stumble over inflation all the time.

March, new home sales were up over 50 percent, building permits were up more than 70 percent, and building starts were up by 75 percent over the same time last year. Consumer confidence has had its best monthly gain in 9 years, all the way to 77 percent as measured by the Conference Board. We now have the lowest prime interest rate in 4\1/2\ years; inflation is better than the double-digit figures of a few years ago; and the stock market is healthy again.

And this need not be a temporary recovery. If we can continue to cut the growth in spending, if we can continue to hold the line on taxes, consumer and business confidence will remain high, and the recovery will be sustained over a long period of time. Once again, America's working people will know that hard work, saving, and sound investment will pay off for them and their children in the future. And this will mean far more to the lower income groups that have been so badly hit by unemployment and inflation than all the government programs of the past. It'll mean economic growth and expanding opportunity over a long period of time. Instead of having government trying to redistribute a shrinking economic pie, that pie will be expanding, and everyone will have a chance at a larger share.

Well, here, I would submit, is the central political error of our time. Instead of seeing the people and their free institutions as the principal means of social and economic progress, our political opposition has looked at government and bureaucracy as the primary vehicle of social change.

And this marked the onslaught of special interest politics, the notion that every noble social goal is the business of government, that every pressure group has its claim on the tax dollars of working people, that national legislation means brokering and bartering with the largest share going to the most powerful of the noisiest political constituency.

Oakeshott has observed, it is the conjunction of utopian dreaming and government power that degenerates into tyranny. Even beyond the raids on the national treasury, the huge deficits, the high inflation and taxation -- the very abuses that brought down so many empires and nations in the past -- this trend toward well-intentioned but overwhelming government also diminishes personal freedom and the autonomy of those branches of government closest to the people.

By preventing government from overextending itself we stop it from disturbing that intricate but orderly pattern of private transactions among various institutions and individuals who have different social and economic goals. In short, like the Founding Fathers, we recognize the people as sovereign and the source of our social progress. We recognize government's role in that progress, but only under sharply defined and limited conditions. We remain aware of government's urge to seek more power, to disturb the social ecology and disrupt the bonds of cooperation and interchange among private individuals and institutions through unnecessary intrusion or expansion.

When new management takes over a failing business or a coach tries to revitalize a sports team, both will frequently find that the key to success is cutting out the extraneous or extravagant, while returning to basics and emphasizing those resources that have been traditionally successful. Well, this is precisely what we're trying to do to the bloated Federal Government today: remove it from interfering in areas where it doesn't belong, but at the same time strengthen its ability to perform its constitutional and legitimate functions.

Or take the national security area, where we're trying to make up for years of neglect when spending declined from 40 percent of the budget in 1970 to less than 24 percent in 1980. And let me take a moment here for an important aside.

During the past 10 years, the Soviet Union has improved, developed, and deployed more than a dozen large, new ICBM systems while the United States has been thinking about developing one, much smaller intercontinental ballistic missile. The debate over a new ICBM and our entire strategic triad has cost the country millions of man-hours and billions of dollars, and it still hasn't been decided.

I wanted to get some answers, once and for all. So, I created a blue-ribbon, bipartisan commission this past January to study the strategic forces of the United States. The commission conferred with over 200 experts and consulted closely with the Congress and produced a thorough report that made three basic recommendations: first, that we continue with our strategic modernization program; second, that we build and deploy the MX missile and develop a simple, single-warhead missile; and, third, that we continue ambitious arms control negotiations that promote nuclear arms stability and reduction of nuclear arms.

Eighteen senior officials from the three previous administrations, including six former Secretaries of State and Defense, agree that all three parts of this commission's recommendations are essential to the future security of our country. The National Security Council agrees. The Joint Chiefs of Staff agree. And I agree.

But I more than agree. I believe with every fiber of my being that these steps are essential to ensuring arms control progress and our nation's future safety and security. Only when the Soviets are convinced that we mean business will arms control agreements become a reality. We're not building missiles to fight a war; we're building missiles to preserve the peace.

Congress rejects these proposals it will have dealt a blow to our national security that no foreign power would ever have been able to accomplish. I call on the Congress to support this bipartisan program, a program that combines vigorous arms control with the modernization of our strategic forces.

Now, discussion of Justice Department personnel or economic statistics may seem a long way from the insights of Michael Oakeshott or the lofty thoughts of the Founding Fathers. But I would argue that John Ashbrook would never have found it so. For him, conservatism was not so much a political pressure group as it was a modern reflection of the insights and wisdom that began the American Republic.

But he was a practical man as well. In the face of redistricting and an unfavorable political climate for conservative candidates, he won 11 consecutive terms in the House of Representatives. He believed in political action -- he was among those select few who began the draft Goldwater movement in 1963 and stunned the political world by succeeding a year later.

I first came to John's district at a dinner here with Bill Buckley the spring after that election. He was not discouraged. John looked at the Goldwater campaign as a first step toward the eventual triumph of his political principles. Those principles are in the ascendency today in large part due to his efforts.

As you know, this is Small Business Week. I'm glad to be at the Chamber where so many small firms have become members and are working to keep America great by helping us to preserve our system of free enterprise.

I understand many thousands of small business people in some 42 sites will be watching this broadcast. Well, that's good news, because no group is more important to America's economic well-being than small business. No group does more to create human progress and receives less recognition than you, the risktakers of America.

We're asking you to address the great challenge of trade with your vision, courage, and leadership. I'm convinced the United States can begin the first leg of a new voyage into the future, a future in which commerce will be king. The eagle will soar, and America will be the mightiest trading nation on Earth.

Every citizen has a role and stake in helping the United States meet her trade challenge in the eighties. And the potential for growth is enormous -- a nearly $2 trillion market abroad, a chance to create hundreds of thousands of jobs, more income security for our people, and greater security for our freedom and democracy. Ninety percent of American manufacturers do not export at all.

We're trying to meet the trade challenge in several ways. First, we're taking long overdue steps to get this economy back on a sound footing. We're encouraging lasting, noninflationary growth through economic reforms based on time-tested principles, spending restraint, and sound monetary policy to bring down inflation and interest rates; less regulatory interference to stimulate greater competition and growth of enterprise and employment through tax incentives to encourage work, thrift, investment, and productivity.

I believe our economic program is delivering a recovery, and without returning us to the misery we inherited in 1980 -- double-digit inflation and 21\1/2\-percent interest rates. Each month brings fresh evidence that the recovery is building and that we can look forward to more growth, more jobs, and more opportunities.

America is on a new road now, and it's a far better road than before. I'm digging in my heels against those who would put us back on a dead-end path of raising taxes for bigger and bigger government. We cannot make America stronger by making the small businesses [business men] and women of America weaker.

Entrepreneurs and working people must not be burdened with new tax increases. The Congress must work with us to control the growth of spending. I will also oppose the quick fix of trade protectionism, because we saw the nightmare that helped create in the 1930's.

The same holds true for dead-end policies like the local content rule -- legislation that would force those who sell cars in the United States, including domestic manufacturers, to build their cars with a rising share of U.S. labor and parts. As the Congressional Budget Office pointed out, this would destroy more jobs than it would create. It would add significantly to the cost of new cars and these costs of protecting one group of workers would be passed on to another group down the line whose jobs would then be jeopardized. It would violate our international commitment to the GATT.

Protectionism only opens the door to retaliation. We would buy less from our partners, they would buy less from us. The world economic pie would shrink and political tensions would multiply. The local content rule is a cruel hoax. We propose a positive approach. We want to enhance the ability of U.S. producers and workers to compete on a fair and equitable basis in the world marketplace.

Mac Baldrige's team has been holding seminars across the country to promote export trading companies. They're helping businesspeople learn how to use the legislation to expand our markets, become exporters, or to sell to export trading firms who can do it for them. This will mean more exports, higher growth, lower deficits, and a surge in jobs and opportunities.

We want Uncle Sam to be your partner, not your foe. So, we're also moving on many other fronts. We've eased taxation of foreign-earned income, introduced a tax credit for research and development, and eliminated export controls on low technology items that don't threaten our national security.

Williamsburg, Virginia. The leaders of the great democracies will have an opportunity to discuss issues of domestic and international economic policy and reflect on their collective responsibilities to free peoples throughout the world. I can assure you that expanding international trade will be a priority topic. The United States will carry the banner of free trade and open markets. You could help us greatly if you would let the Congress know you stand behind us.

Q. This is Joseph G. Conway. I am vice-chairman of the National Bank of Detroit. Mr. President, the recession has certainly increased the calls for economic protectionism. We in Detroit are particularly conscious of the local content legislation which you mentioned. Quotas on Japanese cars and European steel and the recent tariff decision on imported motorcycles would seem to contradict your administration's commitment to free trade. Would you comment, please?

The quotas on Japanese automobiles are voluntary quotas. They, themselves, adopted them and without us requesting such a thing. They were very conscious of the tendency toward protectionism in our Congress, and so the Japanese -- well, much more than a year ago -- themselves imposed those quotas.

With regard to steel, there again within existing laws, we have been negotiating with our trading partners in the world because some of them were dumping. And that single word, ``dumping,'' means they were invading our market and selling at lower than production cost by government subsidies being provided to the producers of steel in those countries. And our law provides that when that takes place, we can fight back. And that we've been doing. And I think we've had a better relationship established with some of our trading partners as a result.

With regard to the motorcycle incident, that is a single thing that has come up with regard to one type of motorcycle. And again, under existing laws, we can temporarily offer a protection to enable an American company to readjust in order to meet the foreign competition. And that's what we have done with regard to the motorcycle action. This is a temporary thing under existing law.

But I agree with you, that protectionism -- and as I said in my remarks -- that's a one-way -- or a two-way street I should say, and you can't practice that without having retaliation. And so we are dedicated to anything that will increase free trade. And I'm sure that this will be one of the items that will be discussed at the summit conference in Williamsburg, Virginia.

Grande Title Company. There are great opportunities in overseas markets for our small business exporters, especially those in the high technology companies. However, they seem to be the hardest hit by the various government regulations that act as a disincentive to exporting. What proposals do you have, sir, for making small business more competitive in the world market?

The President. Well, for one thing, we are very well aware of the problem of overregulation by the Federal Government. And we've had a task force under the Vice President working on that ever since we've been here. Many regulations have been changed. But we have now identified 20 specific regulations that are, according to small business in America, the most -- well, they hinder small business the most, interfere the most. And we're going to work on those 20 regulations.

We have done other things that I mentioned, however. We've obtained some waivers on the antitrust laws to enable small businesses to work through -- well, to sell directly themselves or to work through export trading companies. That's what the legislation was all about, so that groups of businesses could come in together and through an export trading company do business abroad.

We're doing other things that -- well, we hope that under our economic program that we have helped small business with regard to taxing policies, investment policies. And we're going to continue along that line.

Commerce and director of the Port of Mobile. Mr. President, statistics indicate that our main overseas competitors invest at double our per capita rate in new plants and equipment. In your opinion, how should the United States Government create tax conditions which will encourage investment over consumption in order to help expand the U.S. export market?

The President. Well, I think our economic program, Mr. Hope -- and, you know, it's an awful temptation right now for me to start calling you Bob. But the -- our economic program and our tax program recognize the fact that about 80 percent of small business pays in the personal income tax, not in the corporate tax. And as of July 1st, there will be a full 25-percent cut, as you know, in that tax. And I have -- and am resisting every suggestion here in Washington that that final 10 percent on July 1st should be delayed or in some way interfered with. I will veto any attempt to take that tax cut away from the people. That is one thing.

There are other features of the overall tax program that we adopted in 1981 that are directed toward breaks for business and opportunities for them to accumulate the capital needed. I think it has been the taxing policy plus inflation in our country over a number of years that has made it difficult for American business to modernize, to bring plant and equipment up to date, and thus keep pace with our overseas competitors. We continue to seek new ways in the taxing structure.

We've done things with regard to the inheritance tax for the protection of family businesses and so forth. We're going to continue with that. We're going to continue with looking at the regulations that we can change to make it more possible.

We have also in taxing, that I think should be of help to anyone doing exporting overseas, made some changes with regard to the inducements that you can offer for Americans who have to serve at least 11 out of 12 months of the year as employees of yours overseas. The tax exemption now is up to 75,000, and it is phased so that by 1986 that exemption will be $95,000, which I think will be an incentive for direct work by your own employees in the overseas markets.

The other thing that we've done with our economic plan is the matter of inflation, which has been so penalizing to so many of you and the high interest rates. They've come down from 21\1/2\ to 10\1/2\, and I have a hunch they're going to come a little lower in the near future.

Association. Mr. President, my question concerns export finance. Capital goods represent some of our most important exports to lesser developed countries, many of whom have significant credit needs. The U.S. Export-Import Bank is often crucial to these export efforts. What Eximbank programs will be expanded to make sure that U.S. exporters can offer foreign buyers to the credit that they need?

The President. Well, right at the moment, the Exim -- Export Bank has funding available, because the world recession has reduced the demand from so many of the developing countries. But in addition to about $3.8 billion that is on hand for direct loans, I have asked for 1984, 10 billion additional dollars in guarantees and insurance to help in this. And I have expressed a willingness to the Congress to augment or add additional -- almost $3 billion to that bank. So, I think that the funds are there and that, yes, they can be used for this very purpose -- to offer credit and to enable our customers to buy.

Incorporated. Mr. President, for a number of years, we've seen proposals advanced that would create a single department of international trade, one that would pull together all of the international trade responsibilities of the various Federal agencies. Could you tell us why you have decided to support this proposal?

The President. Well, because foreign trade is so important. Ten percent of our whole gross national product is foreign trade. A billion dollars of export can add 25,000 jobs and play a factor in solving the unemployment problem.

And we have found, and I have found here, in our Cabinet meetings and all, that policy is actually distributed among a number of different agencies in our government and legitimately so. They have a stake in it -- the Department of Agriculture, with regard to foreign trade, Defense Department, and national security, and things of this kind.

And we have just decided that, with this great importance to business and industry in America, that it makes sense to have a single government agency where policy for foreign trade is concentrated and our trading partners in the world know that there is one agency in government that can provide the answers to any questions that they might have or that our export businesses might have.

The President is taking this action because of the extraordinary situation in Central America and its implications for the United States, and the region as a whole, including Honduras, Costa Rica, and El Salvador. These three countries are experiencing enormous problems, caused in considerable part by Nicaraguan-supported subversion and extremist violence. The additional quota for these three countries represents a total of roughly $14 million in foreign exchange per year. This occurs because the U.S. internal price (21 - 22 cents/lb.) in recent weeks is far higher than in most other markets of the world (6 - 7 cents/lb.). The transfer of the Nicaraguan quota will significantly benefit the recipient countries.

By denying to Nicaragua a foreign exchange benefit resulting from the high U.S. sugar price, we hope to reduce the resources available to that country for financing its military buildup and its support for subversion and extremist violence in the region.

This is a signal of the United States seriousness with regard to the economic and political stability of its neighbors in the hemisphere which is integrally related to the security of the region and the United States. The United States will continue to respond to developments in that region.

The sugar quota decision does not affect our continued willingness to talk with the Nicaraguans about regional issues. We are ready to maintain as positive a relationship with Nicaragua as warranted by Nicaraguan actions.

This is not a fundamental change in the overall sugar program. The quotas of all countries other than the four specified above are unchanged and continue to be based on the formula announced in May 1982, when the quota program was initiated.

Two hundred eight years ago, the first distinctive American flags were flown over the colonial defenses during the Battle of Bunker Hill. One flag was an adaptation of the British Blue Ensign while the other had a new design. Both flags bore a pine tree, symbol of the struggle colonial Americans undertook to wrest their land from the forests.

As the colonials moved toward a final separation from Britain, other flags with various symbols appeared to inform the world of the hopes, dreams, and challenges of the new Nation. Many of the early American flags carried such mottoes as ``Liberty or Death'' or ``Don't Tread on Me'' to reflect the courage and quest for freedom which motivated our forefathers and gave birth to our Nation.

Two centuries later, with the addition of thirty-seven stars, this flag still symbolizes our shared commitment to freedom and equality. It carriers a message of hope to the downtrodden, opportunity to the oppressed, and peace to all mankind.

As challenges face our Nation today, the ``Stars and Stripes'' continues to remind each of us of the sacrifices and determination which built this Nation. It signals the great land of opportunity that our forefathers carved out of the wilderness and gave their lives to make free so many years ago.

Panama. It will enter into force following ratification by five coastal states of the region. Also transmitted for the information of the Senate is the report of the Department of State with respect to the Treaty.

The United States has been involved in a fisheries dispute with several Latin American countries as a result of conflicting laws regarding jurisdiction over highly migratory tuna and has, in the past, prohibited imports of tuna from several countries as a result of seizures of U.S. tuna boats.

United States policy, pursuant to the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act, has been to negotiate international agreements to ensure the effective conservation and management of tuna and to secure access for U.S. fishermen to the stocks wherever they migrate beyond a narrow belt of coastal waters.

This Agreement, which is interim in nature pending the negotiation of a comprehensive tuna conservation and management regime, provides for the issuance of international licenses for fishing tuna in a broad area of the eastern Pacific Ocean. Provision is also made for conservation under specified circumstances. It thus furthers U.S. fisheries policy goals while reducing tensions that have arisen as a result of conflicting juridical claims.

My Administration is strongly committed to that goal and has actively pursued it by reinforcing essential non-proliferation measures and by adopting new approaches where these will serve our non-proliferation interests.

As noted in my March 31 statement, for arms control to be complete and world security strengthened, efforts to halt the spread of nuclear arms need to be increased. We are undertaking further efforts with key countries on the need for urgent movement to strengthen measures against nuclear proliferation.

I'm told that you have an action-packed schedule in our city, so we're especially pleased that you could be with us this morning as a part of the Small Business Week celebration. You're here today because you've been selected from the millions of small business owners around America, representing the best of the entrepreneurial spirit in our nation. And you have each in your own way proven that the American dream of economic independence, of individual initiative, of personal excellence can still be achieved through small business.

In just a few moments it will be my great pleasure to announce the 1983 Small Business Person of the Year -- the 20th annual award of this special honor. It'll be one of these contestants here: either Fred Luber, O.C. Branch, or Louis and Fred Ruiz. I, for one, am glad that I didn't have to make the choice, because each of them has so much to be proud of. But it's gratifying to see among your ranks a growing number of women and minority entrepreneurs. This demonstrates that our economic system is open and free to all who wish to pursue their dreams of success.

We've cut inflation from double digits, as you know, to less than a third of its former rate. We've been able to bring skyrocketing interest rates down from a staggering 21\1/2\ percent to 10\1/2\, and I think they're going to come some lower. We've attacked the regulatory burden and are continuing to slice away needless redtape that government had imposed on you.

We've provided small business with more opportunity to participate in international trade through the Export Trading Company Act; signed into law the Small Business Innovation Development Act, assuring small high-tech firms a greater share of government research and development.

I believe that our greatest contribution to small business, however, is -- well, to all Americans for that matter -- is our package of tax reforms. We've broken through tax barriers to capital formation and investment and virtually eliminated investment -- or estate taxes, I should say, for a surviving spouse. Our tax indexing provision and individual tax rate cuts will make it easier for small business owners to fund and maintain their companies.

There's an old economic axiom that still holds true today. If people are not allowed to earn more by producing more, then no more will be produced. Well, that's why our tax incentives, I think, are critical to recovery. The third year of the tax cut and tax indexing will enormously benefit small business people and average working families. Repealing those rate cuts and indexing would be a cruel blow to the American people and to the recovery, and we're not going to let that happen.

Now, I know you have a full schedule. Earlier I said you reminded me of smalltown America and of the pioneer spirit, and you do. You also hold the promise of America's future. It's in your dreams, your aspirations that our future will be molded and shaped. You're the pioneers in America's continuing best and endless frontier -- the free enterprise system. I join the Small Business Administration and all Americans in saluting you, the small business proprietors, of 1983.

The President. I'd just like to tell you both that one of the things Californians miss the most when they come here to Washington is Mexican food. So, please -- [laughter] -- stay with it. We like it very much. Congratulations. We're pleased to have you here.

Well, this is more fun than being President. [Laughter] I really do love baseball, and I wish we could do this out on the lawn every day. I wouldn't even complain if a stray ball came through the Oval Office window now and then.

But it's great to see all these youngsters out here and the bats and the balls and everything that's going on. Baseball of course is our national pastime, that is if you discount political campaigning.

For this signing today we have Hall-of-Famers here, we have Little Leaguers, and that's the way it should be, because baseball appeals to young and old alike. It's increasingly appealing to people around the entire world, and I'm very glad that baseball will be played as a demonstration sport at next summer's Los Angeles Olympic Games. And then, if we're very successful, very possibly it could become a full-fledged medal sport in time for the 1988 games in Seoul, South Korea.

The game of baseball originated in the United States of America approximately 150 years ago and quickly became a fixture of community life. Today baseball diamonds dot parks, playgrounds, and schoolyards across the land, and virtually every village, town, and neighborhood has its own team, or teams. No summer would be complete without its schedule of games and championship playoffs.

Baseball is affectionately known as the ``national pastime'' because of its popularity as both a participant and spectator sport. Some 19 million children, youths, and adults play amateur baseball in the United States; and many millions more attend amateur contests as spectators each year. This vast program is made possible by generous contributions of time, effort, and financial support by millions of individuals representing business, fraternal, civic, religious and service organizations.

Baseball has achieved its greatest popularity and highest level of perfection in the United States, but it is rapidly gaining acceptance elsewhere. In Europe, and in Japan and other Far Eastern countries, there is growing recognition of baseball's great entertainment value and its effectiveness as a means of instilling those qualities of teamwork and fair play that are essential to good citizenship. This recognition is reflected in the fact that baseball will be a part of the 1984 Olympic Games in Los Angeles.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 11th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Thank you for your recent letter on our strategic modernization program and its relationship to our arms control proposals. Your letter represents the bipartisan spirit which I believe will help achieve our common goals of ensuring effective deterrent forces and equitable and verifiable arms reductions.

The fundamental U.S. goal in negotiations concerning arms reduction, and especially in our approach to the START negotiations, is to seek agreements that would enhance security and stability by reducing overall force levels while permitting modernization of U.S. forces necessary for a credible deterrent. As you know, the Scowcroft Commission noted that elements of our START proposal are consistent with and supportive of the Commission's findings. I agree wholeheartedly with the essential theme of the Scowcroft Commission's approach to arms control: the attainment of stability at the lowest possible level of forces.

The Scowcroft Commission's recommendations on modernization and arms control are integrally related. Our action with respect to these recommendations must be equally comprehensive. That is why I am now conducting a review of our START proposal with the intention of developing such modifications as are necessary to reflect the Commission's approach, which I share. To cite just one example, the Commission report recommended that the proposed limit on deployed ballistic missiles currently contained in the U.S. START position be reassessed since it is not compatible with a desirable evolution toward small, single-warhead ICBMs. There are a number of alternative approaches available to integrate this and the other Commission recommendations into our approach to arms reductions. As modifications are made to our START proposal, I will continue to seek stability at the lowest possible level of forces.

The planned deployment of the Peacekeeper missile as proposed by my Administration is compatible with the long-term objective of the Scowcroft Commission Report. The Peacekeeper missile, deployed in a mix with small single-warhead ICBMs, would permit us to maintain the effectiveness of our deterrent and enhance stability while serving as a hedge against Soviet temptation to exploit their present advantage.

At the same time, let me emphasize that we do not seek a first strike capability. To this end, we have constrained the number of Peacekeeper missiles that we plan to deploy to the minimum number needed to assure the effectiveness of our deterrent and no more. Our task, of course, would be much easier if the Soviets would agree to work with us to reduce the ratio of accurate warheads to missile silos. Clearly, consistent with our national security requirements, the overall level of Peacekeeper deployment will be influenced by Soviet strategic programs and arms reductions agreements.

In addition, I fully recognize the central role that the small, single-warhead ICBM plays in the overall modernization program recommended by the Scowcroft Commission Report. We will promptly undertake a major effort to bring the proposal of a small, single-warhead ICBM to fruition on a high priority basis.

Commission also recognized that a series of decisions involving both the Executive Branch and the Congress would be necessary in the months ahead in order to determine the future shape of our ICBM force. Further, it noted that not all of these decisions can or should be made in 1983.

The deliberate approach to decision making proposed by a number of members of Congress is fully in keeping with the intent of the Scowcroft Commission Report. I fully recognize that a lasting consensus on such an important issue must be built up carefully and I intend to take the time necessary to forge that lasting consensus.

I urge all concerned, however, to keep in mind that if we draw out critical elements of the decision-making process unnecessarily, we encourage the Soviets to delay in negotiations while continuing apace in their own weapons modernization programs. To avoid this, I am seeking a clear show of support from Congress to signal U.S. resolve. A case in point is the clear necessity of approving funds promptly to procure Peacekeeper missiles. Working together, this should be achievable while simultaneously meeting our mutual desire to deal with deployment issues, whenever possible, in a careful, deliberate manner.

Finally, I want to stress the extraordinary contribution made by the Scowcroft Commission. It provided an opportunity for nonpartisan analysis of an exceptionally difficult issue as a prelude to obtaining necessary bipartisan support for critically needed modernization of our strategic forces.

While not prescribing the details or the timing, the Commission report suggested certain directions that the continued evolution of our complementary strategy for arms reduction could take. Over the short term, follow-on arrangements involving members of the Commission, as well as close coordination with the Congress, will be extremely helpful both technically and politically in thinking through this evolution. However, we are giving careful consideration to determining which follow-on arrangements best meet our common objectives.

In this regard, I do see merit in a panel with bipartisan composition and with staggered terms of membership to provide advice and continuity in this area. I will work with the Congress, building upon the experience of the Scowcroft Commission, to strengthen and supplement our consultative and advisory processes to assure a lasting, national, bipartisan consensus concerning arms control initiatives -- a consensus which will deserve to be sustained from one Administration to the next.

Our two countries share fundamental values. Foremost among them, a deep and abiding commitment to democratic government. And this has been very much emphasized in the conversations that we've had so far today.

In contrast to the war and turmoil elsewhere in the region, Belize, Central America's newest independent democracy, serves as a model of peace and stability. Belize is a developing country struggling with serious economic problems. And I'm hopeful that we can, as a neighbor, be of help, especially in those areas effecting the private sector.

Our meeting was productive and cordial. Our conversations have reaffirmed the close relations between our two countries, the friendship of our people, and our mutual commitment to freedom and human rights.

We are happy to be received by the President of the United States of America. And our exchange of views served to further the good relations between our two countries, the United States of America and Belize.

Our two countries share the same side of planet Earth. We can draw wisdom and strength from the basic values of a common heritage, the same language and common law, a kindred parliamentary democracy, and a mixed economy.

Belize is thankful for the Caribbean Basin Initiative and the helpful cooperation of your people and your government in our daily task to maintain stability and security, which result from mutual respect and recognition of Belize's sovereignty and territorial integrity.

The principle of a mutual build-down, if formulated and implemented flexibly, and negotiated within the context of our modified START proposal, would be a useful means to achieve the reductions that we all seek.

It would, if properly applied, reinforce our intent to cap the number of strategic ballistic missile warheads on both sides and to cause each side to reduce those levels steadily and substantially over time.

It could be implemented flexibly and with reasonable latitude for each side to balance the forces it deploys and reduces. Variable ratios as appropriate, would encourage more stabilizing rather than less stabilizing systems.

As you have acknowledged, any build-down concept must recognize the importance of strategic modernization and the necessity of maintaining a balance during the reduction process to deal with asymmetries in U.S. and Soviet forces. It would, of course, require agreement on effective verification measures, including counting rules for all systems.

My Administration is currently examining the structure of a build-down proposal which would meet these criteria and would facilitate a START agreement embodying substantial reductions in nuclear forces. I will work with you and your colleagues to develop such a proposal.

In this regard, I do see merit in a panel with bi-partisan composition and with staggered terms of membership to provide advice and continuity in this area. I will work with the Congress, building upon the experience of the Scowcroft Commission, to strengthen and supplement our consultative and advisory processes to assure a lasting, national, bi-partisan consenus concerning arms control initiatives -- a consensus which will deserve to be sustained from one Administration to the next.

Nearly half a million Americans suffer from Parkinson's disease, a progressive disorder of the nervous system. We know now that their symptoms of tremor and muscle stiffness are related to a chemical deficiency in the part of the brain that controls movement, but there is far more to learn about this disease.

Several drugs developed since World War II have enabled thousands of Parkinson's patients to function more fully. Rigorous research is still needed, however, to provide more information about this disease and to develop new and improved therapies. Scientists must continue to explore possible causes of Parkinson's disease and search for ways to prevent the disorder or lessen its effect.

Many of the scientists studying Parkinson's disease receive support from the Federal government through the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and privately through four voluntary organizations: the American Parkinson Disease Association, the National Parkinson Foundation, Inc., the Parkinson's Disease Foundation, and the United Parkinson Foundation. I commend these voluntary groups and the scientists who devote their efforts toward conquering this disease. I also note the courage and resourcefulness of Parkinson's disease patients in overcoming their disorder and in helping other patients and families deal with the effects of this disease.

In order to emphasize the role of research in conquering Parkinson's disease and encourage continued private and Federal support of this research, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 62, has designated the week beginning May 15, 1983 as ``National Parkinson's Disease Week'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that week.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 12th. day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

United States-Japan Relations. The Commission shall be composed of no more than eight members appointed or designated by the President from among citizens of the United States. The President shall designate a Chairman from among the members of the Commission.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The Commission shall develop recommendations with respect to the conduct of the United States-Japan relations. The Commission shall examine both the bilateral and multilateral dimensions of the relationship of the two countries with a view to identifying issues requiring resolution and opportunities for expanded cooperation, and make recommendations on ways by which the United States and Japan can better carry out their common responsibilities aimed at promoting world peace and prosperity.

States-Japan Relations, the Commission may conduct studies, hearings, and meetings as it deems necessary; assemble and disseminate information, and issue reports and other publications; and coordinate, sponsor, or oversee projects, studies, events, and other activities it deems necessary or desirable.

Thank you, Guy Vander Jagt. And thank all of you for doing what you were just doing long enough for me to swallow the lump in my throat. Nancy and I are honored to be here with you distinguished ladies and gentlemen this evening.

Ernie Banks, I felt a little like the fellow that bats last for the Chicago Cubs. [Laughter] But that's all right. I'm a lifelong Cubs fan. I used to broadcast the Chicago Cubs games. And, Ernie, I was broadcasting that 21-game winning streak, which has never been matched in the history of baseball. But if I can wait all these years for them to win another pennant, you better believe I can wait a few minutes to pay tribute to each of you on this beautiful spring evening.

You know, the more things change, the more they seem the same. Every time I see my dear friend, Jim Brady, it seems that the Cubs have lost another game, and that's bad news; but every time I see Jim, he's looking better and better, and that's good news.

Republican Party has reached its peak is making a big mistake. If you maintain the support, enthusiasm, and commitment you've shown this evening, then this Grand Old Party can reach the farthest stars and score a tremendous victory on election night in November 1984.

We have a man who only 1 week after leaving his government post to accept a top job in private industry didn't hesitate a second when asked to organize this dinner, as you've been told. You know, of course, I'm talking about Drew Lewis and what a great job he always does.

And let me repeat what I could never say often enough: When I needed someone of unquestionable leadership, loyalty, and skill, there's only one person I could or would choose again, and that's my partner and your Vice President, George Bush.

I believe we have an important message. With the support of the people, we come to the rescue of a nation whose house was on fire. We put out the flames, and brick by brick we're rebuilding a foundation of strength, safety, and security for America. We've made our share of mistakes. We'll have many problems to solve. But you gave us the courage to take action when those before us had refused again and again and again.

If inflation had continued at the 12.4-percent rate of their last year in office, a family of four on a fixed income of $20,000 would be $1,700 poorer in purchasing power today. If their tax increases had stayed on the books and our tax cuts had not been passed, a median-income family of four would be paying $700 more in Federal income taxes this year.

You know, I get kidded about this, but I keep wondering -- now that our program is doing what we said it would, how come our critics don't call it Reaganomics anymore? [Laughter] That was their name for our program when they were sure it wouldn't work. To tell you the truth, I never liked it. In my mind, it's always been the People's Program. And now that it seems to be working, our opponents want to change it. Well, let there be no confusion on one point. I will veto any attempt to tamper with or take away the third year of the people's income tax cut or indexing.

And the other day I was handed two letters -- one from the House of Representatives and one from the Senate. And each of those letters was signed by enough good Republican Members of the House and of the Senate to guarantee upholding a veto that I would put on any attempt to tamper with those tax reductions.

Incidentally, of the third income tax cut that comes due on July 1st, 72 percent of that will go to the low- and middle-income earners in our country. And yet, today I saw where there was a poll in which the -- our opponents are hailing this poll -- that says that tax cut's only going to benefit the rich.

This is Small Business Week. And we should remember that small business is on the cutting edge of innovation and job creation in America. The 2.7 million new jobs added in 1980 and '81, some 60 percent were in firms of less than 500 employees. Eighty-five percent of all U.S. firms pay their taxes by personal rates, not by the corporate rate. So, let us spell out what this means in terms of jobs. The Democratic plan to eliminate the third year of the tax cut or the indexing provision amounts to an enormous tax increase on the most important employers of America -- the small business community. The Democratic tax increases are not a jobs creation program. Their tax increases are a jobs elimination program, and America doesn't need any more progress of that kind.

Washington are shared by the great majority of our citizens. During the years when Federal spending on education grew and grew, and the government elbowed aside the traditional role of parents, we saw the SAT scores steadily decline. We said the answer was not Washington knows best, but a return to the basics: more competition, more emphasis on high standards, quality instruction, student discipline, and a restoration of parental involvement and local control. Now, after 18 months of preparation, a blue-ribbon commission on excellence in education has issued a report that says exactly what we had been saying.

Let me interject here to say there's one area where the Federal Government has clearly neglected its responsibility, and that is in national defense. The debate on defense is about more than dollars and deficits and rooting out waste, as important as they are. The central issue is about protecting human lives and preserving freedom and democracy, because they're the source of all our other blessings. I believe what occurred in the last decade when the Soviets raced ahead militarily and we stood still was dreadfully wrong. I believe it is not just immoral but unforgivable to ask the sons and daughters of America to protect this country with aging equipment and bargain-basement weapons. We can only keep our families safe and our country at peace when the enemies of democracy know that America has the courage to stay strong. And we intend to see that they know that.

Senior officials from three previous administrations and leading Republicans and Democrats across the country have joined our call to build and deploy the MX Peacekeeper and the small, single-warhead missile that's been nicknamed Midgetman, but not so we can fight a war. They want to build and deploy those missiles so America can secure deep arms reductions and preserve the peace. And just before coming over here the phone rang tonight, and I learned that out of the Senate Appropriations Committee came the money for the MX missile by a 17-to-11 vote.

During the past decade the U.S.S.R. improved, developed, or deployed almost a dozen new strategic systems, while the United States virtually stood still. The Soviets will have no incentive to negotiate arms reductions if we unilaterally disarm. For the sake of America, and all we hold dear, I'm asking all responsible Democrats and Republicans to join together now to endorse the Scowcroft commission's recommendations for the Peacekeeper, the small, single-warhead missile, and the renewed efforts toward arms reduction.

We're doing everything we can to ensure the United States will be safer, stronger, and more secure today -- both economically and militarily -- than before. And let us remain united and true to our vision of progress, a vision that begins with your families, churches, schools, and neighborhoods. We don't ask the people to trust us. We say, ``Trust yourselves. Trust your values.'' And working together, we'll make America great again.

Some of our opponents are only comfortable trusting government. Their solutions would bring us back full circle to the source of our economic problems, with the government deciding that it knows better than you what should be done with your earnings and how you should live your life.

Our road is bold and filled with hope and opportunity. Their road is timid and relies on fear and envy. So, we have a great message for the people. And, with the allout support that I know you'll continue to give, we'll get that message across, and Republicans will celebrate a magnificent victory in 1984.

The President. Well, the budget resolution is meaningless to them. They've never abided by it. It isn't binding on them. But I would rather see them show and demonstrate to the business and industrial and financial communities that they are willing to be responsible, and can proceed with the cutting of government spending, and recognize that the tax cuts so far have been the incentive that has brought about this economic recovery.

When you think about it, every week should be Small Business Week, because America is small business. Small firms account for nearly half our jobs; they create some 60 percent of new jobs; and they're on the cutting edge of innovation, providing products and ideas for the future.

Everything from ballpoint pens to FM-radios, automatic transmissions and helicopters was conceived in the minds of entrepreneurs -- men and women who had the spirit to dream impossible dreams, take great risks, and work long hours to make their dreams come true.

In his book, ``Wealth And Poverty,'' George Gilder wrote, ``. . . most successful entrepreneurs contribute far more to society than they ever recover. And most of them win no riches at all. They are the heroes of economic life. And those who begrudge them their rewards demonstrate a failure to understand their role and their promise.'' Well, he's right. Too often, entrepreneurs are forgotten heroes. We rarely hear about them. But look into the heart of America, and you'll see them. They're the owners of that store down the street, the faithfuls who support our churches, schools, and communities, the brave people everywhere who produce our goods, feed a hungry world, and keep our homes and families warm while they invest in the future to build a better America.

But that alone won't do the trick. Success comes when they can anticipate and deliver what you, the consumer, wants, and do it in a way that satisfies you. As Gilder points out, entrepreneurs intuitively understand one of the world's best kept secrets: Capitalism begins with giving. And capitalism works best and creates the greatest wealth and human progress for all when it follows the teachings of scripture: Give and you will be given unto . . . search and you will find . . . cast your bread upon the waters and it will return to you manyfold.

In the Parable of the Talents, the man who invests and multiplies his money is praised. But the rich who horde their wealth are rebuked in scripture. True wealth is not measured in things like money or oil, but in the treasures of the mind and spirit. Oil was worthless until entrepreneurs with ideas and the freedom and faith to take risks managed to locate it, extract it, and put it to work for humanity. We can find more oil and we can develop abundant supplies of new forms of energy if we encourage risktaking by thousands and thousands of entrepreneurs, not rely on government to horde, ration, and control. The whole idea is to trust the people. Countries that don't, like the U.S.S.R. and Cuba, will never prosper.

Entrepreneurs have always been leaders in America. They led the rebellion against excessive taxation and regulation. They and their offspring pushed back the frontier, transforming the wilderness into a land of plenty. Their knowledge and contributions have sustained us in wartime, brought us out of recessions, carried our astronauts to the Moon, and led American industry to new frontiers of high technology.

We came to Washington confident that this small business spirit could make America well and get our economy moving again. Well, it's working. And we want to keep on using that special principle of giving by putting America's destiny back into the people's hands, providing you new incentives to save, invest, and take risks, so more wealth will be created at every level of our society.

We know small business is ready. That group fared better during the recent recession, laid off less workers than big business, and will recover faster. Over the last 2 years, you heard about the high rate of small business failures. You heard about it over and over again. What you didn't hear very often was that in 1981 a record 580,000 new businesses were formed. And 560,000 new enterprises were begun in 1982. They're the seeds of lasting recovery.

I think America's witnessing a renaissance in enterprise, and it's being nurtured by victories we've won -- for example, reducing the regulatory burden; knocking down the rate of inflation by more than two-thirds; cutting more than in half the record 21\1/2\- percent prime interest rate we inherited; passing a Small Business Innovation Development Act to direct millions of dollars in research funds to high-tech firms; passing the Prompt Payments Act to assure that small businesses dealing with the Federal Government get paid promptly; and, most important, providing solid incentives for new investment and risk-taking by cutting personal tax rates, shortening depreciating schedules, and sharply reducing estate taxes on family-owned businesses and farms.

Any action that tampers with the third year of the tax cut or the indexing provision, which protects you from being pushed by inflation into higher tax brackets, would harm small business and send unemployment up, not down. That's why I must and I will veto any attack on the tax incentives. They belong to you, the people. They're not the government's to take away.

If the Congress wants to help us spur small business growth and jobs in depressed regions, it should pass our enterprise zones proposal. This could provide genuine opportunity for those in need. So, we hope there'll be no further delay.

Governments don't reduce deficits by raising taxes on the people. Governments reduce deficits by controlling spending and stimulating new wealth, wealth from investments of brave people with hope for the future, trust in their fellow man, and faith in God.

You know, I've said on occasion out on the mashed-potato circuit that it's always important to see if you can't find something that aligns you with the audience or that you have in common that would kind of justify your being there. Well, the first summer job that I ever had, I was 14 years old, and I was hired by an outfit that had bought a number of rundown houses and was remodeling them and making them into new houses. I don't think under some of the rules and regulations that this could happen today, but before the summer was over, I'd laid hardwood floor, I'd shingled roof, I'd painted.

Well, I consider it a great privilege to be here with you today, for America's home builders are the heroes of today's economy. You and your industry have just struggled through your toughest, most painful time since the Great Depression; and you did it without bailouts, boondoggles, or big brother. And here you are today leading America's economic recovery by the strength of your nerve and the sweat of your brow.

You've stood by us as we've sought to reform the spending and taxing excesses that threatened to destroy the American dream. You've worked with us in our effort to cut back on the bureaucracy, regulations, and redtape that have been strangling the marketplace. You've believed in our principles and our people, knowing that, given a chance and some common sense in Washington, our country and the economy can and will be great again.

On behalf of the millions of your fellow countrymen now free from the ravages of soaring inflation and skyrocketing interest rates, I thank you. You've done and are doing so much already, I only hope we can continue to count on the National Association of Home Builders in the critical months ahead.

Together, we've accomplished much. But much still remains to be done to ensure that our recovery is both strong and lasting. These are days of great hope for your industry and all our people. But the Congress must work with us to do what is right and necessary if we're to keep those hopes from being dashed on the rocks of partisanship and runaway government spending.

If the Congress can summon the discipline needed to rein in the budget monster, we can have the kind of hale and hearty recovery that could become a way of life again, instead of just another blip on the boom and bust roller coaster of the past.

Now, I don't have to tell you what kind of relief those kinds of numbers are bringing to your industry, or what they mean to American families. Our policies are based on the essential right to private property. And in private property, nothing is more important than home ownership.

Our administration is also, with the help and support of the N.A.H.B., taking important steps to increase cooperation between the FHA and the private sector, especially in the area of deregulation. We're delegating FHA processing to lenders, which will save weeks of waiting, and we're revising minimum property standards, lifting the overlay of Federal requirements and deferring to local codes for single and multi-family dwellings. That should help make housing more affordable. Other steps include removing FHA rent controls for unsubsidized multifamily projects, streamlining environmental regulations, relaxing regulations on retirement communities, and accepting more local government certification for land development.

Spearheaded by Secretary Pierce and you in the N.A.H.B., that experiment is proving home prices can be brought down when industry and local governments cooperate. Unnecessary building and zoning regulations often add to the cost of housing by preventing the use of innovative building and land development techniques. Our goal is for industry and government to determine which requirements can be set aside without harming health, safety, or quality of life.

As we begin the new building season, we can see that our initiatives and success with the economy are having an effect. Construction permits for the past few months are up 75 percent over last year, near the one-and-a-half million mark. New housing starts have been running at an annual rate of 1.7 million units. That's up 82 percent. Each new housing start means more construction workers hired, more materials ordered. Each new home completed means more purchases in furniture, appliances, floor coverings, and the like. Streets must be built, sewers laid, and utilities connected, and all that means more jobs.

But there remains one threat to the prosperity that you've risked so much and worked so hard to achieve -- those deficits looming on the horizon. Now, there's a lot of moaning about deficits up on Capitol Hill, a lot of confusing talk about where they come from, and even some argument about how important they are. Well, let there be no mistake about that: Deficits do matter. Deficit spending represents one of the most alarming dangers to our Republic and to the prosperity of our people.

Deficit spending spurs inflation and crowds the private sector out of the credit market. This, in turn, could squeeze up interest rates like toothpaste through the tube. Deficit spending and budget-busting bailouts are no solution. If we're to have long term improvement in interest rates, the Congress needs to join in a bipartisan effort to cut irresponsible spending.

Now, working together, we can and must reduce these intolerable budget deficits that have haunted us for so many years. But while there's a lot of talk about reducing deficits these days, I can't see much evidence that very many people are really serious about it. The root cause of deficits is runaway government. Yet, most of the deficit-reduction proposals I've seen would simply raise taxes and balloon spending. When you clear away the rhetoric, the issue is quite simple: Deficits are the symptom; the disease is uncontrolled spending; and the cause is an addiction to big government.

In 1982 the Congress promised $3 in budget savings for every additional dollar in revenue that we agreed to. And so I swallowed hard and reluctantly went along with a tax reform package last year that would raise about $100 billion over a 3-year period. And guess what happened? They aren't keeping their pledge to reduce spending by the $300 billion over the same period. Indeed, they are urging added spending that will further increase the deficits.

We should know by now, from painful experience, that simply raising taxes is not the answer to our problem. Tax revenue doubled between 1976 and 1981, yet during the same period the government ran record deficits. We jumped off the spend-and-spend, tax-and-tax merry-go-round, which resulted in back-to-back years of double-digit inflation, the highest interest rates in 100 years, and an American homebuilding industry knocked to its knees. Washington's idea of business as usual just about drove you out of business. And we must never allow them to do that to you again.

Congress as serious alternatives to finance more spending. Other proposals would be just as devastating to other vital industries. Another suggestion is to repeal the third year of the tax cut and indexing. But repeal of those two measures would result in a massive, $273 billion tax increase during the next 6 years. And that would be the unkindest hike of all, because about three-quarters of that burden would fall on the lower- and middle-income taxpayers.

Indexing, especially, is a blessing for average, working families who are pushed into higher and higher tax brackets by inflation. Tax brackets are most narrow at the lower end of the scale, where inflation once worked its darkest deeds. You see, government more than kept up with inflation. It actually made a profit from it. When workers got cost-of-living raises, government often bumped them into higher tax brackets, taking larger and larger bites from their paychecks.

And if anyone here thinks the extra revenue has gone to reduce the national debt, please raise your hand. [Laughter] No, government has continued to spend every dollar it could rake in and then some. And that's how, with inflation at historic levels in the late seventies, everything went haywire. The Federal Government became America's largest growth industry, and recession became inevitable. The indexing provision that we passed in 1981 will end government's hidden profit on inflation. To repeal or delay it now would once again give the Congress an incentive to fire up inflation so that it can continue to spend and spend and spend. Well, we cannot and will not let that happen.

Yes, we need to bring down the deficit, and, yes, we've proposed a way to do that. But there are some who apparently think the American people, and you in the homebuilding industry, have caused the current deficit. They think you don't pay enough taxes. You've been tried and found guilty of not contributing enough of your wages and profits to the government. The sentence they want to impose is a lifetime of higher and higher taxes. Well, I say you're not guilty.

And I've got a news flash: The Federal Government did not run up a trillion dollar debt because it failed to tax enough. We're saddled with a trillion-dollar debt because the government spent too much.

Now, what we don't need is more reckless spending and what we don't need is more taxes. And I ask for your help again this year in making that message clear. We must reduce deficits, but we will not abide any attempt to repeal, rescind, or delay tax indexing or the final installment of the tax cut.

Now, this battle is not between Republicans and Democrats. It must not be, for it'll take all of us, working together in a bipartisan spirit, to ensure a strong, lasting recovery. But let us recognize that we're engaged in a struggle between the proponents of big government and the vest majority of Americans who put their faith in our basic values and our free system of democratic capitalism.

I appeal to you today, not just as homebuilders, but as men and women who have bet their livelihoods on small business and the American dream. Your membership is filled with people who started with nothing more than an idea and the intestinal fortitude to make it work. Gary Kramlich, for example, founded his company 20 years ago with $345. He built one house in 1964, five more in 1965, and by 1975 was putting up more than 100 a year. He's now the largest builder in North Dakota. Clarence Buerman started building houses with his father about 25 years ago in Albany, Minnesota. He's now the owner of a housing manufacturing plant with more than 30 dealerships in four States. And your first vice president, Pete Herder, was a football and wrestling coach 25 years ago, when he and his wife decided to go into construction -- saving money by living in unfinished houses while they were building them. And now he's building 250 units a year.

Small business men and women like yourselves are the risk-takers in America. Who better to explain [to] Washington's political elite that America's prosperity was never a gift from government or anyone else. It was earned with imagination, invention, and backbreaking labor.

Send away the handwringers and doubting Thomases and bring on the capitalists and entrepreneurs. Once again free enterprise is breathing life into our economy and we will not tolerate a return to the old ways of profligate spending and taxing that threatened to snuff it out.

I've relied on your support in the past, and on behalf of all those in America who yearn for the day when we can balance the Federal budget, I'm calling on you again. Make sure your Senators and Congressmen understand you know where deficits come from. Every dollar in those deficits was voted into law through one spending bill or another, and it's got to stop. We're not even asking to cut spending below current levels; we just propose slowing the rate of increase to a saner level.

Above all, call on them to put aside partisan politics and join together in a common crusade to fulfill the will of the American people -- to limit the size, scope, and interference of the Federal Government. Our economic policies have begun to work because they're based on good, old-fashioned common sense. They're founded on solid, time-tested economic principles that have produced prosperity in this country every time we've tried them. And, lo and behold, once they've got America on the mend.

Two years ago, with your help, we built a bipartisan consensus around our program for economic recovery, and the Congress passed its basic reforms. Our task today is to hold the Congress to its words so we can keep our recovery on track and restore the American dream. And together, I know we can do it.

The President today announced that the U.S. Government fully endorses and will facilitate commercial operations of Expendable Launch Vehicles (ELV's) by the U.S. private sector. This policy applies to both those ELV's previously developed for U.S. Government use, as well as new space launch systems developed specifically for commercial applications. This policy is consistent with the President's National Space Policy and represents a positive step toward encouraging U.S. private sector investment and involvement in civil space activities.

The U.S. Government will license, supervise, and/or regulate U.S. commercial ELV operations only to the extent required to meet its national and international obligations and to ensure public safety. Commercial ELV operators must comply with applicable international, national, and local laws and regulations including security, safety, and environmental requirements.

The U.S. Government encourages the use of its national ranges for U.S. commercial ELV operations. Commercial launch operations conducted from a U.S. Government national range will, at a minimum, be subject to existing U.S. Government range regulations and requirements.

Consistent with its needs and requirements, the U.S. Government will identify and make available, on a reimbursable basis, facilities, equipment, tooling, and services that are required to support the production and operation of U.S. commercial ELV's.

The U.S. Government will have priority use of U.S. Government facilities and support services to meet national security and critical mission requirements. The U.S. Government will make all reasonable efforts to minimize impacts on commercial operations.

The U.S. Government will not subsidize the commercialization of ELV's but will price the use of its facilities, equipment, and services consistent with the goal of encouraging viable commercial ELV launch activities.

The U.S. Government will encourage free market competition among the various systems and concepts within the U.S. private sector. The U.S. Government will provide equitable treatment for all commercial launch operators for the sale or lease of government equipment and facilities consistent with its economic, foreign policy, and national security interests.

The U.S. Government will review and approve any proposed commercial launch facility and range as well as subsequent operations conducted therefrom. Near-term demonstration or test flights of commercial launch vehicles conducted from other than a U.S. Government national range will be reviewed and approved on a case-by-case basis using existing licensing authority and procedures.

Notwithstanding the U.S. Government policy to encourage and facilitate private sector ELV entry into the space launch market, the U.S. Government will continue to make the space shuttle available for all authorized users -- domestic and foreign, commercial and governmental -- subject to U.S. Government needs and priorities. Through FY 1988, the price of STS flights will be maintained in accordance with the currently established NASA pricing policies in order to provide market stability and assure fair competition. Beyond this period, it is the U.S. Government's intent to establish a full cost recovery policy for commercial and foreign STS flight operations.

Working Group will be composed of members representing the SIG (Space) agencies and observers as well as other affected agencies. Additional membership, at a minimum, will include the Federal Aviation Administration and the Federal Communications Commission. This group will be used to (a) streamline the procedures used in the interim to implement existing licensing authority, (b) develop and coordinate the requirements and process for the licensing, supervision, and/or regulations applicable to routine commercial launch operations from commercial ranges, and (c) recommend the appropriate lead agency within the U.S. Government to be responsible for commercial launch activities. Until a final selection of the lead agency is made, the Department of State will serve as the U.S. Government focal point for all inquiries and requests relative to seeking U.S. Government approval for commercial ELV activities.

This 4-month interagency study concluded that a U.S. commercial ELV capability would offer substantial benefits to the Nation and would be consistent with the goals and objectives of the President's space policy.

